 Capital Holding Corp. said it requested and received the resignation of John A. Franco, its vice chairman, as an officer and a director of the life insurance holding company.  The company said Mr. Franco developed a plan to establish a business that might be competitive with Capital Holding Corp.'s Accumulation and Investment Group, which Mr. Franco headed.  The group temporarily will report to Irving W. Bailey II, chairman, president and chief executive officer of Capital Holding.  Mr. Franco, 47 years old, said in a telephone interview that he has been considering and discussing a number of possible business ventures, but that "nothing is at a mature stage."  He said he "didn't argue with" the company's decision to seek his resignation because contemplating outside business ventures can distract an executive from performing his best "at the job he is paid to do."  Martin H. Ruby, a managing director of Capital Holding's Accumulation and Investment Group, also resigned to pursue other business interests, Capital Holding said.  Mr. Ruby, 39, said that he had "an amicable parting" with Capital Holding and that he has "a number of ventures in the financial-services area" under consideration.  He said that his resignation was a mutual decision with Capital Holding management, but that he wasn't actually asked to resign.  The Accumulation and Investment Group is responsible for the investment operations of all Capital Holding's insurance businesses and markets guaranteed investment contracts to bank trust departments and other institutions.  It also sells single-premium annuities to individuals.  Mr. Bailey said he expects to name a new group president to head that operation following the Nov. 8 board meeting.  @ Money Market Deposits-a 6.23%  @ Super-NOW Accounts-a 5.04%  @ Six-month Certificates-a 8.00%  @ One-year Certificates-a 7.93%  @ Thirty-month Accounts-a 7.90%  @ Five-Year Certificates-a 7.81%  @ U.S. Savings Bonds-b 7.81%  a-Average rate paid yesterday by 100 large banks and thrifts in the 10 largest metropolitan areas as compiled by Bank Rate Monitor.  b-Current annual yield.  Guaranteed minimum 6%.  (During its centennial year, The Wall Street Journal will report events of the past century that stand as milestones of American business history.)  PLASTIC PENCILS, CODE-NAMED E-71, made their hush-hush debut in children's pencil boxes at five-and-dime stores in 1973.  But few knew it then and most still think all pencils are wooden.  Eagle Pencil of Shelbyville, Tenn., "Pencil City U.S.A.," had made its earliest pilot plastic pencils in 1971.  But it wasn't until after it hired Arthur D. Little, a Cambridge, Mass., research concern, that its new product was refined for commercial sale in 1973.  Three A.D.L. inventors applied April 6, 1973, for the patent, which was assigned and awarded in 1976 to Hasbro Industries, then Eagle's parent.  Pencil pushers chew and put the plastic models behind their ears just like traditional pencils made of glued strips of California incense cedar filled with ceramic lead.  It takes five steps to make standard pencils, just one for the plastic type.  Automated machines coextrude long plastic sheaths with graphite-plastic cores that are printed, cut, painted and eraser-fitted.  "After more than 200 years, something new has happened to pencils," said Arthur D. Little in a 1974 report that publicly described the previously secret item.  Eagle's plastic type sharpens and looks like a wooden pencil.  A major difference is that a snapped wooden pencil will have a slivered break while a plastic model will break cleanly.  The softness of the core constrains the plastic models to No. 1, No. 2 or No. 3-type pencils, which account for the bulk of the market.  Artists and draftsmen need harder "leads."  Eagle, now called Eagle-Berol, remains a leading company among the 10 in the U.S. that produced about 2.3 billion pencils last year, according to the Pencil Makers Association.  It's a trade secret how many were plastic, and most writers still don't know what they're using.  H.F. Ahmanson & Co., the nation's largest thrift holding company, posted a 12% earnings decline for the third quarter while another large California savings and loan, Great Western Financial Corp., reported a slight earnings gain.  H.F. Ahmanson, parent of Home Savings of America, reported third-quarter net of $49.2 million, or 50 cents a share, down from $56.1 million, or 57 cents a share, in the year-earlier period.  Most of the earnings decline reflected an increase in the company's effective tax rate to 44% from 37% in the year-ago third quarter when nonrecurring tax credits were recorded, the company said.  Pretax earnings declined 1.3%.  For the nine months, Los Angeles-based H. F. Ahmanson had profit of $128.1 million, or $1.29 a share, a 4.6% decline from earnings of $134.2 million in the year-ago nine months.  The company said the decline was attributable to a 79% reduction in net gains on loan sales this year.  Third-quarter spreads widened to the highest level in two years as loan portfolio yields rose and money costs declined, the company said.  Great Western Financial said third-quarter profit rose slightly to $68.4 million, or 52 cents a share, from $67.9 million, or 53 cents a share, from a year ago.  Great Western, based in Beverly Hills, Calif., is a financial services firm and parent to Great Western Bank, an S&L.  Great Western said it had a sharp increase in margins in the recent third quarter.  Margins are the difference between the yield on the company's earning assets and its own cost of funds.  But a reduction in one-time gains on the sale of various assets and an increase in the company's provision for loan losses held down the earnings gain, the company said.  Great Western's provision for loan losses was increased to $27.9 million for the recent quarter compared with $21.8 million a year ago primarily as a result of "continued weakness in various commercial and multifamily real estate markets outside California."  For the nine months Great Western posted net of $177.5 million, or $1.37 a share, a 5.9% decline from $188.7 million, or $1.48 a share, in the year-ago period.  Dun & Bradstreet Corp. posted a 15% rise in third-quarter earnings.  But revenue declined more than 2%, reflecting in part a continuing drop in sales of credit services in the wake of controversy over the company's sales practices.  The information company also cited the stronger dollar, the sale last year of its former Official Airline Guides unit and other factors.  Net income rose to a record $155.3 million, or 83 cents a share, from $134.8 million, or 72 cents a share.  Revenue fell to $1.04 billion from $1.07 billion.  In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange, Dun & Bradstreet closed yesterday at $53.75, down 25 cents a share.  Analysts said the results were as expected, but several added that the earnings masked underlying weaknesses in several businesses.  "The quality of earnings wasn't as high as I expected," said Eric Philo, an analyst for Goldman, Sachs & Co.  For example, he noted, operating profit was weaker than he had anticipated, but nonoperating earnings of $14.6 million and a lower tax rate helped boost net income.  Dun & Bradstreet said operating earnings rose 8%, excluding the sale of Official Airline Guides.  Third-quarter sales of U.S. credit services were "disappointingly below sales" of a year earlier, Dun & Bradstreet said.  As previously reported, those sales have been declining this year in the wake of allegations that the company engaged in unfair sales practices that encouraged customers to overpurchase services.  The company has denied the allegations but has negotiated a proposed $18 million settlement of related lawsuits.  Analysts predict the sales impact will linger.  "There isn't much question there will continue to be a ripple effect," said John Reidy, an analyst with Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc.  Dun & Bradstreet noted that price competition in its Nielsen Marketing Research, Nielsen Clearing House and Donnelley Marketing businesses also restrained revenue growth.  It cited cyclical conditions in its Moody's Investors Service Inc. and D&B Plan Services units.  For the nine months, net income rose 19% to $449 million, or $2.40 a share, from $375.9 million, or $2.01 a share, a year earlier.  Year-earlier earnings reflected costs of $14.3 million related to the acquisition of IMS International.  Revenue rose slightly to $3.16 billion from $3.13 billion.  Control Data Corp. said it licensed its airline yield-management software to the International Air Transport Association.  Terms include a royalty arrangement, but details weren't disclosed.  The computer equipment and financial services company said IATA, a trade group, will sell access to the package to its 180 airline members world-wide.  Control Data will receive revenue linked to the number of passengers served by the software, IATA said.  The package helps carriers solve pricing problems, such as how to react to discounts offered by competitors or what would be the optimum number of seats to offer at a given price.  Wheeling-Pittsburgh Steel Corp. said it decided to proceed with installation of automatic gauge and shape controls at its 60-inch tandem cold rolling mill in Allenport, Pa.  The new equipment, which will produce steel sheet with more uniform thickness and flatness, is likely to cost more than $20 million, the company said.  When the company last considered adding the equipment two years ago, it estimated the cost at $21 million to $22 million, but a task force will have to prepare a detailed plan before the company can predict the current cost.  The time schedule for installing the equipment also will be developed by the task force, the company said.  Sir Richard Butler, 60-year-old chairman of Agricola (U.K.) Ltd., was named chairman of County NatWest Investment Management Ltd., the investment management subsidiary of County NatWest Ltd., the investment banking arm of this British bank.  Sir Richard succeeds John Plastow, who resigned in July.  Sir Richard is also a non-executive director at National Westminister Bank and NatWest Investment Bank Ltd.  In the long, frightening night after Tuesday's devastating earthquake, Bay Area residents searched for comfort and solace wherever they could.  Some found it on the screen of a personal computer.  Hundreds of Californians made their way to their computers after the quake, and checked in with each other on electronic bulletin boards, which link computers CB-radio-style, via phone lines.  Some of the most vivid bulletins came over The Well, a Sausalito, Calif., board that is one of the liveliest outposts of the electronic underground.  About two-thirds of the Well's 3,000 subscribers live in the Bay Area.  The quake knocked The Well out for six hours, but when it came back up, it teemed with emotional first-hand reports.  Following are excerpts from the electronic traffic that night.  The time is Pacific Daylight Time, and the initials or nicknames are those subscribers use to identify themselves.  11:54 p.m. JCKC: Wow] I was in the avenues, on the third floor of an old building, and except for my heart (Beat, BEAT]) I'm OK. Got back to Bolinas, and everything had fallen: broken poster frames with glass on the floor, file cabinets open or dumped onto the floor.  11:59 p.m. JKD: I was in my favorite watering hole, waiting for the game to start.  I felt the temblor begin and glanced at the table next to mine, smiled that guilty smile and we both mouthed the words, "Earth-quake]" together.  That's usually how long it takes for the temblors to pass.  This time, it just got stronger and then the building started shaking violently up and down as though it were a child's toy block that was being tossed.  12:06 a.m. HRH: I was in the Berkeley Main library when it hit.  Endless seconds wondering if those huge windows would buckle and shower us with glass.  Only a few books fell in the reading room.  Then the auto paint shop fire sent an evil-looking cloud of black smoke into the air.  12:07 a.m. ONEZIE: My younger daughter and I are fine.  This building shook like hell and it kept getting stronger.  Except for the gas tank at Hustead's Towing Service exploding and burning in downtown Berkeley, things here are quite peaceful.  A lot of car alarms went off.  The cats are fine, although nervous.  12:15 a.m. DHAWK: Huge fire from broken gas main in the Marina in SF. Areas that are made of `fill' liquefy.  A woman in a three-story apartment was able to walk out the window of the third floor onto street level after the quake.  The house just settled right down into the ground.  12:38 a.m. DAYAC: I was driving my truck, stopped at a red light at the corner of Shattuck and Alcatraz at the Oakland-Berkeley border when it hit.  Worst part was watching power lines waving above my head and no way to drive away.  12:48 a.m. LMEYER: Was 300 ft. out on a pier in San Rafael.  It flopped all around, real dramatic] Many hairline cracks in the concrete slabs afterwards.  Ruined the damn fishing]  1:00 a.m. HEYNOW: I rode it out on the second floor of Leo's at 55th and Telegraph in Oakland.  I heard parts of the building above my head cracking.  I actually thought that I might die.  I couldn't decide if I should come home to Marin, because my house is on stilts.  I decided to brave the storm.  There was a horrible smell of gas as I passed the Chevron refinery before crossing the Richmond-San Rafael Bridge.  I could also see the clouds across the bay from the horrible fire in the Marina District of San Francisco.  I have felt many aftershocks.  My back is still in knots and my hands are still shaking.  I think a few of the aftershocks might just be my body shaking.  1:11 a.m. GR8FLRED: I could see the flames from San Francisco from my house across the bay.  It's hard to believe this really is happening.  1:11 a.m. RD: Building on the corner severely damaged, so an old lady and her very old mother are in the guest room.  Books and software everywhere.  This being typed in a standing position.  1:20 a.m. DGAULT: Bolinas -- astride the San Andreas Fault.  Didn't feel a thing, but noticed some strange bird behavior.  Duck swarms.  3:25 a.m. SAMURAI: I just felt another aftershock a few seconds ago.  I'm just numb.  3:25 a.m. MACPOST: Downtown Bolinas seems to be the part of town that's worst off.  No power, minimal phones, and a mess of mayonnaise, wine, and everything else all over the floors of the big old general store and the People's Co-op.  The quivers move through my house every few minutes at unpredictable intervals, and the mouse that's been living in my kitchen has taken refuge under my desk.  It runs out frantically now and then, and is clearly pretty distressed.  I was in Stinson Beach when the quake rolled through town.  At first, we were unfazed.  Then as things got rougher, we ran for the door and spent the next few minutes outside watching the brick sidewalk under our feet oozing up and down, and the flowers waving in an eerie rhythm.  Amazing what it does to one's heart rate and one's short-term memory.  Everyone looked calm, but there was this surreal low level of confusion as the aftershocks continued.  4:02 a.m. SHIBUMI: Power is back on, and UCSF {medical center} seems to have quieted down for the night (they were doing triage out in the parking lot from the sound and lights of it).  A friend of mine was in an underground computer center in downtown SF when the quake hit.  He said that one of the computers took a three-foot trip sliding across the floor.  Today should be interesting as people realize how hard life is going to be here for a while.  4:30 a.m. KIM: I got home, let the dogs into the house and noticed some sounds above my head, as if someone were walking on the roof, or upstairs.  Then I noticed the car was bouncing up and down as if someone were jumping on it.  I realized what was happening and screamed into the house for the dogs.  Cupboard doors were flying, the trash can in the kitchen walked a few feet, the dogs came running, and I scooted them into the dog run and stood in the doorway myself, watching the outside trash cans dance across the concrete.  When I realized it was over, I went and stood out in front of the house, waiting and praying for Merrill to come home, shivering as if it were 20 below zero until he got there.  Never in my life have I been so frightened.  When I saw the pictures of 880 and the Bay Bridge, I began to cry.  5:09 a.m. JROE: The Sunset {District} was more or less like a pajama party all evening, lots of people & dogs walking around, drinking beer.  6:50 a.m. CAROLG: I was just sitting down to meet with some new therapy clients, a couple, and the building started shaking like crazy.  It's a flimsy structure, built up on supports, and it was really rocking around.  The three of us stopped breathing for a moment, and then when it kept on coming we lunged for the doorway.  Needless to say, it was an interesting first session]  7:13 a.m. CALLIOPE: Albany escaped embarrassingly unscathed.  Biggest trouble was scared family who couldn't get a phone line through, and spent a really horrible hour not knowing.  8:01 a.m. HLR: Judy and I were in our back yard when the lawn started rolling like ocean waves.  We ran into the house to get Mame, but the next tremor threw me in the air and bounced me as I tried to get to my feet.  We are all fine here, although Mame was extremely freaked.  Kitchen full of broken crystal.  Books and tapes all over my room.  Not one thing in the house is where it is supposed to be, but the structure is fine.  While I was standing on the lawn with Mame, waiting for another tremor, I noticed that all the earthworms were emerging from the ground and slithering across the lawn]  9:31 a.m. GR8FLRED: It's amazing how one second can so completely change your life.  9:38 a.m. FIG: I guess we're all living very tentatively here, waiting for the expected but dreaded aftershock.  It's hard to accept that it's over and only took 15 seconds.  I wonder when we'll be able to relax.  9:53 a.m. PANDA: Flesh goes to total alert for flight or fight.  Nausea seems a commonplace symptom.  Berkeley very quiet right now.  I walked along Shattuck between Delaware and Cedar at a few minutes before eight this morning.  Next to Chez Panisse a homeless couple, bundled into a blue sleeping bag, sat up, said, "Good morning" and then the woman smiled, said, "Isn't it great just to be alive?"  I agreed.  It is.  Great.  Georgia-Pacific Corp., exceeding some analysts' expectations, said third-quarter earnings rose 56% to $178 million, or $2.03 a share, from $114 million, or $1.19 a share, in the year-earlier period.  Sales increased 10% to $2.65 billion from $2.41 billion.  Per-share earnings were enhanced by the company's share buy-back program, which reduced the average shares outstanding to 87.5 million in the quarter from 95.8 million in the same quarter of 1988.  With strong prices in the company's two major areas -- building products as well as pulp and paper -- analysts had expected a roaring quarter.  But the performance exceeded some estimates of around $1.90 a share.  Fueling the growth, among other things, were higher-than-expected prices for certain building products.  One reason: efforts to protect the spotted owl led to restrictions on logging in the Pacific Northwest, constricting supply and forcing prices up.  Another reason: strikes, both at Georgia-Pacific and other lumber companies also cut supplies and raised prices, analysts said.  For the nine months, Georgia-Pacific's earnings increased 49% to $504 million, or $5.58 a share, from $338 million, or $3.41 a share.  Sales rose 11% to $7.73 billion from $6.94 billion.  In composite New York Stock Exchange Trading, Georgia-Pacific stock rose $1.25 a share yesterday to close at $58.  The House Public Works and Transportation Committee approved a bill that would give the Transportation Department power to block airline leveraged buy-outs, despite a clear veto threat from the Bush administration.  The 23-5 vote clears the way for consideration on the House floor next week or the week after.  Transportation Secretary Samuel Skinner, in a letter to the committee, warned that he would urge President Bush to veto the legislation if it passed Congress.  The Senate Commerce Committee already has approved similar legislation.  On Monday, a letter from Mr. Skinner's deputy, Elaine Chao, said the administration opposed the legislation "in its present form."  Some of the bill's supporters had taken heart from the fact that the letter wasn't signed by Mr. Skinner and that it didn't contain a veto threat.  The stepped-up administration warnings annoyed some lawmakers, especially senior Republicans who supported the bill because they thought the Transportation Department favored it.  "We backed this bill because we thought it would help Skinner," one Republican said, "and now we're out there dangling in the wind."  A few weeks ago, Mr. Skinner testified before Congress that it would be "cleaner, more efficient" if he had authority to block buy-outs in advance.  But he never took an official position on the bill and has steadfastly maintained that he already has enough authority to deal with buy-outs.  Under the committee bill, the Transportation secretary would have 30 days, and an additional 20 days if needed, to review any proposed purchase of 15% or more of a major U.S. airline's voting stock.  The secretary would be required to block an acquisition if he concluded that it would so weaken an airline financially that it would hurt safety or reduce the carrier's ability to compete, or if it gave control to a foreign interest.  Although the legislation would apply to any acquisition of a major airline, it is aimed at transactions financed by large amounts of debt.  Supporters of the bill are concerned an airline might sacrifice costly safety measures in order to repay debt.  The panel's action occurs in a politically charged atmosphere surrounding recent buy-out proposals, their apparent collapse and the volatile conditions in the stock market.  "It became apparent in hearings that there ought to be regulation of leveraged buy-outs of some sort," Rep. James Oberstar (D., Minn.), chairman of the House Aviation Subcommittee, said during the panel's deliberations.  "I don't believe in the airline business you can be totally laissez-faire because of the high degree of public interest" at stake.  But Mr. Skinner disagreed, calling the legislation "a retreat from the policy of deregulaton of the airline industry."  In his letter to Committee Chairman Glenn Anderson (D., Calif.), the secretary also said the bill "would be at odds with the administration's policies welcoming open foreign investment and market allocation of resources."  Currently, the Transportation Department doesn't have the authority to block a takeover in advance.  However, if the secretary concludes that a transaction has made a carrier unfit to operate, the department may revoke its certificate, grounding the airline.  Such authority is more than adequate, say opponents of the legislation.  But supporters argue that grounding an airline is so drastic that the department would hesitate doing it.  The panel rejected a proposal pushed by AMR Corp., the parent of American Airlines, to allow the Transportation secretary to block corporate raiders from waging proxy fights to oust boards that oppose a leveraged buy-out.  It also voted down proposals to give the secretary much more discretion on whether to block a buy-out and to require the department to consider the impact of a buy-out on workers.  London shares rallied to post strong gains after initial fears evaporated that the California earthquake would depress Wall Street prices.  Tokyo stocks, which rebounded strongly Tuesday, extended their gains yesterday, but most other Asian and Pacific markets closed sharply lower.  In London, the Financial Times-Stock Exchange 100-share index jumped 34.6 points to close at its intraday high of 2170.1.  The index was under pressure for most of the morning over concerns that the effects of Tuesday night's major earthquake in the San Francisco area would undermine the U.S. market.  The mood changed after dealers reappraised the direct impact of the disaster on shares and Wall Street rebounded from early losses.  The Financial Times 30-share index settled 27.8 points higher at 1758.5.  Volume was 449.3 million shares, the slowest of a hectic week, compared with 643.4 million Tuesday.  U.K. composite, or non-life, insurers, which some equity analysts said might be heavily hit by the earthquake disaster, helped support the London market by showing only narrow losses in early trading.  The insurers' relative resilience gave the market time to reappraise the impact of the California disaster on U.K. equities, dealers said.  Dealers said the market still hasn't shaken off its nervousness after its bumpy ride of the past several sessions, caused by interest-rate increases last week and Wall Street's 6.9% plunge Friday.  But technical factors, including modest gains in the value of the pound, helped draw buying back into the market and reverse losses posted a day earlier.  Among composite insurers, General Accident rose 10 pence to #10.03 ($15.80) a share, Guardian Royal climbed 5 to 217 pence, Sun Alliance rose 3 to 290, and Royal Insurance jumped 12 to 450.  Life insurers fared similarly, with Legal & General advancing 3 to 344, although Prudential fell 2 to 184 1/2.  Pearl Group rose 5 to 628, and Sun Life finished unchanged at #10.98.  Most banking issues retreated after a sector downgrade by Warburg Securities, although National Westminister showed strength on positive comments from brokerage firms about its long-term prospects.  NatWest, the most actively traded of the banks, finished at 300, up 1.  B.A.T Industries fell in early dealings but recovered to finish at 754, up 5.  Dealers said the market was nervous ahead of a special B.A.T holders' meeting today.  The session is to consider a defensive plan to spin off assets to fend off Sir James Goldsmith's #13.4 billion bid for B.A.T.  The recent stock market drop has shaken confidence in the plan, but dealers said the shares fell initially on questions about whether Mr. Goldsmith's highly leveraged bid will come to fruition.  Trading was suspended in WCRS Group, a U.K. advertising concern, pending an announcement that it is buying the remaining 50% of France's Carat Holding for 2.02 billion French francs ($318.7 million) and expanding commercial and equity ties with advertising group Eurocom.  Merchant banker Morgan Grenfell climbed 14 to 406 on renewed takeover speculation.  S.G. Warburg, also mentioned in the rumor mill, jumped 14 at to 414.  Jaguar advanced 19 to 673 as traders contemplated a potential battle between General Motors and Ford Motor for control of the U.K. luxury auto maker.  Tokyo's Nikkei index of 225 issues rose 111.48 points, or 0.32%, to 35107.56.  The index gained 527.39 Tuesday.  Volume was estimated at 800 million shares, compared with 678 million Tuesday.  Declining issues outnumbered advancers 505-455, with 172 unchanged.  The Tokyo Stock Price Index of all issues listed in the first section, which gained 41.76 Tuesday, was up 0.24 points, or 0.01%, at 2642.88.  In early trading in Tokyo Thursday, the Nikkei index rose 135.09 points to 35242.65.  On Wednesday, shares were pushed up by index-related buying on the part of investment trusts as well as small orders from individuals and corporations, traders said.  Institutions, meanwhile, stepped back to the sidelines as the direction of U.S. interest rates remained unclear.  The uncertainty was multiplied by the persistent strength of the dollar, traders said, and by the U.S. trade deficit, which widened by 31% in August from the previous month.  Traders and analysts said they didn't see any effect on Tokyo stocks from the California earthquake.  The impact on Japanese insurers and property owners with interests in the San Francisco area is still being assessed, they said.  Buying was scattered across a wide range of issues, making the session fairly characterless, traders said.  With uncertainty still hanging over interest rates and the dollar, the market failed to find a focus that might lead to further investor commitments, they said.  Some traders said the popularity of issues that gained yesterday won't last long, as investors will rotate their buying choices over the short term.  Interest rate-sensitive shares such as steel, construction and electric utility companies, which rose early in the week, saw their advance weaken yesterday.  Traders said these issues need large-volume buying to push up their prices, so substantial gains aren't likely unless institutional investors participate.  An outstanding issue in yesterday's session was Mitsubishi Rayon, which surged 95 to 905 yen ($6.34) a share.  Its popularity was due to speculation about the strong earnings potential of a new type of plastic wrap for household use, a trader at County Natwest Securities Japan said.  Some laggard food issues attracted bargain-hunters, traders said.  Kirin Brewery was up 100 at 2,000, and Ajinomoto gained 70 to 2,840.  Pharmaceuticals were mostly higher, with SS Pharmaceutical gaining 140 to 1,980.  Shares closed lower in other major Asian and Pacific markets, including Sydney, Hong Kong, Singapore, Taipei, Wellington, Seoul and Manila.  Most of those markets had rebounded the day before from Monday's slide.  But unlike the Tokyo exchange, they failed to extend the rise to a second session.  Elsewhere, prices surged for a second day in Frankfurt, closed higher in Zurich, Stockholm and Amsterdam and were broadly lower in Milan, Paris and Brussels.  South African gold stocks ended marginally firmer.  In Brussels, it was the first trading day for most major shares since stocks tumbled on Wall Street Friday.  Trading had been impeded by a major computer failure that took place before the start of Monday's session.  Here are price trends on the world's major stock markets, as calculated by Morgan Stanley Capital International Perspective, Geneva.  To make them directly comparable, each index is based on the close of 1969 equaling 100.  The percentage change is since year-end.  @ % This  @ Oct 17 Oct 16 Year  @ U.S. .......................... 313.4 315.1 + 22.4  @ Britain ....................... 637.2 645.7 + 16.7  @ Canada ........................ 427.3 430.3 + 16.4  @ Japan ......................... 1525.1 1500.4 + 7.4  @ France ........................ 515.4 516.6 + 16.4  @ Germany ....................... 236.8 221.9 + 13.9  @ Hong Kong ..................... 2042.4 1963.2 + 0.6  @ Switzerland ................... 214.3 206.8 + 23.9  @ Australia ..................... 332.3 321.3 + 14.5  @ World index ................... 526.6 522.3 + 6.5  Housing construction sank in September to its lowest level since the last recession, the Commerce Department reported.  Work began on homes and apartments at an annual rate of 1,263,000 units last month, down 5.2% from August, the department said.  The September decline followed an even steeper drop of 6.2% in August and left housing starts at their weakest since October 1982, when the country was nearing the end of a recession.  Originally the department had reported the August decline as 5%.  The numbers suggest that the housing industry is still suffering the effects of the Federal Reserve's battle against inflation.  The industry had shown signs of recovery this summer, after the central bank began to relax its clamp on credit, allowing interest rates to drop a bit after pushing them up for a year.  Sales of new homes rose and inventories of houses, which had been climbing, dropped.  But last month new construction in all types of homes waned, from single-family houses to large apartment complexes.  "It's pretty much weak across the board," said Martin Regalia, chief economist of the National Council of Savings Institutions.  Mr. Regalia said the industry may be reluctant to step up building at the moment for fear the inventories of unsold homes will increase again.  Another reason for the weakness, he said, may be that mortgage rates have hit a plateau since they began edging down after a peak in March.  In August, rates on 30-year fixed-rate mortgages started creeping up a bit, but they inched down again through September.  "Rates haven't really peeled off that much," Mr. Regalia said.  "We've kind of settled now into an interest-rate environment that's fairly high."  Work was begun on single family homes -- the core of the housing market -- at an annual rate of 971,000 in September, a drop of 2.1% from the previous month.  That followed a 3.3% decline in August.  Construction of apartments and other multi-family dwellings slipped 2.2% to an annual rate of 1,022,000 following a 3.5% decline in August.  The number of building permits issued for future construction dropped 2.4% to a 1,296,000 annual rate after rising 3.7% in August.  All the numbers were adjusted for normal seasonal variations in building activity.  The housing starts numbers, however, are one of the least precise of the government's economic indicators and are often revised significantly as more information is collected.  Shearson Lehman Hutton Holdings Inc. posted a sharp third-quarter turnaround from a year earlier, but net income would have dropped from the second quarter without a $37 million after-tax gain.  The securities firm posted third-quarter net of $66 million, or 64 cents a share, compared with a restated year-earlier loss of $3 million, or 11 cents a share.  Revenue climbed 25% to $3.3 billion from $2.6 billion.  The latest period included the gain, which was $77 million before tax, from the previously announced sale of the institutional money management business of Lehman Management Co.  The 1988 period was restated from net income of $8 million to correct an overstatement in the company's Boston Co. subsidiary.  In the 1989 second quarter, Shearson had net income of $55 million, or 54 cents a share.  An average 102.5 million common shares were outstanding in the latest quarter, up from 87.1 million.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Shearson shares lost 37.5 cents to $18.125.  The company said the improved performance from a year ago reflects higher commissions and revenue from marketmaking and trading for its own account.  Commission revenue was $522 million, up 49%.  But industrywide trading activity slowed in September as institutional investors turned cautious and individuals continued to shy away from the market.  Investment banking revenue fell 32% to $205 million, in part reflecting the continued slowdown of the underwriting business.  In the nine months, net fell 3% to $106 million, or 98 cents a share, from $110 million, or $1.05 a share.  Revenue advanced 26% to $9.6 billion from $7.6 billion.  Two major drug companies posted strong third-quarter earnings, in line with profits already reported by industry leaders and analysts' expectations.  But Pfizer Inc., based in New York, reported flat earnings.  Schering-Plough Corp., based in Madison, N.J., reported a 21% rise in earnings as American Home Products Corp. of New York posted an 11% increase in net.  American Home Products  American Home Products said sales and earnings for the third quarter and nine months were at record levels.  Sales for the third quarter increased 6.5% to $1.51 billion from $1.42 billion.  Sales of health-care products increased 6% in the third quarter, based in part on strong sales of prescription drugs such as Premarin, an estrogen-replacement drug, and sales of the company's infant formula.  American Home Products said net income benefited from a "lower effective tax rate," reflecting a reduction of foreign tax rates, and additional operations in Puerto Rico.  Net also was aided by a gain on the sale of the company's equity interests in South Africa effective Sept. 1.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, American Home Products closed at $102.25 a share, down 75 cents.  Pfizer  Pfizer said third-quarter sales increased 4% to $1.44 billion from $1.38 billion.  The company said net income was flat because of investment in research and development and costs related to launches of several products.  The company said the dollar's continued strengthening reduced world-wide sales growth by three percentage points.  Pfizer posted its largest gains in healthcare sales, up 3%, and consumer products, up 23%.  Sales by the specialty chemicals and materials science segments were flat, and sales by the agriculture segment declined 5%.  In the health-care segment, pharmaceutical sales increased 4% and sales of hospital products increased 1%.  During the quarter, Pfizer received federal approval of Procardia XL, a calcium channel blocker approved for both angina and hypertension, and Monorail Piccolino, used to open obstructed coronary arteries.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Pfizer closed at $67.75 a share, up 75 cents.  Schering-Plough  Schering-Plough said sales gained 2.7% to $743.7 million from $724.4 million.  In the period, the company completed the sale of its European cosmetics businesses, sold a majority interest in its Brazilian affiliate, and announced the reorganization of its over-the-counter drug businesses into a new unit, Schering-Plough Health Care Products.  These actions didn't affect results because the gain on the sale of the European cosmetics businesses was offset by provisions relating to the Brazil divestiture and drug restructuring.  U.S. pharmaceutical sales rose 15%, led by allergy, asthma and cold products; dermatological products; anti-infectives and anti-cancer products; and cardiovascular products.  World-wide consumer product sales declined 12%, primarily because of the European cosmetics sale.  Significantly lower sales of `Stay Trim' diet aids also were a factor in the drop.  The Maybelline beauty product line had higher sales following a sluggish first half.  In Big Board composite trading, Schering-Plough shares fell 75 cents to close at $74.125.  ---  @ 1989 1988  @ in per in per %  @ millions share millions share chg.  @ THIRD-QUARTER NET INCOME  @Schering .......... $114.0 $1.01 $94.4 $0.84 + 21  @Amer.  Home ........ 266.2 1.80 240.7 1.65 + 11  @Pfizer ............ 217.5 1.29 216.8 1.29 + 0.3  @ NINE-MONTHS NET INCOME  @Schering .......... $360.2 $3.20 $296.9 $2.65 + 21  @Amer.  Home ........ 766.7 5.21 693.5 4.75 + 11  @Pfizer ............ 594.0 3.52 649.7 3.86 - 8.5  Swedish auto and aerospace concern Saab-Scania AB said it received a 250 million krona ($39 million) order from Swiss Crossair, one of Europe's leading regional air companies, for five Saab 340B turboprop commuter aircraft.  It is quite unfortunate that you failed so miserably in reporting the Hurricane Hugo disaster.  Your Sept. 27 page-one article "Charleston Lost Quite a Lot to Hugo, Especially Gentility" leaves the impression that the storm was little more than an inconvenience.  The damage reported focused on a select few who owned irreplaceable historic homes on the Battery.  Not mentioned were the 50,000 people rendered homeless, and the more than 200,000 out of work for an indeterminable period; the $1 billion-plus in losses to homes and personal property on the barrier islands; the near- and long-term impact on the state's largest industry, tourism, not to mention the human suffering.  In centering on the disruption of a few proud local customs such as the historichomes tour and the damage to the antiquities, your reporter served to only perpetuate an outdated and stereotypically provincial view of this otherwise thriving port city.  The damage will undoubtedly prove to be one of the epic human and economic disasters of the decade in this country.  David M. Carroll  Columbia, S.C.  ---  Your story was tasteless and insensitive.  Depicting the people of a traumatized city reeling from a disaster of unprecedented proportions was at the very best ludicrous under the circumstances.  Your narrow focus appears to be a contrived attempt to show the people of that historic city to be doddering fools.  You had to have been blind not to see the scenario there for what it was and is and will continue to be for months and even years -- a part of South Carolina that has sustained a blow that the Red Cross expects will cost that organization alone some $38 million.  William C. Barksdale Jr.  Columbia, S.C.  ---  Charleston is historic and aristocratic, as your reporter said, but not haughty, as he suggested.  Charlestonians are instead indomitable and have contributed mightily to the culture and history of our country for more than 300 years.  I suggest your reporter see Charleston next spring in its full glory.  William C. Stuart III  Silver Spring, Md.  Affiliated Bankshares of Colorado Inc. said it agreed to sell its 10% interest in Rocky Mountain Bankcard Systems for $18.5 million to Colorado National Bank of Denver and Central Bank of Denver.  Colorado National is a unit of Colorado National Bankshares Inc. and Central is a unit of First Bank System of Minneapolis.  Affiliated said it expects to record a pretax gain of about $18.5 million from the sale of the credit-card business, which should more than offset any reduction in the carrying value of real estate and real-estate loans on its books.  The U.S. Export-Import Bank tentatively decided to guarantee commercial bank financing for the purchase of two Boeing Co. 767 airliners by Avianca, Colombia's international airline, at a cost of about $150 million.  The loan guarantee would amount to about $127.5 million, or 85% of the cost of the aircraft.  Because of the size of the proposed loan guarantee, the Ex-Im Bank's preliminary commitment is subject to review by the House and Senate Banking committees.  Ex-Im Bank officials said this review process currently is under way.  Sebastian Guzman Cabrera took over the oil workers union, Mexico's most powerful labor organization, only last January.  But even in that short time Mr. Guzman Cabrera has become as controversial in his own way as his deposed predecessor, Joaquin Hernandez Galicia, known as La Quina.  President Carlos Salinas de Gortari used the army to oust La Quina, who reigned for 28 years over a graft-riddled empire that made state-run Petroleos Mexicanos, or Pemex, one of the world's most inefficient oil companies.  Now, Mr. Guzman Cabrera is facing accusations that he's as much a company man as La Quina was a crook.  In recent contract negotiations with Pemex management, Mr. Guzman Cabrera accepted major concessions that greatly curtail the union's role in subcontracting, long a source of millions of dollars in illicit earnings.  And with the quiet pragmatism of Mr. Guzman Cabrera replacing the prickly populism of La Quina, government technocrats have been given a free hand to open the petrochemical sector to wider private and foreign investment.  Mr. Guzman Cabrera's new order hasn't arrived without resistance.  Brawls between union factions still erupt at Pemex installations.  Leftist leader Cuauhtemoc Cardenas publicly questioned Mr. Guzman Cabrera's "moral quality," suggesting he is part of a conspiracy to turn over the country's oil, a symbol of Mexican nationalism, to foreigners.  The 61-year-old Mr. Guzman Cabrera takes such criticisms in stride.  "This isn't a new kind of union leadership, it's a new Mexico.  We're no longer afraid of associating with private or foreign capital," he says.  Pemex, which produces 40% of government revenue, desperately needs new investment.  Since world oil prices collapsed in 1982, the government has siphoned Pemex's coffers to make payments on Mexico's $97 billion foreign debt.  Little money has been returned to upgrade Pemex's aging facilities.  While the government drains Pemex from above, the union has drained it from below.  A bloated payroll and pervasive graft caused Pemex's operating costs to balloon to 95 cents of each $1 in sales, far above the industry norm.  The declines in investment and efficiency explain in part why Mexico has been importing gasoline this year.  Some projections show Mexico importing crude by the end of the century, barring an overhaul of operations.  "Whatever you tried to change, whether it was cutting costs or attracting new partners, the big obstacle was the old union leadership," says oil consultant George Baker.  Enter Mr. Guzman Cabrera, who has a clear understanding of where union leaders fit in the pro-enterprise regime of President Salinas.  "I'm the secretary-general, if there is one," he says, greeting a visitor to his office.  Beginning as a laborer in a refinery, Mr. Guzman Cabrera put in more than 40 years at Pemex before being pushed into retirement by La Quina after a dispute two years ago.  Though he also long benefited from the system built by La Quina, Mr. Guzman Cabrera says union perks had simply gotten out of hand.  They are "at the base of all of the problems of corruption," he says.  Thus, in recent contract negotiations, Mr. Guzman Cabrera gave up the union's right to assign 40% of all of Pemex's outside contracts -- an enormous source of kickbacks.  The union also ceded the 2% commission it had received on all Pemex maintenance contracts. (The union will keep a 2% commission on construction projects.)  The new contract also eliminates the $15 monthly coupon, good only at union-owned grocery stores, that was part of the salary of every worker, from roughneck to chief executive.  About 9,800 technical workers, notably chemists and lawyers, were switched to non-union status.  Also, because of its reduced capital budget, Pemex has phased out about 50,000 transitory construction workers, reducing the work force to about 140,000, the union leader says.  Mr. Guzman Cabrera says the union's sacrifices will be offset by a wage and benefit package that amounts to a 22% increase in compensation.  But Pemex managers are the ones most thrilled by the contract.  "We are retaking the instruments of administration," says Raul Robles, a Pemex subdirector.  Pemex officials wouldn't say how much money the new contract would save the company, but one previous government estimate pegged savings at around $500 million a year.  Pemex's customers also are pleased with the company's new spirit.  Grupo Desc, a big conglomerate, has long depended on Pemex petrochemicals to produce plastic packing material.  But when the Pemex plant shut down for an annual overhaul, it would never give notice to its customers.  "The capriciousness would completely disrupt our operations," says Ernesto Vega Velasco, Desc's finance director.  This year, for the first time, Desc and other customers were consulted well in advance of the Pemex plant's shutdown to ensure minimal inconvenience.  Taming the union complements previous moves by the government to attract private investment in petrochemicals, which Mexico has been forced to import in large quantities in recent years.  In May, the government unveiled new foreign investment regulations that create special trusts allowing foreigners, long limited to a 40% stake in secondary petrochemical companies, to own up to 100%.  Later, the government reclassified several basic petrochemicals as secondary products.  But Pemex's courtship with private companies, and especially foreign ones, is controversial in a country where oil has been a symbol of national sovereignty since foreign oil holdings were nationalized in 1938.  "They are preparing the workers for what's coming: foreign control," wrote Heberto Castillo, a leftist leader.  Mr. Guzman Cabrera and government officials insist that foreigners will be limited to investing in secondary petroleum products.  But the new union leader makes no apologies for Pemex's more outward-looking attitude.  "If we do not integrate into this new world of interdependence, sooner or later we're going to become victims of our own isolation," he says.  Couple Counseling  Grows to Defuse Stress  MORE EXECUTIVES and their spouses are seeking counseling as work and family pressures mount.  Some employers initiate referrals, especially if work problems threaten a top manager's job.  Many couples "are like ships passing in the night," a communications gulf that sparks problems on the job and at home, says psychologist Harry Levinson.  His Levinson Institute in Belmont, Mass., has seen in recent years a doubling in the number of executives and spouses at its weeklong counseling program.  Employers foot the bill, he says, figuring what's good for the couple is good for the company.  One East Coast manufacturing executive, faced with a job transfer his wife resented, found that counseling helped them both come to grips with the move.  And the vice president of a large Midwestern company realized that an abrasive temperament threatened his career when his wife confided that similar behavior at home harmed their marriage.  More dual-career couples also are getting help, with men increasingly bringing their working wives for joint counseling.  "The level of stress for a woman is often so high, it's the husband who says, 'I'm worried about her,'" says psychologist Marjorie Hansen Shaevitz.  Her Institute for Family and Work Relationships in La Jolla, Calif., has noted a doubling in the number of couples seeking help the past two years.  "No matter how competent and smart you both are, the relationship almost certainly will erode if you don't have time to talk, to have fun and to be sexual," says Ms. Shaevitz.  She urges client couples to begin a "detoxification" period, purging social and other nonproductive activities and setting time apart for themselves.  "Putting those times on the calendar," she says, "is as important as remembering business appointments."  Power of Suggestion  Stronger in Japan  HERE'S ONE more explanation for why Japan is a tough industrial competitor: Two of three Japanese employees submit suggestions to save money, increase efficiency and boost morale, while only 8% of American workers do.  And the Japanese make far more suggestions -- 2,472 per 100 eligible employees vs. only 13 per 100 employees in the U.S.  Data for 1987 from the National Association of Suggestion Systems and the Japan Human Relations Association also indicate that Japanese employers adopt four of five suggestions, while their U.S. counterparts accept just one in four.  In Japan, small suggestions are encouraged.  Each new employee is expected to submit four daily in the first few months on the job.  U.S. companies tend to favor suggestions "that go for the home runs," says Gary Floss, vice president of corporate quality at Control Data Corp.  That helps explain why American employers grant an average award of $604.72 per suggestion, while Japan's payment is $3.23.  Still, suggestions' net savings per 100 employees is $274,475 in Japan vs. $24,891 in the U.S.  U.S. companies developing management teams are wrestling with how to handle individual suggestion systems.  Control Data, for one, plays down its employee suggestion program because it favors the team-management focus.  Merger Fallout: Beware  Employee Dishonesty  CORPORATE security directors increasingly worry that merger mania spawns a rise in employee dishonesty.  A Security magazine survey places the effect of takeovers and buy-outs among the industry's 10 biggest challenges.  "If it causes management to take their eye off the ball, inventory shrinkage is going to be affected," says Lewis Shealy, vice president for loss prevention at Marshall Field's, the department store chain.  A separate study of the extent of employee misconduct linked general job satisfaction to property loss.  Co-author Richard Hollinger cites what happened at one family-owned company absorbed by a foreign giant.  Pilferage climbed dramatically as many angry employees "felt abandoned by the former owners," says the University of Florida sociologist.  But top management should watch for other tell-tale signs of employee misdeeds, like expense-account fudging and phone misuse.  Security consultant Dennis Dalton of Ventura, Calif., thinks mergers often trigger longer lunch hours and increased absenteeism, conduct which can sap the bottom line more than thefts.  New management can take several steps to reduce dishonesty.  Most important, experts say, is to show that a company's ethical tone is set at the top.  Mr. Dalton also recommends that the chief executive establish a rumor control center and move swiftly to bolster morale.  Consultant John Keller of Southlake, Texas, urges that top management adopt a "tough hands-on approach" with very tight controls and monitoring.  And security authority Robert L. Duston favors disciplining all employees who cheat.  Firms Walk Fine Line  In Distributing Profits  ARE CORPORATE profits distributed fairly?  A survey by Sirota, Alper & Pfau, a New York consulting firm, underscores the difficulty for top management in satisfying employees and investors on that score.  Nearly seven of 10 investors think companies reinvest "too little" of their profits in the business.  And half the employees surveyed think companies dole out too little to them.  But both see a common enemy: About 66% of employees and 73% of investors think senior managers get too big a slice of the profit pie.  Bank of New York Co. said it agreed in principle to acquire the credit-card business of Houston-based First City Bancorp. of Texas for between $130 million and $134 million.  The move, subject to a definitive agreement, is part of a trend by big-city banks that have been buying up credit-card portfolios to expand their business.  Just last month, a Bank of New York subsidiary agreed to buy the credit-card operation of Dreyfus Corp.'s Dreyfus Consumer Bank for $168 million, a transaction that is expected to be completed by the end of the year.  First City's portfolio includes approximately 640,000 accounts with about $550 million in loans outstanding.  First City, which issues both MasterCard and Visa cards, has agreed to act as an agent bank.  At the end of the third quarter, Bank of New York's credit-card business consisted of 2.4 million accounts with $3.6 billion in loans outstanding.  Bank of New York is currently the seventh-largest issuer of credit cards in the U.S.  First City said that because of increased competition in the credit-card business, it had decided it either had to expand its own holdings substantially or sell them.  "We think there's a good prospect that competition is going to get pretty fierce in this market," said James E. Day, a First City vice president.  "We see it becoming a bargain-basement kind of business."  The company estimated that the transaction would enhance its book value, which stood at $28.55 a share on Sept. 30, by more than $100 million, or about $4 a share.  The company also said the transaction would bolster after-tax earnings by $3.25 a share when completed and boost its primary capital ratio to 7% from 6.63%.  First City, which recently purchased three small Texas banking concerns, said it would use the proceeds to pursue additional expansion opportunities in the Southwest and elsewhere.  With that possibility in mind, analysts said the transaction was a positive move for First City.  "I think they'll be able to move faster to make acquisitions in Texas," said Brent Erensel, an analyst with Donaldson, Lufkin & Jenrette.  "That's something they can do very well."  British Airways PLC said it is seeking improved terms and a sharply lower price in any revised bid for United Airlines parent UAL Corp. following the collapse of a $6.79 billion, $300-a-share buy-out bid.  Derek Stevens, British Air's chief financial officer, told Dow Jones Professional Investor Report a price of $230 a share is "certainly not too low," and indicated his company would like to reduce the size of its $750 million cash investment.  He added the airline isn't committed to going forward with any new bid, and hasn't participated in bankers' efforts to revive the transaction that collapsed.  "We're in no way committed to a deal going through at all.  We're not rushing into anything.  We don't want to be party to a second rejection," he said, adding that coming up with a revised offer could easily take several weeks.  Mr. Stevens's remarks, confirming a report in The Wall Street Journal that British Air wants to start from scratch in any new bid for the nation's second-largest airline, helped push UAL stock lower for the fourth straight day.  UAL fell $6.25 a share to $191.75 on volume of 2.3 million shares in composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange as concern deepened among takeover stock traders about the length of time it will take to revive the purchase.  Under the original buy-out approved by the UAL board Sept. 14, UAL's pilots planned to put up $200 million in cash and make $200 million in annual cost concessions for a 75% stake.  UAL management was to pay $15 million for 10%, and British Air was to receive a 15% stake.  The buy-out fell through when Citicorp and Chase Manhattan Corp. unexpectedly failed to obtain bank financing.  Since then, UAL stock has fallen 33% in what may rank as the largest collapse of a takeover stock ever.  The tenor of Mr. Stevens's remarks seemed to indicate that British Air will take a more active, high-profile role in pursuing any new bid.  He said he believes UAL management was badly advised on the funding of its original transaction.  Mr. Stevens said British Air hasn't received any new buy-out proposals from the labor-management group, led by UAL Chairman Stephen Wolf, and hasn't received any indication of when one might be forthcoming.  "As far as we're concerned, we're waiting for the dust to settle," he said.  Although British Air is waiting to see what the buy-out group comes up with, Mr. Stevens said a revised transaction with less debt leverage is likely to be more attractive to banks.  He said the original proposal is dead, and all aspects of a revised version are up for change, in light of the changes in UAL's market price, the amount of debt banks are willing to fund, and the price British Air would be willing to pay.  Mr. Stevens said he expects the new price will be considerably lower, but declined to specify a figure.  Asked whether a $230-a-share figure circulating in the market yesterday is too low, he said, "It's certainly not too low."  He added the original offer was "a pretty full price," and that British Air's contribution "was quite a large chunk for us."  British Air was originally attracted to the chance of obtaining a 15% stake in the company, but wasn't particularly happy with paying $750 million.  "If the {new} deal had us putting up less money but still having 15%, that would be a point in our favor," he said.  In any new proposal, British Air would expect a greater rate of return than the 20%-plus in the original proposal.  In the event that the buy-out group stalls in reviving its bid, the UAL board could remain under some pressure to seek another transaction, even without any legal obligation to do so.  Roughly one-third of its stock is believed held by takeover stock traders, who could vote to oust the board if they become impatient.  Meanwhile, the buy-out group's task of holding its fragile coalition together, in the face of the bid's collapse and internal opposition from two other employee groups, has been further complicated by an apparent rift in the ranks of the pilot union itself.  A pilot representing a group of 220 pilots hired during United's 1985 strike filed suit Friday in Chicago federal court to block the takeover.  The dissident pilots oppose the plan because it would cause them to lose their seniority.  UAL's management agreed to reduce the seniority of those pilots in exchange for the support of the United pilot union for the buy-out proposal.  The 220 pilots involved in the suit aren't members of the union.  The airline had allowed them to move ahead of some union members in seniority following the 1985 strike, a move the union had contested in a previous lawsuit.  ---  Judith Valente contributed to this article.  Corporate efforts to control health-care costs by requiring evaluations prior to planned hospitalization and surgery haven't been sweeping enough to reduce the long-term rate of cost increases, according to a study by the Institute of Medicine.  In the last decade, many corporations have embraced the "utilization management" cost containment strategy as a way to control health-care costs for employees.  These programs vary widely, but often require second opinions on proposed surgery, preadmission reviews of elective hospitalizations and reviews of treatment during illnesses or recovery periods.  Between 50% and 75% of today's workers are covered by such plans, up from 5% five years ago.  "Although it probably has reduced the level of expenditures for some purchasers, utilization management -- like most other cost containment strategies -- doesn't appear to have altered the long-term rate of increase in health-care costs," the Institute of Medicine, an affiliate of the National Academy of Sciences, concluded after a two-year study.  "Employers who saw a short-term moderation in benefit expenditures are seeing a return to previous trends."  While utilization management frequently reduces hospitalization costs, these savings are often offset by increases in outpatient services and higher administrative costs, according to the report by a panel of health-care experts.  The report suggested that current review programs are too narrow.  "The unnecessary and inappropriate use of the hospital, and not the actual need for a particular procedure, has been the main focus," the panel said.  "As a general rule, prior-review programs have not made case-by-case assessments of the comparative costs of alternative treatments or sites of care."  The report said that utilization management should have more of an impact as federal research on the effectiveness of medical treatments helps lead to medical practice guidelines.  Howard Bailit, a panel member and a vice president of Aetna Life & Casualty, said that utilization management will also do a better job of containing costs as it spreads to cover medical services delivered outside of hospitals.  "There's pretty good evidence that utilization management has reduced inappropriate hospitalization," he said.  But at the same time, spending on physician services and ambulatory care have mushroomed.  "It's like squeezing a balloon," Dr. Bailit said.  David Rahill of A. Foster Higgins & Co. said that clients of his consulting firm report that utilization management reduces their hospital care bills by about 5%, but he agreed that for the health-care system as whole, some of these savings are offset by administrative and outpatient care costs.  Jerome Grossman, chairman of the panel, agrees that administrative costs of utilization management programs can be high.  "You have a whole staff standing ready" to evaluate the appropriateness of recommended treatment, he said.  Dr. Grossman, who also is president of New England Medical Center Hospitals in Boston, noted that the hospitals he runs deal with more than 100 utilization management firms and that many of them have different procedures and requirements.  The panel urged greater efforts to reduce the complexity, paperwork and cost of utilization review.  "Utilization management needs to better demonstrate that it reduces the wasteful use of resources, improves the appropriateness of patient care and imposes only reasonable burdens on patients and providers," the panel concluded.  Renault and DAF Trucks NV announced a preliminary agreement to jointly manufacture a line of trucks in Britain and France.  Philippe Gras, a Renault managing director, said the new line will cover trucks of between 2.5 tons and 4.2 tons and will be built at Renault's Bapilly plant in France and at DAF's British plant.  The French state-controlled auto group and the Dutch truck maker plan to incorporate the new trucks into their product lines when they begin production toward the middle of the 1990s.  Mr. Gras said he expects a definitive agreement between the two companies to be completed in the next few months.  The venture is the latest example of the trend toward cooperative projects in Europe ahead of the 1992 deadline for eliminating trade barriers within the European Community.  Renault and DAF are expected to invest a total of about three billion French francs ($157.8 million) in the venture, including FFr1 billion for design and development costs.  In addition, the companies will each spend about FFr1 billion on tooling up their plants.  Mr. Gras said the joint venture represents considerable savings for both Renault and DAF, since both companies would in any case have had to renew their existing ranges of light goods vehicles.  By pooling their resources, the two groups have effectively halved the design and development costs that would otherwise have been entailed, he said.  Renault officials said the potential European market for light trucks in the 2.5-ton to 4.2-ton range is between 700,000 and 800,000 vehicles annually, and Renault and DAF are aiming for a combined market share of about 11%.  Both Renault and DAF will have world-wide marketing rights for the new range of vans and light trucks.  Under a separate arrangement, British Aerospace PLC's Rover Group PLC subsidiary will also be able to offer the vehicles through its dealers in the U.K., and Renault's truck-building subsidiary Renault Vehicles Industriels will have similar rights in France.  DAF is 16%-owned by British Aerospace, with a further 6.5% held by the Dutch state-owned chemical group NV DSM.  The van Doorne family of the Netherlands holds an additional 11% of DAF's capital.  The Federal Reserve System is the standard object of suggestions for organizational and institutional changes, for two reasons.  First, its position in the government is anomalous.  It has an unusual kind of independence from elected officials and still has authority over one of the most powerful of government's instruments -- the control of the money supply.  Thus we have a condition that is easily described as undemocratic.  Second, the responsibilities of the Federal Reserve as guardian of the currency, which means as guardian of the stability of the price level, sometimes lead it to take measures that are unpopular.  As former Fed Chairman William McChesney Martin used to say, they would have to take the punch bowl away just as the party is getting interesting.  So the Federal Reserve is an attractive target for complaint by politicians.  The Fed is easily assigned the blame for unpleasantness, like high interest rates or slow economic growth, while the politicians can escape responsibility by pointing to the Fed's independence.  This leads to proposals for "reform" of the Fed, which have the common feature of making the Fed more responsive to the administration, to the Congress and to public opinion -- without, however, any assumption of additional responsibility by the politicians.  These proposals include changing the term of the chairman, shortening the terms of the members, eliminating the presidents of the Federal Reserve Banks from the decision-making process, putting the Secretary of the Treasury on the Federal Reserve Board, having the Fed audited by an arm of Congress (the General Accounting Office), putting the Fed's expenditures in the budget, and requiring prompt publication of the Fed's minutes.  Some of these ideas are again under consideration in Congress.  But these proposals do not rest on a view of what the Fed's problem is or, if they do, they rest on an incorrect view.  They would not solve the problem; they would make it worse.  The problem is not that the Fed is too unresponsive to the public interest.  On the contrary, it is too responsive to an incorrect view of the public interest.  The price level in the U.S. is now about 4 1/4 times as high as it was 30 years ago.  On average, something that cost $100 30 years ago now costs $425.  Or, a wage that was $100 30 years ago would buy only $23.53 worth of stuff today.  On two occasions the inflation rate rose to more than 10% a year.  In each case the ending of this unsustainable inflation caused a severe recession -- the two worst of the postwar period.  The enormous inflation over the past 30 years was largely due to monetary policy.  At least, it would not have happened without the support of monetary policy that provided for a 10-fold increase in the money supply during the same period.  And that increase in the money supply would not have happened without the consent of the Federal Reserve.  The basic problem of monetary policy, to which reform of the Fed should be addressed, is to prevent a recurrence of this experience.  There were two general reasons for the mistaken monetary policy of the past 30 years:  1.  To some extent the Federal Reserve shared the popular but incorrect view that expansionary monetary policy could yield a net improvement in employment and output.  2.  Even where the Fed did not share this view it felt the need to accommodate to it.  Despite all the formal provisions for its independence, the Fed seems constantly to feel that if it uses its independence too freely it will lose it.  The common proposals for reforming the Fed would only make the situation worse, if they had any effect at all.  Putting the Secretary of the Treasury on the Board of Governors, one of the leading proposals today, is an example.  The secretary is the world's biggest borrower of money.  He has a built-in, constant longing for lower interest rates.  Moreover, he is a political agent of a political president, who naturally gives extraordinary weight to the way the economy will perform before the next election, and less to its longer-run health.  These days, the secretary suffers the further disqualification that he is a member of a club of seven finance ministers who meet occasionally to decide what exchange rates should be, which is a diversion from the real business of the Federal Reserve to stabilize the price level.  How should a reasonable member of the Federal Reserve Board interpret a congressional decision to put the secretary on the board?  Could he plausibly interpret it as encouragement for the Fed to give primary emphasis to stabilizing the price level?  Or would he interpret it as instruction to give more weight to these other objectives that the secretary represents -- low interest rates, short-run economic expansion, and stabilization of exchange rates at internationally managed levels?  The answer seems perfectly clear.  (True, a succession of Fed chairmen has given color to the notion that the Secretary of the Treasury belongs on the Fed.  By their constant readiness to advise all and sundry about federal budgetary matters the chairmen have encouraged the belief that fiscal policy and monetary policy are ingredients of a common stew, in which case it is natural that the Fed and the Treasury, and probably also the Congress, should be jointly engaged in stirring the pot.  The Fed's case for its own independence would be a little stronger if it were more solicitous of the independence of the rest of the government.)  The Fed's problem is not that it is too independent, or too unpolitical.  The Fed is responsive to, and cannot help being responsive to, the more overtly political part of the government.  The Fed exercises a power given to it by Congress and the president.  But Congress and the president accept no responsibility for the exercise of the power they have given the Fed.  Critics of the present arrangement are correct to say that it is undemocratic.  What is undemocratic is the unwillingness of the more political parts of the government to take the responsibility for deciding the basic question of monetary policy, which is what priority should be given to stabilizing the price level.  To leave this decision to an "independent" agency is not only undemocratic.  It also prevents the conduct of a policy that has a long-term rationale, because it leaves the Fed guessing about what are the expectations of its masters, the politicians, who have never had to consider the long-term consequences of monetary policy.  The greatest contribution Congress could make at this time would be to declare that stabilizing the price level is the primary responsibility of the Federal Reserve System.  Legislation to this effect has been introduced in Congress in this session by Rep. Stephen Neal (D., N.C.).  It is not the kind of thing that is likely to be enacted, however.  Congress would be required to make a hard decision, and Congress would much prefer to leave the hard decision to the Fed and retain its rights of complaint after the fact.  People will say that the nation and the government have other objectives, in addition to stabilizing the price level, which is true.  But that is not the same as saying that the Federal Reserve has other objectives.  The government has other agencies and instruments for pursuing these other objectives.  But it has only the Fed to pursue price-level stability.  And the Fed has at most very limited ability to contribute to the achievement of other objectives by means other than by stabilizing the price level.  The two objectives most commonly thought to be legitimate competitors for the attention of the Fed are high employment and rapid real growth.  But the main lesson of economic policy in the past 30 years is that if the Fed compromises with the price-stability objective in the pursuit of these other goals, the result is not high employment and rapid growth but is inflation.  ---  A former chairman of the president's Council of Economic Advisers, Mr. Stein is an American Enterprise Institute fellow.  Republic New York Corp. joined the list of banks boosting reserves for losses on loans to less-developed countries, setting out a $200 million provision and posting a $155.4 million third-quarter net loss as a result.  The per-share loss was $5.32.  In the year earlier period, the New York parent of Republic National Bank had net income of $38.7 million, or $1.12 a share.  Excluding the provision, Republic earned $44.6 million, up 15% from a year ago.  The bank's medium-term and long-term loans to less-developed countries total $293 million, of which $146 million aren't accruing interest, the bank said.  Republic's total of nonperforming assets was $167 million at Sept. 30, with its reserve for loan losses now standing at $357 million.  Abortion-rights advocates won last week's battles, but the war over the nation's most-contentious social question is about to pick up again on turf that favors those seeking to restrict abortions.  Strict new regulations seem certain to pass the state House in Pennsylvania next week, with easy approval by the Senate and by Democratic Gov. Bob Casey expected shortly thereafter.  Legislation to require the consent of parents before their daughters under the age of 18 can have abortions will probably pass both houses of the Michigan legislature and set up a grinding battle to override the expected veto of Democratic Gov. James Blanchard.  The short-term shift in the political climate surrounding abortion reflects two factors that are likely to govern the debate in the next several months: the reawakening of the abortion-rights movement as a potent force after years of lassitude, and the ability of each side to counter the other's advance in one arena with a victory of its own elsewhere.  The action in Pennsylvania, for example, will follow last week's collapse of a special session of the Florida legislature to enact restrictions on abortions in that state, and the vote here in Washington by the House to permit federally paid abortions for poor women who are victims of rape or incest.  But President Bush is expected to veto the congressional legislation and that, along with the easy approval of the Pennsylvania measure, is likely to mute the abortion-rights activists' claims of momentum and underline the challenges faced by this resurgent movement.  "It's great to feel good for once in 15 years," says Harrison Hickman, a consultant to abortion-rights advocates, reflecting the relief of his compatriots after last week's victories, the first major events since the Supreme Court, in its July 3 Webster decision, permitted the states to enact restrictions on abortions.  "But how many more times we're going to feel good in the next 15 is another question."  Indeed, abortion-rights activists still face their greatest tests.  "The pro-choice movement has shown -- finally -- that it can mobilize," says Glen Halva-Neubauer, a Furman University political scientist who specializes in how state legislators handle the abortion question.  "But it still hasn't shown that it can win in a state like Pennsylvania or Missouri, where abortion has been clearly an electoral issue and where it's been an emotional issue for a long time."  The foes of abortion hold the strong whip hand in Pennsylvania, where abortion-rights activists are so much on the defensive that their strategy is less to fight the proposed legislation than it is to stress how the state legislature doesn't reflect the viewpoints of the state's citizens.  As a result, GOP state Rep. Stephen Freind of Delaware County, the legislature's leading foe of abortion, has been given all but free rein to press a strict seven-point plan to restrict abortion and, he hopes, to force the Supreme Court directly to reassess its 1973 Roe v.  Wade decision that established the right of abortion in the first place.  The Freind legislation -- the state's House Judiciary Committee approved it in Harrisburg this week and the full Pennsylvania House is expected to take up the bill next Tuesday -- includes a provision to ban abortions after 24 weeks of pregnancy, except to avert the death of the mother.  Mr. Freind calculates that the provision, which attacks the trimester standards that Roe established, will "make it necessary" for the Supreme Court to review Roe and, perhaps, to overturn it.  But the Pennsylvania measure also includes an "informed consent" provision that may become widely imitated by abortion foes who want to make women contemplating abortion as uncomfortable as possible with the procedure and with themselves.  Under this legislation, a woman must be informed 24 hours before the operation of the details of the procedure and its risks.  "Regardless of whether one supports or opposes the right to an abortion," Mr. Freind argues, "it is virtually impossible for any rational human being to disagree with the concept that a woman has the right to have all of the appropriate materials and advice made available to her before she makes a decision which, one way or the other, might remain with her for the rest of her life."  In Michigan, where the state Senate is expected to approve parental-consent legislation by the end of next week, Gov. Blanchard is the principal obstacle for anti-abortionists.  Susan Rogin, a consultant to abortion-rights activists in the state, takes comfort from the fact that the state's House abortion opponents "haven't been able to muster the votes to overturn a veto on abortion in 16 years."  But proponents believe they may be able to shake enough votes loose to override the veto if they are successful in portraying the legislation as a matter of parents' rights.  In Illinois, lawmakers will vote before next spring on legislation requiring physicians to perform tests on fetuses at 20 weeks to determine their gestational age, weight and lung maturity along with a provision requiring that, if fetuses survive an abortion, a second doctor must be on hand to help it survive.  The legislation failed by one vote to clear the House Rules Committee Tuesday, but anti-abortionists still may succeed in bringing the measure to the floor this fall.  Pamela Sutherland, executive director of the Illinois Planned Parenthood Council, says she and her allies are "cautiously optimistic" they can defeat it if it comes to a floor vote.  Abortion foes in Wisconsin, meanwhile, expect a parental-consent bill to be sent to the state assembly floor by early November and are hopeful of prevailing in both houses by next March.  In Texas, abortion opponents want to pass parental-consent legislation along with a statewide ban on the use of public funds, personnel and facilities for abortion, and viability tests for fetuses 19 weeks and older.  The anti-abortionists are urging GOP Gov. Bill Clements to press the issues in a special session scheduled to run Nov. 14 to Dec. 13.  "The prognosis is only fair," says Kathie Roberts, administrative director of the Texas Right to Life Committee.  "Next year is an election year and the legislators just don't want to do anything about this now."  This legislative activity comes as both sides are undertaking new mobilization efforts, plunging into gubernatorial races in Virginia and New Jersey, and girding for next autumn's state elections.  At the same time, abortion foes have developed a national legislative strategy, deciding to move on what Jacki Ragan, the National Right to Life Committee's director of state organizational development, calls "reasonable measures that an overwhelming mainstream majority of Americans support."  These include bans on the use of abortion for birth control and sex selection, and the public funding of alternatives for abortion.  "Those who are on the other side can hardly oppose alternative funding if they continue to insist on calling themselves 'pro-choice' rather than `pro-abortion,'" says Mary Spaulding, the group's associate state legislative coordinator.  Over the weekend, the National Abortion Rights Action League singled out eight politicians, including Pennsylvania's Mr. Freind, as 1990 targets and held a Washington seminar designed to train its leaders in political techniques, including how to put the anti-abortionists on the defensive in state legislatures.  "We now see pro-choice legislators going on the offensive for the first time," says Kate Michelman, executive director of the group.  ---  @ The Pennsylvania Proposal  @ Elements of the proposed Pennsylvania abortion law:  @ -- "Informed Consent": Woman must be informed 24 hours before operation of the procedure to be used, probable gestational age of the unborn, the medical risks both of the procedure and childbirth, and alternatives to abortion.  The woman must be told that medical-assistance benefits may be available for pre-natal care, childbirth and neonatal care.  @ -- Prohibition against sex-selection abortions.  @ -- Notification of husband of intention to have an abortion; spousal consent not required.  @ -- Determination of gestational age except in cases of medical emergency.  @ -- Ban on all abortions after 24 weeks of pregnancy except to avert the death of the mother.  @ -- Ban on any nontherapeutic experimentation with fetal tissue.  @ -- Prohibition against any publicly owned medical facility or hospital operated with public funds performing abortions, except those to save the life of the mother and in cases of rape and incest.  Wall Street  When I was just a child  And confronted by my fears,  The things that I thought would get me  Had fangs and pointed ears.  Nothing much has changed --  My periodic scares  Are still from hostile animals,  Only now, they're bulls and bears.  -- Pat D'Amico.  ---  Daffynition  Trained dolphins: pur-poises.  -- Marrill J. Pederson.  This maker and marketer of cartridge tape systems said it completed the sale of 2.85 million shares of common priced at $10 a share in an initial public offering.  The company said that it is selling two million shares and that the rest are being sold by certain stockholders.  Proceeds will be used for capital expenditures and working capital.  Goldman, Sachs & Co. and Montgomery Securities Inc. are co-managing the offering.  Congress sent President Bush an $18.4 billion fiscal 1990 Treasury and Postal Service bill providing $5.5 billion for the Internal Revenue Service and increasing the Customs Service's air-interdiction program nearly a third.  Final approval came on a simple voice vote in the Senate, and the swift passage contrasted with months of negotiations over the underlying bill which is laced with special-interest provisions for both members and the executive branch.  An estimated $33 million was added for university and science grants, including $1.5 million for Smith College.  And Southwest lawmakers were a driving force behind $54.6 million for U.S.-Mexico border facilities, or more than double the administration's request.  More than $1.8 million is allocated for pensions and expenses for former presidents, and the budget for the official residence of Vice President Quayle is more than doubled, with $200,000 designated for improvements to the property.  Even the Office of Management and Budget is remembered with an extra $1 million to help offset pay costs that other government departments are being asked to absorb.  Within the IRS, nearly $1.95 billion is provided for processing tax returns, a 12% increase over fiscal 1989 and double what the government was spending five years ago.  Investigation and taxpayer service accounts would grow to $1.6 billion, and Congress specifically added $7.4 million for stepped up criminal investigations of money laundering related to drug traffic.  The large increase in Customs Service air-interdiction funds is also intended to counter smuggling, and the annual appropriations level has more than quadrupled in five years.  The $196.7 million provided for fiscal 1990 anticipates the purchase of a Lockheed P-3 surveillance aircraft and five Cessna Citation II jets.  Despite administration reservations, the plan has had the quiet backing of customs officials as well as influential lawmakers from Cessna's home state, Kansas.  Among legislative provisions attached to the bill is a ban on any Treasury Department expenditure for enforcement of a 1986 tax provision intended to counter discrimination in employee-benefit plans.  Small-business interests have lobbied against the so-called Section 89 tax rules.  Repeal is considered likely now, but the Treasury Department bill has been used as a vehicle to raise the profile of the issue and block any action in the interim.  Less noticed is a bit of legislative legerdemain by Houston Republicans on behalf of HEI Corp. of Texas to retroactively "move" a Missouri hospital from one county to the next to justify higher Medicare reimbursements.  The provision seeks to wipe out an estimated $1.4 million in claims made by the Health Care Finance Administration against HEI, which owned the hospital in Sullivan, Mo., during most of the four-year period -- 1983-1987 -- covered in the amendment.  In a separate development, a private meeting is scheduled this morning between House Appropriations Committee Chairman Jamie Whitten (D., Miss.) and Sen. Dale Bumpers (D., Ark.) in an effort to end a dispute which for two weeks has delayed action on an estimated $44 billion agriculture bill.  A House-Senate conference reached agreement Oct. 5 on virtually all major provisions of the bill, but final settlement has been stalled because of differences between the two men over the fate of a modest Arkansas-based program to provide technical information to farmers seeking to reduce their dependence on chemical fertilizers and pesticides.  The program's nonprofit sponsors received $900,000 in fiscal 1989 through an Extension Service grant, but Mr. Whitten has been adamant in insisting that the program be cut in 1990.  The 79-year-old Mississippian takes a more orthodox, entrenched view of agriculture policy than those in the movement to reduce chemical use, but as a master of pork-barrel politics, he is believed to be annoyed as well that the project moved to Arkansas from a Tennessee center near Memphis and the northern Mississippi border.  Michael F. Klatman, director of corporate public relations at Data General Corp., was named to the new position of vice president, corporate communications, of this maker of data storage equipment.  B.A.T Industries PLC may delay aspects of its defensive restructuring plan -- including the sale of its Saks Fifth Avenue and Marshall Field units -- in the wake of the current upheaval in financial markets, company officials said.  The British conglomerate, planning its own defensive restructuring to fight off a #13.35 billion ($21.03 billion) takeover bid by Anglo-French financier Sir James Goldsmith, intends to press ahead with an extraordinary shareholder vote today to clear the way for its value-boosting measures.  If anything, the gyrations in world stock markets -- and in B.A.T's share price -- since last Friday's sharp Wall Street sell-off have increased the likelihood of shareholder approval for the restructuring, analysts and several big institutional holders said.  "Thank God we have some deal on the table," said Stewart Gilchrist, a director at Scottish Amicable Investment Managers, which intends to vote its roughly 1% stake in favor of the restructuring.  Investors in B.A.T have been on a roller coaster.  B.A.T has been London's best-performing blue chip over the past six months, up 40% against a 4% rise in the Financial Times 100-Share Index.  But this week, B.A.T has been hit harder than other big U.K. stocks -- first by the market gyrations, then by Tuesday's San Francisco earthquake, which could leave B.A.T's Farmers Group Inc. insurance unit facing big claims.  B.A.T rose five pence (eight cents) to 756 pence ($11.91) in London yesterday as a late market rally erased a 28-pence fall earlier in the day.  To fight off predators, B.A.T plans to spin off about $6 billion in assets, largely by selling such U.S. retailing units as Marshall Field and Saks and by floating its big paper and U.K. retailing business via share issues to existing holders.  Proceeds will help pay for a planned buy-back of 10% of its shares and a 50% dividend increase.  "I think the restructuring will get the required support," said Michael Pacitti, an analyst at London stockbroker UBS Phillips & Drew.  "The shareholders effectively will support the share price by clearing the share buy-back."  But B.A.T's restructuring, which was never going to happen quickly, now will take longer because of the market upheaval.  Company officials, holders and analysts who previously expected the disposals to be substantially complete by the end of next year's first half now say the market gyrations could delay the actions well into the second half.  "We aren't forced sellers.  We don't have an absolute deadline and if market conditions are truly awful we might decide it is not the right time," to take particular steps, said Michael Prideaux, a B.A.T spokesman.  Even if B.A.T receives approval for the restructuring, the company will remain in play, say shareholders and analysts, though the situation may unfold over the next 12 months, rather than six.  The new B.A.T will be a smaller tobacco and financial-services hybrid whose price-earnings ratio may more closely reflect the lower-growth tobacco business than the higher-multiple financial-services business, these holders believe.  Thus B.A.T's restructuring may only make the company a more manageable target for other corporate predators -- possibly such acquisitive bidders as Hanson PLC.  "The last few days will surely slow down the pace of events," says Scottish Amicable's Mr. Gilchrist.  "But I wouldn't write off" Sir James or other potential bidders.  Among possible delays, the sales of Saks and Marshall Field -- which were expected to be on the block soon after the crucial Christmas season -- may slide into the second quarter or second half.  Analysts estimate that sales of the two businesses could raise roughly $2 billion.  B.A.T isn't predicting a postponement because the units "are quality businesses and we are encouraged by the breadth of inquiries," said Mr. Prideaux.  But the delay could happen if B.A.T doesn't get adequate bids, he said.  People familiar with B.A.T say possible acquirers for the units include managers from both retailing chains, and General Cinema Corp., which is interested in bidding for Saks.  Other potential bidders for parts of B.A.T's U.S. retail unit include Dillard Department Stores Inc., May Department Stores Co. and Limited Inc. B.A.T has declined to identify the potential bidders.  Though Sir James has said he intends to mount a new bid for B.A.T once approval from U.S. insurance regulators is received, jitters over prospects for junk-bond financing and U.S. leverage buy-outs are making investors more skeptical about Sir James's prospects.  His initial offer indicated he needed to raise as much as 80% of the takeover financing through the debt markets.  Market uncertainty also clouds the outlook for B.A.T's attracting a premium price for its U.S. retailing properties.  Finally, Tuesday's California earthquake initially knocked 3.7% off B.A.T's share price in London yesterday because of fears of the potential claims to Los Angeles-based Farmers, which has a substantial portion of its property and casualty exposure in California.  On Farmers, Mr. Prideaux said it is too early to quantify the level of potential claims.  He added B.A.T "has no expectation of a material impact on Farmers."  Bridge and highway collapses will disrupt truck and auto transportation in the San Francisco Bay area for months to come.  But rail, air and ocean-shipping links to the area escaped Tuesday's earthquake with only minor damage, and many are expected to be operating normally today, government and corporate transport officials said.  Air traffic at San Francisco International Airport was running about 50% of normal yesterday afternoon, but airport officals said they expect a return to full operations by Saturday.  The major gateway to Asia and one of the nation's 10 busiest airports was closed to all but emergency traffic from the time the quake hit Tuesday afternoon, until 6 a.m. PDT yesterday when controllers returned to the tower.  Getting to and from the airport in coming weeks may be the problem, however.  "People's ability to drive throughout the bay area is greatly restricted," said a spokesman for the American Automobile Association.  Tom Schumacher, executive vice president and general manager of the California Trucking Association in Sacremento, said his organization urged trucking firms to halt all deliveries into the Bay area yesterday, except for emergency-medical supplies.  "Some foodstuff shipments will probably resume Thursday," he said.  "Right now most of the roads into the Bay area are closed, but the list of closings changes about every 20 minutes.  This {Wednesday} morning the San Mateo bridge was open and now we are informed that it is closed," Mr. Schumacher said.  United Parcel Service, Greenwich, Conn., said its operations in the San Francisco area have been reduced to 40% of normal.  A UPS spokesman said that although none of the company's terminals, trucks or airplanes were damaged in the quake, road shutdowns and power failures have impeded its pickup and delivery of packages.  The spokesman noted four-hour to five-hour traffic delays on the San Mateo bridge, for example.  In addition, power failures prevented its package-sorting facilities from operating, causing delays.  But freight railroads reported that damage to their facilities was relatively minor, with Santa Fe Pacific Corp.'s rail unit the least affected by the quake.  Santa Fe stopped freight trains Tuesday night while its officials inspected track but resumed service at 10:45 p.m. when they found no damage.  Union Pacific Corp.'s rail unit said that except for damage to shipping containers in its Oakland yard, its track, bridges and structures were unharmed.  That railroad is operating trains but with delays caused by employees unable to get to work.  Southern Pacific Transportation Co., the hardest hit of the three railroads in the Bay area, said service on its north-south coastline, which is used by an Amtrak train between Los Angeles and Seattle, was suspended temporarily because of kinked rails near the epicenter of the quake.  But service on the line is expected to resume by noon today.  "We had no serious damage on the railroad," said a Southern Pacific spokesman.  "We have no problem to our freight service at all expect for the fact businesses are shut down."  Amtrak said it suspended train service into its Oakland station, which sustained "heavy structural damage" during the quake.  The passenger railroad said it terminated some runs in Sacramento, relying on buses to ferry passengers to the Bay area.  Amtrak said it planned to resume some train operations to Oakland late yesterday.  Rail-transit operations suffered little damage, according to Albert Engelken, deputy executive director of the American Public Transit Association in Washington.  The Bay Area Rapid Transit "withstood the earthquake perfectly," said Mr. Engelken, adding that the rail system was running a full fleet of 45 trains during the day to provide an alternative for highway travelers.  "The highway system is screwed up" by the earthquake, Mr. Engelken said.  "The transit system is how people are going to be getting around."  He added that San Francisco's trolley cars and trolley buses were also running at full service levels.  Although air-traffic delays in San Francisco were significant yesterday, they didn't appear to spread to other airports.  The earthquake shattered windows at San Francisco International's air-traffic control tower and rained pieces of the ceiling down on controllers, three of whom suffered minor injuries.  Terminals at San Francisco International also were damaged, but the tower itself was intact.  Tuesday night, thousands were diverted to other airports and had to wait a day to resume travel.  Runways at San Francisco weren't damaged, but traffic was being limited yesterday to 27 arrivals and 27 departures an hour -- down from 33 to 45 an hour normally -- mainly because the noise level in the control tower was overwhelming without the windows, an FAA spokeswoman said.  While the airport was closed, flights were diverted to airports in Sacramento and Stockton, Calif.; Reno and Las Vegas, Nev.; and Los Angeles.  United Airlines, the largest carrier at San Francisco, was operating only 50% of its scheduled service in and out of the area because of damage to its terminal, which in turn was causing delays for travelers headed to the Bay area.  A United spokesman said 14 of its 21 gates were unusable, mainly because of water damage caused when a sprinkler system was triggered by the tremors.  The United spokesman said none of its people were injured at the airport; in fact, as the airport was being evacuated Tuesday night, two babies were born.  Yesterday, the United ticket counter was active, with people trying to get flights out, but the airline said demand for seats into the city also was active, with people trying to get there to help family and friends.  The airports in San Jose and Oakland were both fully operational by noon yesterday, the Federal Aviation Administration said.  In terms of diversions, Denver's Stapleton International may have experienced the most far-flung: A United flight from Japan was rerouted there.  "I think that's the first nonstop commercial passenger flight from Japan to land here," an airport spokesman said.  A Japan Air Lines spokesman said its flights into and out of San Francisco weren't affected, but getting information about its operations was difficult.  Its telecommunications headquarters in Burlingame, Calif., had been knocked out since the quake.  "We're in the dark," he said.  Whitbread & Co. put its spirits division up for sale, triggering a scramble among global groups for the British company's brands.  Whitbread already has been approached by "about half a dozen" companies interested in buying all or part of the spirits business, a spokesman said.  Analysts expect the spirits operations and some California vineyards that also are being sold to fetch about #500 million ($788.8 million).  Among the brands for sale are Beefeater gin, the No. 2 imported gin in the U.S., and Laphroaig single-malt whiskey.  Also for sale are Buckingham Wile Co., which distributes Cutty Sark blended whiskey in the U.S., and Whitbread's Atlas Peak Vineyards in California's Napa Valley.  Beefeater alone is worth as much as #300 million, analysts said.  Whitbread bought the Beefeater distillery two years ago for #174.5 million.  That purchase represented an attempt by Whitbread, a venerable British brewer, to become a major player in the global liquor business.  But Whitbread has been squeezed by giant rivals amid widespread consolidation in the industry.  Now, it wants to concentrate on beer and its newer hotel and restaurant operations.  For rival liquor companies, the Whitbread auction is a rare opportunity to acquire valuable brands.  "It's not very often something like this comes up," said Ron Littleboy, a liquor company analyst at Nomura Research Institute in London.  "The division will be sold off quite rapidly," predicted Neill Junor, an analyst at London brokers County NatWest WoodMac.  Among possible buyers, Grand Metropolitan PLC might find Beefeater a useful addition to its portfolio.  Grand Met owns Bombay gin, the No. 3 imported gin in the U.S.; rival Guinness PLC has the No. 1 imported brand, Tanqueray.  The Whitbread spirits auction "is an extremely interesting development . . . and naturally we'll be considering it carefully," a Grand Met spokesman said.  Guinness, which owns several leading whiskey brands plus Gordon's gin, the world's No. 1 gin, is considered less likely to bid for the Whitbread spirits.  A Guinness spokesman declined to comment.  Two other global liquor giants, Canada's Seagram Co. and Britain's Allied-Lyons PLC, also are possible buyers.  Seagram's gin is the world's No. 2 gin brand, but the company doesn't own any of the major gin brands imported in the U.S. Allied-Lyons, while powerful in whiskey, doesn't own any major white-spirit brands.  "We will certainly have to take a look at" the Whitbread spirits business, an Allied-Lyons spokesman said.  "We would certainly like to have a major white-spirits brand in our portfolio."  A Seagram spokesman in New York wouldn't comment.  Smaller liquor companies, such as Brown-Forman Corp. and American Brands Inc. of the U.S., also are likely to be interested.  Such companies "are increasingly being left behind" in the global liquor business, says Nomura's Mr. Littleboy.  In New York, a spokesman for American Brands wouldn't comment.  Brown-Forman, a Louisville, Ky. distiller, also declined to comment.  Whitbread's wine, spirits and soft-drink operations had trading profit of #35.4 million on sales of #315.5 million in the year ended Feb. 25.  The company, which is retaining most of its wine and all of its soft-drink interests, didn't break out results for the businesses it plans to sell.  But analysts estimate their trading profit at #30 million.  Whitbread had total pretax profit in the year ended Feb. 25 of #223.2 million, on sales of #2.26 billion.  Whitbread's spirits auction occurs amid a parallel shakeup in the British beer industry.  Earlier this year, the government announced plans to foster increased competition in the industry.  British brewers currently own thousands of pubs, which in turn sell only the breweries' beer and soft drinks.  Under new rules, many of the country's pubs would become "free houses," selling beers of their choice.  Whitbread now intends to bolster its brewing interests, in an effort to grab a share of sales to free houses.  The company, which last month paid #50.7 million for regional British brewer Boddington Group PLC, has about 13% of the British beer market.  Whitbread also owns the license to brew and distribute Heineken and Stella Artois beers in Britain.  In addition, Whitbread intends to focus on its newer hotel, liquor store and restaurant businesses in Europe and North America.  In Britain, those interests include the Beefeater steakhouse chain and joint ownership with PepsiCo Inc. of the country's Pizza Hut chain.  In Canada and the U.S., Whitbread owns The Keg chain of steak and seafood restaurants.  Focusing on beer, restaurants and hotels means "we can concentrate our skills and resources more effectively," Peter Jarvis, Whitbread's managing director, said in a statement.  The spirits business "would require substantial additional investment to enable it to compete effectively in the first division of global players."  Whitbread also announced that Mr. Jarvis, who is 48, will become the company's chief executive March 1.  At that time Sam Whitbread, the company's chairman and a descendant of its 18th-century founder, will retire from executive duties.  He will retain the honorary title of non-executive chairman.  The Treasury plans to raise $700 million in new cash with the sale Tuesday of about $10 billion in two-year notes to redeem $9.29 billion in maturing notes.  The offering will be dated Oct. 31 and mature Oct. 31, 1991.  Tenders for the notes, available in minimum $5,000 denominations, must be received by 1 p.m. EDT Tuesday at the Treasury or at Federal Reserve banks or branches.  NEWHALL LAND & FARMING Co., Valencia, Calif., announced a 2-for-1 split in the real estate limited partnership's units and increased its regular quarterly cash distribution 33%, to 40 cents a unit.  The real estate limited partnership also said it will pay a special year-end cash distribution of 10 cents a unit.  Both distributions are payable Dec. 4 to limited partners of record Nov. 3.  Mellon Bank Corp. said directors authorized the buy-back of as many as 250,000 common shares.  The bank holding company said stock repurchased will be used to meet requirements for the company's benefit plans.  Mellon has 36.6 million shares outstanding.  Champion International Corp.'s third-quarter profit dropped 17%, reflecting price declines for certain paper products, operating problems at certain mills, and other factors.  The paper producer reported that net income fell to $102.1 million, or $1.09 a share, from $122.4 million, or $1.29 a share, in the year-earlier period.  Sales rose 2.6% to $1.32 billion from $1.29 billion.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading, Champion's shares rose 25 cents to $32.125.  Digital Equipment Corp. is planning a big coming-out party on Tuesday for its first line of mainframe computers.  But an uninvited guest is expected to try to crash the party.  On the morning of the long-planned announcement, International Business Machines Corp. is to introduce its own new mainframe.  "Their attitude is, `You want to talk mainframes, we'll talk mainframes,'" says one computer industry executive.  "They're deliberately trying to steal our thunder," a Digital executive complains.  "Maybe we should take it as a compliment."  Digital's target is the $40 billion market for mainframe computers, the closet-sized number-crunchers that nearly every big company needs to run its business.  IBM, based in Armonk, N.Y., has dominated the market for decades.  That doesn't scare Digital, which has grown to be the world's second-largest computer maker by poaching customers of IBM's mid-range machines.  Digital, based in Maynard, Mass., hopes to stage a repeat performance in mainframes, and it has spent almost $1 billion developing the new technology.  A spoiler, nimble Tandem Computers Inc. in Cupertino, Calif., jumped into the fray earlier this week with an aggressively priced entry.  IBM appears more worried about Digital, which has a broad base of customers waiting for the new line, dubbed the VAX 9000.  "It's going to be nuclear war," says Thomas Willmott, a consultant with Aberdeen Group Inc.  The surge in competition is expected to stir new life into the huge mainframe market, where growth has slowed to single digits in recent years.  IBM's traditional mainframe rivals, including Unisys Corp., Control Data Corp. and NCR Corp., have struggled recently.  Digital is promising a new approach.  Robert M. Glorioso, Digital's vice president for high performance systems, says Digital's mainframe is designed not as a central computer around which everything revolves, but as part of a decentralized network weaving together hundreds of workstations, personal computers, printers and other devices.  And unlike IBM's water-cooled mainframes, it doesn't need any plumbing.  The challengers will have a big price advantage.  Digital is expected to tag its new line from about $1.24 million to $4.4 million and up, depending on configuration.  That's about half the price of comparably equipped IBM mainframes.  Tandem's pricing is just as aggressive.  The heightened competition will hit IBM at a difficult time.  The computer giant's current mainframe line, which has sold well and has huge profit margins, is starting to show its age.  The new 3090s due next week will boost performance by only about 8% to 10%.  And IBM isn't expected to deliver a new generation of mainframes until 1991.  Still, no one expects IBM's rivals to deliver a knockout.  IBM has a near-monopoly on mainframes, with an estimated 70% share of the market.  IBM is five times the size of Digital -- and 40 times the size of Tandem -- and wields enormous market power.  It counts among its customers a majority of the world's largest corporations, which entrust their most critical business information to IBM computers.  "We're not going to walk in and replace a company's corporate accounting system if it's already running on an IBM mainframe," concedes Kenneth H. Olsen, Digital's president.  He says Digital will target faster-growing market segments such as on-line transaction processing, which includes retail-sales tracking, airline reservations and bank-teller networks.  Tandem, which already specializes in on-line transaction processing, is a potent competitor in that market.  A key marketing target for Digital will be the large number of big customers who already own both Digital and IBM systems.  One such company is Bankers Trust Co. Stanley Rose, a vice president, technological and strategic planning at Bankers Trust, says that despite Digital's low prices, "we aren't about to unplug our IBM mainframes for a DEC machine.  The software conversion costs would dwarf any savings."  But Mr. Rose is still looking seriously at the 9000.  Bankers Trust uses Digital's VAX to run its huge money-transfer and capital markets accounts, juggling hundreds of billions of dollars each day, he says.  As that system grows, larger computers may be needed.  "In the past, customers had to go to IBM when they outgrew the VAX. Now they don't have to," he says.  "That's going to cost IBM revenue."  Analysts say Digital can expect this pent-up demand for the new VAX to fuel strong sales next year.  Barry F. Willman, an analyst at Sanford C. Bernstein & Co., estimates the 9000 could boost sales by more than $1 billion in the fiscal year beginning in July.  He bases the estimate on a survey of hundreds of Digital's largest customers.  Although Digital will announce a full family of mainframes next week, it isn't expected to begin shipping in volume until next year.  The first model available will be the 210, which is likely to appeal to many technical and scientific buyers interested in the optional super-charger, or vector processor, says Terry Shannon of International Data Corp., a market research concern.  Four more models, aimed squarely at IBM's commercial customers, are expected to begin shipping in late June.  Most analysts don't expect the new mainframes to begin contributing significantly to revenue before the fiscal first quarter, which begins next July 1.  Digital's new line has been a long time coming.  The company has long struggled to deliver a strong mainframe-class product, and made a costly decision in 1988 to halt development of an interim product meant to stem the revenue losses at the high end.  Digital's failure to deliver a true mainframe-class machine before now may have cost the company as much as $1 billion in revenue in fiscal 1989, Mr. Willman says.  IBM will face still more competition in coming months.  Amdahl Corp., backed by Japan's Fujitsu Ltd., has a growing share of the market with its low-priced, IBM-compatible machines.  And National Advanced Systems, a joint venture of Japan's Hitachi Ltd. and General Motors Corp.'s Electronic Data Systems, is expected to unveil a line of powerful IBM-compatible mainframes later this year.  ---  @ IBM's Dominant Position in Mainframes  @ In percent  @ IBM 70.6%  @ Unisys 9.1%  @ Amdahl 8.3%  @ NAS 5.6%  @ CDC 2.2%  @ Bull HN 2.2%  @ Other 2.0%  NOTE: NAS is National Advanced Systems,  CDC -- Control Data Corp., Bull NH Information Systems Inc.  Source: International Data Corp.  FICTION LAST WEEKS  @ WEEK ON LIST  @ 1 Clear and Present Danger 1 8  @ by Tom Clancy (Putnam, $21.95)  @ 2 The Pillars of the Earth 2 6  @ by Ken Follett (Morrow, $22.95)  @ 3 California Gold 3 6  @ by John Jakes (Random House, $19.95)  @ 4 Jimmy Stewart and His Poems 4 5  @ by Jimmy Stewart (Crown, $8.95)  @ 5 Star Trek: The Lost Years 7 3  @ by J.M. Dillard (Pocket, $17.95)  @ 6 The Minotaur 10 3  @ by Stephen Coonts (Doubleday, $19.95)  @ 7 Silent Partner 6 4  @ by Jonathan Kellerman (Bantam, $18.95)  @ 8 Oldest Living Confederate Widow 5 6  @ Tells All  @ by Allan Gurganus (Knopf, $21.95)  @ 9 Some Can Whistle - 1  @ by Larry McMurtry (Simon & Schuster,  @ $19.95)  @ 10 Nemesis - 1  @ by Isaac Asimov (Doubleday, $18.95)  @ NONFICTION LAST WEEKS  @ WEEK ON LIST  @ 1 Roseanne: My Life as a Woman 8 2  @ by Roseanne Barr (Harper & Row,  @ $17.95)  @ 2 All I Really Need to Know I Learned 1 50  @ in Kindergarten  @ by Robert Fulghum (Villard, $15.95)  @ 3 It Was On Fire When 2 6  @ I Layed Down On It  @ by Robert Fulghum (Villard, $17.95)  @ 4 Wealth Without Risk 6 33  @ by Charles Givens (Simon & Schuster,  @ $19.95)  @ 5 Among Schoolchildren 5 6  @ by Tracy Kidder (Houghton Mifflin,  @ $19.95)  @ 6 Toxic Parents 3 10  @ by Dr. Susan Forward With Craig Buck  @ (Bantam, $18.95)  @ 7 I Want to Grow Hair, I Want to Grow 7 2  @ Up, I Want to Go to Boise  @ by Erma Bombeck (Harper & Row, $16.95)  @ 8 A Brief History of Time 4 78  @ by Stephen W. Hawking (Bantam, $18.95)  @ 9 The T-Factor Diet 11 24  @ by Martin Katahn (Norton, $18.95)  @ 10 It's Always Something 9 20  @ by Gilda Radner (Simon & Schuster,  @ $18.95)  Compiled by Publishers Weekly from data from large-city bookstores, bookstore chains and local bestseller lists across the U.S. Copyright 1989 by Reed Publishing USA.  The frenetic stock and bond markets cooled off, but the dollar slumped.  Stocks rose slightly as trading activity slowed from the frenzied pace earlier this week.  Prices of long-term Treasury bonds hovered in a narrow band most of the day, finishing little changed despite the dollar's weakness and fears about a wave of government borrowing coming soon.  Helped by futures-related program buying, the Dow Jones Industrial Average gained 4.92 points to close at 2643.65.  But the Dow Jones Transportation Average fell for the seventh-consecutive session as more investors dumped UAL shares.  Bond prices rallied early yesterday morning as traders scrambled to buy Treasury issues on fears that the Northern California earthquake might lead to a stock-market debacle.  But when stocks held steady, Treasury bonds later retreated.  Speculation that the Federal Reserve will lower interest rates in coming weeks helped push the dollar down while boosting stocks, traders said.  But many investors remain wary about stocks, partly because they expect continued turbulence in the junk-bond market that would make it more difficult to finance corporate takeovers.  "I'm surprised we didn't see more volatility" in stocks, said Raymond F. DeVoe Jr., market strategist at Legg Mason Wood Walker.  "I think the problems in the junk-bond area are just beginning, and this will be very unsettling for companies that have issued junk bonds.  In a bull market, credit does not matter," Mr. DeVoe added.  "But when it does matter, then it's the only thing that matters."  However, many institutional investors are reacting to the stock market's plunge as "a great buying opportunity," said Charles I. Clough, chief investment strategist at Merrill Lynch Capital Markets.  "Things are beginning to settle down.  The markets are returning to normalcy."  Oil prices initially rose on fears that the massive earthquake in Northern California would disrupt production.  But prices later reversed course, finishing slightly lower, as investors concluded that any cuts wouldn't be large and that foreign oil producers would quickly pick up the slack.  In major market activity:  Stock prices rose.  New York Stock Exchange volume shrank to 166.9 million shares from 224.1 million Tuesday.  Advancers on the Big Board outpaced decliners by 822 to 668.  Bond prices were little changed in sluggish activity.  The yield on the Treasury's 30-year issue fell slightly to 8.03%.  The dollar dropped.  In New York late yesterday, the currency was at 141.45 yen and 1.8485 marks, down from 142.75 yen and 1.8667 marks late Tuesday.  James L. Madson, 46 years old, was named a vice president and assistant general manager of this producer of copper and other minerals.  He will succeed Arthur E. Himebaugh as general manager Feb. 1, when Mr. Himebaugh retires.  AMR Corp. posted an 8.8% drop in third-quarter net income and said the fourth quarter will be "disappointing" as well, primarily because of slimmer profit margins and increased fuel costs.  AMR's earnings decline comes a year after the parent company of American Airlines and the rest of the airline industry set profit records.  Some analysts say the latest results only seem pale by comparison with a spectacular second half of 1988.  Still, AMR's stumble doesn't bode well for the rest of the industry.  The Fort Worth, Texas, company is generally regarded as one of the best-run in the business, and its difficulties are likely to be reflected industrywide as other major carriers report third-quarter results over the next several days.  Meanwhile, the company's board, which had said nothing publicly about investor Donald Trump's recently withdrawn $7.5 billion offer for AMR, issued a statement condemning "ill-conceived and reckless" bids and saying it was "pleased" that Mr. Trump had backed out.  In the third quarter, AMR said, net fell to $137 million, or $2.16 a share, from $150.3 million, or $2.50 a share.  Revenue rose 17% to $2.73 billion from $2.33 billion a year earlier.  AMR's chairman, Robert L. Crandall, said the results were due to an 11% year-to-year increase in fuel prices and a slight decrease in yield, an industry measure analogous to profit margin on each seat sold.  "We think these trends will continue and will produce a very disappointing fourth quarter as well," he said.  Tim Pettee, an analyst with Merrill Lynch & Co., said: "The business turned faster than expected.  Costs are giving them a little bit of trouble, and the whole industry is having a pricing problem."  For the nine months, AMR's net rose 15% to $415.9 million, or $6.59 a share, from $360.1 million, or $5.99 a share.  Revenue jumped 22% to $7.89 billion from $6.46 billion.  AMR's board, in a statement after a regular meeting yesterday, said: "Ill-considered and reckless acquisition proposals adversely affect employee, financial and business relationships and are contrary to the best interests of AMR shareholders. . . .  AMR has not been, and is not, for sale."  Mr. Crandall said the company's current decline in earnings is exactly the kind of situation that an excessively leveraged company laden with debt from a takeover would find difficult to weather.  "Our very disappointing third-quarter results and the discouraging outlook for the fourth quarter underscore the importance of an adequate capital base," he said.  Christopher Whittington, 51-year-old deputy chairman of this British investment-banking group and chairman of Morgan Grenfell & Co., the group's main banking unit, has retired from his executive duties.  Succeeding Mr. Whittington as deputy chairman of the group is Anthony Richmond-Watson, 43, currently a main board member.  Succeeding Mr. Whittington at Morgan Grenfell & Co. is Richard Webb, 50, currently deputy chairman.  Mr. Whittington will remain on the main group board as a nonexecutive director.  Without federal subsidies to developers of beach houses, the economic and structural damage by Hurricane Hugo in South Carolina would have been much less, as highlighted by your Oct. 3 editorial "Subsidizing Disaster."  Congress should stop throwing tax dollars out to sea by subsidizing the development of beach communities on ecologically fragile coastal barrier islands, such as the hard-hit Isle of Palms near Charleston.  As you mentioned, subsidies for development on a number of barrier islands were curtailed in 1982 by the Coastal Barrier Resource System.  The National Taxpayers Union would like Congress to add 800,000 acres to the 453,000 of shoreline in the system by enacting "The Coastal Barrier Improvement Act of 1989."  This bill simply says that if you want to develop property on a barrier island you have to do so without taxpayer support.  Private-property rights would be upheld because the legislation would not ban coastal development.  However, home builders would have to bear the full costs of such beach-house construction.  A Taxpayers Union study concluded the bill would save taxpayers up to $9.3 billion in barrier-island subsidies over 20 years.  Already, the 1982 legislation has saved an estimated $800 million.  Marshall Y. Taylor  Communications Director  National Taxpayers Union  Washington  The government said 13.1% of Americans, or 31.9 million people, were living in poverty in 1988.  While last year's figure was down from 13.4% in 1987 and marked the fifth consecutive annual decline in the poverty rate, the Census Bureau said the 1988 drop wasn't statistically significant.  The bureau's report also showed that while some measures of the nation's economic well-being improved modestly in 1988, the fruits of prosperity were shared less equitably than the year before.  Summarizing data derived from a March 1989 survey of 58,000 households, William Butz, associate director of the Census Bureau, said that "most groups either stayed the same or improved."  But, he added, "Since the late 1960s, the distribution of income has been slowly getting less equal.  There was no reversal {of that trend} between 1987 and 1988."  Per capita income, a widely used measure of a nation's economic health, hit a record in 1988, rising 1.7% after inflation adjustment to $13,120.  But the median income of American families fell 0.2%, the first time it has failed to rise since 1982.  Mr. Butz said the divergence in the two measures reflects changes in family size and structure, including the rising number of female-headed families and a sharp increase in income reported by Americans who aren't living in families.  As a result of last year's decline, the government's estimate for the number of people living below the poverty line declined by about 500,000.  The poverty threshold, defined as three times food expenses as calculated by the Agricultural Department, last year was $12,092 for a family of four.  The Census Bureau counts all cash income in determining whether families are below the line, but it doesn't consider other government benefits, such as Medicare.  Thanks largely to the continued growth of the U.S. economy, the poverty rate is now substantially lower than the 1983 peak of 15.3%, but the improvements have been modest in the past couple of years.  Poverty remains far more widespread among blacks than other Americans.  In 1988, 31.6% of blacks lived in poverty, compared with 10.1% for whites and 26.8% for Hispanics.  But two-thirds of all poor Americans were white.  More than half of poor families were headed by women living without men, the bureau said.  More than three-fourths of poor black families were headed by women.  The poverty rate of children under 18 years old dropped last year to 19.7% from 20.5% in 1987, but remained far higher than a decade ago.  The rate among the elderly -- 12% in 1988 -- wasn't significantly lower than the year before.  If it weren't for Social Security payments, more than three times as many elderly would be below the poverty line, Mr. Butz said.  The Census Bureau also said:  -- Some 17.2% of all money income received by families in 1988 went to the wealthiest 5% of all families, up from 16.9% in 1987.  That is the greatest share reported for any year since 1950, although changing definitions over the years distort the comparison.  -- The top fifth of all families got 44% of the income, up from 41.5% a decade earlier.  The bottom fifth of all families got 4.6% of the income, down from 5.2% a decade earlier.  -- Confirming other government data showing that wages aren't keeping pace with inflation, earnings of year-round, full-time male workers fell 1.3% in 1988 after adjusting for higher prices, the first such drop since 1982.  Earnings of female workers were unchanged.  -- Women working full-time earned 66 cents for every dollar earned by men, a penny more than in 1987 and seven cents more than in 1978.  -- Median household income -- which includes both those living in families and those who aren't -- rose 0.3% last year to $27,225 after inflation.  It rose sharply in the Northeast and Midwest and fell slightly in the South and West.  Median family income was $32,191, down 0.2%.  -- Per capita income of blacks, though still only 60% that of whites, rose 3.9% in 1988, while per capita income of whites rose only 1.5%.  -- Among married couples, the gap between blacks and whites narrowed sharply, as income of black families shot up 6.8% while income of whites didn't budge.  Fueling a controversy that has been simmering for years, the Census Bureau also said its figures would look far rosier if it recalculated the poverty threshold using an improved consumer-price measure adopted in 1983.  The bureau said some 3.5 million fewer people would have fallen below the poverty line in 1988 -- and the poverty rate would have been 10.5% instead of 13.1% -- under the alternative calculation.  Critics on the left and right have been calling for all sorts of revisions to the measure for years.  A report by the staff of the Joint Economic Committee of Congress released yesterday concluded, "It is misleading to make this change without adjusting for other changes."  The official poverty threshold is set by the Office of Management and Budget.  John E. Hayes Jr. was elected chairman, president and chief executive officer, succeeding David S. Black, who retired.  Mr. Hayes, 52 years old, left Southwestern Bell Telephone Co. in January, where he had been chairman, president and chief executive, to join Triad Capital Partners, a St. Louis company with interests in solid waste and recycling, telecommunications and international venture capital.  He has resigned his posts at Triad to take the Kansas Power positions.  Kansas Power said Mr. Black, 61, chose early retirement.  The space shuttle Atlantis boosted the Galileo spacecraft on its way to Jupiter, giving a big lift as well to an ambitious U.S. program of space exploration.  Seven years late in the launching, $1 billion over budget and a target of anti-nuclear protestors, Galileo has long been a symbol of trouble for the National Aeronautics and Space Administration.  But yesterday, as Atlantis rumbled into a patch of clear sky above Florida with storm clouds closing in on it, NASA sought to turn Galileo into a symbol of triumph.  "NASA did it right; that's the message," said J.R. Thompson, the agency's deputy administrator.  The $1.4 billion robot spacecraft faces a six-year journey to explore Jupiter and its 16 known moons.  If all goes well, it will parachute a probe into the dense Jovian atmosphere in July 1995 to pick up detailed data about gases that may be similar to the material from which the solar system was formed 4.6 billion years ago.  Jupiter is so enormous -- its mass is 318 times that of Earth -- that its gravity may have trapped these primordial gases and never let them escape.  Investigating Jupiter in detail may provide clues to what astronomer Tobias Owen calls the "cosmic paradox" of life: Jupiter and other bodies in the outer solar system are rich in elements such as hydrogen that are essential for life on Earth, but these planets are lifeless; Earth, on the other hand, has a diminished store of such material but is rich in life.  Some scientists have suggested that comets and asteroids may have brought enough of this kind of material from the outer solar system to Earth to spawn life.  Beginning in December 1995, Galileo will begin a two-year tour of the Jovian moons.  In 1979, two Voyager spacecraft sent back stunning photos of Jovian moons Io and Europa that showed them to be among the most intriguing bodies in the solar system.  The photos showed active geysers on Io spewing sulfurous material 190 miles into its atmosphere and indicated that Europa may have an ocean hidden under a thick sheet of ice.  Galileo's photos of Europa will be more than 1,000 times as sharp as Voyager's, according to Torrence Johnson, Galileo's project scientist, and may show whether it actually has the only known ocean other than those on Earth.  Atlantis lifted Galileo from the launch pad at 12:54 p.m. EDT and released the craft from its cargo bay about six hours later.  "Galileo is on its way to another world in the hands of the best flight controllers in this world," Atlantis Commander Donald Williams said.  "Fly safely."  The five-member Atlantis crew will conduct several experiments, including growing plants and processing polymeric materials in space, before their scheduled landing at Edwards Air Force Base, Calif., Monday.  The Galileo project started in 1977, and a number of project veterans were on hand to watch the launch.  An ebullient Mr. Johnson, wearing a NASA baseball cap and carrying a camera and binoculars, called the launch "fantastic."  Benny Chin, manager of the Galileo probe, compared it to watching a child leave home.  "I'm happy and sad," he said.  Anti-nuclear activists took a less positive view.  Having argued that Galileo's plutonium power source could have released lethal doses of radiation if the shuttle exploded yesterday, they weren't quieted by yesterday's successful launch.  Galileo will skim past Earth in 1990 and 1992, collecting energy from the planet's gravitational field to gain momentum for its trip to Jupiter.  The protesters point out that Galileo also could crash to Earth then.  They said they dropped plans to infiltrate the Kennedy Space Center after NASA beefed up its security.  One protest did get past NASA's guard, though; a computer virus caused anti-Galileo messages to flash onto some computer screens at NASA centers.  The successful launch continues a remarkable recovery in the U.S. space-science program.  An unmanned spacecraft, Magellan, already is heading to Venus and is due to begin mapping the planet next August.  Voyager 2 sent back spectacular photos of Neptune and its moon, Triton, this summer.  Next month, NASA plans to launch a satellite to study cosmic rays dating from the birth of the universe.  In December, the shuttle Columbia will try to retrieve a satellite that's been in orbit for nearly five years measuring the deleterious effects of space on materials and instruments.  Next March, the shuttle Discovery will launch the Hubble space telescope, a $1.5 billion instrument designed to see the faintest galaxies in the universe.  Not all of NASA's space-science work will be so auspicious, though.  Around Thanksgiving, the Solar Max satellite, which NASA repaired in orbit in 1984, will tumble back into the Earth's atmosphere.  NASA won't attempt a rescue; instead, it will try to predict whether any of the rubble will smash to the ground and where.  The Associated Press's earthquake coverage drew attention to a phenomenon that deserves some thought by public officials and other policy makers.  Private relief agencies, such as the Salvation Army and Red Cross, mobilized almost instantly to help people, while the Washington bureaucracy "took hours getting into gear."  One news show we saw yesterday even displayed 25 federal officials meeting around a table.  We recall that the mayor of Charleston complained bitterly about the federal bureaucracy's response to Hurricane Hugo.  The sense grows that modern public bureaucracies simply don't perform their assigned functions well.  Bally Manufacturing Corp. and New York developer Donald Trump have agreed in principle to a $6.5 million settlement of shareholder litigation stemming from Bally's alleged greenmail payment to Mr. Trump.  According to lawyers familiar with the settlement talks, the verbal agreement to end a lawsuit filed more than two years ago was reached last week and will soon be submitted to a federal judge in Camden, N.J.  In February 1987, Bally thwarted a possible hostile takeover bid from Mr. Trump by agreeing to buy 2.6 million of Mr. Trump's 3.1 million Bally shares for $83.7 million -- more than $18 million above market price.  The term greenmail refers to a situation where a company pays a premium over market value to repurchase a stake held by a potential acquirer.  Lawyers for shareholders, Bally and Mr. Trump all declined to talk publicly about the proposed settlement, citing a request by a federal court magistrate not to reveal details of the agreement until it is completed.  But some attorneys who are familiar with the matter said the $6.5 million payment will be shared by Bally and Mr. Trump, with the casino and hotel concern probably paying the bulk of the money.  The amount Bally and Mr. Trump will pay to settle the class-action suit pales in comparison to the $45 million Walt Disney Co. and Saul Steinberg's Reliance Group Holdings Inc. agreed to pay to settle a similar suit in July.  That settlement represented the first time shareholders were granted a major payment in a greenmail case.  Mr. Steinberg made a $59.7 million profit on the sale to Disney of his investment in the company in 1984.  But lawyers said Mr. Steinberg probably faced much more potential liability because, when he sued Disney during his takeover battle, he filed on behalf of all shareholders.  When Disney offered to pay Mr. Steinberg a premium for his shares, the New York investor didn't demand the company also pay a premium to other shareholders.  When Mr. Trump sued Bally, he sued only on behalf of himself.  Mr. Trump and Bally also appeared to have some leverage in the case because in the state of Delaware, where Bally is incorporated, courts have held that greenmail is often protected by the business-judgment rule.  That rule gives boards of directors wide latitude in deciding how to deal with dissident shareholders.  ---  SENATE HEARS final arguments in impeachment trial of federal judge.  Yesterday, U.S. Judge Alcee Hastings faced his jury -- the full U.S. Senate -- and said, "I am not guilty of having committed any crime."  Seventeen articles of impeachment against the Florida judge, one of the few blacks on the U.S. bench, were approved by the House in August 1988.  The central charge against Judge Hastings is that he conspired with a Washington lawyer to obtain a $150,000 bribe from defendants in a criminal case before the judge, in return for leniency.  He is also accused of lying under oath and of leaking information obtained from a wiretap he supervised.  The Senate's public gallery was packed with Judge Hastings' supporters, who erupted into applause after he finished his argument.  Judge Hastings, who was acquitted of similar charges by a federal jury in 1983, claims he is being victimized and that the impeachment proceedings against him constitute double jeopardy.  But Rep. John Bryant (D., Texas), the lead counsel for the House managers who conducted a lengthy inquiry into Judge Hastings' activities, said "a mountain of evidence points to his certain guilt."  The Senate will deliberate behind closed doors today and is scheduled to vote on the impeachment tomorrow.  If the judge is impeached, as is thought likely, he will be removed from office immediately.  However, Judge Hastings has said he will continue to fight and is contemplating an appeal of any impeachment to the U.S. Supreme Court.  ---  COMPANIES SEEKING to make insurers pay for pollution cleanup win court victory.  In a case involving Avondale Industries Inc. and its insurer, Travelers Cos., the Second U.S. Circuit Court of Appeals in New York ruled in favor of the company on two issues that lawyers say are central to dozens of pollution cases around the country.  Travelers and other insurers have maintained that cleanup costs aren't damages and thus aren't covered under commercial policies.  They also have argued that government proceedings notifying a company of potential responsibility don't fit the legal definition of a lawsuit; thus, such governmental proceedings aren't covered by the policies, the insurers say.  The appeals court disagreed on both counts.  Avondale was notified by Louisiana officials in 1986 that it was potentially responsible for a cleanup at an oil-recycling plant.  Avondale asked Travelers to defend it in the state proceeding, but the insurer didn't respond.  The appeals court upheld a district judge's ruling that the insurer had to defend the company in such proceedings.  The appeals court also said, "We think an ordinary businessman reading this policy would have believed himself covered for the demands and potential damage claims" stemming from any cleanup.  "This decision will have a very considerable impact," said Kenneth Abraham, professor of environmental law and insurance law at the University of Virginia, because many commercial insurance policies are issued by companies based in New York.  William Greaney, an attorney for the Chemical Manufacturers Association, said that while other appeals courts have ruled differently on whether cleanup costs are damages, the influence of the appeals court in New York "will make insurers sit up and listen."  He said the decision was the first in which a federal appeals court has ruled whether administrative government proceedings qualify as litigation.  Barry R. Ostrager, an attorney for Travelers, said, "there are procedural bases on which this case will be appealed further."  ---  NEW YORK'S poor face nearly three million legal problems a year without legal help.  That is the conclusion of a report released by the New York State Bar Association.  The report was based on a telephone survey of 1,250 low-income households across the state, a mail survey of major legal-services programs and on-site interviews with individuals in the field.  "The report provides detailed documentation of the extent and nature of the problem and indicates how we may want to shape solutions," said Joseph Genova, chairman of the committee that oversaw the survey and a partner at the law firm of Milbank, Tweed, Hadley & McCloy.  According to the study, slightly more than 34% of those surveyed reported having at least one housing problem every year for which they had no legal help.  Nearly 36% ranked housing problems as their most serious unmet legal need.  Other areas targeted by the survey's respondents included difficulty obtaining or maintaining public benefits (22%), consumer fraud (15.4%), and health-care issues (15%).  During the 15-month survey, 43% of all legal-services programs said that at some period they were unable to accept new clients unless they had an emergency.  Mr. Genova said the committee may meet to propose solutions to the problems identified in the study.  ---  PROSECUTOR TO JOIN Gibson Dunn: Assistant U.S. Attorney Randy Mastro, who headed the government's racketeering case against the International Brotherhood of Teamsters, will join Gibson, Dunn & Crutcher in its New York office.  Mr. Mastro has been with the New York U.S. attorney's office for nearly five years.  In 1987 he became deputy chief of the civil division.  Mr. Mastro will do civil litigation and white-collar defense work for Gibson Dunn, which is based in Los Angeles.  ---  FORMER APPLE COMPUTER Inc. general counsel John P. Karalis has joined the Phoenix, Ariz., law firm of Brown & Bain.  Mr. Karalis, 51, will specialize in corporate law and international law at the 110-lawyer firm.  Before joining Apple in 1986, Mr. Karalis served as general counsel at Sperry Corp.  After failing to find a buyer for the Sears Tower in Chicago, Sears, Roebuck & Co. is negotiating with Boston pension fund adviser Aldrich, Eastman & Waltch Inc. to refinance the property for close to $850 million, according to people close to the negotiations.  Under the proposed agreement involving the world's tallest building, Chicago-based Sears would receive about half the money through conventional mortgage financing and the other half as a convertible mortgage.  At the end of the term of the convertible loan, Sears could still own half the building, and AEW could own the other half.  Neither side would comment.  The parties are currently negotiating over who would manage the building, which will be emptied of 6,000 employees from Sears' merchandise group, which is moving elsewhere.  The new manager will face the daunting task of leasing 1.8 million square feet in a relatively soft Chicago real estate market.  Also, it has not yet been decided exactly how much of the mortgage AEW will be able to convert into equity.  Convertible mortgages have become an increasingly popular way to finance prestigious buildings of late.  In a convertible mortgage, the investor lends the building owner a certain amount in return for the option to convert its interest into equity, usually less than 50%, at the end of the loan term.  During the term, the lender can either receive a percentage of cash flow, a percentage of the building's appreciation or a fixed return.  The main advantage of a convertible mortgage is that it is not a sale and therefore does not trigger costly transfer taxes and reappraisal.  Sears said it would put the 110-story tower on the block almost a year ago as part of its anti-takeover restructuring.  But Japanese institutions shied away from bidding on the high-profile tower out of fear their purchase of the property would trigger anti-Japanese sentiment.  Last summer, Sears appeared to have a deal with Canadian developer Olympia & York Developments Ltd.  But that deal fell through in September after it became clear that the sale would lead to a major real estate tax reassessment, raising property taxes, and making it difficult to lease the building at competitive prices.  Real estate industry executives said Sears' investment banker, Goldman, Sachs & Co., sought financing in Japan.  However, Japanese authorities apparently were concerned that a refinancing also would attract too much publicity.  Sears then went back to AEW, the Boston pension adviser that had proposed a convertible debt deal during the first round of bids last spring.  AEW has $3.5 billion of real estate investments nationwide, according to a spokesman.  Tandy Corp. said it signed a definitive agreement to acquire two units of Datatronic AB of Stockholm for cash.  The amount wasn't disclosed.  The electronics maker and retailer previously estimated the sale price at between $100 million and $200 million for Datatronic's Victor microcomputer and Micronic hand-held computer subsidiaries.  In addition, Tandy will acquire rights to the Victor and Micronic names for computers.  During 1988, the Datatronic subsidiaries had combined sales in excess of $200 million.  The transaction will give Tandy a well-known European computer brand that includes 2,700 dealers and distributors marketing to medium-sized business and educational institutions.  Closing of the transaction is subject to certain conditions and regulatory approvals, the company said.  Two rules in pending congressional legislation threaten to hinder leveraged buy-outs by raising the price tags of such deals by as much as 10%.  Wall Street is seething over the rules, which would curtail the tax deductibility of debt used in most LBOs.  The provisions, in deficit-reduction bills recently passed by the House and Senate, could further cool the takeover boom that has been the driving force behind the bull market in stocks for much of the 1980s, some tax experts and investment bankers argue.  Indeed, some investment bankers have already started restructuring deals to cope with the expected rules.  Wall Street has all but conceded on the issue and is now lobbying for the less onerous Senate version of one of the provisions.  At issue is the deductibility of certain junk bonds that are used in most LBOs.  Such high-yield debt is similar to a zero-coupon bond in that it is sold at a discount to face value, with interest accruing instead of being paid to the holder.  Under current rules, that accrued interest is deductible by the company issuing the debt.  The House version of the legislation would kill that deduction, and label any such debt as equity, which isn't deductible.  The less-rigorous Senate version would defer the deductibility for roughly five years.  "You see these in just about every LBO," said Robert Willens, senior vice president in charge of tax issues at Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc. in New York.  "It becomes a source of cash" for the company making the LBO because it gets a deduction and doesn't have to repay the debt for several years.  Typically, Mr. Willens estimates, this type of debt makes up 15% to 20% of the financing for LBOs.  These types of bonds have been used in buy-outs of companies such as RJR Nabisco Inc., Storer Communications Inc. and Kroger Co.  A second provision passed by the Senate and House would eliminate a rule allowing companies that post losses resulting from LBO debt to receive refunds of taxes paid over the previous three years.  For example, if a company posted a loss of $100 million from buy-out interest payments, the existing rule would allow the concern to be able to receive a refund from the tax it paid from 1986 through 1989, when it may have been a profitable public company.  But that rule is being virtually overlooked by Wall Street, which is concentrating on coping with the deduction issue.  "Prices for LBOs have to come down if you don't have that feature," argued Lawrence Schloss, managing director for merchant banking at Donaldson, Lufkin & Jenrette Securities Corp. in New York.  Several Wall Street officials say the proposed legislation already is having an impact.  An investment group led by Chicago's Pritzker family recently lowered a $3.35 billion bid for American Medical International, Beverly Hills, Calif., because of the threat of the legislation.  Moreover, one investment banker, who requested anonymity, said his firm didn't raise the ante for a target company earlier this month after a stronger bid emerged from a public company that wasn't concerned about the financing provision.  "We would have paid more if we thought that law wasn't going to pass," he said.  One possible solution for Wall Street is to increase the equity part of the transaction -- that is, give lenders a bigger stake in the surviving company rather than just interest payments.  That would force the buy-out firm and the target company's management to reduce their level of ownership.  "The pigs in the trough may have to give a little bit of the slop back and then the deal can go through," said Peter C. Canellos, tax partner at Wachtell, Lipton, Rosen & Katz.  Another solution, said a tax lawyer who requested anonymity, is for firms to use convertible bonds that sell at a discount.  Since they have a lower interest rate, they wouldn't fall under the junk-bond category that would lose its deductibility.  The House version of the bill would make debt non-deductible if it pays five percentage points above Treasury notes, has at least a five-year maturity and doesn't pay interest for at least one year out of the first five.  The bill would then declare that the debt is equity and therefore isn't deductible.  The Senate bill would only deny the deduction until interest is actually paid.  Currently, even though the issuer doesn't pay tax, the debt holder is taxed on the accrued interest.  But those holders are often foreign investors and tax-exempt pension funds that don't pay taxes on their holdings.  The Senate estimates that its version of the provision would yield $17 million the first year and a total of $409 million over five years.  The House version would raise slightly more.  Even if Wall Street finds ways around the new rules, a Senate aide contends LBOs will become somewhat more difficult.  "There's no question it will make LBOs more expensive," he said.  "The interest deduction was the engine that made these things more productive."  The average publicly offered commodity fund fell 4.2% in September, largely because of the volatile markets in foreign currencies, according to Norwood Securities.  The firm said that losers outnumbered gainers by more than three to one among the 122 funds it tracks.  For the first nine months of the year, Norwood said the average fund has lost 3.3%.  The government moved aggressively to open the spigots of federal aid for victims of the California earthquake, but its reservoir of emergency funds must be replenished soon if the aid is to continue.  President Bush signed a disaster declaration covering seven Northern California counties.  The declaration immediately made the counties eligible for temporary housing, grants and low-cost loans to cover uninsured property losses.  In addition, an unusually wide array of federal agencies moved to provide specialized assistance.  The Department of Housing and Urban Development prepared to make as many as 100 vacant houses available for those left homeless, the Agriculture Department was set to divert food from the school-lunch program to earthquake victims, and the Pentagon was providing everything from radio communications to blood transfusions to military police for directing traffic.  But the pool of federal emergency-relief funds already is running low because of the heavy costs of cleaning up Hurricane Hugo, and Congress will be under pressure to allocate more money quickly.  In Hugo's wake, Congress allocated $1.1 billion in relief funds, and White House spokesman Marlin Fitzwater said $273 million of that money remains and could be diverted for quick expenditures related to the earthquake.  Now, though, enormous costs for earthquake relief will pile on top of outstanding costs for hurricane relief.  "That obviously means that we won't have enough for all of the emergencies that are now facing us, and we will have to consider appropriate requests for follow-on funding," Mr. Fitzwater said.  The federal government isn't even attempting yet to estimate how much the earthquake will cost it.  But Mr. Fitzwater said, "There will be, I think quite obviously, a very large amount of money required from all levels of government."  In Congress, lawmakers already are looking for ways to add relief funds.  Money could be added to a pending spending bill covering the Federal Emergency Management Agency, which coordinates federal disaster relief.  More likely, relief funds could be added to an omnibus spending bill that Congress is to begin considering next week.  But it isn't just Washington's relief dollars that are spread thin; its relief manpower also is stretched.  FEMA still has special disaster centers open to handle the aftermath of Hugo, and spokesman Russell Clanahan acknowledged that "we're pretty thin."  Mr. Clanahan says FEMA now possibly may have the heaviest caseload in its history.  To further complicate relief efforts, the privately funded American Red Cross also finds itself strapped for funds after its big Hugo operation.  "It's been a bad month money-wise and every other way," said Sally Stewart, a spokeswoman for the Red Cross.  "It just makes it a little rough when you have to worry about the budget."  The Red Cross has opened 30 shelters in the Bay area, serving 5,000 people.  Twenty-five trucks capable of cooking food were dispatched from other states.  All the precise types of federal aid that will be sent to California won't be determined until state officials make specific requests to FEMA, agency officials said.  And in the confusion after the earthquake, "the information flow is a little slow coming in from the affected area," said Carl Suchocki, a FEMA spokesman.  Still, some aid is moving westward from Washington almost immediately.  HUD officials said they will make available as many as 100 Bay area houses that are under HUD loans but now are vacant after the houses have been inspected to ensure they are sound.  Additional housing vouchers and certificates will be made available, officials said, and some housing and community-development funds may be shifted from other programs or made available for emergency use.  Another federal agency not normally associated with disaster relief -- the Internal Revenue Service -- moved quickly as well.  The IRS said it will waive certain tax penalties for earthquake victims unable to meet return deadlines or make payments because of the quake's devastation.  The agency plans to announce specific relief procedures in the coming days.  And the Treasury said residents of the San Francisco area will be able to cash in savings bonds even if they haven't held them for the minimum six-month period.  One advantage that federal officials have in handling earthquake relief is the large number of military facilities in the San Francisco Bay area, facilities that provide a ready base of supplies and workers.  Even before the full extent of the devastation was known, Defense Secretary Dick Cheney ordered the military services to set up an emergency command center in the Pentagon and prepare to respond to various FEMA requests for assistance.  By yesterday afternoon, Air Force transport planes began moving additional rescue and medical supplies, physicians, communications equipment and FEMA personnel to California.  A military jet flew a congressional delegation and senior Bush administration officials to survey the damage.  And the Pentagon said dozens of additional crews and transport aircraft were on alert "awaiting orders to move emergency supplies."  Two Air Force facilities near Sacramento, and Travis Air Force Base, 50 miles northeast of San Francisco, were designated to serve as medical-airlift centers.  Some victims also were treated at the Letterman Army Medical Center in San Francisco and at the Naval Hospital in Oakland.  In addition, 20 military police from the Presidio, a military base in San Francisco, are assisting with traffic control, and a Navy ship was moved from a naval station at Treasure Island near the Bay Bridge to San Francisco to help fight fires.  To help residents in Northern California rebuild, FEMA intends to set up 17 disaster assistance offices in the earthquake area in the next several days and to staff them with 400 to 500 workers from various agencies, said Robert Volland, chief of the agency's individual assistance division.  At these offices, earthquake victims will be helped in filling out a one-page form that they will need to qualify for such federal assistance as home-improvement loans and to repair houses.  And federal officials are promising to move rapidly with federal highway aid to rebuild the area's severely damaged road system.  The Federal Highway Administration has an emergency relief program to help states and local governments repair federally funded highways and bridges seriously damaged by natural disasters.  The account currently has $220 million.  And though federal law dictates that only $100 million can be disbursed from that fund in any one state per disaster, administration officials expect Congress to move in to authorize spending more now in California.  To get that money, states must go through an elaborate approval process, but officials expect red tape to be cut this time.  Keith Mulrooney, special assistant to Federal Highway Administrator Thomas Larson, also said that after the 1971 San Fernando earthquake in Southern California, the state set tougher standards for bridges, and with federal aid, began a program to retrofit highways and bridges for earthquake hazards.  The first phase of the program has been completed, but two other phases are continuing.  The two major structures that failed Tuesday night, he said, were both built well before the 1971 earthquake -- the San Francisco Bay Bridge, completed in the 1930s, and the section of I-880, built in the 1950s.  The I-880 section had completed the first phase of the retrofitting.  ---  Laurie McGinley contributed to this article.  FARMERS REAP abundant crops.  But how much will shoppers benefit?  The harvest arrives in plenty after last year's drought-ravaged effort: The government estimates corn output at 7.45 billion bushels, up 51% from last fall.  Soybean production swells 24%.  As a result, prices paid to farmers for the commodities, which are used in products as diverse as bubble gum and chicken feed, plummet 20% to 33%.  But don't expect too much in the way of price breaks soon at the supermarket.  Economists expect consumer food prices to jump 5.5% this year to the highest level since 1980 and up from last year's 4.1% rise.  Next year may see a drop of one percentage point.  Beef prices, hovering near records since the drought, could drop in earnest this winter if ranchers expand herds.  Lower feed prices may help animals eat more cheaply, but humans have to factor in an expensive middleman: the processor.  Food companies probably won't cut their prices much, blaming other costs.  "Labor takes the biggest single chunk out of the `food dollar,'" says Frank Pankyo of the Food Institute.  Stokely says stores revive specials like three cans of peas for 99 cents.  Two cans cost 89 cents during the drought.  IF IN VITRO fertilization works, it usually does so after only a few tries.  Costly infertility problems and procedures proliferate as aging baby boomers and others decide to have children -- now.  It's estimated that one in six couples experiences infertility, and in 1987, Americans spent about $1 billion to fight the problem.  Only about five states now offer some form of insurance coverage, but more are expected.  A letter in the New England Journal of Medicine notes that while technology offers "almost endless hope . . . when to stop has become a difficult question. . . ."   The authors, from Boston's Beth Israel Hospital, say that 84% of the 50 births they followed occurred after only two in vitro cycles.  It adds that births were "extremely unlikely" after the fourth cycle and concludes couples who don't achieve a pregnancy after four to six procedures should be advised that success is unlikely.  Some couples continue to try.  "Such determination may translate into extreme physical, emotional and financial costs," the letter warns.  MARKET MOVES, these managers don't.  Only three of the 25 corporate pension fund managers attending a Lowry Consulting Group client conference say they plan to change the asset allocation mix in their portfolios because of the market drop.  WORLD ODDITIES come alive in a multimedia version of the Guinness Book of Records.  The $99 CD-ROM disk (it can only be played on an Apple Macintosh computer at the moment) combines animation, music and sound.  Among the Guinness disk's wonders: the world's loudest recorded belch.  ARTY FAX from David Hockney begins a tongue-in-cheek exhibit today at New York's Andre Emmerich Gallery.  One of the artist's earliest Fax works was "Little Stanley Sleeping," a portrait of his dog.  PACS GIVE and receive in a debatable duet with employees' favored charities.  The Federal Election Commission clears corporate plans to donate to an employee's chosen charity in exchange for the worker's gift to the company political action committee.  Latest approvals: Bell Atlantic's New Jersey Bell and General Dynamics.  Companies get more political clout plus a possible tax-deductible charitable donation -- so far no word from the IRS on deductibility.  Detroit Edison, the plan pioneer, generated $54,000 in matching funds this year, up from $39,000 in 1988.  But the utility may not continue next year.  "We're on a tight budget," says Detroit Edison's Carol Roskind.  Two election commission members opposed the matching plans.  Scott E. Thomas says the plans give employees "a bonus in the form of charitable donations made from an employer's treasury" in exchange for the political donation.  "The U.S. government could be, in effect, subsidizing political contributions to corporate PACs," he says.  New Jersey Bell awaits state clearance.  Despite federal approval, General Dynamics says it decided it won't go ahead with the matching program.  CHRISTMAS SHOPPERS find a helping hand from some catalog companies.  Blunt Ellis & Loewi estimates direct mail catalog sales rose to $12 billion last year.  And while it's too soon to tell how sales will fare in the important 1989 Christmas season, some companies take steps to ease the usual 11th-hour crush.  Spiegel promises a "Guaranteed Christmas," with a pledge to deliver goods before Christmas if ordered by Dec. 20.  And, for an extra $6, Land's End will deliver orders within two days; customers can designate the day.  Spiegel, which also owns Eddie Bauer and Honeybee, says that since 1987, sales have doubled during the week before Christmas.  An L.L. Bean spokeswoman notes: "People are just used to living in a last-minute society."  Blunt Ellis, a Milwaukee brokerage firm, says part of the reason catalog sales grow in popularity is because consumers have more money but less time to spend it.  L.L. Bean hires about 2,700 workers for the season rush, about 300 more than last year; Land's End hires 2,000.  BRIEFS: Guarana Antarctica, a Brazilian soft drink, is brought to the U.S. by Amcap, Chevy Chase, Md.  New Product News says the beverage "looks like ginger ale, tastes a little like cherries and smells like bubble gum." . . .  "Amenities" planned for Chicago's new Parkshore Tower apartments include an on-site investment counselor.  Four years ago, Pittsburgh was designated the most-livable U.S. city by Rand McNally's Places Rated Almanac, and the honor did wonders to improve Pittsburgh's soot-stained image.  "People asked, is it really true?" says Maury Kelley, vice president, marketing services, for Beecham Products USA, a maker of health and personal-care products that used the ranking in its recruiting brochure.  Yuba City, Calif., meanwhile, ranked dead last among 329 metro areas.  Unamused, residents burned Rand McNally books and wore T-shirts that said: "Kiss my Atlas."  The almanac will be making new friends and enemies on Oct. 27, when an updated version will be released.  Pittsburgh figures it will be dethroned but plans to accept its ouster graciously.  The city's Office of Promotion plans media events to welcome its successor.  "We're encouraging a graceful transition," says Mary Kay Poppenberg, the organization's president.  "Our attitude is that (the ranking) is like Miss America.  Once you're Miss America, you're always Miss America."  Tell that to Atlanta, which Pittsburgh replaced as the most-livable city in 1985.  Many Atlantans thought Pittsburgh was an unworthy heir.  A columnist in the Atlanta Journal and Constitution wrote: "Who did the research for this report?  Two guys from Gary, Ind.?"  Not so.  Co-authors David Savageau and Richard Boyer, live in Gloucester, Mass., and Asheville, N.C., respectively.  "Atlanta," Mr. Savageau sniffs, "has unrealistic pretensions to world-class status."  The new edition lists the top 10 metropolitan areas as Anaheim-Santa Ana, Calif.; Boston; Louisville, Ky.; Nassau-Suffolk, N.Y.; New York; Pittsburgh; San Diego; San Francisco; Seattle; and Washington.  Mr. Savageau says earthquake or not, San Francisco makes the list.  But attention also rivets on who finishes last, and Pine Bluff, Ark. -- which finished third to last in 1981 and second to last in 1985 -- is certainly in the running.  "I hate to dignify the publication by commenting on the obscene rating," Mayor Carolyn Robinson says, adding that cities have no way to rebut the book.  "It's like fighting your way out of a fog.  You don't know which way to punch."  Northrop Corp.'s third-quarter net income fell 25% to $21.5 million, or 46 cents a share, while General Dynamics Corp. reported nearly flat earnings of $76.5 million, or $1.83 a share.  Los Angeles-based Northrop recorded an 8.2% decline in sales as B-2 Stealth bomber research-and-development revenue continued to ebb and high costs on some other programs cut into profit.  The aerospace concern earned $28.8 million, or 61 cents a share, a year earlier.  Sales in the latest period were $1.25 billion, down from $1.36 billion in the 1988 quarter.  At St. Louis-based General Dynamics, sales rose 10% to $2.52 billion from $2.29 billion.  It earned $76.4 million, or $1.82 a share, in the 1988 quarter.  General Dynamics credited significant earnings gains in its general aviation and material service segments, an earnings recovery in submarine operations, and higher military aircraft sales.  Northrop said sales fell because of the decline in B-2 development dollars from the government as the plane continues its initial production stage and because fewer F/A-18 fighter sections are being produced in its subcontract work with prime contractor McDonnell Douglas Corp.  In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange, Northrop shares closed at $21.125, off 25 cents.  General Dynamics closed at $54.875, up 50 cents.  Northrop, which since early 1988 has declined to accept fixed-price contracts for research and development, said earnings were hurt by excessive costs on a number of such contracts won years ago.  Among them were the ALQ-135 electronic countermeasures system for the F-15 fighter.  Northrop's interest expense also soared to $35 million from $17 million a year ago.  It said debt remained at the $1.22 billion that has prevailed since early 1989, although that compared with $911 million at Sept. 30, 1988.  The backlog of undelivered orders at Northrop on Sept. 30 was $4.68 billion, down from $5.16 billion a year earlier.  For the nine months, Northrop reported a net loss of $46.9 million, or $1 a share, compared with profit of $190.3 million, or $4.05 a share, in 1988.  Sales dipped 3.6% to $3.92 billion from $4.07 billion.  At General Dynamics, factors reducing earnings in the military aircraft segment included higher levels of cost-sharing in development of the Advanced Tactical Fighter, and the high cost of an advanced version of the F-16 fighter.  F-16 deliveries also have fallen "slightly behind schedule," although a return to the previous schedule is expected in 1990, the company said.  Backlog at General Dynamics rose to $16.5 billion from $15.8 billion.  Its interest expense surged to $21.5 million from $12.4 million.  For the nine months, General Dynamics earned $210.3 million, or $5.03 a share, up marginally from $208.8 million, or $4.97 a share, on a 4.9% rise in sales to $7.41 billion from $7.06 billion.  Lotus Development Corp. reported a surprisingly strong 51% increase in third-quarter net income on a 32% sales gain, buoyed by strong demand for a new version of its 1-2-3 computer spreadsheet.  The results topped analysts' expectations and the earnings growth of competitors, prompting traders to all but forget the product-launch delays that bogged down the company for much of the past two years.  Yesterday, in heavy, national over-the-counter trading, Lotus shares rose to $32.50, up $1.25 apiece, capping a threemonth run-up of more than 40%.  Lotus said net rose to $23 million, or 54 cents a share, on sales of $153.9 million.  A year ago, net was $14.3 million, or 31 cents a share, on sales of $116.8 million.  For the nine months, net of $38.5 million, or 92 cents a share, trailed the year earlier's $49.9 million, or $1.08 a share.  Sales rose to $406 million from $356 million the year earlier.  In the first half, Lotus struggled to keep market share with costly promotions while customers awaited the launch of 1-2-3 Release 3, the upgraded spreadsheet software.  Lotus's results were about 10% higher than analysts' average expectations and compared favorably with the 36% earnings rise reported a day earlier by rival Microsoft Corp. of Redmond, Wash.  The company said results were bolstered by upgrades to Release 3 by previous customers and improved profit margins, the result of manufacturing-cost controls.  Rick Sherlund, a Goldman Sachs analyst, said Lotus had upgrade revenue of about $22 million in the quarter, twice what he had expected.  Also, he estimated unit shipments of 1-2-3 in all its forms were about 315,000, up 7% from 1988's quarterly average.  Demand for the new version was enabling Lotus to raise prices with distributors and to hold market share against Microsoft and other competitors that tried to exploit the earlier delays in Release 3's launch, Mr. Sherlund added.  He estimated that 1-2-3 outsold Microsoft's Excel spreadsheet by four-to-one in the quarter, and held a 70% or better share of the spreadsheet market.  Silicon Valley heaved a sigh of relief yesterday.  Though details were sketchy in the aftermath of the violent earthquake that shook the high-tech corridor along with the rest of the San Francisco Bay area, a spot check of computer makers turned up little, if any, potentially lingering damage to facilities or fabrication equipment.  Analysts and corporate officials said they expected practically no long-term disruption in shipments from the Valley of either hardware or software goods.  Intel Corp., Advanced Micro Devices Inc. and National Semiconductor Corp. were all up and running yesterday, though many workers were forced to stay home because of damaged roadways; others elected to take the day off.  "These systems are more rugged than many people would believe," said Thomas Kurlak, who tracks the computer industry for Merrill Lynch Research.  "It's not the end of the world if you shake them up a little bit."  Other companies, including International Business Machines Corp. and Hewlett-Packard Co., completely idled their operations because of Tuesday evening's temblor, which registered 6.9 on the Richter scale.  Personnel spent the morning inspecting buildings for structural weaknesses, mopping up water from broken pipes and clearing ceiling tiles and other debris from factory floors.  Still, many were confident that "in a day or two, everything should be back to normal," according to a spokeswoman for the Semiconductor Industry Association, based in Cupertino.  IBM, for instance, said it anticipates returning to a normal work schedule by the weekend at its San Jose plant, which puts out disk drives for the 3090 family of mainframes.  A Hewlett-Packard spokeswoman said that, while "things are a big mess," some 18,000 Valley employees have been called back to work today.  Apple Computer added that it was being "cautiously optimistic," despite not yet closely eyeballing all of its 50 buildings in the region.  Even the carefully calibrated machinery in its giant Fremont plant, to the north of the Valley, was believed to be undamaged.  Sun Microsystems Inc. and Tandem Computers Inc. also signaled that they should recover quickly.  Digital Equipment Corp., with major facilities in Santa Clara, Cupertino, Palo Alto and Mountain View, said that all of its engineering and manufacturing sites had reported to corporate headquarters in Maynard, Mass., Tuesday night.  None sustained "significant" damage, a spokesman said, adding that "the delicate manufacturing process machines were checked and were all found to be operating normally."  For many companies, of course, there is still a slew of nagging problems to grapple with, some of which have the potential to become quite serious.  For example, a spokesman for Advanced Micro Devices said the Sunnyvale chip maker is worried about blackouts.  A sudden surge or drop in electric power could ruin integrated circuits being built.  But, given what might have happened to the fragile parts that are at the heart of the microelectronics business, the bulk of Valley companies seemed to be just about shouting hosannas.  Several factors apparently spared the Valley -- a sprawling suburban stretch from San Jose to Palo Alto -- from the kind of impact felt in San Francisco, an hour's drive north.  For one thing, buildings there tend to be newer and, thus, in step with the latest safety codes.  Also, the soil in the Valley is solid, unlike the landfill of San Francisco's downtown Marina District, which was hit with fires and vast destruction.  In addition, some microelectronics companies said they were prepared for tremulous conditions like Tuesday's.  Their machine tools are even bolted to the shop floor.  Intel said that over the past decade, it has installed computer sensors and shutoff valves, sensitive to the shake of an earthquake, in the pipes that snake through its plants.  Like other large Valley companies, Intel also noted that it has factories in several parts of the nation, so that a breakdown at one location shouldn't leave customers in a total pinch.  That's certainly good news for such companies as Compaq Computer Corp., Houston, which has only a four-day supply of microprocessors from the Valley on hand because of a just-in-time manufacturing approach that limits the buildup of inventory.  Compaq said it foresees no difficulties in obtaining parts in the immediate future.  Computer makers were scrambling to help customers recover from the disaster.  Digital Equipment has set up disaster-recovery response centers in Dallas, Atlanta and Colorado Springs, Colo.  These units were handling calls both from people in the San Francisco area and from computers themselves, which are set to dial Digital automatically when trouble arises.  They then run remotely controlled self-diagnostic programs.  Digital also said it has dispatched teams of technicians to California.  Meanwhile, several other major installations around the Valley -- America's center of high-tech -- said they, too, fared as well as could be expected.  Lawrence Livermore National Laboratory, where the Energy Department tests and conducts research on nuclear weapons, had only "superficial damage," a spokesman said.  At Lockheed Corp.'s missiles and space systems group in Sunnyvale, about 40 miles south of San Francisco, workers were asked to head to work yesterday after it was realized that "there were no show-stoppers" in the 150-plus buildings on its one-square-mile campus.  Several engineering and research offices needed closer scrutiny to make sure they weren't in danger of crumbling, but "the bulk of the place is in pretty good shape," an official said.  One of Lockheed's most lucrative sectors -- accounting for more than half the aerospace company's $10.59 billion in sales in 1988 -- the missiles and space group is the prime Pentagon contractor on the Trident II ballistic missile.  It also generates pieces of the missile shield called the Strategic Defense Initiative.  Fortunately, the Hubble Space Telescope -- set to be launched on the shuttle next year in a search for distant solar systems and light emitted 14 billion years ago from the farthest reaches of the universe -- was moved from Sunnyvale to the Kennedy Space Center in Florida at the beginning of October.  ---  John R. Wilke contribued to this article.  Michael Maynard offered the world a faster way to break eggs.  As thanks, the egg industry tried to break him.  And the egg producers have done a pretty good job.  They tried to put Mr. Maynard out of business by an act of Congress.  Egg-industry lobbying helped persuade six states to ban Mr. Maynard's automatic egg-breaking machine because of fears over salmonella.  His company, Misa Manufacturing Inc., was forced to seek protection from creditors under federal bankruptcy law in 1987 and has since been liquidated.  Monthly sales of his Egg King machine -- which he now is marketing through a new company -- have sunk to about half a dozen from a peak of 75, says the 46-year-old businessman.  Mr. Maynard isn't the first entrepreneur to bump up against entrenched interests.  But his case is notable both for the scale of the fight -- it isn't often that a congressional hearing is held to determine whether one small businessman is a threat to the republic -- and for what it tells about the pitfalls of marketing a new product.  Now one might ask why people who sell eggs would fight someone who is trying to make it easier to crack them.  Part of the answer lies in the nature of the industry.  Many larger egg producers are also egg processors, who crack, inspect, and sanitize billions of eggs, turning them into powdered, liquified or frozen egg products.  However, dozens of bakers, restaurant chefs and other food preparers who flocked to Mr. Maynard's defense say that products ranging from egg bread to eclairs lose some zip when the eggs come in 30-pound cans instead of shells.  But for companies that use hundreds of eggs a day, breaking them by hand can get, well, out of hand.  The idea behind the Egg King is pretty simple: put the eggs into a cylinder that contains perforated baskets, spin them at a high speed to break the shells and strain the edible part through the baskets.  One Egg King -- which at just under four feet tall and two feet wide has been likened to the robot R2-D2 -- can crack about 20,000 eggs an hour.  Because fresh eggs are less expensive than processed ones, a big egg user can recover the Egg King's $3,390 cost in a few months, says Mr. Maynard.  Such centrifugal egg breakers have been around since the 1890s.  But when Mr. Maynard came forward with his machine in the early 1970s nobody else was offering them in the U.S.  The main reason: salmonella.  Chickens carry this bacteria, which can cause upset stomachs and, in rare cases, death among people.  Hens sometimes pass salmonella to the eggs, and it can also be found on unclean shells.  Thus, any machine that breaks large amounts of eggs at once has the potential to spread salmonella if a bad egg gets in with the good ones.  Mr. Maynard claims this is a manageable problem.  The Egg King carries written instructions to break only high-grade eggs that have been properly sanitized and, as an added precaution, to use the eggs only in products that will be cooked enough to kill bacteria.  With nearly 4,000 machines in use, there have been no salmonella problems as long as instructions were followed, Mr. Maynard boasts.  He says the handful of salmonella cases involving products that may have used eggs broken by an Egg King stemmed from a failure to adequately cook the products.  But he says that's no more a reason for banning Egg Kings than bad drivers are a reason for banning cars.  Opponents don't buy such arguments.  "Human nature being what it is, people don't always follow instructions," says Jack Guzewich, chief of food protection for the New York state Health Department.  Leading the assault against the Egg King has been United Egg Producers.  The Decatur, Ga., trade group has issued a "briefing book" that claims the machine is "a health hazard" and that Mr. Maynard is trying "to make a fast buck at the expense of the nation's egg producers."  The UEP declines to comment, but the group's attorney, Alfred Frawley, says the group's actions are motivated solely by "health concerns."  An early battleground was the U.S. Department of Agriculture.  Mr. Maynard initially won approval for his machine to be used at egg-processing facilities regulated by the USDA's Food Safety Inspection Service.  Unfortunately for Mr. Maynard, another branch of the USDA, the Agricultural Marketing Service, was in charge of eggs.  After receiving complaints from egg producers, this branch got the other branch to rescind its approval, thus limiting the machine's potential market to bakeries and restaurants and other establishments that aren't regulated by the USDA.  The egg producers also lobbied the Food and Drug Administration.  But the FDA in a 1985 letter to the United Egg Producers said that there was "little likelihood" of a health problem as long as instructions were followed.  So the producers went to Capitol Hill, where a congressman from Georgia introduced a measure to ban centrifugal egg-breaking machines.  Mr. Maynard, whose company at the time was based in Santa Ana, Calif., enlisted his local congressman, and the battle was joined.  Mr. Maynard's forces finally defeated the measure, though it took a vote on the floor of the House of Representatives to do it.  Even then, opponents managed to get a congressional hearing to examine what one congressman called an "unscrupulous" method for breaking eggs.  Foiled in their effort to get a national ban, the egg producers turned their attention to the states.  So far, New York, New Jersey, Nebraska, Georgia, Michigan and Minnesota have outlawed Mr. Maynard's device, citing health concerns.  An antitrust suit that Mr. Maynard's company filed in Los Angeles federal court against the United Egg Producers and others only added to the entrepreneur's woes.  The judge dismissed the suit and ordered Mr. Maynard's company to pay over $100,000 in legal fees to the defendants' lawyers.  Mr. Maynard says the ruling pushed his company into bankruptcy court.  Now he has moved to Oklahoma where costs are lower, and started a new company, Adsi Inc., to market his machine.  But, so far, the change of scenery hasn't ended his string of bad breaks.  Mr. Maynard recently fell from a horse and fractured his arm.  Michelle Pfeiffer can't chew gum and sing at the same time.  But on the evidence of "The Fabulous Baker Boys," that may be the only thing she can't do, at least when she's acting in movies.  As the tough, slinky lounge chanteuse in "The Fabulous Baker Boys," Ms. Pfeiffer sings for herself, and more than passably well.  Her Susie Diamond handles a song the way the greats do, like she's hearing the way it should sound inside her head and she's concentrating on matching that internal tone.  Yet her intensity stops and starts with the music.  When she isn't performing for an audience, she prepares for a song by removing the wad of gum from her mouth, and indicates that she's finished by sticking the gum back in.  Like almost everything in this wonderfully romantic and edgy movie, Ms. Pfeiffer's Susie seems like someone you've seen before, in numerous show-biz stories (even her name, Susie Diamond, sounds like a character Marilyn Monroe must have played).  Yet nothing about "Baker Boys," and certainly nothing about Ms. Pfeiffer, really is like something from the video vault.  Steve Kloves, the young writer and director (he isn't yet 30), has only one produced picture to his credit; he wrote the screenplay for "Racing With the Moon," a lovely coming-of-age picture set in the '40s.  Both movies are infused with the nostalgic sensibility of someone much older, someone who doesn't dismiss dreams, but who also has enough experience to see his limits.  However, Mr. Kloves directs his own material without sentimentality and at its own eccentric pace; "Baker Boys" is both bluesy and funny.  He's put a fresh spin on material that could come off terribly cliched; for example, the way Susie wows an audience the first time she sings with the Baker Boys.  Of course, it doesn't hurt that Mr. Kloves has made up for his lack of experience behind the camera with technicians who know exactly what they're doing.  Much of the picture's sensuality emerges from cinematographer Michael Ballhaus's slyly seductive lens work.  After working for years with Werner Rainer Fassbinder, the late German director, and more recently with Martin Scorsese ("After Hours," "The Color of Money," "The Last Temptation of Christ"), Mr. Ballhaus has developed a distinctively fluid style.  And Dave Grusin's witty score embraces the banal requirements of banquet-hall musicianship ("Feelings" is a must) without condescension.  Though Ms. Pfeiffer has the flashy part -- she gets the best comic bits and to wear glamorous dresses and spiked heelsthe boys are pretty great, too.  What seemed like a good idea, to cast the Bridges brothers (Jeff and Beau) as the Baker brothers, actually turned out to be a good idea.  Anyone who's tried to appear "natural" in front of a camera knows that it's much more natural to end up looking like a stiff.  So it's quite possible that the terrific play between the brothers isn't natural at all, that Jeff and Beau had to work like crazy to make their brotherly love -- and resentment and frustration and rage -- seem so very real.  When the movie opens the Baker brothers are doing what they've done for 15 years professionally, and twice as long as that for themselves: They're playing proficient piano, face-to-face, on twin pianos.  They're small time in the small time-hotels (not the best ones) and restaurants in Seattle.  Yet they don't disparage their audiences by disparaging their act.  They wear tuxedos most nights, unless circumstances (a regular gig at a "tropical" lounge, for example) require them to wear special costumes, like Hawaiian shirts.  Plump Beau, looking eager to please with his arched eyebrows and round face, plays the older brother, Frank.  Frank plans the program, takes care of business, and approaches the work like any other job.  He's even able to think of a job that takes him out of the house 300 nights a week as an ordinary job.  He's got a wife and two kids and a house in the suburbs; the audience sees only the house, and only near the end of the movie.  Frank grovels a little for the bookers, probably no more or less than he would have to if he worked for a big corporation.  On his off-hours he wears cardigan sweaters.  Jeff Bridges is the younger brother, Jack, who fancies himself the rebellious artist; he lives in a loft with his sick dog and the occasional visit from the little girl upstairs, who climbs down the fire escape.  Yet Jack's the one who can remember every dive they ever played, and when, and he dutifully shows up for work night after night (he consoles himself with booze and by showing up at the last minute).  Looking leaner than he has in a while, the younger Mr. Bridges's Jack is sexy and cynical and a far sadder case than Frank, who's managed to chisel his dreams to fit reality without feeling too cheated.  He can live with little pleasures.  Mr. Kloves has put together some priceless moments.  These include Jennifer Tilly's audition to be the Baker Boys' girl singer.  Ms. Tilly of the tweety-bird voice showed great comic promise during her stint as the mobster's girlfriend on the television show, "Hill Street Blues."  Here she delivers, especially during her enthusiastically awful rendition of the "Candy Man," which she sings while prancing around in a little cotton candy pink angora sweater that couldn't be more perfect. (It matches her voice.) And Ms. Pfeiffer's particular version of "Making Whoopee" -- and the way Mr. Ballhaus photographs her, from the tips of her red high heels right up her clingy red velvet dress -- might make you think of Marilyn Monroe if Ms. Pfeiffer hadn't gone and become a star in her own right.  ---  VIDEO TIP: If you'd like to see the first time Michelle Pfeiffer sang on screen, and you have a lot of patience, take a look at "Grease 2."  You'll find her there.  Better yet, check out the emergence of her comic persona in "Married to the Mob," Jonathan Demme's delightful Mafia comedy.  International Proteins Corp. definitively agreed to pay $49 million and 2,850,000 of its shares for Hanson PLC's Ground Round restaurant subsidiary.  Shareholders of International Proteins, a food and agriproducts company, will vote on the transaction at a meeting late next month.  Hanson is a London producer of consumer and other goods.  International Proteins shares didn't trade yesterday on the American Stock Exchange.  They closed Tuesday in composite trading at $13.625, down 37.5 cents, giving the stock portion of the transaction an indicated value of $38.8 million.  Control Data Corp. agreed to sell its idle supercomputer manufacturing plant here to Minnesota Mining & Manufacturing Co. for $5.8 million.  The tentative agreement calls for 3M to use the 115,000-square-foot plant and 19 acres of land for research laboratories.  Control Data has been seeking a buyer for the facility since it folded its ETA Systems Inc. supercomputer unit this past April.  General Dynamics Corp. was awarded contracts totaling $589 million for one Navy Trident submarine and for Air Force research on the National Aerospace plane.  Grumman Corp. won a $58.9 million Navy contract for 12 F-14 aircraft.  Raytheon Co. was issued a $19.2 million Air Force contract for support of the Milstar communications satellite.  McDonnell Douglas Corp. got a $12.5 million Air Force contract for support work on the National Aerospace plane.  Denis C. Smith was named to the new post of vice president of world-wide advanced materials operations for this chemicals concern.  Mr. Smith, 50 years old, was formerly responsible for advanced materials, which include plastic composites and alloys, in North America only.  Himont is 81%-owned by Montedison S.p.A. of Milan, Italy.  Galveston-Houston Co. said it will redeem all 3,950 shares of its privately held 6.5% convertible Series C preferred stock Nov. 8.  Holders can either convert each share into 421 shares of the company's common stock, or surrender their shares at the per-share price of $1,000, plus accumulated dividends of $6.71 a share.  Galveston-Houston makes and markets products for the construction, mining and energy industries.  Bank Building & Equipment Corp. of America, which previously said accounting discrepancies its auditors uncovered would hurt earnings and require restatement of earlier results, increased its projections of the negative fiscal impact, and said it was exploring the company's sale.  Bank Building, which builds and equips banks, had announced it would restate the first-three quarters of this fiscal year, which ends Oct. 31.  On Oct. 5, the company estimated after-tax effects on the year's earnings would be "at least" $1.3 million.  Yesterday, the company said the negative after-tax effect on earnings for the year will be about $3.3 million.  For the nine months ended July 31, Bank Building had a net loss of $1 million, on revenue of $66.5 million.  Bank Building, which expects to report a fourth-quarter loss, said it engaged advisers to "explore financial alternatives for the company including the possible sale of the company or one or more of its units."  Company auditors are continuing their review, and final restated figures aren't yet available.  Bank Building earlier said the restatement is necessitated by "certain errors in recording receivables and payables" at its Loughman Cabinet division.  That division's manager has been fired.  In American Stock Exchange composite trading, Bank Building closed at $4 a share, down 62.5 cents.  Gen. Paul X. Kelley, retired commandant of the U.S. Marine Corps, was elected a director of this plastics, specialty materials and aerospace concern, succeeding Jewel Lafontant, who resigned to accept a government position.  Rep. Mary Rose Oakar (D., Ohio) at last week's hearings on irregularities in programs at the Department of Housing and Urban Development:  I don't want to feel guilty representing my constituents.  And if I think that some people {on HUD Secretary Jack Kemp's} staff are off base in terms in which they're evaluating certain things affecting my hometown, I have to tell you something -- I'm not going to take it.  I think that I'm elected to represent the people that sent me here.  And one of our charges is to be an ombudsman for our area.  And if we're not ombudsman for our area, we ought to be thrown out of office.  On the other hand, if we're asking for something unreasonable or unethical and so on, then that's a whole different story.  But if I feel that there are situations where I'm trying to get housing for our area -- whatever it happens to be -- and I have to feel that I can't even ask a question, I've got to tell you, I think that's outrageous. . . .   I think these regulations that would prohibit well-operated programs in areas across this country would be wrong to change. . . .  I don't want to see some guidelines change that's going to inhibit my city's opportunity to use its money.  The Chicago Mercantile Exchange said it fined Capcom Futures Inc. $500,000 and accepted its withdrawal from membership as part of a settlement of disciplinary actions against the firm.  Capcom Futures is a Chicago subsidiary of Capcom Financial Services Ltd., a London financial firm that was implicated last year in a scheme to launder drug money.  The case is pending.  The firm was indicted in Tampa, Fla., on money-laundering charges.  In June, the Chicago Board of Trade said it suspended Capcom Financial.  The Capcom Futures unit withdrew from Board of Trade membership voluntarily in August, a Board of Trade spokesman said.  Capcom Futures, while neither admitting nor denying the Merc charges, said in a statement that the Merc charges were "technical in nature" and that "no customers were hurt" as a result of the violations cited by the Merc.  The Merc alleged that, among other things, from April 1987 through October 1988 Capcom Futures failed to document trades between Capcom Futures and people or entities directly or indirectly controlled by Capcom Futures shareholders.  Frederick W. Lang, 65 years old, the founder of this software services concern, was elected to the new post of chairman.  Formerly president and treasurer, Mr. Lang remains chief executive officer.  Victor C. Benda, 58, formerly executive vice president, succeeds Mr. Lang as president and becomes chief operating officer, a new post.  Maurice Warren, 56-year-old group managing director, was named chief executive officer of this food and agriculture group.  The post of chief executive has been vacant since July when Terry Pryce, 55, left the company.  Money-market mutual fund assets grew at nearly three times their usual rate in the latest week, as investors opted for safety instead of the stock market.  Money-fund assets soared $4.5 billion in the week ended Tuesday, to a record $348.4 billion, according to IBC/Donoghue's Money Fund Report, a Holliston, Mass.-based newsletter.  "We were expecting it, following the fall of the Dow Friday," said Brenda Malizia Negus, editor of Money Fund Report.  "It's the proverbial flight to safety."  Despite recent declines in interest rates, money funds continue to offer better yields than other comparable investments.  The average seven-day compound yield on the 400 taxable funds tracked by IBC/Donoghue's was 8.55% in the latest week, down from 8.60%.  Compound yields assume reinvestment of dividends and that current yields continue for a year.  Most short-term certificates of deposit are yielding about 8% or less at major banks, and the yields on Treasury bills sold at Monday's auction fell to 7.61% for three months and 7.82% for six months.  Money-fund assets have been rising at an average rate of $1.6 billion a week in recent months, Ms. Negus said, reflecting the relatively high yields.  In the latest week, funds open to institutions alone grew by $1.8 billion.  Some fund managers say inflows could increase in coming days as a result of stock selling in the wake of Friday's 190.58point drop in the Dow Jones Industrial Average.  "If you're selling equities, you don't start getting proceeds for five to seven days," said Frank Rachwalski, who manages the Kemper Money Market Fund.  Neal Litvack, marketing vice president for Fidelity Investments, said inflows Friday into Fidelity's Spartan and Cash Reserves money-market funds were about twice normal levels, with about half coming from equity and junk-bond funds.  Monday and Tuesday "were lackluster in comparison," he said.  "People aren't necessarily running scared," Mr. Litvack said.  "They're maintaining their attitude toward investing, which has leaned toward the conservative recently."  Money-fund yields tend to lag interestrate trends as portfolio managers adjust the maturities of their investments -- short-term Treasury securities, commercial paper and the like -- to capture the highest yields.  Maturities usually are shorter when rates are rising and longer when they are falling.  The average maturity of the funds tracked by IBC/Donoghue's remained at 38 days for the third consecutive week.  It was as short as 29 days at the start of this year, when rates were marching steadily upward, and hit 42 days in August.  The average seven-day simple yield of the funds fell to 8.21% this week from 8.26%.  The average 30-day simple yield was 8.26%, compared with 8.27% the week before, and the 30-day compound yield slid to 8.60% from 8.61%.  Some funds are posting yields far higher than the average.  The highest yielding taxable fund this week was Harbor Money Market Fund, with a seven-day compound yield of 12.75%.  That included capital gains that were passed along to customers.  Among the other high-yielding funds, Fidelity's Spartan Fund had a seven-day compound yield of 9.33% in the latest week.  The seven-day compound yield of the Dreyfus Worldwide Dollar Fund was 9.51%.  whose Della Femina McNamee WCRS agency created liar Joe Isuzu, among others -- announced a massive restructuring that largely removes it from the advertising business and includes selling the majority of its advertising unit to Paris-based Eurocom.  The complex restructuring, which was long expected, transforms London-based WCRS from primarily a creator of advertising into one of Europe's largest buyers of advertising time and space.  It also creates a newly merged world-wide ad agency controlled by Eurocom and headed jointly by New York ad man Jerry Della Femina and two top WCRS executives.  The merged agency's admittedly ambitious goal: to become one of the world's 10 largest agencies, while attracting more multinational clients than the agencies were able to attract alone.  WCRS's restructuring reflects the growing importance of media buying in Europe, where the only way to get a good price on advertising time and space is to buy it in bulk.  For Eurocom, meanwhile, the move gives it a strong U.S. foothold in Della Femina, and more than quadruples the size of its ad agency business world-wide.  It also gives the outspoken Mr. Della Femina -- who often generates as much publicity for himself as for his clients -- an international platform that he most certainly won't be loath to use.  According to terms, WCRS will pay 2.02 billion French francs ($318.6 million) for the 50% it doesn't already own of Carat Holding S.A., one of Europe's largest media buyers.  Meanwhile, Eurocom, which had held 20% of WCRS's ad unit, will pay #43.5 million ($68.5 million) to raise its stake to 60%.  That price also covers Eurocom raising to 60% its 51% stake in Europe's Belier Group, a joint venture ad agency network it owns with WCRS. Eurocom will also have the right to buy the remaining 40% of the merged ad agency group in six years.  The transaction places the three executives squarely at the helm of a major agency with the rather unwieldy name of Eurocom WCRS Della Femina Ball Ltd., or EWDB.  The merged agency will include Della Femina McNamee based in New York, Eurocom's various agencies in France, the Belier Group in Europe and WCRS's other advertising and direct marketing operations.  Mr. Della Femina will be joint chairman with former WCRS executive Robin Wight.  Both will report to Tim Breene, a former WCRS executive who will be chief executive officer at the new agency.  In an interview in New York, Mr. Breene, fresh from a Concorde flight from Paris where executives had worked through most of the night, outlined big plans for the new agency.  "Our goal is to develop quite rapidly to a top-10 position . . . by the end of three years from now.  It implies very dramatic growth," he said.  He added that Eurocom and WCRS had agreed to provide a development fund of #100 million for acquisitions.  The new agency group is already in discussions about a possible purchase in Spain, while Mr. Breene said it also plans to make acquisitions in Scandinavia, Germany and elsewhere.  Cracking the top 10 within three years will be difficult at best.  Della Femina had billings of just $660 million last year and ranked as the U.S.'s 24th-largest ad agency.  The merged company that it now becomes part of will have billings of just more than $2.6 billion -- most of that in Europe -- bringing it to about 14th world-wide.  To make it to top-10 status, it would have to leapfrog over such formidable forces as Grey Advertising, D'Arcy Masius Benton & Bowles and Omnicom's DDB Needham.  The merged agency's game plan to attract multinational packaged-goods advertisers may prove equally difficult.  When WCRS created Della Femina McNamee out of the merger of three smaller agency units in 1988, it said it did so in order to attract larger clients, especially packaged-goods companies.  Since then, Della Femina won Pan Am as an international client and also does work for a few packaged-goods clients, including Dow Chemical Co.'s Saran Wrap.  But major packaged-goods players of the world -- such as Procter & Gamble, Colgate-Palmolive and Unilever -- have steadfastly eluded the agency.  "Three of our favorite names," Mr. Della Femina calls that roster, adding hopefully, "We're a much more attractive agency to large multinationals today than we were yesterday."  Still, the restructuring could create one of the most powerful alliances between advertising and media-buying firms that Europe has seen.  As part of the restructuring, WCRS and Eurocom said they will look for ways to combine their media buying across Europe.  What's more, both Eurocom and brothers Francis and Gilbert Gross, who founded Carat, will acquire 14.99% stakes in WCRS Group, creating a powerful link between Eurocom and Carat.  Carat will receive its WCRS stake as part of payment for the 50% Carat stake that WCRS is buying, while Eurocom said it expects to pay about #32 million for its WCRS stake.  Mr. Della Femina says he plans to remain heavily involved in the creative product at the world-wide agency, serving as a sort of "creative conscience."  Louise McNamee, Della Femina's president, will continue running the U.S. agency day-to-day.  They and other top executives signed long-term employment contracts and Mr. Della Femina will receive an additional multimillion-dollar sum, which some industry executives pegged at about $10 million.  WCRS Group, for its part, will now be able to follow its longstanding plan of becoming "a holding company for a series of media-related businesses," said Peter Scott, the firm's chief executive.  In addition to Carat, WCRS will hold onto its public relations, TV programming and other businesses.  WCRS says its debt will be cut to #24 million from #66 million as a result of the transaction.  For Carat, meanwhile, the alliance with Eurocom and WCRS is intended to strengthen its own push outside France.  Carat's Gross brothers invented the idea of large-scale buying of media space.  By buying the space in bulk, they obtain discounts as high as 50%, which they can pass on to customers.  They thus have won the French space-buying business of such advertising giants as Coca-Cola Co., Fiat S.p.A., Gillette and Kodak.  But now, other agencies are getting into the business with their own competing media-buying groups -- and Carat wants to expand to the rest of Europe.  To help finance the Carat purchase, WCRS said it plans an issue of Euroconvertible preferred shares once the market settles down.  But WCRS added that "in the light of the current uncertainty in the equity markets," it has arranged medium-term debt financing, which would be underwritten by Samuel Montagu & Co. Ltd.  ---  Earthquake's Damage  Tuesday's earthquake brought the San Francisco ad scene to a screeching halt yesterday, with only a few staffers showing up at their offices, mainly to survey the damage or to wring their hands about imminent new-business presentations.  While no agencies reported injuries to employees, the quake damaged the offices of J. Walter Thompson, Chiat/Day/Mojo and DDB Needham, among others, spokesmen for those agencies said.  Staffers at Thompson, whose offices are in the ultramodern Embarcadero Center, watched pictures drop from the walls and then felt the skyscraper sway seven to eight feet, according to a spokeswoman.  Plaster fell and windows were broken at Chiat/Day/Mojo, a spokesman for that agency said.  Late yesterday afternoon, DDB Needham executives were scrambling to figure out what to do about a new business presentation that had been scheduled for today, a spokesman said.  DDB Needham's office building may have sustained structural damage, the spokesman added.  "All operations have stopped," he said.  A number of agencies, including Thompson and Foote, Cone & Belding, said some employees who live outside of San Francisco, fearful that they wouldn't be able to get home, spent the night at the agency.  ---  Ad Notes. . . .   NEW ACCOUNT: Chesebrough-Pond's Inc., Greenwich, Conn., awarded its Faberge hair care accounts to J. Walter Thompson, New York.  Thompson, a unit of WPP Group, will handle Faberge Organic shampoo and conditioner and Aqua Net hairspray.  The accounts, which billed about $7 million last year, according to Leading National Advertisers, were previously handled at Bozell, New York.  WHO'S NEWS: William Morrissey, 44, was named executive vice president, world-wide director of McCann Direct, the direct marketing unit of Interpublic Group's McCann-Erickson agency.  He had been president and chief operating officer of Ogilvy & Mather Direct.  BOZELL: Los Angeles will be the site of a new entertainment division for the ad agency.  The division will be headed by Dick Porter, who returns to Bozell after being vice president of media at MGM.  AC&R ADVERTISING: The agency's three California offices, previously called AC&R/CCL Advertising, will now be called AC&R Advertising to match the name of its New York office.  AC&R Advertising is a unit of Saatchi & Saatchi Co.  NEW BEER: Sibra Products Inc., Greenwich, Conn., awarded its Cardinal Amber Light beer account to Heidelberg & Associates, New York.  Budget is set at $1.5 million.  The new beer, introduced this week at a liquor industry convention, is imported from Switzerland's Cardinal brewery.  Heidelberg's first ads for the brand, which Sibra says will compete with imported light beer leader Amstel Light, feature the line "The best tasting light beer you've ever seen."  Diamond-Star Motors Corp., a joint venture of Chrysler Corp. and Mitsubishi Motors Corp. said it will begin shipping Mitsubishi Eclipse cars to Japan next week, emulating other Japanese auto ventures shipping U.S.-built vehicles back to Japan.  Diamond-Star said it will export about 1,500 Eclipse cars to Japan by year's end.  Honda Motor Co., the first Japanese auto maker to ship cars to Japan from the U.S., is now exporting more than 5,000 Accord Coupes a year from its Marysville, Ohio, factory.  One of the most remarkable features of the forced marches of the ethnic Turks out of Bulgaria over the past five months has been the lack of international attention.  The deportation of more than 315,000 men, women and children by the Bulgarian regime adds up to one of the largest migrations seen in the postwar years.  Yet some people are advancing a chilling casuistry: that what we are seeing is somehow the understandable result of the historical sins committed by the Turks in the 16th century.  Today's Turks in Bulgaria, in other words, deserve what is coming to them four centuries later.  As if this weren't enough, the Senate Judiciary Committee is getting into the act.  On Tuesday it approved Senator Bob Dole's proposed commemorative resolution designating April 24, 1990, as the "National Day of Remembrance of the 75th Anniversary of the Armenian Genocide of 1915-1923," suffered at the hands of the warring Ottoman Empire.  There can be no quibbling that the Armenians endured terrible suffering, but one has to wonder what possible good such a resolution will achieve.  It puts great strain on a longstanding U.S. friendship with Turkey, a country that has been one of America's strongest allies in NATO.  The resolution also comes at a time when Turkey has been seeking help from the United States in resolving its Bulgarian emigration controversy and pursuing democratic reforms that may lead to membership in the European Community.  Turkey has been fighting its past for years, and thus far has been only partially successful.  Must it now accept that one of its strongest allies blames it for the genocide of another people?  Such sentiment only encourages the adverse feelings toward Turkey that surfaced when Turkey asked for assistance in dealing with its Bulgarian emigration crisis.  Mr. Dole's odd effort notwithstanding, most of Turkey's political problems lie with the Europeans.  Part of the problem some Europeans have with Turkey seems to stem from its location -- Turkey isn't really part of Europe.  Why, they wonder, should it belong to the EC?  Another anti-Turkish hook is the Islamic faith of the majority of the Turkish people: Turkey, we are told, is not a Christian nation; its people simply won't fit in with the Western European Judeo-Christian tradition.  It's when these rationalizations fall on deaf ears that the old standby of retribution for treatment at the hands of the Ottoman Empire comes to the fore.  No one has to accept the sins of the Ottoman Empire to reject that argument.  Turkey in any event is long past it.  The country has in recent years accepted more than 500,000 refugees from at least four bordering nations.  Kurds, suffering what many people consider to be a current extermination campaign at the hands of Syria, Iran and Iraq have inundated eastern Turkey.  Now it is their fellow Turks arriving as refugees from Bulgaria.  The Turkish refugee tragedy and the ongoing crisis cannot be ignored and shuttled off to that notorious dustbin of history that has become so convenient recently.  Surely, the past suffering of any people at any time cannot be simply filed away and forgotten.  But what the Senate Judiciary Committee has done in supporting the strongly worded Armenian resolution achieves no useful end; it merely produces more controversy and embittered memories.  Congress has enough difficulty dealing with the realities of the world as it currently exists.  Bulgaria's government has been behaving beyond the pale for months, and the U.S. does its values no credit by ignoring that while casting its votes into the past.  Many in Washington say President Bush will have to raise taxes to pay for his war on drugs.  We have a better idea: Dismantle HUD to pay for the war on drugs.  Housing and Urban Development's budget is $17 billion.  From what we and the nation have been reading, the money isn't being spent very well.  The single most important contribution the government could make now to help the poor is to get the specter of drugs out of their neighborhoods.  If that takes money, take it away from this discredited federal department.  But of course the Democrats pillorying HUD in hearings and in the press have no such solution in mind.  Instead, they're scrambling to protect the very programs at the heart of the HUD scandal.  This month, HUD Secretary Jack Kemp unveiled a series of proposed reforms to improve management at HUD. No doubt many of his ideas are worthy, but ultimately he is proposing to make fundamentally flawed programs work slightly more fairly and efficiently.  Congress is unlikely to go even that far.  Last week, Secretary Kemp ran into a buzzsaw of criticism from House Banking Committee members.  They were appalled, for instance, that he wanted to target more of the $3 billion Community Development Block Grant (CDBG) program to low-income projects and zero out the notorious "discretionary" funds that have allowed HUD officials to steer contracts to political cronies.  These development grants mainly enrich developers who want to put up shopping centers and parking garages.  They also give those in Congress political credit for bringing home the pork, and so they are popular with such Members as Mary Rose Oakar.  Rep. Oakar, a Democrat from Cleveland, wants a $6.9 million grant so Cleveland can build an 18-story Rock and Roll Hall of Fame.  She says it'd create 600 jobs and bring Cleveland tourist revenue.  HUD says the project doesn't qualify, and Mr. Kemp says that rock 'n' roll musicians and the music industry ought to put up the money.  At the hearing, Rep. Oakar started wailing about "phoney baloney regulations" that would stand between her and "housing for downtown Cleveland."  Rep. Chalmers Wylie, an Ohio Republican, rallied to the cause: "I think the gentlelady is making an important statement.  The implication that if a congressman calls about a project in his district there's something wrong, I think is most unfortunate."  We're sure some theologian can explain the difference between what the Republican consultants have been doing with HUD and what these gentleladies and gentlemen want to do with HUD.  Our view is that given Congress's attitude toward HUD, the place probably is beyond reform.  For more than 50 years the federal government has tried various ways to provide housing for the poor and revive cities.  In the process HUD has wasted untold billions, created slums and invited corruption.  Much of HUD's spending actually is disguised welfare for developers or the middle class.  That includes the CDBG funds and the Federal Housing Administration, which loans out money for private home mortgages and has just been discovered to be $4 billion in the hole.  Selling the FHA's loan portfolio to the highest bidder would save the taxpayers untold billions in future losses.  Some HUD money actually does trickle down to the poor, and zeroing out housing middlemen would free up more money for public housing tenants to manage and even own their units.  The rest ought to be used to clean out drugs from the neighbhorhoods.  Rival gangs have turned cities into combat zones.  Even suburban Prince George's County, Md., reported last week there have been a record 96 killings there this year, most of them drug-related.  Innocent bystanders often are the victims.  A man in a wheelchair was gunned down in the crossfire of a Miami drug battle.  A three-year-old Brooklyn boy was used as a shield by a drug dealer.  Decent life in the inner cities won't be restored unless the government reclaims the streets from the drug gangs.  Until then, the billions HUD spends on inner-city housing simply is wasted.  It's still unclear whether Secretary Kemp wants to completely overhaul the engine room at HUD or just tighten a few screws here and there.  No doubt he believes the place can be salvaged.  Having seen the hypocrisy with which Congress has addressed the HUD scandals, we disagree.  It's time to scrap the politically infested spending machine HUD has become and channel the resources into the drug war.  Randy Delchamps was named chairman and chief executive officer of this grocery chain.  Mr. Delchamps, 46 years old, succeeds A.F. Delchamps Jr., who died in a plane crash on Sunday at the age of 58.  Randy Delchamps retains his position as president.  Natural upheavals, and most particularly earthquakes, are not only horrible realities in and of themselves, but also symbols through which the state of a society can be construed.  The rubble after the Armenian earthquake a year ago disclosed, quite literally, a city whose larger structures had been built with sand.  The extent of the disaster stemmed from years of chicanery and bureaucratic indifference.  The larger parallel after the earthquake centered south of San Francisco is surely with the state of the U.S. economy.  Did the stock-market tremors of Friday, Oct. 13, presage larger fragility, far greater upheavals?  Are the engineering and architecture of the economy as vulnerable as the spans of the Bay Bridge?  The eerie complacency of the Reagan-Bush era has produced Panglossian paeans about the present perfection of U.S. economic and social arrangements.  A licensed government intellectual, Francis Fukuyama, recently announced in The National Interest that history is, so to speak, at an end since the course of human progress has now culminated in the glorious full stop of American civilization.  His observations were taken seriously.  But we are, in reality, witnessing the continuing decline of the political economy of capitalism: not so much the end of history but the history of the end.  The financial equivalent of the sand used by those Armenian contractors is junk bonds and the leveraged buy-outs associated with them.  Builders get away with using sand and financiers junk when society decides it's okay, necessary even, to look the other way.  And by the early 1980s U.S. capitalists had ample reason to welcome junk bonds, to look the other way.  By that time they found extremely low profit rates from non-financial corporate investment.  Government statistics in fact show that the profit rate -- net pretax profits divided by capital stock -- peaked in 1965 at 17.2%.  That same calculation saw profit rates fall to 4.6% in the recession year 1982 and the supposed miracle that followed has seen the profit rate rise only to 8.1% in 1986 and 8% in 1987.  Corresponding to the fall in profit rates was -- in the early 1980s -- the drop in the number arrived at if you divide the market value of firms by the replacement costs of their assets, the famous Q ratio associated with Prof.  James Tobin.  In theory, the value attached to a firm by the market and the cost of replacing its assets should be the same.  But of course the market could decide that the firm's capital stock -- its assets -- means nothing if the firm is not producing profits.  This is indeed what the market decided.  By 1982 the ratio was 43.5%, meaning that the market was valuing every dollar's worth of the average firm's assets at 43 cents.  From the history of capitalism we can take it as a sound bet that if it takes only 43 cents to buy a dollar's worth of a firm's capital stock, an alert entrepreneur won't look the other way.  His assumption is that the underlying profitability rate will go up and the capital assets he bought on the cheap will soon be producing profits, thus restoring the market's faith in them.  Hence the LBO craze.  But here is where the entrepreneur made a very risky bet, and where society was maybe foolish to look the other way.  The profit rate is still low and the Q ratio was only 65% in 1987 and 68.9% in 1988.  Result: a landscape littered with lemons, huge debt burdens crushing down upon the arch and spans of corporate America.  The mounting risks did not go unobserved, even in the mid-1980s.  But there were enough promoters announcing the end of history (in this case suspension of normal laws of economic gravity) for society to continue shielding its eyes.  Mainstream economists and commentators, craning their necks up at the great pyramids of junk financing, swiveling their heads to watch the avalanche of leveraged buy-outs, claimed the end result would be a leaner, meaner corporate America, with soaring productivity and profits and the weaker gone to the wall.  But this is not where the rewards of junk financing were found.  The beneficiaries were those financiers whose icon was the topic figure of '80s capitalism, Michael Milken's $517 million salary in one year.  Left-stream economists I associate with -- fellows in the Union of Radical Political Economists, most particularly Robert Pollin of the economics faculty at the University of California at Riverside -- were not hypnotized in the manner of their pliant colleagues.  All along they have been noting the tremors and pointing out the underlying realities.  Profit rates after the great merger wave are no higher, and now we have an extremely high-interest burden relative to cash flow.  The consequences of building empires with sand are showing up.  In contrast to previous estimates reckoning the default rate on junk bonds at 2% or 3%, a Harvard study published in April of this year (and discussed in a lead story in The Wall Street Journal for Sept. 18) found the default rate on these junk bonds is 34%.  What is the consequence of a high-interest burden, high default rates and continued low profitability?  Corporations need liquidity, in the form of borrowed funds.  Without liquidity from the junk-bond market or cash flow from profits, they look to the government, which obediently assists the natural motions of the capitalist economy with charity in the form of cuts in the capital-gains tax rate or bailouts.  The consequence can be inflation, brought on as the effect of a desperate bid to avoid the deflationary shock of a sudden crash.  Attacks on inflation come with another strategy of capital of a very traditional sort: an assault on wages.  Mr. Fukuyama, peering through binoculars at the end of history, said in his essay that "the class issue has actually been successfully resolved in the West . . . the egalitarianism of modern America represents the essential achievement of the classless society envisioned by Marx."  Mr. Fukuyama might want to consult some American workers on the subject of class and egalitarianism.  From its peak in 1972 of $198.41, the average American weekly wage had fallen to $169.28 in 1987 -- both figures being expressed in 1977 dollars.  In other words, after the glory boom of the Reagan years, wages had sunk from the post World War II peak by 16% as capitalists, helped by the government, turned down the screws or went offshore.  But there are signs now -- the strikes by miners, Boeing workers, telephone workers, etc. -- that this attack on wages is being more fiercely resisted.  These are long-term Richter readings on American capitalism.  The whole structure is extremely shaky.  Governments have become sophisticated in handling moments of panic (a word the London Times forbade my father to use when he was reporting the Wall Street crash in 1929).  But sophistication has its limits.  The S&L bailout could cost $300 billion, computing interest on the government's loans.  These are real costs.  Under what weights will the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation totter?  Capitalism may now be engineered to withstand sudden shocks, but there are fault lines -- the crisis in profits, the assault on wages, the structural inequity of the system -- that make fools of those who claim that the future is here and that history is over.  ---  Mr. Cockburn is a columnist for The Nation and LA Weekly.  Japan Air Lines, Lufthansa German Airlines and Air France reportedly plan to form an international air-freight company this year, a move that could further consolidate the industry.  Japanese newspaper Nihon Keizai Shimbun reported that the three giants plan to integrate their cargo computers and ground-cargo and air-cargo systems.  They reportedly will invest a total of 20 billion yen ($140 million) in the venture, whose headquarters would be in France or West Germany.  The action follows Federal Express Corp.'s acquisition of Flying Tiger Line Inc. in August.  After that, "it would make sense for airlines to talk about doing things jointly," said Cotton Daly, director of cargo services for New York consulting firm Simat, Helliesen & Eichner Inc.  Mr. Daly said such discussions are motivated by the competitive threat posed by Federal Express, United Parcel Service of America Inc. and other fast-growing air-freight companies.  Many airlines are talking about cargo ventures, and there have been rumors about such a tie between JAL and European airlines.  In Tokyo, a JAL spokesman said he couldn't confirm or deny the latest Japanese report.  But he said JAL is talking to Lufthansa and Air France about some sort of cargo venture.  "It is just one of a number of strategies JAL has embarked upon to come to terms with the situation in Europe after 1992," the deadline for ending trade barriers in the EC, he said.  In Frankfurt, a Lufthansa spokesman confirmed talks are under way, but declined to comment.  A Lufthansa spokeswoman in Tokyo said the head of Lufthansa's cargo operations had been in Toyko last week for talks with JAL.  In Paris, Air France declined to comment.  "Nothing is defined or signed at this point," Mr. Daly said of the talks.  Whatever accord the three carriers reach, he said, he is skeptical it would create a separate airline.  If the three companies pool their air-freight businesses, their clout would be considerable.  According to figures from the International Air Transport Association, they carried a combined 1.8 million tons of freight last year.  Federal Express and Flying Tiger, as separate companies, carried a combined 2.6 million tons.  Air France and Lufthansa last month concluded a far-reaching cooperation accord that includes air-freight activities.  They plan to increase cooperation in freight ground-handling and create a world-wide computer system to process cargo.  Other airlines would have access to the system, they said, and negotiations with partners were already under way.  Both European airlines operate extensive fleets of Boeing 747 freighters and 747 Combis, aircraft that carry both freight and passengers on the main deck.  They currently have large orders for cargo planes.  Several airlines, including Lufthansa, JAL and Cathay Pacific Airways, are working on a so-called global cargo system and are trying to attract other carriers to join, Mr. Daly said.  JAL also has signaled it is looking for toeholds in Europe before the end of 1992.  Last month, the carrier said it wanted to lease crews and planes from British Airways so it could funnel its passengers from London to other European destinations.  British Airways said it hasn't received a proposal from JAL.  But last week there were air-traffic negotiations between the U.K. and Japan, a likely first step to any commercial agreement between JAL and British Airways or another U.K. carrier.  Federal Paper Board Co. said it completed the previously announced purchase of Imperial Cup Corp., a closely held maker of paper cups based in Kenton, Ohio.  Terms weren't disclosed.  Imperial Cup has annual sales of approximately $75 million.  Federal Paper Board sells paper and wood products.  In a move to prevent any dislocation in the financial markets from the California earthquake, the Securities and Exchange Commission said it temporarily reassigned options listed on the Pacific Stock Exchange to the American, New York and Philadelphia stock exchanges and to the Chicago Board Options Exchange.  The decision, which affects millions of dollars of trading positions, was made late yesterday because the Pacific exchange's options floor was shut down as a result of Tuesday's earthquake.  The SEC, faced with a major squeeze on options positions, said it was necessary to ensure that options listed on the exchange could be traded today and tomorrow.  SEC Chairman Richard Breeden said the cooperation by the exchanges would enable investors to buy and sell options listed solely on the Pacific exchange, guaranteeing the liquidity of the market.  Officials at the four exchanges said well over 50 traders from the Pacific exchange were taking flights from San Francisco late yesterday to the American, New York and Philadelphia exchanges and to the CBOE, where they would continue making markets in the Pacific-listed options.  The Big Board said carpenters quickly erected a new options floor to accomodate 40 traders from the Pacific exchange.  In addition, specialists on the exchanges agreed to provide backup capital for market-making in Pacific exchange options traded on the exchanges.  Trading was light on the Pacific Stock Exchange yesterday, with workers at the exchange's main floor in San Francisco struggling to execute orders by flashlight as a result of a continuing power outage.  The most pressing problem was the suspension of options trading.  The Pacific exchange has options for 129 underlying stock issues, including highly active Hilton Hotels Corp., which is listed on the Big Board.  Investors were concerned that they might be unable to exercise options that expire tomorrow.  But professionals said throughout the day that the shutdown wouldn't be a cause for alarm even if it were to persist for several days.  "I've told my staff and clients that they still have the ability to exercise their options, because they are guaranteed by the Options Clearing Corp.," said Michael Schwartz, a senior registered options strategist at Oppenheimer & Co.  The SEC reassigned trading in the options, however, to allow investors to do more than simply exercise the options.  While the exchange's equities floor in San Francisco remained open on a limited basis, orders were being routed and executed in Los Angeles.  Workers could dial out, but they couldn't receive telephone calls.  "It's a very uncertain situation right now," said Navin Vyas, administrative assistant of trading floor operations of the exchange, which has daily volume of about 10 million shares.  Because the exchange's computer was rerouting orders to the exchange's trading operations in Los Angeles, "business is as usual" Mr. Vyas said.  "If one city is down, the other can take over."  Meanwhile, the brokerage firms in San Francisco were trying to cope.  Charles Daggs, chairman and chief executive officer of Sutro & Co., said traders came to work at 5 a.m. PDT -- many on foot because of uncertain road and traffic conditions -- but learned that they would have to await a required inspection by the city in order to turn the power back on at the company's two main facilities there.  That should happen by today, he said.  Traders worked with the help of sunlight streaming through windows, despite large cracks in the walls and a lack of incoming phone calls.  Also, most of the telecommunications equipment was out.  The traders were executing municipal bond, mutual fund and other orders through a sister firm, Tucker Anthony Inc., which is also owned by John Hancock Freedom Securities but is based in New York.  "We are having a regular day.  Volume is down out of San Francisco, but not out of the 11 outlying offices," Mr. Daggs added.  Sutro's Oakland office executed orders through the Sacramento office, which wasn't affected by the quake.  Others, like Prudential-Bache Securities Inc., which has eight offices in the San Francisco area, set up an 800 number yesterday morning for customers to obtain market commentary and other help.  At Kidder, Peabody & Co.'s Sacramento branch, Manager Janet White received calls yesterday morning from workers in San Francisco who offered to work in Sacramento.  Then she discovered that Quotron Systems Inc.'s Sacramento lines were down, because they are normally tied in through a system that goes through San Francisco.  So the Kidder brokers had to call other company offices to get quotes on stocks.  At Quotron, the company's National Call-In Center, which swung into action for the first time last month for Hurricane Hugo, assembled a tactical team at 5 a.m. yesterday to begin rerouting lines and restore service to brokers and traders.  The company dispatched as many as 200 people in the San Francisco area to do the work, though most of the rerouting was done by computer.  Service appeared to be down throughout the financial district in downtown San Francisco, while just parts of Oakland and San Jose were knocked out.  But Dale Irvine, director of the emergency center, said service was being restored to outlying San Francisco areas.  In Chicago yesterday, Options Clearing confirmed that it guarantees the Pacific exchange options.  The firm also will permit its members and the public "to exercise their put and call options contracts traded on the Pacific exchange" even if the exchange is closed, said Wayne Luthringshausen, chairman of Options Clearing. (Put options give holders the right, but not the obligation, to sell a financial instrument at a specified price, while call options give holders the right, but not the obligation, to buy a financial instrument at a specified price).  Investors and traders in Pacific exchange options "are protected to the extent that they can convert their put and call options into the underlying instrument," Mr. Luthringshausen said.  "We are seeing such exercises today, in fact."  International Business Machines Corp. said its board approved the purchase of $1 billion of its common shares, a move that should help support its battered stock.  Even as the stock market has generally done well this year, IBM's shares have slipped steadily from its 52-week high of $130.875.  Yesterday's closing price of $101.75, down 50 cents, in composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange, puts the stock at about 1 1/2 times book value, which is as low as it has sunk over the past decade.  The announcement came after the market's close.  The move by IBM wasn't exactly a surprise.  The company has spent some $5 billion over the past 3 1/2 years to buy back 42 million common shares, or roughly 7% of those outstanding.  In addition, despite IBM's well-publicized recent problems, the computer giant still generates enormous amounts of cash.  As of the end of the second quarter, it had $4.47 billion of cash and marketable securities on hand.  As a result, some securities analysts had predicted in recent days that IBM would authorize additional purchases.  In Armonk, N.Y., a spokesman said that although IBM didn't view its spending as necessarily a way to support the stock, it thought the purchases were a good way to improve such financial measurements as per-share earnings and return on equity.  "We view it as a good long-term investment," the spokesman said.  In the short term, the move is likely to have little effect.  At yesterday's closing price, $1 billion would buy back about 10 million shares, or less than 2% of the roughly 580 million outstanding.  In addition, as of Sept. 30, the company still had authorization to buy $368 million of stock under a prior repurchase program.  Over the long term, however, IBM's stock repurchases -- along with its hefty, $4.84-a-share annual dividend and generally loyal following among large institutional investors -- are providing a floor for the stock price.  Although IBM last year produced its first strong results in four years and was expected to continue to roll this year, it began faltering as early as January.  First, it had trouble manufacturing a chip for its mainframes, IBM's bread-and-butter business.  Then it had a series of smaller glitches, including problems manufacturing certain personal computers and the delay in the announcement of some important workstations.  Finally, IBM had to delay the introduction of some high-end disk drives, which account for 10% of its $60 billion of annual revenue.  None of the problems is necessarily fatal, and they aren't all necessarily even related.  There are also other factors at work that are outside IBM's control, such as currency exchange rates.  The strong dollar, which reduces the value of overseas earnings and revenue when they are translated into dollars, is expected to knock 80 to 85 cents off IBM's per-share earnings for the full year.  Without that problem, IBM might have matched last year's earnings of $5.81 billion, or $9.80 a share.  Still, investors will take some convincing before they get back into IBM's stock in a big way.  Steve Milunovich, a securities analyst at First Boston, said that while investors were looking for an excuse to buy IBM shares a year ago, even the big institutional investors are looking for a reason to avoid the stock these days.  On Wall Street yesterday, northern California's killer earthquake was just another chance to make a buck.  At the opening bell, investors quickly began singling out shares of companies expected to profit or suffer in some way from the California disaster, including insurers, construction-related companies, refiners and housing lenders.  Brokerage houses jumped in, touting "post-quake demand" stocks, and Kidder, Peabody & Co. set up a toll-free hot line for San Franciscans who might need emergency investment advice and help in transferring funds.  "Wall Street thinks of everything in terms of money," says Tom Gallagher, a senior Oppenheimer & Co. trader.  However, he added, such event-driven trading moves typically last only a few hours and are often made without full information.  The most popular plays of the day were insurance companies such as General Re Corp., which rose $2.75 to $86.50, Nac Re Corp., up $2 to $37.75, American International Group Inc., up $3.25 to $102.625, and Cigna Corp., up 87.5 cents to $62.50.  Yesterday, the brokerage firm Conning & Co. said insurers will use the earthquake as an excuse to raise insurance rates, ending their long price wars.  Before this bullish theory surfaced, some insurance stocks initially fell, indicating that investors thought the quake might cost insurers a lot of money.  In fact, Fireman's Fund Corp., which ended the day off 50 cents to $36.50, said earthquake damage would slightly hurt fourth-quarter profit.  On the prospect for rebuilding northern California, investors bid up cement-makers Calmat Co., up $2.75 to $28.75, and Lone Star Industries Inc., up $1.75 to $29.25.  Bridge and road builders had a field day, including Kasler Corp., up $2.125 to $9.875, Guy F. Atkinson Co., up 87.5 to $61.875, and Morrison Knudsen Corp., which reported higher third-quarter earnings yesterday, up $2.25 to $44.125.  Fluor Corp., a construction engineering firm, gained 75 cents to $33.375.  But home-building stocks were a mixed bag.  Timber stocks got a big boost.  Georgia Pacific Corp., up $1.25 to $58, and Maxxam Inc., up $3 to $43.75, both reported strong profits.  Merrill Lynch & Co. touted Georgia-Pacific, Louisiana Pacific Corp. and Willamette Industries Inc. as the best post-quake plywood plays.  Other gainers were companies with one or more undamaged California refineries.  Tosco Corp. jumped $1.125 to $20.125 and Chevron Corp., despite a temporary pipeline shutdown, rose $1 to $65.  Meanwhile, shares of some big housing lenders got hit, on the likelihood that the lenders' collateral -- people's homes -- suffered physical damage and perhaps a loss in value.  Wells Fargo & Co. fell 50 cents to $81.50, and BankAmerica Corp. fell 50 cents to $31.875.  Some California thrift stocks also fell, including Golden West Financial Corp. and H.F. Ahmanson & Co., which reported lower earnings yesterday.  "Property values didn't go up in California yesterday," says one money manager.  Pacific Gas & Electric Co. fell 37.5 cents to $19.625.  One of its power generators was damaged, though the company said there won't be any financial impact.  Pacific Telesis Group lost 62.5 cents to $44.625.  A computer failure delayed its earnings announcement, and some investors think it might have extra costs to repair damaged telephone lines.  Heavy construction, property-casualty insurance and forest products were among the best performing industry groups in the Dow Jones Equity Market Index yesterday.  Friday's stock market plunge claimed its second victim among the scores of futures and options trading firms here.  Petco Options, an options trading firm owned by the family of the deceased former Chicago Board of Trade chairman Ralph Peters, is getting out of the trade clearing, or processing and guaranteeing, business after sustaining a multimillion dollar loss Friday, options industry officials said.  Nearly 75 options traders on the Chicago Board Options Exchange who cleared trades through Petco, including a handful of traders who lost between $500,000 to $1 million themselves as a result of Friday's debacle, are trying to transfer their business to other clearing firms, CBOE members said.  Timothy Vincent, Petco chief executive officer, confirmed that Petco was withdrawing from the clearing business.  "The owners of the company got a look at the potential risks in this business, and after Monday they felt they didn't want to be exposed any more," he said.  He added that Petco remained in compliance with all industry capital requirements during the market's rapid plunge Friday and Monday's rebound.  A CBOE spokeswoman declined comment on Petco.  Over the weekend Fossett Corp., another options trading firm, transferred the clearing accounts of about 160 traders to First Options of Chicago, a unit of Continental Bank Corp., because it couldn't meet regulatory capital requirements after Friday's market slide.  The unprecedented transfer of accounts underscored the options industry's desire not to have its credibility tarnished by potentially widespread trading defaults on Monday.  The CBOE, American Stock Exchange, Options Clearing Corp. and Stephen Fossett, owner of Fossett, joined in putting up $50 million to guarantee the accounts at First Options.  The head of another small options clearing firm, who asked not to be identified, said that the heightened volatility in the financial markets in recent years makes it increasingly difficult for any but the largest financial trading firms to shoulder the risk inherent in the highly leveraged options and futures business.  Prior to the introduction of financial futures in the late 1970s, most trading firms clustered around the LaSalle Street financial district here were family operations handed down from one generation to the next.  Most also were relatively undercapitalized compared with the size of most Wall Street securities firms.  Mr. Peters, a LaSalle Street legend among the post-World War II generation of commodity traders, was rumored to have amassed a multimillion-dollar fortune from commodity trading and other activities by the time he died in May.  Part of a Series}  Betty Lombardi is a mild-mannered homemaker and grandmother in rural Hunterdon County, N.J.  But put her behind a shopping cart and she turns ruthless.  If Colgate toothpaste offers a tempting money-saving coupon, she'll cross Crest off her shopping list without a second thought.  Never mind that her husband prefers Crest.  Some weeks when her supermarket runs a double-coupon promotion, she boasts that she shaves $22 off her bill.  Money isn't the only thing that makes her dump once favorite brands.  After she heard about the artery-clogging hazards of tropical oils in many cookies, she dropped Pepperidge Farm and started buying brands free of such oils.  "I always thought Pepperidge Farm was tasty and high quality," Mrs. Lombardi says.  "But I don't want any of that oil for my grandkids." (Pepperidge Farm says it can't tell exactly how many customers it has lost, but it hopes to remove the objectionable tropical oil from all its products by year end.)  Clearly, people like Mrs. Lombardi are giving marketers fits.  She represents a new breed of savvy consumer who puts bargain prices, nutritional and environmental concerns, and other priorities ahead of old-fashioned brand loyalty.  While brand loyalty is far from dead, marketing experts say it has eroded during the 1980s.  Marketers themselves are partly to blame: They've increased spending for coupons and other short-term promotions at the expense of image-building advertising.  What's more, a flood of new products has given consumers a dizzying choice of brands, many of which are virtually carbon copies of one other.  "Marketers have brought this on themselves with their heavy use" of promotions, contends Joe Plummer, an executive vice president at the D'Arcy Masius Benton & Bowles ad agency.  "Without some real product improvements, it's going to be difficult to win that loyalty back."  The Wall Street Journal's "American Way of Buying" survey this year found that most consumers switch brands for many of the products they use.  For the survey, Peter D. Hart Research Associates asked some 2,000 consumers, including Mrs. Lombardi, whether they usually buy one brand of a certain type of product or have no brand loyalty.  More than half the users of 17 of the 25 products included in the survey said they're brand switchers.  Overall, 12% of consumers aren't brand loyal for any of the 25 product categories.  About 47% are loyal for one to five of the products.  Only 2% are brand loyal in 16 to 20 of the categories, and no one is loyal for more than 20 types of products.  For such products as canned vegetables and athletic shoes, devotion to a single brand was quite low, with fewer than 30% saying they usually buy the same brand.  Only for cigarettes, mayonnaise and toothpaste did more than 60% of users say they typically stick with the same brand.  People tend to be most loyal to brands that have distinctive flavors, such as cigarettes and ketchup.  Kathie Huff, a respondent in the Journal survey from Spokane, Wash., says her husband is adamant about eating only Hunt's ketchup.  He simply can't stomach the taste of Heinz, she says.  The 31-year-old homemaker adds, "The only other thing I'm really loyal to is my Virginia Slims cigarettes.  Coke and Pepsi are all the same to me, and I usually buy whichever brand of coffee happens to be on sale."  Brand imagery plays a significant role in loyalty to such products as cigarettes, perfume and beer.  People often stay with a particular brand because they want to be associated with the image its advertising conveys, whether that's macho Marlboro cigarettes or Cher's Uninhibited perfume.  Loyalty lags most for utilitarian products like trash bags and batteries.  Only 23% of trash-bag users in the Journal survey usually buy the same brand, and just 29% of battery buyers stick to one brand.  Underwear scored a middling 36% in brand loyalty, but consumer researchers say that's actually quite high for such a mundane product.  "In the past, you just wore Fruit of the Loom and didn't care," says Peter Kim, U.S. director of consumer behavior research for the J. Walter Thompson ad agency.  "The high score reflects the attempts to make underwear more of a fashion image business for both men and women."  He believes there's opportunity for a smart gasoline marketer to create a strong brand image and more consumer loyalty.  What loyalty there is to gas brands, he believes, is a matter of stopping at the most conveniently located service stations.  Brand loyalty was stronger among older consumers in the Journal survey.  Nearly one-fourth of participants age 60 and older claim brand loyalty for more than 10 of the 25 products in the survey; only 9% of those age 18 to 29 have such strong allegiance.  Higher-income people also tend to be more brand loyal these days, the Journal survey and other research studies indicate.  Marketers speculate that more affluent people tend to lead more pressured lives and don't have time to research the products they buy for the highest quality and most reasonable price.  An established brand name is insurance that at least the product will be of acceptable quality, if not always the best value for the money.  It's sort of loyalty by default.  Meanwhile, "the bottom end of the market is becoming less loyal," says Laurel Cutler, vice chairman of the ad agency FCB/Leber Katz Partners.  "They're buying whatever's cheaper."  The biggest wild card in the brand loyalty game: How those hotly pursued but highly unpredictable baby boomers will behave as they move into middle age.  They grew up with more brand choices than any generation and have shown less allegiance so far.  But now that they're settling down and raising families, might they also show more stability in their brand choices?  Mr. Kim of J. Walter Thompson doesn't think so.  He believes baby boomers will continue to be selective in their brand loyalties.  "Earlier generations were brand loyal across categories," he says, "but boomers tend to be brand loyal in categories like running shoes and bottled water, but less so in others like toilet paper and appliances."  While not as brand loyal as in the past, consumers today don't buy products capriciously, either.  Rather, they tend to have a set of two or three favorites.  Sometimes, they'll choose Ragu spaghetti sauce; other times, it will be Prego.  Advertisers attribute this shared loyalty to the striking similarity among brands.  If a more absorbent Pampers hits the market, you can be sure a new and improved Huggies won't be far behind.  The BBDO Worldwide ad agency studied "brand parity" and found that consumers believe all brands are about the same in a number of categories, particularly credit cards, paper towels, dry soups and snack chips.  "When there's a clutter of brands, consumers simplify the complexity by telling themselves, 'All brands are the same so what difference does it make which I buy,'" says Karen Olshan, a senior vice president at BBDO.  "Too often, advertising imagery hasn't done a good job of forging a special emotional bond between a brand and the consumer."  But given such strong brand disloyalty, some marketers are putting renewed emphasis on image advertising.  A small but growing number of companies are also trying to instill more fervent brand loyalty through such personalized direct-marketing ploys as catalogs, magazines and membership clubs for brand users.  While discount promotions are essential for most brands, some companies concede they went overboard in shifting money from advertising to coupons, refunds and other sales incentives.  Some people argue that strong brands can afford to stop advertising for a time because of the residual impact of hundreds of millions of dollars spent on advertising through the years.  But most companies are too afraid to take that chance.  And perhaps with good reason.  Says Clayt Wilhite, president of the D'Arcy Masius ad agency's U.S. division, "Every time 24 hours pass without any advertising reinforcement, brand loyalty will diminish ever so slightly -- even for a powerful brand like Budweiser."  Consider, for example, what happened to Maxwell House coffee.  The Kraft General Foods brand stopped advertising for about a year in 1987 and gave up several market share points and its leadership position in the coffee business.  But since returning to advertising, Maxwell House has regained the lost share and is running neck and neck with archrival Folgers.  "Now, Philip Morris {Kraft General Foods' parent company} is committed to the coffee business and to increased advertising for Maxwell House," says Dick Mayer, president of the General Foods USA division.  "Even though brand loyalty is rather strong for coffee, we need advertising to maintain and strengthen it."  Campbell Soup Co., for one, has concluded that it makes good sense to focus more on its most loyal customers than on people who buy competitive brands.  "The probability of converting a non-user to your brand is about three in 1,000," says Tony Adams, the company's vice president for marketing research.  "The best odds are with your core franchise.  Our heavy users consume two to three cans of soup a week, and we'd like to increase that."  So Campbell is talking to its "brand enthusiasts," probing their psychological attachment to its soup.  In one consumer focus group, a fan declared that, "Campbell's soup is like getting a hug from a friend."  That helped persuade the company to introduce a new advertising slogan: "A warm hug from Campbell's."  ---  @ Faithful or Fickle  @ Percentage of users of these products who are loyal to one brand  @ Cigarettes 71%  @ Mayonnaise 65  @ Toothpaste 61  @ Coffee 58  @ Headache remedy 56  @ Film 56  @ Bath soap 53  @ Ketchup 51  @ Laundry detergent 48  @ Beer 48  @ Automobile 47  @ Perfume/after shave 46  @ Pet food 45  @ Shampoo 44  @ Soft drink 44  @ Tuna fish 44  @ Gasoline 39  @ Underwear 36  @ Television 35  @ Tires 33  @ Blue jeans 33  @ Batteries 29  @ Athletic shoes 27  @ Canned vegetables 25  @ Garbage bags 23  @ Source: Wall Street Journal Centennial Survey  Insurers face the prospect of paying out billions of dollars for damages caused by this week's California earthquake.  Getting a grip on the extent of the damages is proving a far more difficult task than what insurers faced after Hurricane Hugo ripped through the Caribbean and the Carolinas last month.  The earthquake's toll, including possible deep structural damage, goes far beyond the more easily observed damage from a hurricane, says George Reider, a vice president in Aetna Life & Casualty Insurance Co.'s claims division.  But investors are betting that the financial and psychological impact of the earthquake, coming so soon after the hurricane, will help stem more than two years of intense price-cutting wars among business insurers.  Reflecting that logic, insurance-company stocks posted strong gains.  Aetna and other insurers are hiring engineers and architects to help them assess structural damage.  Most insurers already have mobilized their "catastrophe" teams to begin processing claims from their policyholders in northern California.  Since commercial air travel is interrupted, Aetna, based in Hartford, Conn., chartered three planes to fly claims adjusters into Sacramento and then planned for them to drive to the Bay area.  About 25 adjusters were dispatched yesterday afternoon, along with laptop computers, cellular phones and blank checks.  Some adjusters, already in other parts of California, drove to the disaster area with recreational vehicles and mobile homes that could be used as makeshift claims-processing centers.  Insurers will be advertising 800 numbers -- probably on the radio -- that policyholders can call to get assistance on how to submit claims.  State Farm Mutual Automobile Insurance Co., the largest home and auto insurer in California, believes the losses from the earthquake could be somewhat less than the $475 million in damages it expects to pay out for claims resulting from Hurricane Hugo.  State Farm, based in Bloomington, Ind., is also the largest writer of personal-property earthquake insurance in California.  Earthquake insurance is sold as a separate policy or a specific endorsement "rider" on a homeowner's policy in California, because of the area's vulnerability to earthquakes.  State Farm said about 25% of its policyholders in California have also purchased earthquake insurance.  Allstate Insurance Co., a unit of Sears, Roebuck & Co., said about 23% of its personal property policyholders -- about 28% in the San Franciso area -- also have earthquake coverage.  The Association of California Insurance Companies estimated damage to residential property could total $500 million, but only $100 million to $150 million is insured, it said.  Officials from the American Insurance Association's property-claim service division, which coordinates the efforts of the claims adjusters in an area after a natural disaster, will be flying to San Francisco today.  They expect to have a preliminary estimate of the damages in a day or two.  Roads and bridges in the Bay area appear to have suffered some of the most costly damage.  Highways, such as the section of Interstate 880 that collapsed in Oakland, generally don't have insurance coverage.  Industry officials say the Bay Bridge -- unlike some bridges -- has no earthquake coverage, either, so the cost of repairing it probably would have to be paid out of state general operating funds.  However, the bridge, which charges a $1 toll each way, does have "loss of income" insurance to replace lost revenue if the operation of the bridge is interrupted for more than seven days.  That coverage is provided by a syndicate of insurance companies including Fireman's Fund Corp., based in Novato, Calif., and Cigna Corp., based in Philadelphia.  Earthquake-related claims aren't expected to cause significant financial problems for the insurance industry as a whole.  Instead, even with the liabilities of two natural disasters in recent weeks, analysts said the total capital of the industry is likely to be higher at year end than it was at midyear.  Indeed, the earthquake could contribute to a turnaround in the insurance cycle in a couple of ways.  For example, insurers may seek to limit their future exposure to catastrophes by increasing the amount of reinsurance they buy.  Such increased demand for reinsurance, along with the losses the reinsurers will bear from these two disasters, are likely to spur increases in reinsurance prices that will later be translated into an overall price rise.  Reinsurance is protection taken out by the insurance firms themselves.  "We are saying this is the breaking point, this is the event that will change the psychology of the marketplace," said William Yankus, an analyst with Conning & Co., a Hartford firm that specializes in the insurance industry.  His firm, along with some others, issued new buy recommendations on insurer stocks yesterday.  Among the insurance stocks, big gainers included American International Group, up $3.25 to $102.625; General Re Corp., up $2.75 to $86.50; Aetna, up $2.375 to $59.50; and Marsh & McLennan Inc., up $3.125 to $75.875.  Still, a few individual companies, most likely smaller ones, could be devastated.  "I think there is a damned good chance someone is going to hit the skids on this," said Oppenheimer & Co. analyst Myron Picoult.  He suspects some insurers who had purchased reinsurance to limit their exposure to catastrophes will discover that reinsurance was used up by Hurricane Hugo.  British, West German, Scandinavian and other overseas insurers are bracing for big claims from the San Francisco earthquake disaster.  Although it's unclear how much exposure the London market will face, U.K. underwriters traditionally have a large reinsurance exposure to U.S. catastrophe coverage.  Jack Byrne, chairman of Fireman's Fund, said this disaster will test the catastrophe reinsurance market, causing these rates to soar.  The catastrophe losses sustained by insurers this year will probably be the worst on an inflation-adjusted basis since 1906 -- when another earthquake sparked the Great San Francisco Fire.  Orin Kramer, an insurance consultant in New York, estimates that the 1906 San Francisco destruction, on an inflation-adjusted basis, included insured losses of $5.8 billion.  He is estimating this week's disaster will generate insured losses of $2 billion to $4 billion, following about $4 billion in costs to insurers from Hurricane Hugo.  Silicon Graphics Inc.'s first-quarter profit rose sharply to $5.2 million, or 28 cents a share, from $1 million, or six cents a share, a year ago.  The maker of computer workstations said a surge of government orders contributed to the increase.  Revenue rose 95% to $86.4 million from $44.3 million the year earlier.  In national over-the-counter trading, the company closed yesterday at $23.25 a share, down 25 cents.  Hunter Environmental Services Inc. said it reached a preliminary accord on the sale of its environmental consulting and services business for about $40 million and assumption of related debt.  The buyer wasn't identified.  The company said it also is making progress in negotiating the buy-out of its design division by management.  In addition, Hunter said it will use proceeds from a private placement of $8 million of preferred shares to purchase an interest in a start-up company to underwrite environmental impairment insurance.  Hunter wants to concentrate its resources on the insurance business and on a project to store hazardous wastes in salt domes.  Jaguar PLC's chairman said he hopes to reach a friendly pact with General Motors Corp. within a month that may involve the British luxury-car maker's producing a cheaper executive model.  Sir John Egan told reporters at London's Motorfair yesterday he "would be disappointed if we couldn't do {the deal} within a month."  He said the tie-up would mean Jaguar could "develop cars down range {in price} from where we are" by offering access to GM's high-volume parts production.  Besides creating joint manufacturing ventures, the accord is expected to give GM about a 15% stake that eventually would rise to about 30%.  Jaguar figures a friendly alliance with GM will fend off unwelcome advances from Ford Motor Co.  But Ford, Jaguar's biggest shareholder since lifting its stake to 10.4% this week, is pressing harder for talks with Sir John.  "We're getting to the point where we are going to have to meet" with him, one Ford official said yesterday.  Ford probably will renew its request for such a meeting soon, he added.  Sir John has spurned Ford's advances since the U.S. auto giant launched a surprise bid for as much as 15% of Jaguar last month.  Ford has signaled it might acquire a majority interest later.  "I'm not obligated to sit down and talk to anybody," the Jaguar chairman asserted yesterday.  He didn't rule out negotiations with Ford, however.  The fiercely proud but financially strapped British company prefers to remain independent and publicly held, despite Ford's promise of access to cash and technological know-how.  Sir John noted that GM, a longtime Jaguar supplier, agrees "we should remain an independent company."  He said Jaguar started negotiating with GM and several other car makers over a year ago, but the rest "dropped by the wayside ever since the share price went above #4 ($6.30) a share."  Jaguar shares stood at 405 pence before Ford's initial announcement, but the subsequent takeover frenzy has driven them up.  The stock traded late yesterday on London's stock exchange at 673 pence, up 19 pence.  Developing an executive-model range would mark a major departure for Britain's leading luxury-car maker.  A typical British executive car is mass produced and smaller than a luxury car.  It generally fetches no more than #25,000 ($39,400) -- roughly #16,000 less than the highest-priced Jaguars, which are all known for their hand-crafted leather work.  "We have designs for such {executive} cars, but have never been able to develop them," Sir John said.  GM's help would "make it possible {for Jaguar} to build a wider range of cars."  An executive model would significantly boost Jaguar's yearly output of 50,000 cars.  "You are talking about a couple hundred thousand a year," said Bob Barber, an auto-industry analyst at U.K. brokerage James Capel & Co.  A pact with GM may emerge in as little as two weeks, according to sources close to the talks.  The deal would require approval by a majority of Jaguar shareholders.  "We have to make it attractive enough that {holders} would accept it," Sir John said.  That may be difficult, the Jaguar chairman acknowledged, "when you have somebody else breathing down your neck."  Ford probably would try to kill the proposal by enlisting support from U.S. takeover-stock speculators and holding out the carrot of a larger bid later, said Stephen Reitman, European auto analyst at London brokers UBS Phillips & Drew.  Ford can't make a full-fledged bid for Jaguar until U.K. government restrictions expire.  The anti-takeover measure prevents any outside investor from buying more than 15% of Jaguar shares without permission until Dec. 31, 1990.  But with its 10.4% stake, Ford can convene a special Jaguar shareholders' meeting and urge them to drop the restrictions prematurely.  "It's a very valuable weapon in their armory," which could enable Ford to bid sooner for Jaguar, observed Mr. Barber of James Capel.  Otherwise, Jaguar may have to tolerate the two U.S. auto giants each owning a 15% stake for more than a year.  "It would be difficult to see how a car company can be owned by a collective," Sir John said.  "It has never been done before, but there's always a first."  Although two Baby Bells showed strong growth in access lines, usage and unregulated business revenue, one reported a modest gain in third-quarter net while the other posted a small drop.  Ameritech Corp.'s earnings increased 2.8%, after strong revenue gains were offset somewhat by refunds and rate reductions imposed by regulators in its Midwest territory.  BellSouth Corp.'s third-quarter earnings dropped 3.8% as a result of debt refinancing, the recent acquisition of a cellular and paging property and rate reductions in its Southeast territory.  BellSouth  At BellSouth, based in Atlanta, customer access lines grew by 162,000, or 3.5%, during the 12-month period ended Sept. 30.  For the third quarter, total operating revenue grew 2.6% to $3.55 billion from $3.46 billion.  Total operating expenses increased 3.5% to $2.78 billion from $2.69 billion.  Overall access minutes of use increased 10.3% and toll messages jumped 5.2%.  BellSouth Chairman and Chief Executive Officer John L. Clendenin said three factors accounted for the drop in third-quarter earnings.  The refinancing of $481 million in long-term debt reduced net income by $22 million, or five cents a share, but in the long run will save more than $250 million in interest costs.  The company previously said that the recent acquisition of Mobile Communications Corp. of America would dilute 1989 earnings by about 3%.  In addition, earnings were reduced by rate reductions in Florida, Kentucky, Alabama, Tennessee and Louisiana.  Ameritech At Ameritech, based in Chicago, customer access lines increased by 402,000, or 2.6%, and cellular mobile lines increased by 80,000, or 62.3%, for the 12-month period ended Sept. 30.  For the third quarter, revenue increased 1.9% to $2.55 billion from $2.51 billion.  Operating expenses increased 2.6% to $2.04 billion, including one-time pretax charges of $40 million for labor contract signing bonuses.  Local service revenue increased 3.5% and directory and unregulated business revenue jumped 9.5%.  But network access revenue dropped 4% and toll revenue dropped 1.4%.  ---  @ 1989 1988  @ in per in per %  @ millions share millions share chg.  @ THIRD-QUARTER NET INCOME  @Ameritech ... $289.1 $1.06 $281.1 $1.03a + 2.8  @BellSouth ... 404.4 0.84b 419.6 0.89 - 3.8  @ NINE-MONTHS NET INCOME  @Ameritech ... 906.5 3.37 927.7 3.40a - 2.3  @BellSouth ... 1,272.1 2.67c 1,246.2 2.61 + 2.1  a-reflects 2-for-1 stock split effective Dec. 30, 1988. b-reflects extraordinary loss of five cents a share for early debt retirement. c-reflects extraordinary loss of five cents a share and extraordinary gain of 14 cents a share from cumulative effect of accounting change.  The Wall Street Journal "American Way of Buying" Survey consists of two separate, door-to-door nationwide polls conducted for the Journal by Peter D. Hart Research Associates and the Roper Organization.  The two surveys, which asked different questions, were conducted using national random probability samples.  The poll conducted by Peter D. Hart Research Associates interviewed 2,064 adults age 18 and older from June 15 to June 30, 1989.  The poll conducted by the Roper Organization interviewed 2,002 adults age 18 and older from July 7 to July 15, 1989.  Responses were weighted on the basis of age and gender to conform with U.S. Census data.  For each poll, the odds are 19 out of 20 that if pollsters had sought to survey every household in the U.S. using the same questionnaire, the findings would differ from these poll results by no more than 2 1/2 percentage points in either direction.  The margin of error for subgroups -- for example, married women with children at home -- would be larger.  In addition, in any survey, there is always the chance that other factors such as question wording could introduce errors into the findings.  (See related story: "The American Way of Buying: Brand Loyalty Is Rarely Blind Loyalty --- Rise in Coupons, Choices Blamed For '80s Erosion" -- WSJ Oct. 19, 1989)  Program traders were buying and selling at full steam Monday, the first trading session after the stock market's 190.58-point plunge Friday.  They accounted for a hefty 16% of New York Stock Exchange volume Monday, the fourth busiest session ever.  On Friday, 13% of volume was in computer-guided program trades.  In August, by contrast, program trading averaged 10.3% of daily Big Board turnover.  Program traders were publicly castigated following the 508-point crash Oct. 19, 1987, and a number of brokerage firms pulled back from using this strategy for a while.  But as the outcry faded by the spring of 1988, they resumed.  Some observers thought that after Friday's sharp drop, the firms would rein in their program traders to avoid stoking more controversy.  But the statistics released yesterday show the firms did nothing of the sort.  One reason, they said, was that the official reports on the 1987 crash exonerated program trading as a cause.  Stock-index arbitrage is the most controversial form of program trading because it accelerates market moves, if not actually causing them.  In it, traders buy or sell stocks and offset those positions in stock-index futures contracts to profit from fleeting price discrepancies.  Under the exchange's definitions, program trading also describes a number of other strategies that, in the opinion of some traders, don't cause big swings in the market.  The Big Board's disclosure of program trading activity on these two days was unusual.  Though it collects such data daily, its monthly reports on program trading usually come out about three weeks after each month ends.  The September figures are due to be released this week.  The Big Board declined to name the Wall Street firms involved in the activity Friday and Monday, or the type of strategies used.  But traders on the exchange floor, who can observe the computer-guided trading activity on monitor screens, said most of the top program-trading firms were active both days.  Through August, the top five program trading firms in volume were Morgan Stanley & Co., Kidder, Peabody & Co., Merrill Lynch & Co., PaineWebber Group Inc. and Salomon Brothers Inc.  Though brokerage officials defended their use of program trading, one sign of what an issue it remains was that few executives would comment on the record.  Besides reciting the pardon for program trading contained in the Brady Commission report, they said stock-index arbitrage was actually needed Monday to restore the markets' equilibrium.  On Friday, the stock-index futures market was unhinged from the stock market when the Chicago Mercantile Exchange halted trading in Standard & Poor's 500 futures contract -- a "circuit breaker" procedure instituted after the 1987 crash and implemented for the first time.  Futures trading resumed a half-hour later, but the session ended shortly thereafter, leaving the stock market set up for more sell programs, traders said.  By Monday morning, they said, stock-index arbitrage sell programs helped re-establish the link between stocks and futures.  But stunning volatility was produced in the process.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average plunged a breathtaking 63.52 points in the first 40 minutes of trading Monday as stock-index arbitrage sell programs kicked in.  At about 10:10 a.m. EDT, the market abruptly turned upward on stock-index arbitrage buy programs.  By day's end, the Dow industrials had rebounded 88.12 points, or nearly half of Friday's drop.  FREDERICK'S OF HOLLYWOOD Inc., Los Angeles, said its board voted a 50% increase in the specialty boutique-store operator's semiannual dividend, to five cents a common share.  The dividend is payable Dec. 15 to stock of record Nov. 15.  Valley National Corp. reported a third-quarter net loss of $72.2 million, or $3.65 a share, and suspended its quarterly dividend because of potential losses on its Arizona real estate holdings.  The Phoenix-based holding company for Arizona's largest bank said it added $121 million to its allowance for losses on loans and for real estate owned.  The company earned $18.7 million, or 95 cents a share, a year earlier.  For the nine months, Valley National posted a net loss of $136.4 million, or $6.90 a share.  It had profit of $48.6 million, or $2.46 a share, in the 1988 period.  Valley National had been paying a quarterly dividend of 36 cents a share.  "The Arizona real estate market continues to be depressed, and there is still uncertainty as to when values will recover," James P. Simmons, chairman, said.  The decision to increase the loan-loss reserve and suspend the dividend is "both prudent and in the best long-term interest of the shareholders," he said.  Valley National said it made the decision on the basis of an "overall assessment of the marketplace" and the condition of its loan portfolio and after reviewing it with federal regulators.  The addition to reserves comes on top of a provision of $199.7 million that was announced in June.  In July, Moody's downgraded $400 million of the company's debt, saying the bank holding company hadn't taken adequate write-offs against potential losses on real estate loans despite its second-quarter write-down.  Richard M. Greenwood, Valley National's executive vice president, said then that the company believed the write-downs were "adequate" and didn't plan to increase its reserves again.  Bruce Hoyt, a banking analyst with Boettcher & Co., a Denver brokerage firm, said Valley National "isn't out of the woods yet."  The key will be whether Arizona real estate turns around or at least stabilizes, he said.  "They've stepped up to the plate to take the write-downs, but when markets head down, a company is always exposed to further negative surprises," Mr. Hoyt said.  Valley National closed yesterday at $24.25 a share, down $1, in national over-the-counter trading.  Two years of coddling, down the drain.  That's the way a lot of brokers feel today on the second anniversary of the 1987 stock-market crash.  Ever since that fearful Black Monday, they've been tirelessly wooing wary individual investors -- trying to convince them that Oct. 19, 1987, was a fluke and that the stock market really is a safe place for average Americans to put their hard-earned dollars.  And until last Friday, it seemed those efforts were starting to pay off.  "Some of those folks were coming back," says Leslie Quick Jr., chairman, of discount brokers Quick & Reilly Group Inc.  "We had heard from people who hadn't been active" for a long time.  Then came the frightening 190-point plunge in the Dow Jones Industrial Average and a new wave of stock-market volatility.  All of a sudden, it was back to square one.  "It's going to set things back for a period, because it reinforces the concern of volatility," says Jeffrey B. Lane, president of Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc.  "I think it will shake confidence one more time, and a lot of this business is based on client confidence."  Brokers around the country say the reaction from individual investors this week has been almost eerie.  Customers and potential customers are suddenly complaining about the stock market in the exact way they did in post-crash 1987.  "The kinds of questions you had before have resurfaced," says Raymond A. "Chip" Mason, chairman of regional brokerage firm Legg Mason Inc., Baltimore.  "I can just tell the questions are right back where they were: `What's going on?,' `Can't anything be done about program trading?,' `Doesn't the exchange understand?,' `Where is the SEC on this?'"  Mr. Mason says he's convinced the public still wants to invest in common stocks, even though they believe the deck is stacked against them.  But "these wide swings scare them to death."  All of this is bad news for the big brokerage firms such as Shearson and Merrill Lynch & Co. that have big "retail," or individual-investor, businesses.  After expanding rapidly during the bull-market years up to the 1987 crash, retail brokerage operations these days are getting barely enough business to pay the overhead.  True, the amount of money investors are willing to entrust to their brokers has been growing lately.  But those dollars have been going into such "safe" products as money market funds, which don't generate much in the way of commissions for the brokerage firms.  At discount brokerage Charles Schwab & Co., such "cash-equivalent" investments recently accounted for a record $8 billion of the firm's $25 billion of client's assets.  The brokers' hope has been that they could soon coax investors into shifting some of their hoard into the stock market.  And before last Friday, they were actually making modest progress.  A slightly higher percentage of New York Stock Exchange volume has been attributed to retail investors in recent months compared with post-crash 1988, according to Securities Industry Association data.  In 1987, an average 19.7% of Big Board volume was retail business, with the monthly level never more than 21.4%.  The retail participation dropped to an average 18.2% in 1988, and shriveled to barely 14% some months during the year.  Yet in 1989, retail participation has been more than 20% in every month, and was 23.5% in August, the latest month for which figures are available.  Jeffrey Schaefer, the SIA's research director, says that all of his group's retail-volume statistics could be overstated by as much as five percentage points because corporate buy-backs are sometimes inadvertently included in Big Board data.  But there did seem to be a retail activity pickup.  But "Friday didn't help things," says Mr. Schaefer.  With the gyrations of recent days, says Hugo Quackenbush, senior vice president at Charles Schwab, many small investors are absolutely convinced that "they shouldn't play in the stock market."  Joseph Grano, president of retail sales and marketing at PaineWebber Group Inc., still thinks that individual investors will eventually go back into the stock market.  Investors will develop "thicker skins," and their confidence will return, he says.  Friday's plunge, he is telling PaineWebber brokers, was nothing more than a "tremendous reaction to leveraged buy-out stocks."  Meanwhile, PaineWebber remains among the leaders in efforts to simply persuade investors to keep giving Wall Street their money.  "It's more of an important issue to keep control of those assets, rather than push the investor to move into (specific) products such as equities," Mr. Grano says.  "The equity decision will come when the client is ready and when there's a semblance of confidence."  It could be a long wait, say some industry observers.  "Some investors will tiptoe back in," says Richard Ross, a market research director for Elrick & Lavidge in Chicago.  "Then there'll be another swing.  Given enough of these, this will drive everyone out except the most hardy," he adds.  Mr. Ross, who has been studying retail investors' perception of risks in the brokerage industry, said a market plunge like Friday's "shatters investors' confidence in their ability to make any judgments on the market."  The long-term outlook for the retail brokerage business is "miserable," Mr. Ross declares.  The following were among yesterday's offerings and pricings in the U.S. and non-U.S. capital markets, with terms and syndicate manager, as compiled by Dow Jones Capital Markets Report:  @ MUNICIPALS  Washington, D.C. -- $200 million of general obligation tax revenue anticipation notes, Series 1990, due Sept. 28, 1990.  About $190 million were offered through Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc. Shearson is offering the notes as 6 3/4% securities priced to yield 6.15%.  J.P. Morgan Securities Inc. is offering the remaining $10 million of notes.  The notes are rated MIG-1 by Moody's Investors Service Inc. Standard & Poor's Corp. has them under review.  @ MORTGAGES  Federal National Mortgage Association -- $400 million of Remic mortgage securities being offered in 16 classes by Bear, Stearns & Co.  The offering, Series 1989-83, is backed by Fannie Mae 9% securities.  The offering used at-market pricing.  Separately, Fannie Mae issued $400 million of Remic mortgage securities in 12 classes through First Boston Corp.  The offering, Series 1989-84, is backed by Fannie Mae 9% securities.  Pricing details weren't available.  The two offerings bring Fannie Mae's 1989 Remic issuance to $31 billion and its total volume to $43.3 billion since the program began in April 1987.  @ EUROBONDS  Societa per Azioni Finanziaria Industria Manaifatturiera (Italy) -- $150 million of 9% depository receipts due Nov. 27, 1994, priced at 101.60 to yield 9.07% less fees, via Bankers Trust International Ltd. Fees 1 7/8.  Mitsubishi Corp. Finance (Japanese parent) -- $100 million of 8 5/8% bonds due Nov. 1, 1993 priced at 101 1/4 to yield 8.74% annually less full fees, via Yamaichi International (Europe) Ltd. Fees 1 5/8.  Indian Oil Corp. (India) -- $200 million of floating-rate notes due November 1994, paying six-month London interbank offered rate plus 3/16 point and priced at par via Credit Suisse First Boston Ltd. Guaranteed by India.  Fees 0.36.  Notes offered at a fixed level of 99.75.  National Westminster Bank PLC (U.K.) -- #200 million of undated variable-rate notes priced at par via Merill Lynch International Ltd. Initial interest rate set at 0.375 point over three-month Libor.  Subsequent margins set by agreement between NatWest and Merrill.  If no margin agreed, there is a fallback rate of Libor plus 0.75 point in years one to 15, and Libor plus 1.25 point thereafter.  Keihin Electric Express Railway Co. (Japan) -- $150 million of bonds due Nov. 9, 1993, with equity-purchase warrants, indicating a 4% coupon at par via Yamaichi International (Europe) Ltd.  Each $5,000 bond carries one warrant, exercisable from Dec. 1, 1989, through Nov. 2, 1993, to buy company shares at an expected premium of 2 1/2% to the closing share price when terms are fixed Oct. 24.  Seiren Co. (Japan) -- 110 million Swiss francs of privately placed convertible notes due March 31, 1994, with an indicated 0.25% coupon at par, via Bank Leu Ltd. Put option on March 31, 1992, at an indicated 109 to yield 3.865%.  Callable on March 31, 1992, at 109, also beginning Sept. 30, 1992, from 101 1/2 and declining half a point semiannually to par.  Each 50,000 Swiss franc note is convertible from Nov. 20, 1989, to March 17, 1994, at an indicated 5% premium over the closing share price Oct. 25, when terms are scheduled to be fixed.  N. Nomura & Co. (Japan) -- 50 million Swiss francs of privately placed convertible notes due March 31, 1994, with an indicated 0.5% coupon at par, via Bank Julius Baer.  Put option on March 31, 1992, at an indicated 108 1/4 to yield 3.846%.  Each 50,000 Swiss franc note is convertible from Nov. 20, 1989, to March 17, 1994, at a 5% premium over the closing share price Oct. 21, when terms are scheduled to be fixed.  Aegon N.V. (Netherlands) -- 250 million Dutch guilders of 7 3/4% bonds due Nov. 15, 1999, priced at 101 1/4 to yield 7.57% at issue price and 7.86% less full fees, via AMRO Bank.  Fees 2.  @ OTHER  Continental Airlines -- a four-part, $71 million issue of secured equipment certificates priced through Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc.  The size of the issue was decreased from an originally planned $95.2 million.  In addition, a planned two-part offering of $58 million in unsecured notes wasn't offered.  The first part, consisting of $2.5 million of 11 1/4% secured equipment certificates due June 15, 1990, was priced at 98.481 with a yield to maturity of 13.75%.  The second part, consisting of $28 million of 11 3/4% secured equipment certificates due June 15, 1995, was priced at 87.026 with a yield to maturity of 15.25%.  The third part, consisting of $18.5 million of 12 1/8% secured equipment certificates due April 15, 1996, was priced at 85.60 with a yield to maturity of 15.75%.  The fourth part, consisting of $22 million of 12 1/2% secured equipment certificates due April 15, 1999, was priced at 85.339 with a yield to maturity of 15.50%.  The issue was rated single-B-2 by Moody's and single-B by S&P.  All parts of the issue are callable at any time at par.  Continental Airlines is a unit of Texas Air Corp.  John V. Holmes, an investment-newsletter publisher, and three venture-capital firms he organized were enjoined from violating the registration provisions of the securities laws governing investment companies.  As part of an agreement that settled charges brought by the Securities and Exchange Commission, a receiver was also appointed for the three venture-capital firms.  Mr. Holmes was the subject of a page one profile in The Wall Street Journal in 1984, after the SEC questioned him about ties between him and companies he touted in a newsletter.  In 1986, in another consent agreement with the SEC, Mr. Holmes was enjoined from violating the stock-registration and anti-fraud provisions of the securities laws.  Without any admission or denial of guilt by Mr. Holmes, that agreement settled SEC charges that Mr. Holmes sold unregistered securities and misled investors.  In charges filed last week in federal district court in Charlotte, N.C., the SEC alleged that Venture Capitalists Inc., Venture Finance Corp. and New Ventures Fund Inc., all of Charlotte, failed repeatedly to file proper documents.  The SEC also charged that Mr. Holmes acted as an officer or director of New Ventures, in violation of his previous consent agreement.  "Some companies were delinquent in filings and other actions, all of which cost money," Mr. Holmes said.  Two of Mr. Holmes's business associates who worked for Venture Capitalists, Kimberly Ann Smith and Frederick Byrum, also consented to being enjoined from violations of registration provisions of the securities laws.  Ms. Smith also agreed to a permanent injunction barring her from acting as an officer, director or investment adviser of any mutual fund, unit investment trust or face-amount certificate company.  Mr. Byrum and Ms. Smith couldn't be reached for comment.  In consenting to the injunctions, none of the individuals or companies admitted or denied the allegations.  Senate Republicans have settled on a proposal that would cut the capital-gains tax for individuals and corporations.  At the same time, a small group of Senate Democrats are working on a similar plan and may introduce it soon.  Sen. Bob Packwood (R., Ore.), the lead sponsor of the GOP proposal, said he intends to unveil the plan today and to offer it as an amendment to whatever legislation comes along, particularly this month's bill to raise the federal borrowing limit.  He gave 10-to-1 odds that a capital-gains tax cut of some sort would be approved this year, though it probably won't be included in the pending deficit-reduction bill.  He added that he expects to talk to the Democrats who also wanted to cut the gains tax about drafting a joint proposal.  For individuals, the Packwood plan would exclude from income 5% of the gain from the sale of a capital asset held for more than one year.  The exclusion would rise five percentage points for each year the asset was held until it reached a maximum of 35%.  The exclusion would apply to assets sold after Oct. 1, 1989.  As an alternative, he said, taxpayers could chose to reduce their gains by an inflation index.  For corporations, the top tax rate on the sale of assets held for more than three years would be cut to 33% from the current top rate of 34%.  That rate would gradually decline to as little as 29% for corporate assets held for 15 years.  The Packwood plan would also include a proposal, designed by Sen. William Roth (R., Del.), that would expand and alter the deduction for individual retirement accounts.  The Roth plan would create a new, non-deductible IRA from which money could be withdrawn tax-free not only for retirement, but also for the purchase of a first home and to pay education and medical expenses.  Current IRAs could be rolled over into the new IRAs but would be subject to tax.  For their part, the group of Democrats are working on a plan that, like the Packwood proposal, would grant larger exclusions to assets the longer they were held by individuals and companies.  Newly acquired assets would get a bigger break than those currently held.  An extra exclusion would be given to long-held stock in small and medium-size corporations just starting up.  No one in the Senate is considering the capital-gains plan passed by the House.  That plan would provide a 30% exclusion to assets sold over a 2 1/2-year period ending Dec. 31, 1991.  After then, the House measure would boost the tax rate to 28% and exclude from tax the gain attributable to inflation.  Senators are focusing on making a capital-gains differential permanent.  Separately, Chairman Dan Rostenkowski (D., Ill.) of the House Ways and Means Committee said he didn't want the capital-gains tax cut or any other amendments attached to the pending bill raising the federal borrowing limit.  The current debt limit expires Oct. 31.  He also urged House and Senate negotiators to rid the deficit-reduction bill of all provisions that increase the budget deficit, including the House-passed capital-gains provision.  From a helicopter a thousand feet above Oakland after the second-deadliest earthquake in U.S. history, a scene of devastation emerges: a freeway crumbled into a concrete sandwich, hoses pumping water into once-fashionable apartments, abandoned autos.  But this quake wasn't the big one, the replay of 1906 that has been feared for so many years.  Despite the tragic loss of more than 270 lives, and damage estimated in the billions, most businesses and their plants and offices in the Bay area weren't greatly affected.  The economic life of the region is expected to revive in a day or two, although some transportation problems may last weeks or months.  A main factor mitigating more widespread damage was the location of the quake's epicenter -- 20 miles from the heart of the Silicon Valley and more than 50 miles from downtown San Francisco and Oakland.  Also, the region's insistence on strict building codes helped prevent wider damage.  The tremendous energy of the quake was dissipated by the distance, so that most parts of the valley and the major cities suffered largely cosmetic damage -- broken windows, falling brick and cornices, buckled asphalt or sidewalks.  Of course, the quake was the worst since the emergence of the computer era turned Silicon Valley into the nation's capital of high technology.  Like other major American cities, the San Francisco -- Oakland area owes its current prosperity more to its infrastructure of fiber-optic cables linking thousands of computer terminals and telephones than to its location astride one of the world's great natural harbors.  When the tremors struck, the region's largely unseen high-tech fabric held up surprisingly well despite the devastation visible from the air.  Michael L. Bandler, vice president for network technology at Pacific Bell Telephone Co., says nearly all the network's computer switches, which move thousands of calls a minute from one location to another, changed to battery power when the city lost power.  The battery packs have enough power for only three hours, but that gave emergency crews time to turn on an emergency system that runs primarily on diesel fuel.  Of some 160 switches in Pacific Bell's network, only four went down.  One of those was in Hollister, Calif., near the earthquake's epicenter.  Few telephone lines snapped.  That's because the widely used fiber-optic cable has been installed underground with 25 extra feet of cable between junction points.  The slack absorbs the pulling strain generated by an earthquake.  Nevertheless, phone service was sporadic; many computer terminals remained dark, and by late yesterday a third of San Francisco remained without power.  Business in the nation's fourth-largest metropolitan region was nearly paralyzed; an estimated one million members of the work force stayed at home.  The economic dislocation was as abrupt as the earthquake itself, as virtually all businesses shut down.  The $125-billion-a-year Bay area economy represents one-fourth of the economy of the nation's most populous state and accounts for 2% to 3% of the nation's total output of goods and services, according to the Center for Continuing Study of the California Economy in Palo Alto.  In high-tech, the Bay area accounts for 15% to 20% of the U.S. computer-related industry.  "This has been a major disruption for the Bay area economy," says Pauline Sweezey, the chief economist at the California Department of Finance.  "Obviously, things are going to have to go on hold for many companies."  The damage to the Bay area's roadways could cause significant economic hardship.  A quarter of a million people cross the Bay Bridge every day, far more than the 100,000 that use the Bay Area Rapid Transit system (BART) -- which was working but wasn't stopping in the city's Financial District yesterday afternoon because electricity was shut off and the area was being checked for gas leaks.  California state transportation officials interviewed by telephone say they nevertheless don't expect serious problems for commerce in and out of the Bay area.  All major roadways except Interstate 880, known as the Nimitz Freeway, and the Bay Bridge were open by 1 p.m. yesterday.  Officials expect difficulty routing traffic through downtown San Francisco.  The earthquake caused many streets to buckle and crack, making them impassible.  Other roads were obstructed by collapsed buildings and damaged water and power lines, an emergency relief spokesman says.  San Francisco Mayor Art Agnos estimated the damage to his city alone at $2 billion.  But many predicted that the commercial disruption would be short-lived.  Of the scores of companies contacted by this newspaper, few reported any damage that they didn't expect to have remedied within a day or two.  It is possible, of course, that some of the most seriously damaged companies couldn't be reached, particularly in areas nearest the epicenter.  Typical, perhaps, was the situation at New United Motor Manufacturing Inc., the General Motors Corp.-Toyota joint-venture auto plant in Fremont, about 35 miles south of Oakland.  Ten of the plant's workers were injured when the quake hit about a half-hour into the afternoon shift; seven were hospitalized.  Metal racks on the plant floor fell over, and water mains ruptured, a spokeswoman says.  The plant was evacuated and workers sent home.  But the plant was able to resume limited production of its Toyota Corollas and Geo Prizms by 6 a.m. yesterday, and absenteeism was only 7% of the work force, about twice normal.  Computer maker Hewlett-Packard Co., based in Palo Alto, says one of its buildings sustained severe damage when it was knocked off its foundation.  Other buildings had broken glass, dangling light fixtures and broken pipes, a spokesperson says, estimating the cost of reconstruction "in the millions."  Most banks were closed but were expected to reopen today with few problems anticipated.  At the Federal Reserve Bank of San Francisco, Vice President Robert Fienberg says operations were "steaming along as usual" yesterday afternoon.  `When the quake hit, we turned on our emergency generator and brought our computers up," he says.  The Fed serves as a middleman for banks, taking checks from one bank and sending them to another, an operation that it handled smoothly Tuesday night after the quake.  "The volume we received from the banks was a lot lower than usual," he says.  A disaster-contingency plan in which the Los Angeles Fed would come to San Francisco's aid wasn't needed, he adds.  Most of the telephone problems in the immediate aftermath stemmed from congestion.  The telephone network simply couldn't handle the large number of people seeking to make a call at the same time.  The volume resulted in dial-tone delays that were as short as 15 seconds and as long as five minutes.  Mr. Bandler puts traffic volume at 10 to 50 times normal.  American Telephone & Telegraph Co., MCI Communications Inc. and United Telecommunications' U S Sprint unit were blocking phone calls into the Bay area to alleviate congestion.  The companies block traffic much as highway on-ramps are blocked when traffic backs up.  William E. Downing, Pacific Bell's vice president of customer services for the Bay area, says most long-distance companies were blocking about 50% of all calls.  Pacific Telesis says its Pacific Bell unit also was blocking about 50% of its calls locally.  Ironically, the long-term effect of the earthquake may be to bolster the Bay area's economic fortunes and, indeed, the nation's gross national product.  It may also lead to new safeguards in major construction projects such as double-deck highways.  "It would in the near-term give a boost to the San Francisco economy because there will be an influx of people to help," says Beth Burnham Mace, a regional economist at DRI/McGraw Hill, a Lexington, Mass., forecasting firm.  The construction industry is sure to feel increased demand.  "There will be a big influx of federal dollars and gains in state, federal and local employment," Ms. Mace says.  Adds Stacy Kotman, an economist at Georgia State University, "There's nothing positive about an earthquake, but it will probably generate more construction activity."  Wall Street reacted swiftly yesterday to the disaster by bidding up stocks of construction and related companies.  Shares of Lone Star Industries Inc., a cement maker, rose sharply in anticipation of stepped-up demand.  In Greenwich, Conn., Lone Star spokesman Michael London says, "Obviously with an earthquake of this size, there are likely to be construction projects that wouldn't otherwise have been anticipated.  But any increase isn't likely to be any kind of a surge.  It's something likely to be spread out over a long period of time.  There will be a lot of repair work that won't require the quantities of cement or concrete that new constructon would."  Lone Star's San Francisco facilities weren't damaged in the quake.  The earthquake is likely to reduce GNP negligibly in the near term and then could raise it a bit as rebuilding begins.  The first effects are, of course, negative as work is disrupted and people lose income and cut spending.  Corporate profits may also dip initially.  Many of the lost tourism dollars won't be recovered; many trips delayed never take place.  Subsequently, however, the ill effects are likely to be offset, at least in economic terms, as construction activity begins.  Because of the way the government keeps its books, the damage to the Bay Bridge, however costly, won't be counted as a minus.  The money spent on repairs will be counted as a plus.  "It's very difficult to model the long-term impact of this," says Andrew Goldberg, who studies the public-policy and crisis-management aspects of earthquakes at the Center for Strategic International Studies in Washington, D.C.  "You certainly can say it's going to be extremely severe.  We really are talking about shutting down a major American city for a number of days, maybe for a few weeks."  Mr. Goldberg says the cost of the earthquake will definitely top $1 billion and could reach $4 billion.  He cautions that early damage estimates are often low; the damage totals in Hurricane Hugo increased tenfold as more information was received.  The earthquake damage, of course, would have been far greater if the epicenter had been in downtown San Francisco.  A direct hit on a major city, Mr. Goldberg figures, would cause $20 billion to $40 billion of damage.  Experts caution that it is far too soon for reliable estimates of the quake's total damage, but it's clear that insurers are likely to pay out enormous sums.  Jack Byrne, the chairman of Fireman's Fund Corp., which is based in Novato, Calif., estimates insured losses resulting the earthquake could total $2 billion.  The impact on the insurance industry "will be big and harsh, but less than {Hurricane} Hugo," says Mr. Byrne, who toured the Bay area by car yesterday afternoon to get a sense of the company's exposure to the earthquake.  Mr. Byrne says Fireman's Fund will probably pay hundreds of millions in primary claims, but, after taxes and use of its reinsurance lines, the company's fourthquarter charge against earnings shouldn't top $50 million.  The company was able to assess its damage liability quickly because it has computerized maps of Northern California showing the exact locations of all the property it insures.  Fireman's Fund had claims adjusters on the streets of San Francisco right after sunrise yesterday and was paying as many claims as it could right on the spot.  Fireman's Fund insures 37,300 homes and autos and 35,000 businesses in the Bay area.  In addition to paying for earthquake and fire damage, the insurer must cover worker-compensation claims and also losses due to businesses being shut down by lack of power or phone service.  But many Californians may not have adequate insurance coverage to pay for damages to their property.  The Independent Insurance Agents of America says fewer than one of every five California homeowners has earthquake insurance.  A somewhat higher percentage of people living in the Bay area have bought the additional insurance protection, but the great majority aren't covered.  Earthquake insurance typically runs $200 or more a year for a small house.  Whatever the long-term economic effect, the scene from the helicopter above Oakland is one of tragedy.  Gargantuan sections of a double-decker freeway have been heaved about like plastic building blocks.  Atop them sit cars and trucks abandoned in a terrifying scramble to safety the day before.  In areas where the freeway made giant concrete sandwiches of itself lie cars that police say have been flattened into foot-thick slabs.  On the periphery, rescue workers seem, from the air, to move in slow motion.  They peck away at the 1 1/2-mile section of rubble, searching for more of the 250 people thought to have died here.  About 20 other deaths were also attributed to the earthquake.  The heart of the earthquake, 6.9 on the Richter scale, was 50 miles to the south, near Santa Cruz, but its terrible fist struck here on the Nimitz Freeway, a major artery serving the Bay Bridge between Oakland and San Francisco.  Along the way, the quake toppled a mall in Santa Cruz, knocked down buildings in San Francisco's fashionable Marina District and sent a wall of bricks crashing on motorists in the city's Financial District.  Just a short span across the bay to the west, the quake also showed its mettle: A four-square-block area of the Marina District lies smoldering under a steady stream of seawater being pumped onto rubble to prevent it from blazing anew.  Many of the buildings, mostly condominiums and apartments, were flattened almost instantly as the underlying soil -- much of it landfill -- was literally turned to ooze by the quake's intensive shaking, rupturing gas lines.  Onlookers say three persons died when one of the buildings exploded into a fireball shortly after the quake struck.  Efforts to fight the blaze were hampered because water mains were severed as well.  From the air, ribbons of yellow fire hose carry water from the bay to high-pressure nozzles trained on the site.  As onlookers stand behind barricades, helmeted firemen and building inspectors survey rows of nearby buildings that were twisted from their foundations and seem on the verge of collapse.  In the Marina District, residents spent yesterday assessing damage, cleaning up and trying to find friends and neighbors.  Evelyn Boccone, 85 years old, has lived in the district most of her life.  Her parents lost everything in the 1906 earthquake.  "Now, we realize what our mothers must have gone through," she says.  "We always heard about the earthquake, but as children we didn't always listen."  PRINCE HENRI is the crown prince and hereditary grand duke of Luxembourg.  An article in the World Business Report of Sept. 22 editions incorrectly referred to his father, Grand Duke Jean, as the crown prince.  {See: "World Business (A Special Report): The Uncommon Market --- Towering Babble: An Automatic Translation System Proves That to Err Isn't Just Human" -- WSJ Sept. 22, 1989}  Resolution Funding Corp. plans to sell $4.5 billion of 30-year bonds Wednesday in the agency's first sale of securities.  The new bonds will be dated Oct. 30 and mature Oct. 15, 2019.  Tenders for the bonds, available in minimum denominations of $1,000, must be received by 1 p.m. EDT Wednesday at Federal Reserve banks.  Refcorp, created by the thrift-overhaul law enacted in August, will use the proceeds to merge or sell off ailing savings-and-loan institutions.  Congress authorized $50 billion to be borrowed to pay for the thrift bailout.  Of that amount, $20 billion has already been borrowed by the Treasury Department.  Unless otherwise specified in a particular offer, the bonds won't be subject to redemption prior to maturity.  Interest payments on the bonds will be payable semiannually.  The bonds are subject to federal taxation in the U.S., including income taxes.  At the state and local level, the bonds are subject to surtaxes and estate, inheritance and gift taxes, but exempt from taxation as to principal and interest.  G.D. Searle & Co., a Monsanto Co. unit, is launching a program to give consumers more information about its drugs when doctors prescribe them.  Called Patients in the Know, the program features fact sheets designed to be easy to understand.  The sheets tell how the medicine works, describe how to use it and list its possible side effects.  They are designed to be given to patients by their doctors when the medicines are prescribed and include space for the doctor to write special instructions.  In addition, Searle will give pharmacists brochures on the use of prescription drugs for distribution in their stores.  Consumer groups have long advocated that drug companies and doctors make more information available to patients.  "We believe that every drug that's marketed to a consumer should have a consumer label," said Douglas Teich of the Public Citizen Health Research Group, a Ralph Nader affiliate.  Dr. Teich said Searle is "the only company I know that voluntarily" will make consumer information available.  According to federal officials and drug-industry studies, nearly half of the 1.6 billion prescriptions filled each year aren't used properly, meaning that money is wasted on some prescriptions and patients are deprived of the benefits of medication.  "We think it's very important to provide as much information as possible on the drugs consumers take," said Searle Chairman Sheldon Gilgore.  Bond prices rambled yesterday as investors kept close watch on the stock market and worried about a wave of new supply.  Early yesterday, bonds rose as investors rushed to buy Treasury securities on the prospect that stocks would plummet in the aftermath of the massive California earthquake.  For example, some securities analysts warned that stocks of certain insurance companies, which face massive damage claims, would get hit hard.  But when the Dow Jones Industrial Average rose instead, bonds drifted lower.  With stocks not a major focus, "we're waiting for the next guiding light," said Brian J. Fabbri, chief economist at Midland Montagu Securities Inc.  "If the stock market tremors are behind us, then the bond market will go back to looking at the next batch of economic numbers to determine" where interest rates are heading.  The Treasury's benchmark 30-year bond, which jumped 3/8 point, or about $3.75 for each $1,000 face amount, during the first hour of trading, ended little changed.  Interest rates barely budged from Tuesday's levels.  Most junk bonds, which have been battered in recent weeks, continued a slow recuperation and ended unchanged to slightly higher.  But some so-called high-quality junk issues fell as some mutual funds sold their most liquid issues to raise cash.  RJR Holdings Capital Corp.'s 14.7% bonds due 2009 fell one point.  Other RJR issues fell between 1/2 point and 1 1/2 point.  In the latest sign of how difficult it is to place certain junk bonds, Continental Airlines said it was forced to scale back the size of its latest offering.  Continental, a unit of Texas Air Corp., slashed the size of its note offering from $150 million to $71 million.  The move had been widely expected.  In the multipart offering, the company sold a portion of secured notes but shelved all the unsecured notes.  A Continental spokeswoman said the notes may be offered at a later date.  "This was not a do-or-die deal," she said.  "I think this is a market that required some level of security.  It did not make sense to offer unsecured paper in an unsettling market."  Investors have been speculating for weeks about the market's ability to place the $7 billion to $10 billion of new junk bonds scheduled to be sold by year end.  Supply troubles were also on the minds of Treasury investors yesterday, who worried about the flood of new government securities coming next week.  "We're being bombarded by new Treasury and agency debt offerings," said William Sullivan Jr., director of money-market research at Dean Witter Reynolds Inc.  "The market is concerned about its ability to underwrite all this debt at current levels."  In addition to the $15.6 billion of Treasury bills to be sold at next week's regular Monday auction, the government will sell $10 billion of new two-year Treasury notes.  And Resolution Funding Corp. said late yesterday that it will sell $4.5 billion of 30-year bonds Wednesday.  Refcorp is the financing unit of Resolution Trust Corp., a new government agency created to rescue the nation's troubled thrifts.  Its securities have been dubbed "bailout bonds" by traders.  In when-issued trading, the two-year Treasurys had a yield of about 7.88%.  In the municipal market, all eyes were on California debt as investors tried to gauge the financial ramifications of Tuesday's earthquake.  But traders said the quake had only a minor impact on the trading of California state and local municipal debt.  "There are certain bonds traders refer to as `earthquake' bonds because the (issuers) are on top of the San Andreas fault," said Zane Mann, editor of the California Municipal Bond Advisor, a newsletter for investors.  Since those bonds already pay a slightly higher yield, an extra premium for the earthquake risk, they weren't materially affected.  But some bond market analysts said that could quickly change if property casualty insurance companies scramble to sell portions of their municipal portfolios to raise cash to pay damage claims.  "Insurance companies will foot a substantial amount of the bill to reconstruct San Francisco," said Charles Lieberman, chief economist at Manufacturers Hanover Securities Corp.  He also expects the performance of municipals to lag Treasurys as California is forced to issue new debt over time to repair public facilities.  A report issued late yesterday by Standard & Poor's Corp. concluded the quake won't cause "wide-scale credit deterioration" for issuers and debt issues in the 12-county area of Northern California affected by the quake.  Treasury Securities  Treasury bonds ended narrowly mixed in quiet trading.  The benchmark 30-year bond ended at a price of 100 29/32 to yield 8.03%, compared with 100 28/32 to yield 8.04% Tuesday.  The latest 10-year notes were quoted late at a price of 99 26/32 to yield 8%, compared with 99 25/32 to yield 8.01%.  Short-term rates were little changed.  Corporate Issues  Investment-grade corporate bonds ended 1/4 point lower.  The Continental junk bond offering, underwritten by Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc., was the only new issue priced yesterday.  In the four-part offering, the $71 million of secured equipment certificates was priced to yield 13.75% to 15.75%.  Municipals  Municipal bonds ended about 1/8 to 3/8 point lower, hurt by the circulation of two "bid-wanted" lists totaling $655 million.  Chemical Securities Inc. is acting as agent for the seller.  Meanwhile, some California issues were down a touch more than the broad market, but traders said there hadn't been much investor selling because of the quake.  But New York City general obligation bonds came under selling pressure.  Traders said a steady stream of bonds was put up for sale yesterday, pushing yields for longer maturities up 0.05 percentage point.  Traders said investors were reacting to recent negative news on the city's finances and are nervous ahead of the Nov. 7 election.  Washington, D.C., topped the competitive slate yesterday with a sale of $200 million of general obligation tax revenue anticipation notes.  In late trading, New Jersey Turnpike Authority's 7.20% issue of 2018 was off 1/4 point at 98 bid.  The yield was 7.35%, up 0.01 percentage point.  Mortgage-Backed Securities  Mortgage securities ended little changed after light dealings.  There was no appreciable market impact from the California earthquake.  Dealers said there was some concern that insurance companies might be forced to sell mortgage securities to help pay earthquake-related claims, but no selling materialized.  The Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corp. and Federal National Mortgage Association, two dominant issuers of mortgage securities, have a sizable amount of California home loans in their mortgagebacked pools.  But their potential quake exposure is seen as small given that they require a financial cushion on all the loans they purchase.  And because Northern California home prices are so high, loans from the region often are too large to be included in Freddie Mac and Fannie Mae pools.  Meanwhile, Government National Mortgage Association 9% securities for November delivery ended at 97 29/32, unchanged.  Freddie Mac 9% securities were at 97 4/32, down 1/32.  In derivative markets, Fannie Mae issued two $400 million real estate mortgage investment conduits backed by its 9% securities.  Foreign Bonds  British government bonds, or gilts, ended moderately lower as equities there recovered from Tuesday's drop.  The Treasury's 11 3/4% bond due 2003/2007 fell 11/32 to 111 31/32 to yield 10.08%, while the 12% notes due 1995 were down 7/32 to 103 22/32 to yield 11.04%.  Traders said today may be an anxious day for the market.  Several key economic figures are due out and Chancellor of the Exchequer Nigel Lawson is scheduled to give the annual "Mansion House" address to the financial community.  The chancellor sometimes has used the occasion to announce major economic policy changes.  Economists don't expect any such changes in this year's address, given Mr. Lawson's apparent reluctance to adjust policy currently.  Meanwhile, Japanese government bonds retreated in quiet trading, stymied by the dollar's resiliency.  Japan's bellwether 4.6% bond due 1998 ended on brokers' screens at 95.75 to yield 5.315%.  In West Germany, investors stayed on the sidelines as the bond market searched for direction.  The government's 7% issue due October 1999 fell 0.05 point to 99.90 to yield 7.01%.  The Berlin Wall still stands.  But the man who built it has fallen.  East Germany yesterday removed Erich Honecker, one of the staunchest holdouts against the reform rumbling through the Communist world, in an effort to win back the confidence of its increasingly rebellious citizens.  But while it was a move that stunned the East bloc, it hardly ushers in an era of reform -- at least anytime soon.  For the Politburo replaced Mr. Honecker, who had led East Germany for 18 years and before that headed its security apparatus, with a man cut of the same cloth: Egon Krenz, the most recent internal-security chief and a longtime Honecker protege.  East Germany, it is clear, is no Poland, where the Communist Party now shares power with the democratically elected Solidarity union.  Nor is it a Hungary, where yesterday the parliament approved constitutional changes meant to help turn the Communist nation into a multiparty democracy.  Still, any change in East Germany has enormous implications, for both East and West.  It raises the long-cherished hopes of many Germans for reunification -- a prospect that almost equally alarms political leaders in Moscow, Washington and Western Europe.  Mr. Krenz, 52, was named the new party chief just minutes after the Party's 163-member Central Committee convened in East Berlin.  Although the East German news agency ADN claimed Mr. Honecker had asked to be relieved of his duties for "health reasons," West German government sources said the 26-man Politburo had asked for his resignation at a separate meeting late Tuesday. (Mr.  Honecker was twice hospitalized this summer for a gall bladder ailment and his physical condition has been the subject of intense speculation in the Western media.)  ADN said Mr. Honecker, a hard-line Stalinist who in 1961 supervised the construction of the Berlin Wall, also was relieved of his title as head of state and his position as chief of the military.  Mr. Krenz is expected to be formally named to all three positions once the nation's parliament convenes later this week.  Mr. Honecker's ignoble fall culminates nearly two decades of iron-handed leadership during which Mr. Honecker, now 77 years old, built East Germany into the most economically advanced nation in the Soviet bloc.  His grip on power unraveled this summer as thousands of his countrymen, dissatisfied by the harshness of his rule, fled to the West.  Thousands more have taken to the streets in the last month in East Germany's largest wave of domestic unrest since a workers' uprising in 1953.  In Washington, the Bush administration took a characteristically cautious and skeptical view of the leadership change.  The official line was to offer warmer ties to Mr. Krenz, provided he is willing to institute reforms.  But U.S. officials have strong doubts that he is a reformer.  President Bush told reporters: "Whether that {the leadership change} reflects a change in East-West relations, I don't think so.  Because Mr. Krenz has been very much in accord with the policies of Honecker."  One top U.S. expert on East Germany added: "There is no clear-cut champion of reform, that we know of, in the East German leadership."  Indeed, Mr. Krenz said on East German television last night that there will be no sharing of power with pro-democracy groups.  He said, while dialogue is important, enough forums already exist "in which different interests" can express themselves.  The removal of Mr. Honecker was apparently the result of bitter infighting within the top ranks of the Communist party.  According to West German government sources, Mr. Honecker and several senior Politburo members fought over the last week to delay any decisions about a leadership change.  But, with public demonstrations in the country growing in size and intensity, Mr. Honecker and several key allies lost out in this battle, officials say.  Those allies included Politburo members Guenter Mittag, who has long headed economic affairs, and Joachim Hermann, chief of information policy.  Both men were also relieved of their duties yesterday.  Although other resignations may follow, it's still not clear to what extent the change in party personnel will alter the government's resistance to fundamental change.  Clearly, the central figure in this process is Egon Krenz.  Born in 1937 in a Baltic Sea town now part of Poland, he was eight years old when World War II ended.  Like West German Chancellor Helmut Kohl, he represents the postwar generation that has grown up during Germany's division.  Since joining the Politburo in 1983 as its youngest member, Mr. Krenz had acquired the nickname "crown prince," a reference to the widely held view that he was the hand-picked successor to Mr. Honecker.  In fact, the two men have had strikingly similar career paths, both having served as chief of internal security before their rise to the top party position.  Moreover, both men have hewn to a similar hard-line philosophy.  Notably, one of Mr. Krenz's few official visits overseas came a few months ago, when he visited China after the massacre in Beijing.  He later defended the Chinese government's response during a separate visit to West Germany.  East German Protestantism in particular fears Mr. Krenz, in part because of an incident in January 1988 when he was believed to have ordered the arrest of hundreds of dissidents who had sought refuge in the Church.  However, Mr. Krenz also has a reputation for being politically savvy.  His shrewd ability to read the shifting popular mood in East Germany is best illustrated by his apparent break with his old mentor, Mr. Honecker.  Indeed, according to West German government sources, he was one of the leaders in the power struggle that toppled Mr. Honecker.  In recent days, Mr. Krenz has sought to project a kinder image.  According to a report widely circulating in East Berlin, it was Mr. Krenz who ordered police to stop using excessive force against demonstrators in Leipzig.  "He doesn't want to have the image of the gun man," says Fred Oldenburg, an expert at the Bonn-sponsored Institute of East European and International Studies in Cologne.  "He's not a reformer -- he wants to have the image of a reformer."  As part of his image polishing, Mr. Krenz is expected to take modest steps toward reform to rebuild confidence among the people and reassert the party's authority.  Besides sacking other senior Politburo officials who allied themselves with Mr. Honecker, Mr. Krenz could loosen controls on the news media, free up travel restrictions, and establish a dialogue with various dissident groups.  But will it be enough?  West German government officials and Western analysts are doubtful.  "He doesn't signify what people want, so the unrest will go on," Mr. Oldenburg predicts.  At the same time, the expectations of the East German people are great and will continue to grow.  Says one West German official: "What's necessary now is the process of democratization.  Not just that people are being heard but that their interests are being taken seriously."  Chancellor Kohl, meanwhile, has invited Mr. Krenz to open discussions with Bonn on a wide range of subjects.  Reports in the West German press, citing sources in East Germany, suggest Mr. Krenz may serve only as a bridge between Mr. Honecker and a genuine reform leader.  Adding to that speculation is Mr. Krenz's reputation as a heavy drinker, who is said to also suffer from diabetes.  "This is a dynamic process and we're experiencing the first step," the Bonn official adds.  The selection of Mr. Krenz may also disappoint Moscow.  Soviet leader Mikhail Gorbachev has pressed hard for a change in East Germany's rigid stance.  Two reform-minded party leaders favored by Moscow as possible successors to Mr. Honecker, Dresden party secretary Hans Modrow and Politburo member Guenter Schabowski, were passed over.  If Mr. Krenz sticks to rigid policies the pressure from the Soviet Union could intensify.  In Moscow, Mr. Gorbachev sent Mr. Krenz a congratulatory telegram that appeared to urge the new leadership to heed growing calls for change.  According to the Soviet news agency Tass, "Gorbachev expressed the conviction that the leadership of the Socialist Unity Party of {East} Germany, being sensitive to the demands of the time, . . . will find solutions to complicated problems the GDR {German Democratic Republic} encountered."  A force of younger pro-Gorbachev members in the East German bureaucracy has for some time been pushing for relaxation within their country.  The older generation has been torn between a fear of tampering with the status quo and a fear of what might happen if they didn't.  From the perspective of East Germany's old guard, reforms that smack of capitalism and Western-style democracy could eliminate their country's reason for being.  Unlike the other nations of the bloc, East Germany is a creature of the Cold War.  Erasing the differences still dividing Europe, and the vast international reordering that implies, won't endanger the statehood of a Poland or a Hungary.  But it could ultimately lead to German reunification and the disappearance of East Germany from the map.  Which is what the Old Guard fears.  "I'm sure they'll formulate a reform that will be a recipe for the GDR's future as a separately identifiable state," says Michael Simmons, a British journalist whose book on East Germany, entitled "The Unloved Country," was published this month.  Up to now, that recipe has consisted of a dogged effort by former leader Walter Ulbricht to establish the country's international legitimacy, followed by Mr. Honecker's campaign to build the East bloc's only successful Stalinist economy into a consumer paradise.  Neither man achieved perfection.  Early in 1987, Mr. Honecker and his team stopped paying thin compliments to Mr. Gorbachev and joined with Romania in rejecting any necessity for adjustments in their systems.  The less-self-confident Czechoslovaks and Bulgarians, in contrast, declared their intentions to reform, while doing nothing concrete about it.  The East German media soon began presenting Mr. Gorbachev's speeches only as sketchy summaries, and giving space to his opponents.  By late 1988, they were banning Soviet publications.  The country abandoned its former devotion to socialist unity and took to insisting instead that each country in the bloc ought to travel its own road.  Mr. Honecker spoke of "generally valid objective laws of socialism" and left no room for debate.  With this year's dislocations in China and the Soviet Union, and the drive to democracy in Poland and Hungary, the East German leadership grew still more defensive.  Politburo member Joachim Herrman confessed to a "grave concern" over Hungarian democracy.  "Under the banner that proclaims the `renewal of socialism,'" he said, "forces are at work that are striving to eliminate socialism."  Some loyal voices, in and out of the East German Communist party, saw the nation's unrest coming.  The first signs were economic.  Despite heavily subsidized consumer industries, East Germans have for years watched the West pull farther out ahead.  In 1988, for the first time, economic growth came to a dead stop.  Gingerly, some economists began to blame central planning.  Some writers in theoretical journals even raised the notion of introducing democracy, at least in the workplace.  By summer, an independent reform movement was saying out loud what it had only whispered before.  But they are stalwart socialists.  Their proclaimed purpose is to cleanse East Germany of its Stalinist muck, not to merge with the West.  One of their pastors has envisioned a "new utopia" of "creative socialism."  Meanwhile, the man Mr. Krenz replaces has left an indelible mark on East German society.  Imprisoned by the Nazis during World War II for his political beliefs, Mr. Honecker typified the postwar generation of committed Communist leaders in Eastern Europe who took their cues from Moscow.  He was a "socialist warrior" who felt rankled by West Germany's enormous postwar prosperity and the Bonn government's steadfast refusal to recognize the legitimacy of his state.  Finally, during his first and only state visit to Bonn two years ago, he won some measure of the recognition he had long sought.  But ultimately he was undone by forces unleashed by his own comrade, Mr. Gorbachev.  Mr. Honecker's removal "was bound to happen," says one aide to Chancellor Kohl.  "It was only a matter of time."  EUROPEAN FORECASTS  The European Community Commission increased its forecast for economic growth in the EC in 1989 to 3.5%, slightly higher than its June projection of 3.25%.  In its annual economic report for 1989-1990, the commission also projected 1990 gross domestic product growth for the 12 EC members at 3%.  EC inflation was seen at 4.8% in 1989, higher than 1988's 3.6% price rise.  However, inflation for 1990 was seen slowing to 4.5%.  Leading EC growth forecasts in 1989 was Ireland, seen growing 5% at constant prices.  Slower growth countries included Greece, at 2.5%, the U.K., at 2.25%, and Denmark, at 1.75%.  Inflation is expected to be highest in Greece, where it is projected at 14.25%, and Portugal, at 13%.  At the other end of the spectrum, West German inflation was forecast at 3% in 1989 and 2.75% in 1990.  COFFEE FOR KOREA  Nestle Korea Ltd. opened a coffee and non-dairy-creamer plant in Chongju, South Korea.  An official at Nestle Korea, a 50-50 joint venture between Nestle S.A. and the Doosan Group, said the new facility will manufacture all types of soluble, roasted and ground coffee, coffee mix and nondairy coffee creamer.  The South Korean coffee market, consisting mostly of instant coffee, was estimated at about 100 billion won ($150.7 million) last year.  Brands made by the Kraft General Foods unit of Philip Morris Cos. had about 95% of the market share.  Nestle currently has only about a 2% share with its Taster's Choice coffee.  IRANIAN GAS FOR POLAND  Poland plans to start negotiations soon on purchasing natural gas from Iran, the official Islamic Republic News Agency reported.  The agency said Polish Prime Minister Tadeusz Mazowiecki told Iranian Deputy Foreign Minister Mahmoud Vaezi of Poland's willingess to purchase the gas during Mr. Vaezi's current visit to Warsaw.  The agency didn't mention possible quantities and didn't say how the gas would be delivered.  CHINA LASHES OUT  A Chinese official harshly criticized plans to close a British naval base in downtown Hong Kong.  Hong Kong officials announced last week that the base will be relocated to a small island to allow downtown redevelopment.  But Beijing wants to use the base for the People's Liberation Army after 1997, when the territory returns to Chinese sovereignty.  Ke Zaishuo, head of China's delegation to a Chinese-British Liaison Committee on Hong Kong, accused Britain of trying to impose a fait accompli and said, "This is something we cannot accept."  SOVIET-ISRAELI AIR LINKS  The Israeli and Soviet national airlines have reached preliminary agreement for launching the first direct flights between Tel Aviv and Moscow, a spokesman for the Israeli airline, El Al, said.  El Al director Rafi Har-Lev and top officials of the Soviet Union's Aeroflot negotiated a preliminary pact in Moscow this week, the spokesman said.  He added that concluding the deal requires approval by the governments of both countries, which have never had direct air links.  ARREST IN SINGAPORE  The chairman and a director of one of the Republic of Singapore's leading property companies, City Development Ltd., or CDL, were charged yesterday with criminal breach of trust of some 800,000 Singapore dollars (about US$409,000).  Kwek Hong Png, chairman of CDL, and director Quek Leng Chye were arrested by the republic's Corrupt Practices Investigation Bureau Tuesday night.  In addition to abetting in the alleged criminal breach of trust, Kwek Hong Png was also charged with dishonestly receiving S$500,000 that had been stolen.  Both men were charged in a subordinate court and released on bail of S$1 million.  The charges are the culmination of weeks of rumors concerning CDL that have depressed the company's share price and to a lesser extent the shares of all companies owned by CDL's controlling Quek family, brokers in Singapore say.  The Queks control the Hong Leong Group, which has widespread interests in manufacturing, property and finance in both Malaysia and Singapore.  News of the arrest and charging of the two men helped to push prices on the Singapore Stock market sharply lower in early trading yesterday, but brokers said that the market and CDL shares recovered once it became apparent the charges were limited to the two men personally.  POSTSCRIPTS . . .  One of the two British companies still making hard toilet paper stopped production of it.  British Tissues decided to do away with its hard paper after a major customer, British Rail, switched to softer tissues for train bathrooms. . . .  Peasants in Inner Mongolia have partly dismantled a 20-mile section of China's famed Great Wall, the official People's Daily said.  The paper said the bricks were used to build homes and furnaces and, as a result, the wall "is in terrible shape."  Wednesday, October 18, 1989  The key U.S. and foreign annual interest rates below are a guide to general levels but don't always represent actual transactions.  PRIME RATE: 10 1/2%.  The base rate on corporate loans at large U.S. money center commercial banks.  FEDERAL FUNDS: 8 15/16% high, 8 5/8% low, 8 3/4% near closing bid, 8 7/8% offered.  Reserves traded among commercial banks for overnight use in amounts of $1 million or more.  Source: Fulton Prebon (U.S.A.) Inc.  DISCOUNT RATE: 7%.  The charge on loans to depository institutions by the New York Federal Reserve Bank.  CALL MONEY: 9 3/4% to 10%.  The charge on loans to brokers on stock exchange collateral.  COMMERCIAL PAPER placed directly by General Motors Acceptance Corp.: 8.45% 30 to 44 days; 8.25% 45 to 74 days; 8.30% 75 to 99 days; 7.75% 100 to 179 days; 7.50% 180 to 270 days.  COMMERCIAL PAPER: High-grade unsecured notes sold through dealers by major corporations in multiples of $1,000: 8.55% 30 days; 8.45% 60 days; 8.375% 90 days.  CERTIFICATES OF DEPOSIT: 8.05% one month; 8.02% two months; 8% three months; 7.98% six months; 7.95% one year.  Average of top rates paid by major New York banks on primary new issues of negotiable C.D.s, usually on amounts of $1 million and more.  The minimum unit is $100,000.  Typical rates in the secondary market: 8.53% one month; 8.48% three months; 8.40% six months.  BANKERS ACCEPTANCES: 8.42% 30 days; 8.30% 60 days; 8.28% 90 days; 8.15% 120 days; 8.05% 150 days; 7.95% 180 days.  Negotiable, bank-backed business credit instruments typically financing an import order.  LONDON LATE EURODOLLARS: 8 11/16% to 8 9/16% one month; 8 5/8% to 8 1/2% two months; 8 5/8% to 8 1/2% three months; 8 9/16% to 8 7/16% four months; 8 1/2% to 8 3/8% five months; 8 1/2% to 8 3/8% six months.  LONDON INTERBANK OFFERED RATES (LIBOR): 8 11/16% one month; 8 11/16% three months; 8 1/2% six months; 8 1/2% one year.  The average of interbank offered rates for dollar deposits in the London market based on quotations at five major banks.  FOREIGN PRIME RATES: Canada 13.50%; Germany 8.50%; Japan 4.875%; Switzerland 8.50%; Britain 15%.  These rate indications aren't directly comparable; lending practices vary widely by location.  TREASURY BILLS: Results of the Monday, October 16, 1989, auction of short-term U.S. government bills, sold at a discount from face value in units of $10,000 to $1 million: 7.37% 13 weeks; 7.42% 26 weeks.  FEDERAL HOME LOAN MORTGAGE CORP. (Freddie Mac): Posted yields on 30-year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days. 9.88%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 7.875%, 2% rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  FEDERAL NATIONAL MORTGAGE ASSOCIATION (Fannie Mae): Posted yields on 30 year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days (priced at par) 9.83%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 8.70%, 6/2 rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  MERRILL LYNCH READY ASSETS TRUST: 8.50%.  Annualized average rate of return after expenses for the past 30 days; not a forecast of future returns.  A grand jury here indicted Norton Co.'s former director of advanced-ceramics research, charging him with interstate transportation of stolen property.  Norton and General Electric Co. last month filed a lawsuit against the former research manager, Chien-Min Sung, charging him with stealing trade secrets.  Mr. Sung formerly worked at General Electric in research on synthetic diamonds.  The criminal charges brought against him involved GE technology, according the court documents.  If convicted, he could be imprisoned for up to 10 years and fined $250,000.  Mr. Sung couldn't be reached for comment.  He earlier denied the allegations against him in the lawsuit by Norton and GE.  Norton makes sandpaper and other abrasives, diamond tools, specialty plastics and ceramics.  As the citizens of San Francisco and surrounding communities began assessing the damage from Tuesday's devastating earthquake, NBC News began assessing the damage from what some said was a failure to provide comprehensive coverage in the earthquake's initial moments.  "In terms of coverage, it was a disaster equal to the earthquakes," said Eric Premner, president for broadcasting of King Broadcasting Co., which owns the NBC affiliate in Seattle, Wash.  While rival ABC News outstripped the competition in live coverage of the event by sheer luck -- the network was broadcasting the World Series from Candlestick Park when the quake struck -- NBC News was unable to get its signal out of San Francisco for the first hour after the quake.  "I have to attribute the lackluster performance to a natural disaster," said Mr. Premner.  "So before I start to be really critical of NBC, I would like to know more about what happened."  There were no complaints from affiliates of CBS Inc. and Cable News Network, a unit of Turner Broadcasting System Inc.  But that was not the case at NBC News, which has been dogged with the image of not being aggressive on major breaking stories.  Last summer, the affiliates bitterly complained to network executives about the poor coverage of the student uprising in China.  "I was not pleased with the slow start, and neither was NBC News," said Guy Hempel, general manager of NBC affiliate WAVE in Louisville, Ky.  A spokesman for National Broadcasting Co., a unit of General Electric Co., said the network was "looking into what happened."  The stations said they were pleased with the extended coverage yesterday, including a special five-hour edition of "Today."  Don Browne, director of news at NBC News, said in an interview that "we couldn't get a signal out of San Francisco.  We were out of the box.  It was horrible.  The comment we're hearing is that we were slow out of the box, but beat everyone else in the stretch."  NBC broadcast throughout the entire night and did not go off the air until noon yesterday.  The quake postponed the third and fourth games of the World Series.  In place of the games, ABC said it planned to broadcast next week's episodes of its prime-time Wednesday and Thursday lineups, except for a one-hour special on the earthquake at 10 p.m. last night.  The series is scheduled to resume Tuesday evening in San Francisco.  "There are no commercials to make up for since we're going to eventually broadcast the World Series," said a network spokesman.  Pinnacle West Capital Corp. said it suspended indefinitely its common stock dividend and reported a 91% plunge in third-quarter net income.  The announcement, made after the close of trading, caught analysts by surprise.  The company closed at $12 a share, down 62.5 cents, in composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange.  Pinnacle West slashed its quarterly dividend to 40 cents per share from 70 cents in December, saying at the time that it believed the new, lower dividend was "sustainable."  A company spokesman said the decision to eliminate the dividend resulted from a quarterly appraisal and that circumstances had changed since the December announcement.  He declined to elaborate.  Edward J. Tirello Jr., an analyst at Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc., speculated that the sudden dividend elimination presages an expensive agreement with thrift regulators over the company's insolvent MeraBank savings and loan unit.  Analysts have estimated that Pinnacle West may have to inject between $300 million and $400 million into the MeraBank unit before turning the thrift over to federal regulators.  The latest financial results at the troubled utility and thrift holding company, based in Phoenix, Ariz., reflect continuing problems at MeraBank and losses in real-estate, venture-capital and uranium-mining operations.  Third-quarter net income slid to $5.1 million, or six cents a share, from $56 million, or 65 cents, a year earlier.  Utility operations, the only company unit operating in the black in the latest period, had a 26% drop in profit, to $86.3 million, largely as a result of outages at the company's huge Palo Verde nuclear facility and the cost of purchased replacement power.  In other operations, losses at MeraBank totaled $85.7 million in the latest quarter, compared with a $2.5 million profit a year earlier.  The latest quarter includes a $42.7 million addition to loan-loss reserves.  As recently as August, the company said it didn't foresee a need for substantial additions to reserves.  Pinnacle's SunCor Development Co. real-estate unit's loss narrowed to $13.8 million from $78.4 million.  The latest period included a $9 million write-down on undeveloped land, while the year-earlier period included a $46 million reserve for real-estate losses.  Losses at its Malapai Resources Co. uranium-mining unit narrowed to $3.4 million from $18 million a year ago, which included a $9 million write-down of utility inventories.  Losses at El Dorado Investment Co., the venture-capital operation, widened to $6.8 million from $425,000 a year earlier.  The latest quarter included a $6.6 million write-down of investments.  Equitec Financial Group said it will ask as many as 100,000 investors in 12 of its public real-estate limited partnerships to give approval to rolling them up into a new master limited partnership.  Under the proposal by Equitec, a financially troubled real-estate syndicator, New York-based Hallwood Group Inc. would replace Equitec as the newly formed master limited partnership's general partner and manager.  Shares of the new partnership would trade on an exchange like a stock.  Hallwood is a merchant bank whose activities include the ownership, management and financial restructuring of shopping centers, office buildings, apartments and other real estate.  In a statement, Equitec Chairman Richard L. Saalfeld said the transfer will benefit both the company and investors in the 12 limited partnerships included in the proposed rollup.  While he didn't describe the partnerships' financial condition, he said their operations "continue to drain the resources of Equitec."  Equitec posted a $3.3 million net loss in the second quarter on $11.8 million of revenue, compared with a net loss of $12.9 million in the year-earlier period on revenue of $9.1 million.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading, Equitec closed at $2.625 a share, unchanged.  Because of Tuesday's earthquake in Northern California, company officials couldn't immediately be reached for additional comment.  A spokesman for Hallwood said the 12 limited partnerships, which were marketed by brokerage firms and financial planners between 1979 and 1984, raised several hundred million dollars from investors.  With airline deals in a tailspin, legendary Wall Street trader Michael Steinhardt could have trouble parachuting out of USAir Group, traders say.  Only a week ago, when airline buy-out fever was already winding down, Mr. Steinhardt was engaged in a duel with USAir.  He was threatening to take over the carrier, after spending an estimated $167 million to build an 8.4% USAir stake for his investment clients.  The would-be raider even hired an investment banker to give teeth to his takeover threat, which was widely interpreted as an effort to flush out an acquirer for USAir, or for his own stake.  In fighting USAir, Mr. Steinhardt was pitted against another investor, billionnaire Warren Buffett, who bought into USAir to help fend off Mr. Steinhardt.  Mr. Buffett's firm, Berkshire Hathaway, holds a much bigger stake in the carrier than Mr. Steinhardt's firm, Steinhardt Partners.  Now, in the wake of UAL's troubles in financing its buy-out, the airline raiding game has been grounded.  Instead of hoping to sell his USAir stake at analysts' estimated buy-out price of $80 a share, Mr. Steinhardt is stuck with roughly 3.7 million USAir shares that cost him $45, on average, but yesterday closed at 40 1/2, up 1/4, in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  "It doesn't make sense to parachute out at this price," Mr. Steinhardt says, though he has stopped his takeover talk and now commends USAir managers' "operating skills."  At the current price, the USAir holding represents 9% of all the assets that Mr. Steinhardt manages.  A week ago, USAir stock briefly soared above 52 after a report in USA Today that Mr. Steinhardt might launch a hostile bid for the carrier, though takeover speculators say they were skeptical.  "If USAir is worth 80 as a takeover and the stock went to 52, the market was saying Steinhardt's presence wasn't worth anything, in terms of getting a deal done," says a veteran takeover speculator.  Traders say this all goes to show that even the smartest money manager can get infected with crowd passions.  In trying to raid USAir, Mr. Steinhardt abandoned his usual role as a passive investor, and ran into snags.  Moreover, unlike Mr. Buffett, who often holds big stakes in companies for years, Mr. Steinhardt hasn't in the past done much long-term investing.  Mr. Steinhardt, who runs about $1.7 billion for Steinhardt Partners, made his name as a gunslinging trader, moving in and out of stocks with agility -- enriching himself and his investment clients.  Meanwhile, his big losses, for instance in 1987's crash, generally have been trading losses.  So, some see a special irony in the fact that Mr. Steinhardt, the trader, now is encumbered with a massive, illiquid airline holding.  Analysts say USAir stock might lose four or five points if the Steinhardt stake was dumped all at once.  As a result, Mr. Steinhardt must reconcile himself to selling USAir at a loss, or to holding the shares as an old-fashioned investment.  "Long-term investing -- that's not Steinhardt's style," chuckles an investor who once worked at Steinhardt Partners.  "He doesn't usually risk that much unless he thinks he has an ace in the hole," adds another Steinhardt Partners alumnus.  In recent days, traders say USAir has been buying its own shares, as part of a program to retire about eight million USAir shares, though the carrier won't discuss its buy-back program.  If USAir stepped up its share purchases, that might be a way for Mr. Steinhardt to get out, says Timothy Pettee, a Merrill Lynch analyst.  But USAir might not want to help Mr. Steinhardt, he adds.  In 1987, USAir Chairman Edwin Colodny stonewalled when Trans World Airlines Chairman Carl Icahn threatened to take over the carrier.  Mr. Icahn, a much more practiced raider than Mr. Steinhardt, eventually sold a big USAir stake at a tiny profit through Bear, Stearns.  Mr. Steinhardt also could take that route.  He confers big trading commissions on Wall Street firms.  However, with airline stocks cratering, he might not get a very good price for his shares, traders say.  Especially galling for Mr. Steinhardt, say people close to him, is that USAir's Mr. Colodny won't even take his telephone calls.  While USAir isn't considered absolutely takeover-proof, its defenses, including the sale in August of a 12% stake in the company to Mr. Buffett's Berkshire Hathaway, are pretty strong.  USAir's deal with Mr. Buffett "wasn't exactly a shining example of shareholder democracy," Mr. Steinhardt says.  Since last April, the investor has made seven so-called 13D filings in USAir, as he bought and sold the company's stock.  Such disclosures of big holdings often are used by raiders to try to scare a company's managers, and to stir interest in the stock.  But of course it would be highly unusual for an investment fund such as Steinhardt Partners to take over a company.  USAir and Mr. Buffett won't talk about Mr. Steinhardt at all.  Analysts say USAir has great promise.  By the second half of 1990, USAir stock could hit 60, says Helane Becker of Shearson Lehman Hutton.  She thinks traders should buy the stock if it tumbles to 35.  But meanwhile, USAir is expected to show losses or lackluster profit for several quarters as it tries to digest Piedmont Airlines, which it acquired.  Moreover, some investors think a recession or renewed airfare wars will pummel airline stocks in coming months.  However, Mr. Steinhardt says he's "comfortable holding USAir as an investment."  While he has bought and sold some USAir shares in recent days, he says that contrary to rumors, he hasn't tried to unload his holding.  Mr. Steinhardt adds that he bought USAir stock earlier this year as "part of a fundamental investment in the airline group."  In 1989, Mr. Steinhardt says he made money trading in Texas Air, AMR and UAL. Overall, his investments so far this year are showing gains of about 20%, he adds.  Does Mr. Steinhardt regret his incursion into the takeover-threat game?  People close to the investor say that was an experiment he is unlikely to repeat.  "I don't think you'll find I'm making a radical change in my traditional investment style," Mr. Steinhardt says.  Addington Resources Inc. said it called for redemption on Nov. 21 its $25.8 million outstanding of 8% convertible subordinated debentures due 2013.  The debentures were issued in the face amount of $46 million on July 11, 1988, the Ashland, Ky., coal mining, water transportation and construction company said.  The company said the redemption is permitted because the price of Addington's stock has equaled or exceeded $19.60 for 20 consecutive trading days, a condition set in the terms of the debentures.  Debenture holders are expected to convert most of the debentures into common because the value of the stock received in a conversion would exceed the $1,103.11 redemption price.  Commodore International Ltd. said it will report a loss for the first quarter ended Sept. 30 because sales of personal computers for the home market remained weak in some major countries.  That will mark the second consecutive quarterly loss for Commodore and will raise additional questions about whether it can sustain the turnaround it had seemed to be engineering.  Commodore, West Chester, Pa., had said in August that it was consolidating manufacturing to cut costs and expected to be profitable in the fiscal first quarter.  Commodore said that its announcement is based on preliminary information and that the situation could look different by the time final results are announced early next month.  In fact, Commodore's fiscal fourth-quarter loss was $2 million narrower than Commodore had expected a few weeks after the quarter closed.  Still, even results approaching break-even would mark a sharp weakening compared with fiscal 1989 first-quarter earnings of $9.6 million, or 30 cents a share, on sales of $200.2 million.  Reflecting concerns about Commodore's outlook, its stock has plunged more than 50% since May, closing yesterday unchanged at $8.875 a share in composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange.  The price can be expected to erode further, because the loss estimate came after the market closed.  Commodore has seemed to be setting the stage recently for progress in the U.S., where its personal-computer sales have been so dismal for years that Commodore is close to dropping off research firms' market-share charts.  Commodore has assembled an experienced management team, it has persuaded many more dealers to carry its products and it has unleashed a slick advertising campaign.  But those represent long-term strategies that probably won't succeed quickly, even if they turn out to be the right ones.  In the meantime, the strategies will increase expenses.  Commodore had been counting on its consumer business to stay sufficiently healthy to support its efforts in other areas -- mainly in getting schools and businesses to use its Amiga, which has slick graphics yet has been slow to catch on because it isn't compatible with Apple Computer Inc. or International Business Machines Corp. hardware.  But sales to consumers have become difficult during the past several months, even in West Germany, which has been by far Commodore's strongest market.  The Commodore 64 and 128, mainly used for children's educational software and games, had surprised market researchers by continuing to produce strong sales even though other low-profit personal computers now operate several times as fast and have much more memory.  Commodore has said it expects sales to rebound, but market researchers have said that sales of the low-end products may finally be trailing off.  Stock prices closed slightly higher in the first routine trading day since Friday's big plunge.  Some issues were affected by Tuesday's devastating earthquake in the San Francisco area.  Activity continued to slow from the hectic pace set during the market's plunge late Friday and its rebound Monday, as players began to set their sights on events coming later this week.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average drifted through the session within a trading range of about 30 points before closing with a gain of 4.92 at 2643.65.  Broader averages also posted modest gains.  Standard & Poor's 500-Stock Index rose 0.60 to 341.76, the Dow Jones Equity Market Index rose 0.71 to 320.54 and the New York Stock Exchange Composite Index gained 0.43 to 189.32.  Some 822 New York Stock Exchange issues advanced in price, while 668 declined.  But the Dow Jones Transportation Average went down for the seventh consecutive session, due largely to further selling in UAL.  The average dropped 6.40 to 1247.87 and has now lost 21.7% of its value since the losing streak began Oct. 10.  Big Board volume dropped to 166,900,000 shares, in line with the level of trading over the past few weeks, from 224.1 million Tuesday.  Traders cited anticipation of the consumer price report for September, due today, and tomorrow's expiration of October stock-index futures and options as major factors in the slowdown.  In addition, activity at a number of San Francisco-based brokerage houses was curtailed as a result of the earthquake, which knocked out power lines and telephone service throughout the Bay area.  Stocks retreated to session lows just after the opening amid worries about the market impact of the quake, but quickly snapped back to higher levels with the help of futures-related program buying.  The early move essentially established the day's trading range, and traders said they saw little of the program activity that has battered the market recently.  "I didn't expect it to be this quiet.  I expected to see more volatility as some of the institutions who were spooked last Friday did some selling," said Raymond F. DeVoe, a market strategist at Legg Mason Wood Walker, Baltimore.  Mr. DeVoe said he expects prices to show some renewed instability over the next few sessions as institutions re-evaluate their stance toward the market in light of its decline.  "I would suspect that a lot of investment committees are looking into whether (they) want to be in stocks at all," he said.  Insurance stocks were sold at the opening amid concerns about the level of damage claims the companies would receive as a result of the earthquake.  But those issues recovered quickly and turned higher because of expectations that the quake and the recent Hurricane Hugo would set the stage for an increase in premium rates.  Issues of insurance brokers were especially strong.  Marsh & McLennan advanced 3 1/8 to 75 7/8, Alexander & Alexander Services climbed 2 to 32 and Corroon & Black firmed 1 7/8 to 37 1/2.  Elsewhere in the group, General Re rose 2 3/4 to 86 1/2, American International Group gained 3 1/4 to 102 5/8, Aetna Life & Casualty added 2 3/8 to 59 1/2 and Cigna advanced 7/8 to 62 1/2.  Loews, the parent of CNA Financial, rose 1 3/8 to 123 1/8.  Companies in the construction, engineering and building-products sectors were among other beneficiaries of earthquake-related buying.  The heavy-construction sector was the session's best performer among Dow Jones industry groups; Fluor rose 3/4 to 33 3/8, Morrison Knudsen gained 2 1/4 to 44 1/8, Foster Wheeler added 3/8 to 18 1/4 and Ameron climbed 2 3/8 to 39 3/4.  Among engineering firms, CRS Sirrine rose 5/8 to 34 1/4 on the Big Board and four others rallied on the American Stock Exchange: Jacobs Engineering Group, which gained 1 1/8 to 25 3/8, Greiner Engineering, which rose 3 1/2 to 22 1/2; Michael Baker, which added 1 1/4 to 15 1/4, and American Science & Engineering, up 1/2 to 8 1/2.  Within the building-materials group, Georgia-Pacific climbed 1 1/4 to 58 and Louisiana-Pacific added 1 to 40 3/4 after Merrill Lynch recommended the forest-products issues.  CalMat advanced 2 3/4 to 28 3/4, Lone Star Industries gained 1 3/4 to 29 1/4, Lafarge rose 1 to 19 1/2, Southdown added 5/8 to 24 5/8 and Eljer Industries rose 1 1/4 to 24 7/8.  Pacific Gas & Electric fell 3/8 to 19 5/8 in Big Board composite trading of 1.7 million shares and Pacific Telesis Group slipped 5/8 to 44 5/8 as the companies worked to restore service to areas affected by the quake.  Chevron added 1 to 65.  The company, based in San Francisco, said it had to shut down a crude-oil pipeline in the Bay area to check for leaks but added that its refinery in nearby Richmond, Calif., was undamaged.  Other companies based in the area include Hewlett-Packard, which rose 1/4 to 49; National Semiconductor, which went up 1/4 to 7 5/8, and Genentech, which eased 1/4 to 19 5/8.  None of the firms reported any major damage to facilities as a result of the quake.  BankAmerica eased 1/2 to 31 7/8 and Wells Fargo lost 1/2 to 81 1/2; the two bank holding companies, based in San Francisco, were forced to curtail some operations due to the temblor.  Among California savings-and-loan stocks, H.F. Ahmanson eased 3/8 to 22 1/4, CalFed slid 3/4 to 24 1/8, Great Western Financial dropped 1/2 to 21 1/4 and Golden West Financial fell 5/8 to 29 1/4.  UAL, the parent company of United Airlines, swung within a 14-point range during the course of the session before closing at 191 3/4, down 6 1/4, on 2.3 million shares.  British Airways, a member of the group that had offered $300 a share for UAL in a leveraged buy-out, said it had yet to receive a revised proposal and it was "in no way committed" to the completion of a bid.  Separately, investor Marvin Davis withdrew his backup $300-a-share takeover offer.  While UAL faltered, AMR, the parent of American Airlines, pulled out of its recent nosedive by rising 3/4 to 74.  The stock had been on the decline since the financing for the UAL buy-out fell through on Friday and developer Donald Trump subsequently withdrew a takeover offer of $120 a share for AMR. Also, AMR was the most active Big Board issue; 2.8 million shares changed hands.  GTE added 1 1/4 to 65 3/8.  PaineWebber repeated a buy recommendation on the stock and raised its 1990 earnings estimate by 35 cents a share, to $5.10.  Colgate-Palmolive advanced 1 5/8 to 63 after saying it was comfortable with analysts' projections that third-quarter net income from continuing operations would be between 95 cents and $1.05 a share, up from 69 cents a year ago.  Springs Industries dropped 1 3/8 to 36.  Analysts at several brokerage firms lowered their 1989 and 1990 earnings estimates on the company after its third-quarter results proved disappointing.  Trinova third-quarter loss after a charge for a planned restructuring, which will include the closing or downsizing of about 25% of its plants and a work force cut of about 1,500 over three years.  The Amex Market Value Index snapped a five-session losing streak by rising 2.91 to 378.07.  Volume totaled 12,500,000 shares.  Carnival Cruise Lines Class A rose 1 1/4 to 22 3/8.  The company, citing market conditions, postponed a $200 million debt offer.  Philip Morris Cos. posted a 20% jump in third-quarter profit on a 45% revenue increase, reflecting strength in the company's cigarette, food and brewing businesses.  Net income rose to $748 million, or 81 cents a share, from the year-earlier $621 million, or 67 cents a share.  Per-share figures have been adjusted for a 4-for-1 stock split paid earlier this month.  The New York-based tobacco, food and beer concern said revenue increased to $11.25 billion from $7.74 billion.  In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange, Philip Morris closed at $43.375, up 12.5 cents.  Philip Morris disclosed little detailed information about performance by major business lines except to say that most, including Philip Morris U.S.A., Kraft General Foods and Miller Brewing Co., posted increased revenues.  For the nine months, net increased 4.4% to $2.08 billion, or $2.25 a share, from $2 billion, which included $273 million reflecting the effect of an accounting change.  Granges Inc., citing depressed gold prices, said it plans to suspend operations for an indefinite period at its Tartan gold mine in Manitoba.  Granges said in Vancouver, British Columbia, that the production halt will be phased in over a 10-week period.  Tartan currently produces gold at a cash operating cost of $393 an ounce, which is high by industry standards and $25 or so above the current spot price.  Granges said it also plans in the third quarter to write down the carrying value of the Tartan mine by 2.5 million Canadian dollars (US$ 2.12 million), and to write off most of the C$6.3 million carrying value of its Windflower gold property in British Columbia.  Granges didn't say what impact the moves would have on total gold output or earnings, and company officials weren't available.  Computer Associates International Inc., Garden City, N.Y., and Digital Equipment Corp. said they agreed to jointly develop software to help manage Digital's Vax computers.  Computer Associates has carved out a huge business selling such software for use in managing networks of International Business Machines Corp. computers but needs to find new markets if it is to maintain its growth rate of 30% and more each year.  The market for system-management software for Digital's hardware is fragmented enough that a giant such as Computer Associates should do well there.  At the same time, the market is smaller than the market for IBM-compatible software.  For one thing, Digital, Maynard, Mass., has sold fewer machines.  In addition, its machines are typically easier to operate, so customers require less assistance from software.  Wang Laboratories Inc., Lowell, Mass., beset by declining demand for its computers, reported a $62.1 million, 38-cents-a-share loss in its first quarter ended Sept. 30.  Revenue fell 12.7% to $596.8 million from $684 million, although some of the decline was caused by discontinued operations.  Wang had previously forecast a loss.  The company reiterated that it expects another loss in the second quarter and for the full year, although it expects a profitable fourth quarter.  A year ago, Wang had earnings of $13.1 million, or eight cents a share, in its first quarter, including a $3.1 million loss from discontinued operations.  The latest period loss included a $12.9 pretax charge for severance payments.  Dayton Hudson Corp. said it accepted for purchase seven million common shares at $62.875 each, under the terms of a Dutch auction self-tender offer.  The offer expired at 12:01 a.m. yesterday.  In a Dutch auction, the buyer sets a price range and holders give a price in that range at which they're willing to sell their shares.  The buyer then picks a price and buys shares at that price from holders who offered to sell at that price or lower.  Dayton Hudson's repurchase offer, representing about 9% of its common shares outstanding, had established a range of between $60 and $65 for the buy-back.  Dayton Hudson said it accepted all odd-lot shares tendered at or below the final $62.875 price; the preliminary proration factor for other shares tendered at or below the final price is 98%.  The Minneapolis-based retailer said it expects to pay for the seven million shares next Thursday.  Tendered shares not purchased will be returned to holders.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading, Dayton rose $1 to $61.125.  Continental Bank Corp.'s third-quarter net income slipped 11% despite a big gain from the sale of the company's London headquarters building.  The $55 million gain on the sale was offset by lower interest income, poorer results from foreign-exchange trading and a $9 million loss on the sale of a unit, Securities Settlement Corp.  Chicago-based Continental earned $65.2 million, or $1.04 a share, compared with $73.6 million, or $1.19 a share, a year earlier.  The 1988 quarter also included one-time gains totaling about $35 million.  The bank, which has loss reserves equal to about half its long-term and medium-term loans to less-developed nations, said it doesn't think additional reserves are required.  Enron Corp. said a subsidiary and two United Kingdom firms are studying the feasibility of constructing a 1,500 megawatt gas-fired power plant in northern England as an outgrowth of the government's privatization program.  Enron Power Corp., a unit of the Houston natural gas pipeline company, would design, construct and run the plant.  Gas to fuel it would be piped from the North Sea.  A subsidiary of Britain's Imperial Chemical Industries would buy electricity and steam from the proposed station.  Surplus power would be sold on the open market, Enron said.  Also participating in the study, Enron said, is the National Power division of Britain's Central Electricity Generating Board.  Upon privatization, National Power will be responsible for 70% of the country's power generating business.  Viacom Inc., New York, reported that its third-quarter loss widened to $21.7 million, or 41 cents a share, primarily because of interest expense of $70.1 million.  A year ago, Viacom had a net loss of $56.9 million, or $1.07 a share.  Interest expense in the 1988 third quarter was $75.3 million.  In the year-ago quarter, Viacom also paid preferred stock dividends of $17 million; Viacom exchanged its preferred stock for debt in March.  The communications and entertainment company said revenue rose to $345.5 million, from $311.6 million.  Viacom attributed the improvement to higher earnings from operations in its networks segment, which includes the MTV and Showtime networks.  Viacom said it also restructured bank debt under a $1.5 billion unsecured bank agreement that offers significant interest rate savings.  Sumner M. Redstone, Viacom's chairman, said Viacom "emerged from our leveraged buy-out structure and gained substantial operating and financial flexibility through" the bank pact.  Trinova Corp., Maumee, Ohio, said it is launching an extensive restructuring of its core business, and took a charge that resulted in a loss of $29.7 million, or 87 cents a share, for the third quarter.  Trinova said it will close, move or overhaul 40 of its 170 manufacturing facilities and over the next three years cut 1,500 jobs from its current world-wide payroll of 22,300 employees.  Most of the factory closings and job cutbacks will affect Trinova's Aeroquip operations, which manufacture automotive plastics, hoses and other industrial and automotive parts.  Hoses and plastics together account for about 42% of Trinova's total annual sales.  In a separate announcement, Trinova said the Aeroquip group has agreed to sell its spring-brake, piston-brake and related businesses to Midland Brake Inc. of Branford, Conn.  Terms weren't disclosed.  To provide for the restructuring's costs, Trinova said it took an after-tax charge of $38.5 million, or $1.13 a share, in the third quarter.  The $29.7 million net loss compares with net income of $19.6 million, or 57 cents a share, a year earlier.  Sales rose 8% to $456.2 million from $422 million.  Trinova closed at $25, down $1, in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  A group of investors, including Giancarlo Parretti's Pathe Communications Corp. and Sasea Holding S.A., have agreed to buy 76.66% of Odeon Finanziaria, a financially troubled Italian TV station.  Florio Fiorini, managing director of Geneva-based Sasea, said the investors would pay only a symbolic one lira for the station, "but we have agreed to raise the capital that will enable the company to continue operating.  It's sort of a Chapter 11 situation," he added, referring to the U.S. bankruptcy law that protects companies from creditors while they restructure.  Milan-based Odeon, which draws about 3% of Italian TV viewers, has debt of 250 billion lire ($181.9 million), Mr. Fiorini said.  He added that details of the recapitalization still have to be worked out, but that Pathe will take 50% of Odeon, Rome film producer Bruno Lucisano will take 10% and the remaining 16.66%, currently owned by Sasea, will eventually be sold to other investors.  Calisto Tanzi, Odeon's owner, will retain his 23.34% stake.  Italy's Supreme Court this year ordered Parliament to write a law that will regulate media ownership.  "We think that it's going to be far more favorable to own a station before the law is passed than to try to buy one afterward," Mr. Fiorini said.  San Francisco area officials gave the media high marks for helping people find shelter and obtain emergency information after Tuesday's catastrophic earthquake.  "The press has been doing an excellent job.  They are telling people what roads are closed and just keeping the public informed has helped to keep the panic down," said James Ball, a station supervisor at Daly City Police Department.  Mr. Ball noted that television stations featured people holding up phone books, explaining where to call for help.  Radio stations provided an emergency number for people who smelled gas but didn't know how to turn off their gas supply.  Kim Schwartz, a spokesperson for the American Red Cross in Los Angeles, said television and radio stations in San Francisco played a "very positive role" by providing the address of 28 shelters of the Red Cross and by giving out the Red Cross number for contributions to help earthquake victims (1-800-453-9000).  The San Francisco Examiner issued a special edition around noon yesterday that was filled entirely with earthquake news and information.  The Examiner and the San Francisco Chronicle were able to publish despite Tuesday's quake, which occurred close to deadline for many newspapers.  Sterling Software Inc. said it lost its bid to supply software services to the National Aeronautics and Space Administration's Ames Research Center at Moffett Field, Calif.  Sterling, which estimated the value of the contract at $150 million, said NASA selected another bidder for final negotiations.  In 1988, Dallas-based Sterling protested a similar decision by NASA involving the same contract, claiming it had submitted the lowest bid.  As a result, last March the General Services Administration board of contract appeals directed NASA to reopen negotiations on the contract.  Sterling said it had requested a briefing by NASA but had not decided whether to protest the agency's latest decision.  Consolidated Rail Corp., New York, reported that third-quarter net income climbed 4.8% to $87 million, or $1.27 a share, exceeding analysts' expectations.  In the year-earlier quarter, the freight railroad earned $83 million, or $1.21 a share.  James A. Hagen, chairman and chief executive officer, noted that earnings advanced "in the face of a drop in business, brought on by the general economic slowdown."  Revenue slipped 4.6% to $835 million from $876 million.  For the rest of 1989, Mr. Hagen said, Conrail's traffic and revenue "will reflect the sluggish economy, but Conrail will continue to take steps to control and reduce costs."  For the nine months, Conrail earnings grew 0.4% to $229 million, or $3.34 a share, from $228 million, or $3.31 a share.  Revenue was flat at $2.59 billion.  Georgia Gulf Corp., hurt by declining sales and falling chemical prices, said third-quarter earnings fell 13% to $46.1 million from $53.1 million in the year-earlier period.  Sales declined 10% to $251.2 million from $278.7 million.  The Atlanta-based chemical manufacturer said lower prices hurt margins for most products.  "We did see some relief in raw material costs, but it wasn't sufficient to offset the drop in sales prices," James R. Kuse, the company's chairman and chief executive officer said in a statement.  On a per-share basis, quarterly earnings remained at $1.85, the same as last year, because of the company's share buy-back program.  Georgia Gulf had 24.9 million shares outstanding on average in the quarter, compared with 28.6 million in the third quarter of 1988, adjusted for a stock split paid in January 1989.  In composite New York Stock Exchange trading, stock in Georgia Gulf, which has been mentioned as a takeover candidate, rose $2.125 a share to close at $46.125.  This temblor-prone city dispatched inspectors, firefighters and other earthquake-trained personnel to aid San Francisco.  But a secondary agenda among officials in the City of Angels was to learn about the disaster-contingency plans that work and those that don't.  Los Angeles Mayor Tom Bradley used the opportunity to push the City Council harder to pass a measure establishing a loss-recovery reserve of $100 million.  The amount would help Los Angeles cope in the first few weeks after its own anticipated quake, while waiting for federal assistance to arrive.  After San Francisco Mayor Art Agnos spoke on television of the need for building inspectors to check the soundness of buildings, Los Angeles dispatched 32 inspectors to help.  And the county of Los Angeles placed its firefighters and sheriffs on alert, ready to send in reinforcements, and alerted San Francisco that the city has 1,000 hospital beds at its disposal.  Two Los Angeles radio stations initiated Red Cross donation campaigns, and one Los Angeles bank manager forked over $150,000 of his own money for relief purposes, the Red Cross said.  The Los Angeles Red Cross sent 2,480 cots, 500 blankets, and 300 pints of Type-O blood.  It is also pulling 20 people out of Puerto Rico, who were helping Huricane Hugo victims, and sending them to San Francisco instead.  The Arizona Corporations Commission authorized an 11.5% rate increase at Tucson Electric Power Co., substantially lower than recommended last month by a commission hearing officer and barely half the rise sought by the utility.  The ruling follows a host of problems at Tucson Electric, including major write-downs, a 60% slash in the common stock dividend and the departure of former Chairman Einar Greve during a company investigation of his stock sales.  The Arizona regulatory ruling calls for $42 million in added revenue yearly, compared with a $57 million boost proposed by the commission hearing officer.  The company had sought increases totaling $80.3 million, or 22%.  The decision was announced after trading ended.  Tucson Electric closed at $20.875 a share, down 25 cents, in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  A Tucson Electric spokesman said the utility was disappointed by the commission's decision and "concerned about the financial integrity of the company."  South Korean President Roh Tae Woo, brushing aside suggestions that the won be revalued again, said the currency's current level against the dollar is "appropriate."  His comments, made in response to reporters' questions at the National Press Club here, signaled that Seoul is resisting U.S. pressure for a further rise in the currency's value.  The U.S. wants a higher won to make South Korea's exports more expensive and help trim Seoul's trade surplus.  Many South Korean business people want a devaluation instead, arguing that the won's recent gains already have weakened the country's export performance.  Mr. Roh also said South Korea is taking steps that would free the won to respond to market forces.  Seoul has pointed to its lack of a foreign exchange market as one reason the won's value remains heavily controlled.  Mr. Roh said a U.S. demand for the removal of South Korean import quotas on beef will be resolved "satisfactorily" but gave no hint when that will happen.  Speaking to a joint meeting of Congress earlier, he said South Korea can't move quickly on such agricultural trade issues "without causing political and social trauma."  Great American Bank said its board approved the formation of a holding company enabling the savings bank to pursue nontraditional banking activities under a new federal law.  The proposed holding company's primary purpose would be to allow Great American to continue engaging in real estate development activities, it said.  Those activities generated $26.1 million in operating profit last year.  But according to Great American, such profits don't count toward meeting the San Diego savings bank's new capitalization requirements under 1989 federal law.  The new real estate unit would have a separate capital structure to comply with the law.  The proposed holding company would also consolidate Great American Bank in San Diego and its Tucson, Ariz., savings bank into a single, federally chartered institution in San Diego.  The consolidation is expected to save $1 million a year in administrative costs, a Great American spokesman said.  Dale Lang, who this week completed the acquisition of the publisher of Ms. and Sassy, is candid about the challenge he is taking on.  Mr. Lang admits that Ms. is "in dire straits" and that Sassy needs big promotional dollars to keep it alive.  But the 57-year-old publisher has moved quickly and boldly to deal with the magazines' problems.  Last Friday, he told the staff of Ms. that the magazine in January would begin publishing without advertising.  Mr. Lang will do away with expensive circulation drives, not to mention sales staff, and attempt to publish the 17-year-old magazine supported by circulation revenue alone.  "Any fool can publish a money-losing magazine.  I want to publish one that succeeds," said Mr. Lang.  "For Ms., it's time to publish for the reader, not the advertiser."  As for Sassy, which competes directly with News Corp.'s Seventeen magazine, Mr. Lang says that in the next two years he will spend $6 million promoting and improving the magazine.  Though Sassy has grown quickly since its debut in March 1988, it has been the target of conservative lobbyists and skittish advertisers who bristled at its frank editorial matter on teen-age problems.  Mr. Lang said the former Australian owners of Sassy were "blind-sided by the Moral Majority. . . .  Their reaction was to do nothing and ride it out."  He said Sassy will keep its irreverent tone, but added, "We will keep a close watch on the editorial content of the magazine."  Sassy already has recovered; circulation has quickly passed the 500,000 mark and advertising pages have stabilized this year at more than 300.  What's more, Mr. Lang says he has what all publishers wish for: a bona fide niche.  "Seventeen is written more for mothers, not their daughters," said Mr. Lang.  "But Sassy has a different spirit.  It gets more mail in a month than McCall's got in a year, and it's not from mothers.  I feel about Sassy like I did about Working Woman 10 years ago."  Mr. Lang took on Ms. and Sassy with the acquisition of Matilda Publications Inc. by his newly formed Lang Communications.  Lang owns 70% of Matilda, while Citicorp owns the rest through its Citicorp Venture Capital Partners.  Two weeks ago, Citicorp and Mr. Lang pumped $800,000 into Matilda just to keep the doors open.  Industry observers have congratulated Mr. Lang on what some call his "courageous" handling of Ms., but his track record in magazine publishing in general has gotten mixed reviews.  Besides Ms. and Sassy, closely held Lang Communications includes Success, a magazine for entrepreneurs and small businesses, and Working Woman and Working Mother, two monthly magazines.  Working Woman, with circulation near one million, and Working Mother, with 625,000 circulation, are legitimate magazine success stories.  The magazine Success, however, was for years lackluster and unfocused.  Only recently has it been attractively redesigned and its editorial product improved.  Success is expected to gain at least because of the recent folding of rival Venture, another magazine for growing companies.  Working Woman and Working Mother have operated as part of Working Woman/McCall's Group, a less-than-successful joint venture between Mr. Lang and Time Warner Inc.  The joint venture is being undone, with McCall's magazine being sold last summer to the New York Times Co.'s Magazine Group for about $80 million, and Time Warner agreeing to sell back its 50% interest in Working Woman and Working Mother to Mr. Lang.  Executives at Time Inc. Magazine Co., a subsidiary of Time Warner, have said the joint venture with Mr. Lang wasn't a good one.  The venture, formed in 1986, was supposed to be Time's low-cost, safe entry into women's magazines.  Mr. Lang surprised Time soon after joining forces when he said he would negotiate rates individually with advertisers, a practice common in broadcasting but considered taboo by magazine publishers.  In addition, McCall's put in a less than stellar performance.  Until a recent comeback, it saw steep losses in ad pages and circulation.  Time executives complained about the shoddy editorial quality, and in the end, one Time executive who asked not to be identified said, "Frankly, McCall's and the joint venture were an embarrassment."  Mr. Lang feels that Time's priorities changed.  "Their management changed right after {the venture was formed}, and I don't think they were comfortable getting into the competitive wars of women's service magazines."  Today, Mr. Lang believes his magazines will offer what many women's magazines don't.  "We write straight for women on their level," he said.  "We don't have passive readers."  Mr. Lang points out that even Success, in part, fits the company's image, since about 30% of its readership is female.  Mr. Lang has named Carol Taber, 43, as group publisher of New York-based Lang Communications.  She will oversee Working Woman, Working Mother and Success magazines, and retain her post as publisher of Working Woman.  The sale price of McCall's -- twice what Mr. Lang originally paid for it -- will finance Lang Communications' buy-back of Time Warner's 50% interest in Working Woman and Working Mother.  Mr. Lang says he isn't scouting new acquisitions, at least for now.  "We would have to go outside to banks to get the money and I am not ready to do that," he said.  "Besides, we have enough on our plate.  There is plenty of work to be done on what we have."  Britain's Monopolies and Mergers Commission Wednesday cleared Rhone-Poulenc S.A.'s purchase of a specialty bulk-chemical unit from Monsanto Co., saying the purchase was unlikely to have any lasting impact on U.K. industrial consumers.  The commission, which was asked to study the deal by the Department of Trade and Industry after its announcement in February, said the diversity of global supply of chemicals used in making analgesic drugs was great enough to offset the dominant U.K. market share Rhone-Poulenc would gain through the acquisition.  The French chemical giant would hold an 80% share of the U.K. market for salicylic acid, methyl salicylate and bulk aspirin.  The commission found that if the British government attempted to block the merger, Rhone-Poulenc would likely respond by closing the salicylates plant Monsanto operates in Wales, removing the matter from U.K. jurisdiction.  Morrison Knudsen Corp. posted third-quarter net income of $7.9 million, or 69 cents a share, continuing a rebound from steep year-ago losses.  In the third quarter a year-earlier, the construction and engineering concern posted a loss of $51.2 million, or $4.68 a share.  Revenue in the latest quarter rose 14% to $589 million from $515.1 million.  In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange, Morrison gained $2.25 to $44.125.  Morrison said the engineering and construction segment performed well, with the mining and MK-Ferguson operations making important contributions.  Boise, Idaho-based Morrison had losses totaling $186 million over the two years ended in December, but it has surged back to profitability as a result of cost-cutting and shedding of unprofitable operations.  In the nine months, the company's net income was $21.5 million, or $1.88 a share, compared with a year-earlier loss of $97.8 million, or $8.96 a share.  Revenue rose 17% to $1.62 billion from $1.39 billion.  The House Ethics Committee officially cited Rep. Jim Bates (D., Calif.) for sexually harassing two female employees, but didn't recommend formal disciplinary action.  Rep. Bates said he accepted the finding, but one of the victims, Dorena Bertussi, denounced the ethics panel's action as "absurd."  Acting more than a year after Ms. Bertussi filed a complaint, the panel issued a "letter of reproval" saying Rep. Bates had admitted conduct that violated a House rule forbidding discrimination against employees on account of their sex.  It ordered Rep. Bates to write letters of apology to Ms. Bertussi and to a second complainant, Karen Dryden.  Rep. Bates said he would write the letters as ordered.  "I accept the resolution of the matter by the Ethics Committee," he said.  The panel also warned Rep. Bates that any further violations "may result in a recommendation that disciplinary action be considered."  But Ms. Bertussi asked, "Who in their right mind is going to file another complaint with the Ethics Committee?"  Rep. Bates has publicly begged for forgiveness from voters and was re-elected with 60% of the vote last November.  Mesa Airlines said the takeover offer it received earlier this week from StatesWest Airlines is for a combination of cash and securities valued by StatesWest at $10 a Mesa share.  Both companies are regional carriers in the Southwest.  When it made the offer, StatesWest declined to disclose details and asked Mesa to do the same.  But Farmington, N.M.-based Mesa said the offer was for $7 in cash and unspecified StatesWest securities valued at $3 a share.  Based on the number of Mesa shares outstanding not already owned by StatesWest, the proposed takeover would have a value of about $15.3 million.  StatesWest owns 7.25% of Mesa.  Last week, Mesa rejected a general proposal from StatesWest that the two carriers combine.  In response to the specific offer, Gary Risley, Mesa vice president, said management will ask directors to employ a financial consultant to advise them.  Hawker Siddeley Group PLC, a U.K. engineering company, reported a 16% jump in pretax profit for the six-month period ending June 30.  Pretax profit rose to #93.2 million ($146.8 million) from #80.6 million ($127 million), matching analysts' expectations, which ranged from #90 million to #95 million.  Profit after taxes and minority interests increased 16% to #55.2 million from #47.6 million in the year-earlier period, while earnings per share rose 16% to 27.9 pence (44 cents) from 24.1 pence (38 cents).  Hawker Siddeley said its core electrical products division enjoyed strong growth, with a 20% rise in operating profit during the period.  Fleet/Norstar Financial Group reported a 12% increase in net income in the third quarter, led by a 43% gain in its financial services group.  Fleet's net was $96.4 million, or 86 cents a primary share, compared with $85.8 million, or 79 cents a share, a year earlier.  The Providence, R.I., financial services group, which includes commercial-credit, leasing and mortgage-banking operations, contributed $30.6 million to net, up from last year's $21.3 million.  Fleet also noted that, unlike other banking companies in the Northeast, it has been only marginally hurt by nonperforming loans that have resulted from the slumping regional real estate market.  Fleet reported nine-month net of $279.0 million, or $2.51 a primary share, up from $248.2 million, or $2.28 a share, a year earlier.  Benj.  Franklin Federal Savings & Loan Association said it expects to post a third-quarter net loss of about $8 million, or $1.04 a share, as a result of adding $11 million in loan-loss reserves.  The Portland, Ore., thrift, which has $5.2 billion of assets, had net income in last year's third quarter of $1.8 million, or 23 cents a share.  Franklin said it expects to report earnings for the latest quarter next week.  The additional reserves relate to possible write-downs of certain assets held by Franklin and its subsidiaries and the default of a bond in its investment portfolio, the thrift said.  According to a spokeswoman, they also relate to changes Franklin will have to make in its accounting procedures to comply with new federal capitalization requirements for thrifts.  The company's shares closed yesterday at $4.25, off 25 cents, in national over-the-counter trading.  Arkla Inc. said that as part of a program to improve profitability it will take a total of $189 million in after-tax charges by year end.  It also announced an initial public offering of 18% of its gas exploration and production subsidiary.  The Shreveport, La., natural gas company said the charges, though partially offset by a one-time gain from the offering, will result in a full-year after-tax loss.  Last year, the company had net income of $117.3 million, or $1.30 a share.  Arkla said it will report $179 milllion in one-time charges against continuing operations for the third quarter, reflecting settlement of certain natural gas contracts.  It said it will take a $10 million fourth-quarter charge against discontinued operations, reflecting certain write-downs and the planned sale of a unit.  Arkla said its initial offering of 18% of Arkla Exploration Co. is expected to result in a net gain of about $90 million, which will be used to pay down Arkla debt.  Arkla Exploration owns sizable gas and crude-oil reserves in the South and Southwest.  South Africa negotiated a new debt agreement with its major foreign creditors for about $8 billion of its foreign debt outstanding, said Chris Stals, governor of the Reserve Bank and the country's chief debt negotiator.  The new agreement will last for 3 1/2 years starting July 1, 1990, when the current agreement expires.  The announcement coincides with the start of the Commonwealth Ministers Conference in Kuala Lumpur, where proposals for renewed sanctions against South Africa, including moves to block settling of a new debt agreement, were scheduled to be discussed.  As with the previous pact, the new agreement covers the country's debt "inside the net," which applies mainly to repayments due to overseas creditor banks by the private sector.  The agreement calls for South African debtors to make repayments in eight installments, starting in December of next year.  The redemption then would be at 1.5% of the total debt, increasing to 2.5% in February 1991, and to 3% at six-month intervals thereafter.  A revised provision would be included for the conversion of short-term claims inside the net to long-term loans outside the net.  These claims would be repayable over a 10-year period.  Foreign debt falling outside the net of affected indebtedness -- which Mr. Stahl estimated at $12 billion -- would remain not subject to the debt arrangements.  New York Times Co. said net income rose in the third quarter because of a one-time gain on the sale of the company's cable-TV system.  Net surged to $210.8 million, or $2.68 a share, from $26.7 million, or 33 cents a share, a year earlier.  The latest quarter included a gain of $193.3 million, or $2.46 a share, from the sale of New York Times Cable, completed in August.  Exclusive of the gain, operating profit declined 35% to $16.4 million, or 21 cents a share, from $25.2 million, or 31 cents a share.  The decline primarily reflected the dilution from acquiring McCall's, Golf World (U.S.) and Sailing World magazines; lower equity earnings from the forest-products group because of price discounting and an unfavorable exchange rate, and an 8.7% decline in advertising linage at the New York Times, the company's flagship newspaper.  Advertising volume at the company's 35 regional newspapers decreased 1.1%.  The company said the negative factors are expected to continue into next year.  Revenue rose 6.4% to $415.3 million from $390.5 million.  Democrat Gene Taylor won a special election to fill the congressional seat vacated by the death of Republican Larkin Smith, taking back the GOP's lone redoubt in Mississippi's House delegation.  Mr. Taylor's overwhelming victory against Republican Tom Anderson reclaims a seat the Republicans had held for 17 years and gives the Democrats their fifth victory in the seven special House elections held this year.  Mr. Taylor, a 36-year-old state senator from Bay St. Louis, won 65% of the vote in a district that has voted Republican in the past five presidential elections and that was once represented by Republican U.S. Sen. Trent Lott.  Mr. Taylor's victory was an embarrassment for both state and national Republicans.  Mr. Anderson, a former Lott aide, received campaign assistance from the senator and from President Bush, who visited the district last week.  Even so, Mr. Taylor carried all but one of the district's dozen counties.  Rep. Smith died in a plane crash on Aug. 13.  Wall Street Journal reporters called companies with headquarters or facilities in the Bay area in a bid to assess the damage to their operations caused by Tuesday's earthquake.  The calls reached many, but certainly not all, of the publicly held companies with operations in the area.  In most cases damage to company facilities and operations was minimal.  ADIA SERVICES INC., Menlo Park, temporary personnel agency, annual sales of $504 million, OTC, said all 30 offices in Bay area were working, but in various states of disarray.  Business was slow because many companies were closed yesterday.  ADVANCED MICRO DEVICES INC., Sunnyvale, integrated circuit maker, annual sales of $1.12 billion, NYSE, had only minor structural damage.  Most of its 4,500 workers were at work yesterday, and no production slowdown was anticipated as long as electricity remains available.  AMDAHL CORP., Sunnyvale, computer maker, annual sales of $1.8 billion, Amex, was closed yesterday and no damage estimates were available.  AMERICAN BUILDING MAINTENANCE INDUSTRIES Inc., San Francisco, provider of maintenance services, annual revenue of $582 million, NYSE, had some damage to headquarters and lost phone service, but operations were moved to a branch office and are running smoothly thanks to a decentralized computer system the company had developed before the quake.  AMERICAN PRESIDENT COS., Oakland, shipping concern, annual sales of $2.2 billion, NYSE, had little damage to the cranes, dock or rail track at its container-ship facility near the collapsed Route 880 overpass.  The company expects to work a ship due in today with minimal delays, despite sporadic power.  ANACOMP INC., Indianapolis, NYSE, said its Xidex Corp. unit, a Sunnyvale maker of computer disks and microfilm with annual sales of $637 million, had only minor damage and is fully operational.  ANTHEM ELECTRONICS INC., San Jose, distributor of electronic parts, annual sales of about $300 million, NYSE, sustained very little damage, anticipated being "in 100% operating condition" by midday.  APPLE COMPUTER CO., Cupertino, computer maker, annual sales of $4.07 billion, OTC, sustained some structural damage.  Offices were closed yesterday.  APPLIED MATERIALS INC., Santa Clara, maker of computer-chip machine systems, annual sales of $490 million, OTC, had slight damage to headquarters, no damage to manufacturing plants.  Company, with 1,750 workers in area, is fully functional.  ATARI CORP., Sunnyvale, maker of personal computers and software, annual sales of $700 million, Amex, had minor damage and expects to be fully operational by tomorrow.  BANKAMERICA Corp., San Francisco, bank holding company, annual revenue of $10.2 billion, NYSE, yesterday had no power at its headquarters, 80 of its 433 Northern California branches were closed and 250 of 750 automatic teller machines were closed in the area.  Securities trading was conducted in a backup facility in Concord.  BECHTEL CORP., San Francisco, engineering and construction concern, annual sales of $4 billion, had only minor structural damage at its three buildings in the city, but its computers were knocked out.  Backup computer tapes were hand-carried to an IBM office in Philadelphia, and the company expects its mainframe to be up in a few days.  Workers, except for senior management, were asked not to report for work yesterday.  BIO-RAD LABORATORIES INC., Hercules, biological research and clinical-products leader, $200 million in annual sales, Amex, said its Richmond warehouse north of San Francisco was closed because of debris and fallen shelves.  It expects to be fully operational by next week.  BORLAND INTERNATIONAL, Scotts Valley, personal computer and software designer, annual sales of $72 million, had heavy damage to its headquarters and was conducting business from its parking lot.  The company doesn't expect any shipping delays.  BUSINESSLAND INC., San Jose, computer retail company, annual sales of $1.1 billion, NYSE, said all 16 corporate office and stores in the area were open with the exception of a retail center in San Francisco's business district.  That facility should reopen today.  CARTER HAWLEY HALE STORES Inc., Los Angeles, retailer, annual sales of $2.79 billion, NYSE, said nine of its 22 Emporium stores in the area were closed because of water damage, broken windows and fallen displays.  A spokesman said sales are expected to be hurt, but the losses are covered by insurance.  CHEVRON CORP., San Francisco, oil company, annual sales of $25.2 billion, NYSE, had minor damage to downtown headquarters, but structural damage closed two of its seven buildings in San Ramone industrial park.  Company expects to be fully operational by next week.  CLOROX Co., Oakland, consumer products, annual sales of $1.36 billion, NYSE, was closed yesterday but plans to reopen today or tomorrow.  Meanwhile, orders are being routed through Kingsford Products unit in Louisville, Ky., but computer problems mean they must be processed manually.  Expects to be fully operational early next week.  COHERENT INC., Palo Alto, laser maker, annual sales of $159 million, was closed yesterday but expects to reopen today.  CONSOLIDATED FREIGHTWAYS INC., Menlo Park, trucking company, $2.69 billion in annual sales, NYSE, had structural damage to CF Motor Freight subsidiary's office in Palo Alto, no damage in Menlo Park.  COOPER COMPANIES INC., Palo Alto, medical products maker, annual sales of $628 million, NYSE, had little damage and was in full operation yesterday.  DAYTON HUDSON CORP., Minneapolis, retailer, annual sales of $12.2 billion, NYSE, closed seven of its 13 Bay-area Target discount stores and nine of its 20 Mervyn's department stores because of pending reviews by structural engineers or requests from authorities, who were trying to keep shoppers off the freeways.  The company expects to reopen three Target stores and all but two Mervyn's today or tomorrow.  DIASONICS INC., South San Francisco, maker of magnetic resonance imaging equipment, annual sales of $281 million, Amex, had minor damage, mostly in a stockroom.  The company plans to be fully operational today.  DIGITAL EQUIPMENT CORP., Maynard, Mass., computer maker, annual sales of $12.7 billion, NYSE, had structural damage at its San Francisco sales office but no appreciable damage elsewhere in the area, including its Cupertino plant.  DREYER'S GRAND ICE CREAM INC., Oakland, ice cream maker, annual sales of $225 million, OTC, said it is delivering ice cream wherever roads are passable.  EVEREX SYSTEMS INC., Fremont, maker of personal computers and peripherals, annual sales of $377 million, OTC, had minor damage and was almost fully operational yesterday.  EXXON Corp., New York, oil company, NYSE, said its refinery northeast of San Francisco was operating at a slightly reduced rate as a precaution in case of aftershocks.  FORD MOTOR CO., Dearborn, Mich., auto maker, annual sales of $92.4 billion, NYSE, said its three Ford Aerospace unit facilities in the Bay area, including a satellite-assembly operation in Palo Alto, had no major damage.  GAP Inc., San Bruno, clothing retailer, annual sales of $1.25 billion, NYSE, expects most of its stores to return to full operation and all 2,500 of its Bay-area workers to be back at work by today.  GENENTECH INC., South San Francisco, biotechnology company, annual sales of $334.8 million, NYSE, sustained no major damage and expects to be fully operational today.  GENERAL ELECTRIC CO., Fairfield, Conn., consumer, industrial products and broadcasting concern, annual sales of $50 billion, NYSE, said its GE Nuclear Energy unit, with 1,600 Bay-area employees, had only minor damage at its San Jose headquarters.  Business wasn't disrupted.  GENERAL MOTORS CORP., Detroit, auto maker, annual sales of $123.6 billion, NYSE, sustained about 10 injuries to workers and some ruptured water mains at its New United Motor Manufacturing Inc. facility in Fremont, a joint venture with Toyota Motor Corp.  There was limited production of some models yesterday, but it wasn't clear when the normal 750-car-a-day pace will resume.  Plant officials are still assessing damage to parts suppliers and Port of Oakland facilities that handle shipments to the plant.  GOLDEN WEST FINANCIAL CORP., Oakland, savings and loan, annual revenue of $1.4 billion, NYSE, had only minor damage to a few branches and no injured employees.  HEWLETT-PACKARD Co., Palo Alto, personal computer and electronic equipment maker, annual sales of $9.8 billion, NYSE, said there will be a "minimal suspension" of manufacturing for an undefined period.  The computer system was operating, so orders could be taken.  The company has 18,000 employees and more than 70 buildings in the Bay area.  One building in Palo Alto may be damaged beyond repair.  Others had lesser damage and there were no injuries among workers.  Damage will be "easily in the millions," the company said.  HEXCEL Corp., Dublin, manufacturer of engineered parts, annual sales of $399 million, NYSE, had little damage beyond some phone trouble.  HOMESTAKE MINING CO., San Francisco, gold and general miner, annual sales of $432.6 million, NYSE, said its headquarters was closed yesterday because of power failures and lack of water, but that it may reopen today.  It expects any impact on its business to be slight.  HOMESTEAD FINANCIAL CORP., Millbrae, financial services concern, annual revenue of $562 million, OTC, said three of its 17 Bay-area branches were closed yesterday.  The company expects all branches to reopen today.  INMAC CORP., Santa Clara, maker of computer accessories, annual sales of $250 million, OTC, said telephones were out at its headquarters but service should be restored by today.  The company said it was doing a brisk business in computer power-surge protectors, cables and uninterruptable power sources.  INTEL Corp., Santa Clara, semiconductor maker, annual sales of $2.87 billion, OTC, had some damage and few people were at work yesterday.  INTERNATIONAL BUSINESS MACHINES Corp, Armonk, N.Y., maker of business machines, NYSE, said flooding caused by broken water pipes closed its San Jose plant, which makes high-end data-storage devices.  The plant and its 8,500 employees gradually will resume operations over the next several days, the company said.  Also closed yesterday were the company's Santa Teresa software-development lab and the Almaden research center.  The concern's National Service Division opened a center for emergency service in Walnut Creek as part of its disaster-recovery plan.  KAISER ALUMINUM & CHEMICAL, Oakland, metal and chemical maker, annual sales of $2.22 billion, had slight structural damage to its 28-story headquarters building and employees stayed home yesterday to allow crews to clean up.  LOCKHEED CORP., Calabasas, aerospace and defense concern, annual sales of $10.59 billion, NYSE, said its Lockheed Missiles & Space division closed its Santa Cruz test facility because of power outages and landslides.  The closing, affecting 266 employees, will continue at least until roads are cleared.  It wasn't known to what extent, if any, the facility was damaged.  It also wasn't known what the impact will be on the division's work, which includes the Navy's Trident submarine-based missile program and the Air Force's Strategic Defense Initiative.  The division had only minor damage at its Sunnyvale headquarters and plant in Palo Altos, and no delays in deliveries are expected.  LONGS DRUG STORES INC., Walnut Creek, drugstore chain, annual sales of $1.9 billion, NYSE, had only minor damage and only four of its 75 Bay-area stores, all in the Santa Cruz area, were closed.  All are expected to reopen soon.  LSI LOGIC CORP., Milpitas, maker of customized integrated circuits, annual sales of $550 million, NYSE, has halted manufacturing at its three plants in the area while they are inspected for structural damage.  The company expects to resume full operations by today.  R.H. MACY & Co., New York, retailer, annual sales of $7 billion, said there was minor damage to its 24 Macy stores and nine I. Magnin stores in the Bay area.  MEASUREX CORP., Cupertino, maker of computer integrated manufacturing processes, annual sales of $265 million, NYSE, had only minor damage but workers spent most of yesterday cleaning up.  NATIONAL SEMICONDUCTOR CORP., Santa Clara, semiconductor maker, annual sales of $1.65 billion, NYSE, said it had no major structural damage at its 30 Bay-area buildings, but two workers were injured.  Production resumed yesterday.  Piping in a waste-treatment plant needed immediate repairs.  NORDSTROM INC., Seattle, retailer, annual sales $2.33 billion, OTC, five of this 59-store chain's nine stores in the Bay Area were closed yesterday, damage appears primarily cosmetic, hopes to reopen four of the stores by today and the fifth by Saturday.  ORACLE SYSTEMS CORP., Belmont, provider of computer programming and software services, annual sales $584 million, four of 12 offices and buildings in the Belmont and San Mateo areas were closed, 95% of computer and telephone systems are operating, expects to be back to full operation by the end of the week.  PACIFIC GAS & ELECTRIC CO., San Francisco, electric, gas and water supplier, annual sales $7.6 billion, some minor damage to headquarters, undetermined damage to four nearby substations, severe structural damage to a major power plant at Moss Landing, extensive damage to gas lines and electric lines, 400,000 residences without electricity and 69,000 without gas, cannot reconnect electricity until it is certain there are no gas leaks, no predictions on when this will happen.  PACIFIC TELESIS GROUP, San Francisco, telecommunications holding company, annual sales of $9.5 billion, no damage to headquarters, but no power, the power failure has caused a delay in the release of the company's earnings report, major concern is subsidiaries, Pacific Bell and Pacific Telesis Cellular, both of which sustained damage to buildings, structural damage to several cellular sites in Santa Cruz, volume of calls on cellular phones 10 times the usual, causing a big slowdown.  PROCTER & GAMBLE CO., Cincinnati-based company's Folgers Coffee plant in South San Francisco was closed following the earthquake, no injuries or major damage, other plants around country can make up for any lost production.  QUANTUM CORP., Milpitas, manufactures rigid disc drives for small business computers, word processors, annual sales $120.8 million, OTC, open for business, minor structural damage.  RAYCHEM CORP., Menlo Park, plastics manufacturer, annual sales $1 billion, no major damage and no production slowdown is anticipated.  ROSS STORES INC., Newark, discount apparel chain, annual sales $576 million, two of 28 stores in Bay Area closed, both could open as early as today.  SAFEWAY STORES INC., Oakland, retail food chain, annual sales of $13.6 billion, some structural damage to headquarters and no power; major problems transporting products to those stores that remained open; no numbers on how many stores closed.  CHARLES SCHWAB & CO., San Francisco, discount brokerage firm, annual sales of $392 million, had only minor damage to headquarters building and was up and running for yesterday's market open.  Firm will not, however, resume 24-hour service until power in city is restored.  Office closed yesterday at 4:30 p.m. EDT.  SEAGATE TECHNOLOGY, Scotts Valley, maker of hard disk drives for computers, annual sales of $1.37 billion, OTC, closed to assess what appeared to be minor damage to some of its 20 buildings.  SOUTHERN PACIFIC TRANSPORTATION CO., San Francisco, railroad, annual sales of $2.41 billion, had only minor damage to headquarters and tracks, and expects to be fully operational tomorrow.  St. Louis Southwestern Railway Co. unit halted all service Tuesday night but has since restored some freight lines and limited commuter service between San Francisco and San Jose.  SUN MICROSYSTEMS INC., Mountain View, maker of desktop computers, annual sales $1.77 billion, OTC, no injured employees and very little damage to buildings.  Closed yesterday due to power difficulties.  TANDEM COMPUTERS INC., Cupertino, computer maker, annual sales of $1.6 billion, NYSE, said it had no significant damage and should be fully operational within a week.  Many employees stayed home yesterday, but customer service was being maintained.  TRANSAMERICA CORP., San Francisco, financial services and insurance company, annual sales of $7.9 billion, NYSE, said its headquarters, the well-known downtown pyramid-shaped building, was intact but closed yesterday.  VARIAN ASSOCIATES INC., Palo Alto, instrumentation and semiconductor equipment company, annual sales of $1.3 billion, had only minor damage and no slowdowns were anticipated.  VLSI TECHNOLOGY INC., San Jose, maker of semiconductor products, annual sales $171.9 million, OTC, minimal damage to facilities, no injuries, expected operations to return to normal late yesterday.  WATKINS-JOHNSON CO., defense-oriented electronics manufacturer, annual sales $292 million, NYSE, minor damage to headquarters and plant in Palo Alto, no damage to San Jose plant, "still assessing" damage at Scotts Valley plant, where main product is furnaces for semiconductor production.  WELLS FARGO & CO., San Francisco, bank holding company, annual revenue $4.9 billion, NYSE, minor damage at headquarters, 12 branches out of 170 in Northern California sustained structural damage that will preclude them from opening in the near future, 45 locations with at least one automatic teller machine inoperable, central computer systems are operating, no injuries.  WYSE TECHNOLOGY INC., San Jose, maker of video display terminals and workstations and IBM/PC compatible computers, annual sales of $452 million, slight structural damage at headquarters, no injuries, expects to be back to full operation today.  3COM CORP., Santa Clara, maker of computer communications systems, annual sales of $386 million, OTC, slight structural damage to headquarters, communications systems already fully operational.  Could the collapse of I-880 have been prevented?  That was the question structural engineers and California transportation officials were asking themselves yesterday as rescue workers began the gruesome task of trying to extract as many as 250 victims from beneath the concrete slabs of the double-deck Nimitz Freeway in Oakland that caved in during Tuesday's temblor.  After touring the area, California Gov. George Deukmejian late yesterday called for an inquiry into the freeway's collapse, blaming the disaster on substandard construction, the Associated Press reported.  The impact of the destruction of this 2.5-mile stretch of highway was tragically measured in lost lives.  But there are other long-term effects that raise serious questions about the ability of California's infrastructure to withstand a major temblor.  It could easily be two years before the well-traveled artery that helps connect Oakland with San Francisco is reopened, and the cost to build a new stretch of highway could soar to more than $250 million, said Charles J. O'Connell, deputy district director in Los Angeles of the California Department of Transportation, nicknamed Caltrans.  Caltrans in Sacramento said total damage from the collapsed highway is estimated at around $500 million.  The aftershocks of the highway tragedy are reverberating in Los Angeles as well, as local politicians spoke yesterday against plans to bring double-decking to Los Angeles freeways by 1994.  Caltrans plans to add a second deck for buses and car pools above the median of a 2.5-mile stretch of the Harbor Freeway just south of Los Angeles, near the Memorial Coliseum.  Los Angeles County Supervisor Kenneth Hahn yesterday vowed to fight the introduction of double-decking in the area.  Caltrans abandoned double-decking in the early 1970s, following the 1971 Sylmar earthquake that destroyed freeway sections just north of Los Angeles, Mr. O'Connell explained.  That temblor measured 6.1 on the Richter scale; Tuesday's was 6.9.  So why even consider stacking freeways now?  "We've run out of places to build freeways in L.A., and the only place to go is up," Mr. O'Connell said, although he acknowledges there are many obstacles, including cost.  But as for safety, he says double-deck freeways built today with the heavily reinforced concrete and thicker columns required after the Sylmar quake should withstand a calamitous temblor of 7.5 to 8 on the Richter scale.  Reasons for the collapse of the Nimitz Freeway were sketchy yesterday.  But most structural engineers attributed the destruction to improper reinforcement of the columns that supported the decks, and the fact that the ground beneath the highway is largely landfill and can become unstable, or "liquefy," in a major quake.  The two-story roadway, designed in the mid-1940s and completed in 1957, was supported by columns that apparently lacked the kind of steel reinforcement used in highways today.  While the pillars did have long metal bars running vertically through them for reinforcement, they apparently lacked an adequate number of metal "ties" that run horizontally through the column, said Leo Parker, a structural engineer in Los Angeles.  Caltrans today uses a variation of the design Mr. Parker describes, with spiraling steel rods inside.  But in the case of the Nimitz Freeway, the lack of such support caused the core of the columns to crumble and buckle under the weight of the second deck, crushing motorists who were lined up in bumper-to-bumper rush-hour traffic on the lower deck nearly 15 feet below.  Officials of the state agency didn't have any immediate explanation why the reinforcement didn't hold up.  Caltrans reinforced the highway in 1977 as part of a $55 million statewide project, using steel cables to tie the decks of the freeway to the columns and prevent the structure from swaying in a quake.  Caltrans spokesman Jim Drago in Sacramento declined to identify the engineering firm that did the reinforcement work.  Liability in the bridge and road collapses will revolve around whether government took "reasonable care" to build and maintain the structures, says John Messina, a Tacoma, Wash., personal-injury attorney who specializes in highway design and maintenance cases.  The firm brought in to strengthen the structure could be liable as well.  The results of the quake certainly raise questions about whether reasonable care was taken, Mr. Messina says.  Given the seismic history of the Bay Area, "it seems to me that a 6.9 earthquake is a foreseeable event."  Caltrans' Mr. Drago defended the agency's work on the Nimitz Freeway.  "The work was done properly," he said.  "Basically, we had a severe earthquake of significant duration and it was just something the structure couldn't withstand."  Ironically, Caltrans this year began working on a second round of seismic reinforcements of freeways around the state, this time wrapping freeway columns in "steel blankets" to reinforce them.  But only bridges supported with single rows of columns were top priority, and the Nimitz Freeway, supported by double rows, was left out, Mr. Drago explained.  "The reason is that the technology is such that we're not able to retrofit multi-column structures," he said.  ---  Charles McCoy in San Francisco and John R. Emshwiller in Los Angeles contributed to this article.  Lionel Corp.'s board unanimously rejected a tender offer of $8 a share, or $95.4 million, for as much as 90% of Lionel by a group with a 9.9% stake in the toy retailer.  Lionel also urged holders of its stock and debt not to tender their securities, saying it wants to remain independent to pursue its business strategy.  Lionel also said the offer by Robert I. Toussie Limited Partnership is inadequate, and full of conditions that leave it "subject to substantial uncertainty."  In addition, Lionel began a lawsuit in federal District Court in New York seeking to enjoin the offer, alleging, among other things, violations of federal securities law and fraudulent manipulation of the market for Lionel's securities.  Robert I. Toussie, general partner of the investment group, said the Lionel response reflected management's entrenched position, saying officials had failed to come up with a better alternative to his group's offer.  Mr. Toussie said he would respond to Lionel's suit after his lawyers review it.  Efforts by a federal mediator to reignite talks between Boeing Co. and the Machinists union apparently failed, and no further meetings are scheduled.  Company officials and union representatives didn't meet face to face, but the mediator shuttled between the two groups.  In a statement issued after the meeting, the aerospace giant said it won't increase its offer although adjustments within the proposed pay-and-benefit mix are possible.  Machinists already have rejected a proposal that called for a 4% pay increase and 8% bonus in the first year.  In the second year, workers would receive a 3% wage boost and a 3% bonus, followed by a 3% increase without a bonus in the third year.  "The company will not budge on anything," said a spokesman for the union.  As the strike enters its 15th day today, some members are getting nervous, the spokesman conceded, but the majority of the 55,000 Machinists are prepared to "wait it out as long as it takes."  United Merchants & Manufacturers Inc. said its president, Uzi Ruskin, withdrew his proposal to acquire control of the New York textile and clothing company.  Last month, Mr. Ruskin proposed, among other things, to buy 3.5 million shares, or 38%, for $4 apiece.  Coupled with his current 1.2 million shares and 4% held by an associate, the stake would have given him control of 55% of the concern.  In a Securities and Exchange Commission filing, Mr. Ruskin had said that holders of the other 45% of United Merchants would receive one-half share of a new preferred stock for each of their shares.  A special committee of United Merchants directors said that in view of uncertainties regarding various legal and financial considerations, it couldn't recommend the plan to the full board.  The company is exploring, with a major financial institution, the development of a plan to boost the value of the company for its holders, Mr. Ruskin said.  In a separate SEC filing, Albert Safer, who holds 6.46% of United Merchants, said he retained investment bank Lazard Freres & Co. for advice as he evaluates the possibility of making a bid for the textile maker.  On Friday, Mr. Safer, a Newark, N.J., textile businessman, signed a confidentiality agreement under which United Merchants would provide him with nonpublic information.  The White House is making sure nobody will accuse it of taking this crisis lightly.  In the aftermath of the California earthquake, President Bush and his aides flew into a whirlwind of earthquake-related activity yesterday morning.  Some of it was necessary to get federal help flowing to victims, but some seemed designed mostly to project an image of a White House in action.  Mr. Bush and his aides were accused of responding too slowly after the Exxon Valdez oil tanker split open in Alaskan waters and Hurricane Hugo struck the Carolina coast, and they clearly don't want a repeat of those charges now.  So the White House announced that Mr. Bush got his first earthquake briefing of the day at 6:30 a.m. from chief of staff John Sununu.  By noon, Mr. Bush had taken two phone calls from Vice President Dan Quayle, who was in California; made a televised statement of concern; signed a disaster proclamation; received a written report from the Federal Emergency Management Agency; and visited FEMA headquarters.  Mr. Bush himself essentially acknowledged that he and his aides were trying to head off criticism.  On his FEMA visit, Mr. Bush said that he hoped there would be "less carping" about the emergency office's performance this time, adding that the agency "took a hit" for its reaction to Hurricane Hugo.  The White House already is talking of Mr. Bush visiting the California earthquake site this weekend.  He visited the Hugo devastation but not until after local leaders urged him to do so.  Beazer PLC, a major British building materials and construction concern, reported a 24% jump in pretax profit for its latest financial year, helped largely by contributions from its U.S. unit, Koppers Co.  Pretax profit for the year to June 30 rose to #142.5 million ($224.5 million) from #114.7 million ($180.7 million), broadly matching analysts' expectations.  Profit after taxes and minority interests but before extraordinary items increased 22% to #92.6 million from #75.6 million a year earlier, while fully diluted earnings per share rose to 29.90 pence (47 cents) from 24.68 pence (39 cents).  The lethal shudders that wracked the San Francisco Bay Area -- rated a 6.9 on the Richter scale -- didn't match the great earthquake of 1906, rated at 8.25.  The difference of just 1.35 points on the scale, designed by Charles Richter of CalTech in the 1930s, means the older quake was "10 to 20 times stronger," says Lane Johnson, director of the University of California Berkeley Seismographic Station.  The ground ruptured along a 20-to-30-mile stretch of the San Andreas Fault on Tuesday, Mr. Johnson added.  In 1906, the rupture was 300 miles long and a couple feet wide.  Though the epicenter of Tuesday's temblor was located 10 miles north of the town of Santa Cruz, and 50 miles south of San Francisco, its havoc hopscotched up the coast in seemingly random fashion.  But the greatest damage was visited on buildings and roadways perched upon landfill, as were the Marina District of San Francisco and the Bay Bridge -- two areas of maximum devastation.  "Landfill -- loose and unconsolidated earth -- may feel like rock but it behaves like liquid when you shake it," said Douglas Segar, professor of geosciences at San Francisco State University in a televised interview.  "It liquefies in a patchwork quilt pattern.  Our quake behaved much like the Mexico City earthquake, where great damage was miles from the epicenter."  Mr. Johnson, of the Berkeley seismographic station, said: "Landfill can be done if it's properly compacted.  You can drive piles on it and build on it."  He cited the example of San Francisco's financial district, where many new glass towers survived almost unscathed.  But the public policy issues raised by earthquake damage will be difficult to address, Mr. Johnson predicted.  "The attention span of the public is short," he said.  "We've known for years and years we've got lots of old {pre-1950s} unreinforced brick and masonry buildings."  One old building, the Golden State Bank Building on Front Street, had its yellow brick facade sheared off by the shock of the quake, leaving a wedge of its third floor open to the air, while piles of dusty bricks tumbled to the street below narrowly missing rush-hour pedestrians and cars.  Reinforcing such old building stock, Mr. Johnson said, "comes down to money.  It's a danger.  We know it's there.  And sooner or later, we have to do something about it."  The urgency is heightened because this week's earthquake -- while major and followed by hundreds of aftershocks -- didn't release enough pent-up energy tension along the faultlines to preclude more and bigger quakes soon.  "The big one is still due," Mr. Johnson predicted in an interview.  "The Bay Area has three very dangerous faults, the San Andreas, the Hayward fault and the Calaveras fault.  It {Tuesday's quake} hasn't solved our problem.  In California, this is the reality."  Coca-Cola Co. may be about to intensify the cola wars.  Coke said it will test market a caffeine-free version of its flagship brand, Coca-Cola Classic, beginning next week in Charlotte, N.C. Other, as yet unnamed, cities will follow.  If all goes well, the product will be rolled out for national sales sometime next year, a Coke spokesman said.  After the confusion surrounding the change of the Coke formula in 1985, Coca-Cola was reluctant to clutter the Classic name with a brand extension.  But now, the soft-drink giant appears willing to take the risk.  "The name Classic Coke has tremendous value, and they haven't merchandised that name before," says Jesse Meyers, publisher of the trade journal Beverage Digest.  The Coke spokesman said a caffeine-free Classic should help increase volume of the original brand.  Indeed, analysts have said that the absence of new products, among other factors, has limited sales growth throughout the industry.  Coke now leads Pepsi in market share in caffeine-free diet colas but trails Pepsi in sales of caffeine-free sugared colas, according to Beverage Digest.  Coke introduced a caffeine-free sugared cola based on its original formula in 1983.  It switched to a caffeine-free formula using its new Coke in 1985.  Coke has been studying the possibility of introducing a caffeine-free Classic for a year, a company spokesman said.  He said large increases in sales of other non-caffeine soft drinks make the timing right now.  CALIFORNIA STRUGGLED with the aftermath of a Bay area earthquake.  As aftershocks shook the San Francisco Bay area, rescuers searched through rubble for survivors of Tuesday's temblor, and residents picked their way through glass-strewn streets.  In Oakland, hopes faded for finding any more survivors within the concrete and steel from the collapse of an interstate highway.  At least 270 people were reported killed and 1,400 injured in the rush-hour tremor that caused billions of dollars of damage along 100 miles of the San Andreas fault.  Bush declared the region a major disaster area and the military was mobilized to prevent looting.  The baseball commissioner said the third game of the World Series between the Giants and the Athletics would be played Tuesday in Candlestick Park.  ---  HONECKER WAS OUSTED as leader of East Germany amid growing unrest.  The 77-year-old official, who oversaw the building of the Berlin Wall, was removed during a meeting of the 163-member Communist Party Central Committee in East Berlin.  Honecker, who was reported ill following gall-bladder surgery in August, said he was resigning for health reasons.  He was succeeded by internal-security chief Egon Krenz, 52, a hard-liner who quickly ruled out any sharing of power with pro-democracy groups.  Honecker's departure came after weeks of street protests and an exodus to the West of East Germans who had become disenchanted with his rule.  ---  HUNGARY ADOPTED constitutional changes to form a democratic system.  At a nationally televised legislative session in Budapest, the Parliament overwhelmingly approved changes formally ending one-party domination in the country, regulating free elections by next summer and establishing the office of state president to replace a 21-member council.  The country was renamed the Republic of Hungary.  Like other Soviet bloc nations, it had been known as a "people's republic" since 1949.  The voting for new laws followed dissolution of Hungary's Communist Party this month and its replacement by a Western-style Socialist Party.  --- The space shuttle Atlantis blasted into orbit from Cape Canaveral, Fla., and its crew of five astronauts launched the nuclear-powered Galileo space probe on a flight to the planet Jupiter.  The $1.4 billion robot spacecraft's exploratory mission is to take six years.  The shuttle is slated to return Monday to California.  ---  South Korea's President Roh addressed a joint House-Senate meeting and urged patience over U.S. demands for the opening of Seoul's markets to more American goods, saying trade issues would be "resolved to mutual satisfaction."  He also said tragic results could follow any "hint of weakening" of the U.S. defense commitment to Seoul.  ---  The Census Bureau reported that 13.1% of the U.S. population, or 31.9 million people, were living in poverty in 1988.  Last year's figure was down from 13.4% in 1987 and marked the fifth consecutive annual decline in the poverty rate.  Per capita income rose 1.7% to $13,120, but median family income fell 0.2%.  ---  The Bush administration accused Israeli Prime Minister Shamir of hindering peace efforts in the Mideast with "unhelpful" and disappointing statements.  Shamir said Tuesday that he was prepared to risk a policy conflict with the U.S. over an Egyptian plan to hold direct Israeli-Palestinian talks, which the premier's Likud bloc opposes.  ---  Cuba was elected to the U.N. Security Council for the first time since its Castro-led revolution 30 years ago.  The election was by secret ballot in the General Assembly.  The U.S. didn't openly oppose Cuba's seating as the Latin American council delegate.  ---  Britain's Prime Minister Thatcher told a Commonwealth summit in Kuala Lumpur, Malaysia, that sanctions against South Africa were "utterly irresponsible," officials said.  But other nations at the opening of the 49-nation meeting of Britain and its former colonies pressed for continued or stronger embargoes in an effort to end apartheid.  ---  Arab officials in Saudi Arabia said three-week-old talks by Lebanese lawmakers aimed at ending Lebanon's civil war appeared about to collapse.  Christian legislators are insisting on a Syrian troop pullout from Lebanon before agreeing to political changes giving the nation's Moslems a greater role in Beirut's government.  ---  Colombia's judges launched a 72-hour strike to press security demands following Tuesday's murder of a High Court justice in Medellin.  The country's narcotics traffickers claimed responsibility for the slaying.  Most of the country's 20,000 judges and judicial employees joined the work stoppage.  Charles S. Mitchell, a vice president with Homart Development Co., the real estate development subsidiary of Sears, Roebuck & Co., was named president of Figgie Properties, a real estate development unit.  He succeeds William Kohut, who resigned earlier this year.  Also, Richard A. Barkley, a former marketing executive with FMC Corp., was appointed president of Continental Container Systems, a producer of can closing machinery that Figgie acquired late last year.  Figgie is a fire protection, electronics and industrial products concern.  Dow Chemical Co. said third-quarter net income slipped 6.8% from a record year-ago quarter.  The decline broke a streak of 10 quarters in which Dow posted earnings increases.  Dow's third-quarter net fell to $589 million, or $3.29 a share, from $632 million, or $3.36 a share, a year ago.  Sales in the latest quarter rose 2% to $4.25 billion from $4.15 billion a year earlier.  Dow closed at $94.625 a share, up 75 cents, in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  A spokeswoman said Dow is comfortable with Wall Street expectations that full-year earnings will total about $14.60 a share, compared with last year's record net of $2.4 billion, or $12.76 a share.  But that signal on full-year profit casts doubt on whether Dow will improve on its year-ago fourth-quarter net of $3.44 a share, or $635 million.  Dow would earn $14.85 a share for the year if it equaled that year-ago fourth-quarter performance.  Dow officials were signaling that the company would earn less than $15 a share this year even before they announced in July a plan to acquire 67% of Marion Laboratories Inc.  That acquisition could further dilute earnings per share this year, the company spokeswoman said.  Dow hasn't said exactly what impact the Marion acquisition will have on 1989 earnings.  Dow blamed the third-quarter earnings drop on several factors, including softer prices for polyethylene and other basic chemicals, a slower U.S. economy and a stronger dollar, which made Dow's exports from the U.S. more expensive to overseas customers.  Another problem was a 7% increase in operating costs at a time when revenue was rising by only 2%.  For the first nine months of the year, Dow earned $2.06 billion, or $11.41 a share, up 17% from $1.76 billion, or $9.32 a share, a year ago.  Sales for the latest nine months rose 7.7% to $13.34 billion from $12.38 billion in the year-ago period.  as Justice Holmes asserted -- who can doubt that when great confirmation hearings turn on the nominee's response to these great cases they make bad judicial history?  Ethan Bronner's "Battle for Justice: How the Bork Nomination Shook America" (Norton, 399 pages, $22.50) is a spirited narrative of the nastiest of these hearings, done with journalistic verve, but with a flawed legal philosophy.  While the book amply justifies its subtitle, the title itself is dubious.  What shook America was not a battle for justice but for naked power, in which an army of judicial activists rolled over a judge they had demonized.  In its basic structure and style the book is novelistic, with piquant character portrayal, hard-wire action and devious intrigue of the sort more likely to be encountered in a Washington docudrama than in a constitutional history.  Mr. Bronner seems to believe that the hearings could have gone either way.  I doubt that.  Given Democratic frustration with the Reagan victories and Court appointments, the contingency plans in place, and Mr. Bork's paper trail of vulnerable writings, it was pretty clear that Judge Bork never stood much chance of being confirmed.  As Mr. Bronner himself says, the smell of "raw meat" was in the air.  Perhaps because they won, Mr. Bork's attackers come through more vividly than his defenders.  Ralph Neas was the organizing genius, whipping a conglomerate of pressure groups into an irresistible attacking force.  Harvard's Laurence Tribe was the constitutional heavy, laying out legal strategies for the senators and witnesses to follow.  But it was Ted Kennedy who scored most effectively with his searing portrayal of "Robert Bork's America" -- the parade of imaginary horribles that would follow logically, he claimed, from the positions Mr. Bork had taken over the space of two decades.  Sen. Kennedy, never mind his dubious credentials for the moral high ground, emoted brilliantly.  I add two others.  Republican Sen. Arlen Specter of Pennsylvania engaged the nominee in a verbal contest aimed at showing that Mr. Bork was willing to stretch the Constitution in one area (free speech) while remaining rigid in all the others.  It achieved a good media play, and enabled Sen. Specter and others to vote against Mr. Bork out of "conscience."  Further ammunition came from left legal theorist Ronald Dworkin, who in the New York Review of Books painted a picture of a constitutional zombie willfully reading his personal prejudices into the Constitution, particularly in the area of "original intent."  The charge of being "outside the mainstream" of legal thought gravely undercut Mr. Bork's scholarly standing, leaving him bleeding on the platform.  The nomination still might have been salvaged if a number of Democratic moderates in the South and Southwest had broken party lines.  But Democratic Sen. Bennett Johnson of Louisiana reminded the little band that anti-Bork blacks and women could furnish the margin to punish them in their next Senate elections.  Demographics converged with "mainstream" and demonizing to seal Robert Bork's fate.  The upshot?  Mr. Bork's opponents chose the battlefield, held it and kept it.  Yet with the smooth confirmation of Anthony Kennedy, an "80 percenter" only slightly less supportive of judicial restraint than Mr. Bork, the Democrats may have won the battle but lost the war.  Another upshot, however, was the chilling message the Bork hearings sent into the judicial culture from which the Supreme Court draws its talent.  The word went forth to every law school that those with federal court ambitions must travel a safe constitutional journey, with no paper trail and no bite to their tongue or pen.  Unfortunately, the author simply doesn't supply the philosophical frame to sustain his reportorial talents.  He has too readily swallowed the case for the activist law school culture.  Probing more deeply into the doctrine of "judicial restraint," he would have found a long history going back to the great decisions of Justice Holmes.  He would discover it also in Alexander Bickel, a subtle constitutional scholar, Mr. Bork's closest friend at Yale, whose influence on the judge goes well beyond Mr. Bronner's reporting.  Still, the long view of Robert Bork as constitutional thinker must be a spotty one.  His strength lies in his majoritarian doctrine, which keeps the Court clear of transient group pressures and leaves most decisions in a democracy to elected legislatures and executives.  Unfortunately, Mr. Bork failed to distinguish between such pressures and the emergence of great issues critical to a society that must be settled judicially if it is to cohere.  The question of segregated schools, in Brown vs.  Board of Education, was such an issue.  In our time abortion has become another, best left to a line of Supreme Court decisions rather than to the chaos of 50 state legislatures.  A reflective and growing consensus of Americans clearly wishes to apply the right to privacy in contraceptive matters (decided in the Griswold case) to abortion as well.  One can understand Mr. Bork's fear that the new right to privacy will become intolerably stretched, though a Supreme Court composed of men and women with realism, guts and a sense of limits should be able to manage it.  What is certain is that if Americans allow another happening like the degrading Bork confirmation circus, it will be at their peril.  ---  Mr. Lerner is a writer and historian living in New York.  Sotheby's Inc., the world's biggest auction house, is taking a huge Wall Street-style risk on the outcome of the sale of art from the estate of John T. Dorrance Jr., the Campbell Soup Co. heir.  The Financial Services division has guaranteed the Dorrance family that it will receive a minimum of $100 million for the collection, regardless of what the bids for the art works total, people close to the transaction say.  The collection, which includes two early Picassos, a van Gogh, a Monet, other paintings, furniture and porcelains, went on sale last night in the first of six auctions.  What Sotheby's is doing closely resembles an underwriting by an investment bank.  A corporation that wants to sell stock or bonds goes to a Wall Street firm, which purchases the securities outright, accepting the financial risk of finding buyers.  If the investment bank can sell the securities at a higher price than it paid the issuer, it makes a profit.  At the initial sale last night, for example -- the sale featuring the Impressionists masters -- bids totaled $116 million.  That was slightly above Sotheby's presale estimate of $111 million.  Normally, Sotheby's would have earned 20% of the total in commissions.  Instead, people familiar with the transaction said, the auction house opted to forgo that percentage in order to obtain the collection and in exchange for taking a bigger chunk of proceeds exceeding $100 million.  Art dealers say that while auction houses occasionally guarantee the seller of a highly desirable work of art a minimum price, a financial commitment of this size is unprecedented.  Diana D. Brooks, president of Sotheby's North America division, vehemently denies it offered the Dorrance heirs a money-back guarantee, calling such reports "inaccurate."  Buried in the glossy hardbound catalog for the sale, however, appears the statement, "Sotheby's has an interest in the property in this catalog."  Explains a Sotheby's spokeswoman, the statement "means exactly what it says.  We have some level of financial interest" in the collection.  "We don't disclose specifics."  Frank Mirabello, a lawyer for the Dorrance estate with the Philadelphia law firm of Morgan, Lewis & Bockius, declines to comment on the financial arrangements.  Sotheby's made the $100 million guarantee to keep the Dorrance collection away from its archrival, auction house Christie's International PLC; Christie's has handled smaller sales for the Dorrance family over the years.  When Christie's officials asked why the firm wasn't picked to sell the Dorrance collection, representatives of the Dorrance family "told us it was a question of financial considerations," said Michael Findlay, Christie's head of impressionist and modern paintings.  Collectors who have made their money on Wall Street have become an increasingly important part of the art business and their money has helped fuel the art boom, but recently it appears Sotheby's has been returning the compliment.  In November 1987, Sotheby's essentially offered a Wall Street-style "bridge loan" of about $27 million to Australian businessman Alan Bond to enable him to purchase Vincent van Gogh's "Irises" for $53.9 million.  It was the highest bid in history for a work of art.  But two weeks ago, Sotheby's said that it has the painting under lock and key because the loan had not been fully repaid.  Sotheby's is offering such deals because it's an art sellers' market, at least where the best works are concerned, says Ralph Lerner, an attorney and author of the book "Art Law."  "There seems to be a lot of art for sale, but there's more competition.  The competition gives the seller the ability to cut a better deal," he says.  The Dorrance family will still receive a substantial portion of the auction proceeds above $100 million, people familiar with the transaction said.  But it's likely that Sotheby's will take a higher than usual commission, called an override, on the amount exceeding the guarantee.  Sotheby's has been aggressively promoting the Dorrance sale.  At a news conference last May announcing plans for the auction, Sotheby's estimated its value in excess of $100 million.  More recently, Sotheby's has predicted the collection will fetch $140 million.  That's the highest estimate for a single collection in auction history.  The decision to put the entire collection on the block stunned many, since Mr. Dorrance had served as chairman of the Philadelphia Museum of Art, and it had been assumed many of the works would be donated to the institution.  At last night's sale, 13 of 44 works that sold were purchased by Aska International Gallery, the art-acquisition unit of Aichi Financial, a Japanese conglomerate that owns 7.5% of Christie's.  Meanwhile, Sotheby's guarantee is raising eyebrows in the art world.  "The consumer has to throw out the idea that the auction house is a disinterested middleman," says New York art dealer David Tunick.  While he adds that he has no problem with auction houses who sell works in which they have a financial interest, "It ought not to be hidden in some small print."  In such situations, he says, the house "is going to put the best light on things."  For example, an auction house's comments on the condition of a work of art that is up for sale should be looked at with "very open eyes," he says.  "There's more and more of this cash-up-front going on at every level," says Bruce Miller, president of Art Funding Corp., an art lender.  Dealers and auction houses "know if they don't lay out a half a million for this, another one will; it's that competitive."  In January, two small New York galleries, the Coe Kerr Gallery and Beadleston Fine Arts, snatched a major art collection owned by the Askin family away from rival auction-house bidders with an up-front payment of about $25 million.  A Christie's spokeswoman said that while the auction house sometimes waives its seller's commission to attract art works -- it still gets a commission from the buyer -- Christie's won't offer financial guarantees because "Christie's believes its primary role is as an auction house, and therefore as an agent {for buyer and seller}, not as a bank."  Egon Krenz, the man tapped yesterday to become East Germany's new leader, faces the same task that has fallen to neighboring socialist colleagues: reforming a country in crisis.  But unlike the other new leaders in the East Bloc, Mr. Krenz will face an immediate threat to his nation's very existence: German reunification.  Mr. Krenz, age 52, is known as an old-guard ironfist, one likely to continue the method of running a country that the Berlin Wall made famous.  Even if he were to change his stripes and become another Milton Friedman, however, he would still stand a good chance of losing a country.  Mr. Krenz almost certainly will be a younger version of Erich Honecker, his rigid predecessor as dictator.  Mr. Krenz has followed much the same career path as Mr. Honecker: Both spent years overseeing the Freie Deutsche Jugend, the youth group that is the communist regime's principal tool for stamping young Germans into socialist citizens.  More recently, Mr. Krenz has been in charge of East German security, and is the youngest member of the ruling Politburo.  Faced with another Mr. Honecker, so many despairing East Germans are likely to flee that the two German peoples will get their reunification, de facto, on West German ground.  But if East Germany's arthritic Politburo does loosen up enough to permit Mr. Krenz to make serious efforts at reform, he will face a challenge just as fundamental.  Abandoning socialism means abandoning the East German state's reason for existence, and with it the justification for its watchdogs and its Wall.  In this scenario it's hard to imagine that a pale imitation of the Federal Republic could avoid being pulled into some kind of tie -- economic, federal or stronger -- with West Germany.  Mr. Krenz may need a bit of time to consolidate his empire, which would do a lot to promote Reunification Scenario One.  Cartoonists in West Germany have already mocked the exodus by imagining an advertisement placed by Mr. Honecker: "Wanted: one people."  The West German embassies in Prague, Budapest and Warsaw are continuing to find refugees at their gates.  Of course East Germany, true to its tradition, could tighten its borders yet further.  Two of the last gestures of the Honecker regime were to close the border to Czechoslovakia and install halogen lights in some spots along the frontier.  But with world-wide opinion -- even, apparently in Moscow -- against East Germany, the country would have to turn itself into an Albania to clamp down further on refugees.  There have been some reports that Mr. Krenz is moving to "soften" his reputation, notably rumors that it was he who kept East Germany's state police off protesters' backs at the country's dismal 40th anniversary celebrations earlier this month.  But even if he effects a Hyde-to-Jekyll transformation, he will face a serious ideological crisis and Reunification Scenario Two.  The problem is one that East Germany shares with other half-states, such as North Korea, but one it must shoulder alone in the East Bloc.  When Poland moves to reform, it can at least lean on its past: However flawed and short-lived Joseph Pilsudski's interwar republic, it was a nonsocialist democracy.  Czech reformers can recall the Wilsonian ideals of the same period in their country.  Even the Soviet Union has Peter the Great to rediscover, should it choose to.  But East Germany is merely "the land of truly existing socialism."  Beyond that, it has to compete with West Germany for a claim to the German identity.  Up to now, the main weapon of the "worker and peasant state" has been the ideology of socialism.  With talk today of a second economic miracle in West Germany, East Germany no longer can content itself with being the economic star in a loser league.  Without Moscow's military and party behind it, East Germany runs the risk of disintegrating.  If it goes capitalist, and increases trade with West Germany, it will convert itself, willy-nilly, into an economic annex of the Federal Republic.  There's a certain cruel logic at work here: It's particularly appropriate -- and tragic -- that the land that produced Karl Marx should prove socialism's failure in an experiment that uses its own people as controls.  There may be forces that would delay this scenario.  Ideologues are the last to surrender, and Germans are an ideological people.  The protesters who greeted Mikhail Gorbachev at East Berlin's airport earlier this month weren't shouting "Go U.S.A" -- they were chanting "Gorby, Help Us."  Ideologues on the other side of the border can also slow the process.  Helmut Kohl's governing conservative coalition is proving admirably true to the West German constitution by making more than 500,000 people of German descent automatic citizens this year alone.  But within the government and in the think tanks outside it, many West Germans maintain that they don't want immediate reunification.  Politically, this currently is wisdom -- particularly given a nervous neighboring France.  But it would be ironic if Germany's reunification, just like its division, eventually were the result of actions in centers of power other than Bonn and Berlin.  In a statement that was as close as East Germany gets to practicing "glasnost", Otto Reinhold, an East German party theorist, actually acknowledged the reunification dilemma.  "The main problem," Mr. Reinhold said in an East German radio interview monitored by Radio Free Europe in Munich, stems from the fact that "the GDR is different" from other East European states.  "What kind of right to exist," he asked, "would a capitalist German Democratic Republic have alongside a capitalist Federal Republic?"  That's a question East Germany can't answer easily, no matter what its new leader does.  ---  Miss Shlaes is editorial features editor of The Wall Street Journal/Europe.  INSURERS ARE FACING billions of dollars in damage claims from the California quake.  But most businesses in the Bay area, including Silicon Valley, weren't greatly affected.  Computer and software companies in the region are expecting virtually no long-term disruption in shipments.  Also, investors quickly singled out stocks of companies expected to profit or suffer from the disaster.  ---  Leveraged buy-outs may be curbed by two rules in pending congressional legislation.  The provisions, in deficit-reduction bills recently passed by the House and Senate, could raise the price tags of such deals by up to 10% and cool the takeover boom.  A bill giving the Transportation Department the power to block airline leveraged buy-outs cleared a House panel.  But Secretary Skinner said he would urge Bush to veto the bill.  ---  Housing starts sank 5.2% in September to a seven-year low.  The drop, following a 6.2% decline in August, indicates the industry is still being hurt by the Fed's anti-inflation battle.  ---  IBM plans to buy back $1 billion of its common shares, a move likely to help the computer giant's battered stock.  The buy-back, which wasn't a complete surprise, was announced after the stock market had closed.  ---  A capital-gains tax cut plan has been worked out by Senate Republicans.  A similar proposal may be introduced soon by Senate Democrats.  ---  British Airways said it is seeking improved terms and a sharply lower price in any revised bid for United Air's parent.  The British carrier also confirmed it isn't committed to going forward with any new bid.  UAL's stock fell $6.25, to $191.75.  ---  Stock prices rose slightly as trading slowed, while bonds ended little changed despite a slumping dollar.  The Dow Jones industrials gained 4.92, to 2643.65.  But investors remain wary about stocks, partly because of turmoil in the junk-bond market.  --- B.A.T Industries may delay part of its defensive restructuring plan, including the sale of its Saks Fifth Avenue and Marshall Field units.  The British conglomerate cited the recent turmoil in financial markets.  ---  WCRS Group announced a major restructuring that largely removes it from the advertising business.  The London-based concern will sell most of its ad unit to France's Eurocom.  ---  Commodore International expects to post its second consecutive quarterly loss because of weak personal computer sales in some markets.  ---  Jaguar hopes to reach a friendly accord with General Motors within a month that may involve producing a cheaper executive model.  ---  Sears is negotiating to refinance its Sears Tower for close to $850 million, sources said.  The retailer was unable to find a buyer for the building.  ---  Whitbread of Britain put its spirits division up for sale, setting off a scramble among distillers.  The business includes Beefeater gin.  ---  Markets --  Stocks: Volume 166,900,000 shares.  Dow Jones industrials 2643.65, up 4.92; transportation 1247.87, off 6.40; utilities 213.97, off 0.57.  Bonds: Shearson Lehman Hutton Treasury index 3371.36, off 6.07.  Commodities: Dow Jones futures index 129.90, up 0.18; spot index 130.36, up 0.39.  Dollar: 141.45 yen, off 1.30; 1.8485 marks, off 0.0182.  The dollar finished softer yesterday, tilted lower by continued concern about the stock market.  "We're trading with a very wary eye on Wall Street," said Trevor Woodland, chief corporate trader at Harris Trust & Savings Bank in New York.  "No one is willing to place a firm bet that the stock market won't take another tumultuous ride."  News of the major earthquake in California Tuesday triggered a round of dollar sales in early Asian trade, but most foreign-exchange dealers said they expect the impact of the quake on financial markets to be short-lived.  Despite the dollar's lackluster performance, some foreign-exchange traders maintain that the U.S. unit remains relatively well bid.  Harris Trust's Mr. Woodland noted that the unit continues to show resilience in the face of a barrage of "headline negatives" in recent weeks, including rate increases in Europe and Japan, aggressive central bank intervention, a 190-point plunge in New York stock prices, an unexpectedly poor U.S. trade report and action by the Federal Reserve to nudge U.S. rates lower.  While Mr. Woodland doesn't predict a significant climb for the U.S. unit in light of recent moves in interest rates around the world, he noted that "its downside potential is surprisingly and -- for dollar bulls -- "impressively" limited.  In late New York trading yesterday, the dollar was quoted at 1.8485 marks, down from 1.8667 marks late Tuesday, and at 141.45 yen, down from 142.75 yen late Tuesday.  Sterling was quoted at $1.5920, up from $1.5753 late Tuesday.  In Tokyo Thursday, the U.S. currency opened for trading at 140.97 yen, down from Wednesday's Tokyo close of 142.10 yen.  Since Friday's dive in stock market prices, the Fed has injected reserves into the banking system in an effort to calm the markets and avert a repeat of 1987's stock market debacle.  Some analysts note that after last week's stock market tailspin and Tuesday's California earthquake, it's hard to gauge where the central bank wants the key federal funds rate.  They say that the earthquake, by preventing many banks from operating at full capacity, has given the Fed an additional reason to keep liquidity at a high level.  The Fed did, in fact, execute $1.5 billion of liquidity-enhancing customer repurchase agreements, the third set of repurchase orders in three days.  Analysts said the additional liquidity should tend to reduce the federal funds rate.  For now, traders say the foreign exchange market is scrutinizing both federal funds and events on Wall Street.  They note that the dollar remains extremely vulnerable to the slightest bad news from the stock exchange.  Indeed, the U.S. unit edged lower as the Dow Jones Industrial Average dropped about 13 points in early trading.  A slight recovery in the stock market gave currency traders confidence to push the dollar higher before the unit dropped back by day's end.  Some dealers noted that nervousness over the recent sharp dive in stock prices could intensify following suggestions by Bank of Japan Governor Satoshi Sumita that appeared to advise Japanese investors to be very careful in investing in U.S. leveraged buy-outs.  Dealers suggest that the only positive news on the horizon that could detract attention from equities transactions is September's U.S. consumer price data.  The figures, due for release Friday, are expected to show an uptick in inflation to 4.8% from 4.7% in August.  If the figures show a hefty rise in inflation, they could militate against easing by the Fed.  On the Commodity Exchange in New York, gold for current delivery rose $1.30 to $368.70 an ounce in moderate trading.  Estimated volume was three million ounces.  In early trading in Hong Kong Thursday, gold was at $368.15 an ounce.  Crude prices spurted upward in brisk trading on the assumption that heavy earthquake damage occurred to San Francisco area refinery complexes, but the rise quickly fizzled when it became apparent that oil operations weren't severely curtailed.  Trading on little specific information, market players overnight in Tokyo began bidding up oil prices.  The rally spread into European markets, where traders were still betting that the earthquake disrupted the San Francisco area's large oil refining plants.  By yesterday morning, much of the world was still unable to reach San Francisco by telephone.  West Texas Intermediate was bid up more than 20 cents a barrel in many overseas markets.  At the opening of the New York Mercantile Exchange, West Texas Intermediate for November delivery shot up 10 cents a barrel, to $20.85, still on the belief that the refineries were damaged.  In the San Francisco area, roughly 800,000 barrels a day of crude, about a third of all the refining capacity in California, is processed daily, according to industry data.  For more than the past year, even the rumor of a major West Coast refinery shutdown has been enough to spark a futures rally because the gasoline market is so tight.  But yesterday, as the morning wore on, some major West Coast refinery operators -- including Chevron Corp., Exxon Corp. and the Shell Oil Co. unit of Royal Dutch/Shell Group -- said their refineries weren't damaged and were continuing to operate normally.  Most said they shut down their petroleum pipeline operations as a precaution but didn't see any immediate damage.  Gasoline terminals were also largely unhurt, they said.  "It's hard to imagine how the markets were speculating, given that nobody could get through to San Francisco," said one amazed oil company executive.  As the news spread that the refineries were intact, crude prices plunged, ending the day at $20.56 a barrel, down 19 cents.  Gasoline for November delivery was off 1.26 cents a gallon to 54.58 cents.  Heating oil finished at 60.6 cents, down 0.45 cent.  "The market was basically acting on two contradictory forces," said Nauman Barakat of Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc.  "One is the panic, the earthquake in San Francisco, which is positive."  But once that factor was eliminated, traders took profits and focused on crude oil inventories, Mr. Barakat said.  After the market closed Tuesday, the American Petroleum Institute had reported that crude stocks increased by 5.7 million barrels in the week ended Friday, which traders viewed as bearish.  But some market players still think earthquake speculation could have more impact on the oil markets.  "The problem is that while on the surface everything is all right, the question is," said Mr. Barakat, "was there any structural damage to the pipelines or anything else."  In other commodity markets yesterday:  COPPER: Futures prices eased on indications of improvement in the industry's labor situation.  The December contract declined 1.85 cents a pound to $1.2645.  According to one analyst, workers at the Cananea copper mine in Mexico, which hasn't been operating since it was declared bankrupt by the Mexican government in late August, are set to return to work.  The analyst said it will take about two to three months before the mine begins to produce copper in significant quantities.  He added that, while there hasn't been any official announcement as yet, the Highland Valley mine strike in British Columbia, which has lasted more than three months, is regarded as settled.  Another analyst said the Cananea return to operation may not be as near as some expect.  "There are still negotiations taking place on whether there will be a loss of jobs, which has been a critical issue all along," he said.  Nevertheless, the increasing likelihood that these two major supply disruptions will be resolved weighed on the market, the analysts agreed.  Both of these mines are normally major suppliers of copper to Japan, which has been buying copper on the world market.  The first analyst said that the Japanese, as well as the Chinese, bought copper earlier in the week in London, but that this purchasing has since slackened as the supply situation, at least over the long term, appears to have improved.  "The focus for some time has been on the copper supply, and good demand has been taken for granted," he said.  "Now that the supply situation seems to be improving, it would be best for traders to switch their concentration to the demand side."  He noted the Commerce Department report yesterday that housing starts in September dropped 5.2% from August to 1.26 million units on an annualized basis, the lowest level in seven years.  "Along with these factors, other economic reports suggest a slowing of the economy, which could mean reduced copper usage," he said.  SUGAR: Futures prices extended Tuesday's gains.  The March delivery ended with an advance of 0.16 cent a pound to 14.27 cents, for a two-day gain of 0.3 cent.  According to one dealer, Japan said it has only 40,000 tons of sugar remaining to be shipped to it this year by Cuba under current commitments.  The announcement was made because of reports Tuesday that Cuba would delay shipments to Japan scheduled for later this year, into early next year.  The dealer said the quantity mentioned in the Japanese announcement is so small that it's meaningless.  One analyst said he thought the market continued to be supported to some degree by a delay in the Cuban sugar harvest caused by adverse weather.  The dealer said India might be the real factor that is keeping futures prices firm.  That country recently bought 200,000 tons of sugar and had been expected to seek a like quantity last week but didn't.  "It's known they need the sugar, and the expectation that they will come in is apparently giving the market its principal support," the dealer said.  LIVESTOCK AND MEATS: The Agriculture Department is expected to announce tomorrow that the number of cattle in the 13 major ranch states slipped 4% to 8.21 million on Oct. 1 compared with the level a year earlier, said Tom Morgan, president of Sterling Research Corp., Arlington Heights, Ill.  Cattle prices have risen in recent weeks on speculation that the government's quarterly report will signal tighter supplies of beef.  Among other things, the government is expected to report that the number of young cattle placed on feedlots during the quarter slipped 3%.  Feedlots fatten cattle for slaughter, so a drop indicates that the production of beef will dip this winter.  Indeed, some analysts expect the government to report that the movement of young cattle onto feedlots in the month of September in seven big ranch states dropped 8% compared with the level for September 1988.  The following issues were recently filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission:  Health Care Property Investors Inc., offering of 2,250,000 shares of common stock, via Merrill Lynch Capital Markets, Alex.  Brown & Sons Inc. and Dean Witter Reynolds Inc.  Union Pacific Corp., shelf offering of up to $500 million debt securities and warrants.  United Technologies Corp., shelf offering of up to $500 million unsubordinated non-convertible unsecured debt securities.  A new drug to prevent the rejection of transplanted organs has been successfully used on more than 100 patients at the University of Pittsburgh, according to researchers.  The drug, which is still in the experimental phase, hasn't been approved yet by the Food and Drug Admistration, and its long-term effects are unknown.  But researchers say the drug, called FK-506, could revolutionize the transplantation field by reducing harmful side effects and by lowering rejection rates.  Rejection has been the major obstacle in the approximately 30,000 organ transplants performed world-wide each year.  Researchers began using the drug in February on patients who had received kidney, liver, heart and pancreas transplants.  Only two of 111 transplants have been rejected.  The drug, discovered in 1984, is metabolized from soil fungus found in Japan.  The Pittsburgh patients are the first humans to be given the drug, which is made by Fujisawa Pharmaceutical Co.  "We're shocked by it, because it's worked so fast," said Dr. Thomas E. Starzl, director of the University of Pittsburgh Transplantation Program, at a news conference here yesterday.  "We consider it a life-saving drug, like one for AIDS," said Dr. John Fung, an immunologist at the University of Pittsburgh.  Researchers say they believe FK-506 is 100 times more effective than the traditional anti-rejection drug, cyclosporine, made by Swiss pharmaceutical giant Sandoz Ltd.  They are also encouraged by the relatively mild side effects of FK-506, compared with cyclosporine, which can cause renal failure, morbidity, nausea and other problems.  "The side effects {of cyclosporine} have made the penalty for its success rather high," Dr. Starzl said.  Dr. Fung said that FK-506 would not be available in the market for at least a year, and that the FDA approval process usually takes three years to five years.  There are no firm plans to expand the experimental program beyond the University of Pittsburgh, whose hospital performs the most transplants in the world.  Researchers couldn't estimate the cost of the drug when it reaches the market, but they said FK-506 will enable patients to cut hospital stays by 50% and reduce the number of blood tests used to monitor the dosage of cyclosporine and other drugs among transplant recipients.  Dr. Starzl said the research has been largely financed by the National Institute of Health and by university funds, and that Fujisawa didn't give the hospital any grants.  He said that the research team had no financial stake in the drug.  "We've known for six months the effect of this drug, and our advice to our people has been not to buy the company's stock," Dr. Starzl said, adding that profiting from FK-506 wouldn't be ethical.  Economist David N. Laband's Sept. 27 editorial-page article, "In Hugo's Path, a Man-Made Disaster," decries the control of price gouging, swiftly ordered by South Carolina's governor after Hurricane Hugo.  According to Mr. Laband, "screaming" for price controls occurs when income redistribution "threatens to hit home."  To be sure, the threat has hit home down here.  Yet in Mr. Laband's rehash of free-market logic, human greed and self-interest are the only permissible psychological reactions.  Allowing uncontrolled prices for necessities would indeed shorten the lines at stores, as he contends.  But not because resources are going to their most efficient use, leaving scarce goods "allocated to those buyers who place the highest value on them."  Rather, lines would diminish because at higher prices many victims could not afford necessities such as food and medical supplies.  It is inhumane to imply that a poor, unemployed woman cannot receive immediate relief for her family at fair prices because she does not have as much to protect as a rich family.  Moreover, essential relief supplies such as ice must be distributed throughout the population because of potential health problems from spoiled food and possible outbreak of disease.  Such spillover effects give the state a right to intervene in the marketplace and temporarily coordinate allocation of resources.  Fortunately, volunteers and charities are not motivated by self-interest, but by altruism.  Why should they have to co-exist with opportunists rushing in to turn a quick profit?  These latter-day scalawags would be ill-advised to take advantage of the situation, if they ever expect to face the people of South Carolina again.  The government is actually protecting avaricious ice-baggers and other profiteers who cannot see beyond their own short-term gain.  South Carolina deserves an A for its quick and timely relief efforts.  Mr. Laband, meanwhile, gets an A for his rote recital of economic-efficiency arguments.  Give him an F for his failure to understand the ethics of economic equity.  Signed by 25 students  Of Douglas Woodward's Honors Economics Class,  University of South Carolina  Columbia, S.C.  ---  Mr. Laband gives us an idea why economists' predictions are usually wrong.  They set up absurd situations, detached from reality, and then try to reason from them.  I'm surprised he didn't advocate letting people loot, since that behavior can also be foreseen in a disaster and "every individual has an incentive to alter the distribution of income in his favor."  Price controls were "so fervently embraced by Charleston" because price gouging in this situation is equivalent to looting.  Suzanne Foster  Galax, Va.  ---  Mr. Laband described one of the more insidious threats we face when dealing with disasters such as Hugo -- anti-profiteering ordinances such as that by the Charleston City Council as it thrashed about trying to Do Something.  Since he concentrated on the economic folly of such ordinances, he didn't mention certain other of their effects.  They divert law-enforcement resources at a time they are most needed for protecting lives and property.  Also, rather than increase supplies, they reduce them and encourage hoarding.  And they, or even the prospect of them, discourage disaster preparedness in the form of speculative advance stocking of supplies by merchants.  N. Joseph Potts  Miami Lakes, Fla.  ---  Would Mr. Laband also suggest that the Red Cross, Salvation Army, military units, police, fire departments, rescue units and individual citizens cease their efforts to assist Hugo's victims because they interfere with his concept of the "free market"?  What about those caring people all over the country who are donating food, water and other necessities of life to these people who could be any of us?  Should they, too, stop "messing with" his free market?  Maybe he thinks they should also sell to the highest bidder.  And what about insurance firms?  Should they be required to pay claims based on exorbitant costs for labor and materials?  Mr. Laband should beware, since he lives in South Carolina.  In a free market, his insurance rates can be raised to recover insurance-company losses.  John W. Rush  Marietta, Ga.  ---  Having been through several tornadoes and hurricanes, I have a different perspective.  Mine comes from seeing thriving communities devastated -- but only temporarily.  Their recovery came surprisingly fast, and always with the help of neighbors.  The shock of seeing homes destroyed and city services disrupted may cause some to confuse priorities such as the true economic value of a freezer full of meat.  In Texas after Hurricane Alicia, major grocery chains used their truck fleets to ship essential goods to Houston, no gouging, just good will.  Tom Mongan  Victoria, Texas  ---  We here in the affected areas were dazzled by Mr. Laband's analysis of time values and his comparisons of effectiveness concerning research and development.  His theoretical approach and its publication in this venerable paper are no doubt a noteworthy accomplishment for him.  Too bad theory fails in practice.  We consumers tend to have long memories.  The businesses subscribing to Mr. Laband's effective price system will be remembered when normalcy returns.  Perhaps, considering the value of our time, we will be unable to patronize their establishments in the post-Hugo era.  I have a question for Mr. Laband: How do I explain to the single mother of three standing in line next to me for the past three hours that the two bags of ice she needs to keep her children's food edible will take her last $20?  I'm sure she'll appreciate what an efficient reaction to her problems the price system has created.  Chris Edgar  Myrtle Beach, S.C.  This seems to be the season for revivals in Chicago.  Though the Cubs' championship season ended with the National League playoffs, a revival of the Organic Theater's production of "Bleacher Bums," a play in nine innings set in the Wrigley Field bleachers, continues within spitting distance of the ballpark.  Revivals of a different sort also are being offered by our two major theater troupes, the Goodman and Steppenwolf.  Each is more problematic than an unexpected divisional baseball championship, but both help explain why Chicago remains a vital center of this country's regional theater movement.  The Goodman is offering a modernized version of Moliere's "The Misanthrope" through Nov. 4.  The original is a comedy about Alceste, a man who sees falseness and vanity in everyone except himself.  He is the jealous friend of Philinte, and the jealous lover of Celimene.  The play is filled with intrigue, dishonesty and injustice.  Twenty-five years ago the poet Richard Wilbur modernized this 17th-century comedy merely by avoiding "the zounds sort of thing," as he wrote in his introduction.  Otherwise, the scene remained Celimene's house in 1666.  Assuming modern audiences readily understand that Moliere's social indictment covers their world as well as 17th-century Paris, Mr. Wilbur concentrated his formidable artistry on rendering the Alexandrine French verse into sprightly and theatrical English iambic pentameter.  The Wilbur translation is remarkable -- well worth a read and even better seen in the theater if you ever have the opportunity.  But if you happen to be coming to Chicago in the next few weeks, don't fail to have a look at Robert Falls's "The Misanthrope" at the Goodman.  If Mr. Wilbur's translation is a finely ground lens through which we see the pettiness and corruption of 17th-century Paris, Mr. Falls's production is a mirror in which we see ourselves.  Mr. Falls, the Goodman's artistic director, took a recent adaptation by Neil Bartlett and significantly adapted it.  Mr. Bartlett had slimmed Moliere's cast of characters to six and set them in the London media world of Thatcherite Britain.  Mr. Falls transfers the setting to Hollywood, and transforms the characters into what passes for aristocracy there -- agents, producers, actors, writers and sycophants.  It works.  Mr. Bartlett managed to more or less maintain Moliere's Alexandrine verse form, 12 syllable lines in rhyming couplets.  Mr. Falls kept the form, but Americanized it with Mr. Bartlett's further help.  With a splendid cast led by David Darlow as Alceste, Christina Haag as Celimene and, especially, William Brown as a Philinte who plays the Hollywood game but harbors authentic values and feelings, the Goodman production barrels through an all-night Hollywood party with exuberance and wit.  If this version, with its references to Steven Spielberg, Spago and "thirtysomething" attracts younger audiences who might stay away from the classical version, then Messrs.  Bartlett and Falls are justified in abandoning Mr. Wilbur.  A 300-year-old play may be easier to revive than one merely 25.  The Steppenwolf Theatre Company, back from a critical and box office success in London with its adaptation of Steinbeck's "The Grapes of Wrath," opened the new season with Harold Pinter's "The Homecoming," first produced by the Royal Shakespeare Company in 1965.  Back then, Mr. Pinter was not only the angry young British playwright, but also the first to use silences and sentence fragments and menacing stares, almost to the exclusion of what we previously understood to be theatrical dialogue.  When "The Homecoming" was first produced on this side of the Atlantic, actors and directors were reverential.  Silences were lengthy -- nobody moved or gestured.  Nobody smiled onstage, and nobody in the audience was encouraged to laugh.  This kind of theater was new to us.  Also, it was not a funny time over here, what with the Vietnam War, the '68 Democratic convention, assassinations and riots.  But under Jerry Perry's direction the current Steppenwolf production, scheduled to play through Nov. 19, breaks through the flat and boring ritual that "The Homecoming" had become.  Led by a near-perfect performance by Alan Wilder as Max, the father, the play is at once an appalling and hilarious dissection of a family's rage, bitterness, fear and isolation.  Encouraged by Mr. Wilder's sly grins, embarrassed grimaces and sputtering rages, the audience gets the joke and begins to laugh before the end of the first act.  Three of the family members, Max and his two sons, Lenny and Joey, live off the flesh: Max is a retired butcher, Lenny a pimp and Joey an aspiring boxer.  Sam, Max's brother, has escaped the flesh by working as a liveried chauffeur and never seeking a wife.  Teddy, the eldest of Max's sons, has made the most dramatic escape by becoming a professor of philosophy at an American university.  Though it's clearly Max's wife who held sway here until her death, now none of the other male residents of this misbegotten household can challenge Max.  The play concerns Teddy's homecoming with his wife of six years, Ruth.  Curiously, Randall Arney as Teddy seems the only cast member unable to get beyond the zombie approach to a Pinter character.  As Ruth, Moira Harris, a large and beautiful woman who may be our next Colleen Dewhurst, begins almost immediately to overpower each of the men.  In the end, Teddy returns alone to America, leaving Ruth in Max's chair.  We have seen her develop within a few hours from a shy and unknown in-law to a goddess of the flesh who will replace the dead mother, and then some.  While Steppenwolf was in London with "The Grapes of Wrath," Bruce Sagan, the president of its board of directors, quietly returned to Chicago to buy a piece of real estate in the city's rapidly reviving North Halsted Street restaurant and theater district.  Within a year he hopes Steppenwolf will move into a new 500-seat theater on that site.  The troupe currently performs in a converted dairy that seats 211 and provides little capacity for staging anything beyond a simple one-set production.  "If we wanted to stage `Death of a Salesman,' " Mr. Sagan says, "Willie Loman would have to live in a ranch house because of the low ceiling."  Steppenwolf needs the extra seats even more than the fly space.  It's currently forced to turn away many potential subscribers beyond the 13,000 who can be accommodated in its present digs.  For all the attention that Chicago theater has received during the past decade, not one new building has been devoted to it.  Mr. Sagan, a former publisher and real estate developer, has put together an $8 million financial package that includes approximately $4 million of tax exempt bonds issued by the State of Illinois (the first time that a state has used its educational facilities authority to support construction of a theater), and approximately $1 million in grants from the National Endowment for the Arts, the MacArthur Foundation, and a few other deep pockets.  The rest, he is confident, can be raised.  His board members alone have pledged $800,000 and he is just beginning to massage local foundations and corporations.  Mr. Sagan compares the importance of Steppenwolf with Orson Welles's Mercury Theater in the '30s.  But Welles's theater company turned out to have a brief -- one might say a mercurial -- existence.  What will Mr. Sagan do with his new theater building if the allure of Hollywood and Broadway proves too much for such Steppenwolf stalwarts as John Malkovich ("Dangerous Liaisons"), Joan Allen ("The Heidi Chronicles"), and Glenne Headly ("Lonesome Dove"), and the company crumbles?  "That's OK," Mr. Sagan replies.  "Let this building be Steppenwolf's legacy to Chicago theater."  ---  Mr. Henning is a Chicago-based law firm management consultant and a writer.  After enduring three days of heavy selling, the beleaguered Nasdaq over-the-counter market finally rebounded, rising sharply in hearty trading.  The Nasdaq Composite Index jumped 0.7%, or 3.35, to 463.28.  It rose more than the New York Stock Exchange Composite, which improved 0.2%.  Among bigger stocks, the Nasdaq 100 Index rose 1%, or 4.56, to 453.05, while the Dow Jones Industrial Average was up 0.2%.  Richard Bruno, head of OTC trading at PaineWebber, said the OTC market has a habit of lagging big moves on the New York Stock Exchange.  While the industrial average rallied on Monday following last Friday's collapse, the OTC market, which didn't suffer too badly during the correction, tumbled.  "Our market got hit a lot harder on Monday than the listed market," Mr. Bruno said.  "We're just recovering and getting back to business as usual.  I'm encouraged by the action."  The trading pace was busy, with 4,343 issues and 147.6 million shares changing hands.  Advancing issues beat declining ones, 1,271 to 811.  Much of the jockeying by OTC traders and investors centered on shares of companies that might be financially affected by damage from the devastating earthquake in northern California.  As investors speculated about the long- and short-term implications, shares of a number of companies that might either profit or face problems because of the disaster were actively traded.  Heading the list: insurance, construction and technology companies located in the San Francisco Bay Area.  Insurance-related stocks were mixed as investors tried to figure out how to assess the impact of the property damage and deaths on those concerns.  Traders said property-casualty companies with the heaviest exposure in the San Francisco area include the OTC's Safeco and Ohio Casualty.  Frank Gilmartin, a trader who follows insurance stocks for Fox-Pitt Kelton, said his strategy was to sell early.  Then, if the stocks fell sharply, he planned to begin buying them aggressively, on the theory that the companies that insure against property damage and accidents will have to raise rates eventually to compensate for the claims they will pay to earthquake victims and victims of last month's Hurricane Hugo.  As well, reinsurers and insurance brokerage companies will have improved profits.  Many investors expected damage from the hurricane to be the catalyst for higher rates in the industry, which has been depressed because of low rates arising from intense competition.  But Mr. Gilmartin said the hurricane damage wasn't extensive enough to prompt premium boosts.  "The companies just gave back what they had reserved for," he said.  "Now, they'll have to increase their coffers to protect for the future and that means rate increases."  Overall OTC insurance issues were mixed.  Safeco fell 1/8 to 32 5/8 on 462,900 shares.  Ohio Casualty rose 1/4 to 51 3/4 on 137,200 shares.  St. Paul Cos. jumped 2 to 59 3/4 on 517,500 shares.  Academy Insurance fell 1/32 to 1 3/16; but volume totaled 1.2 million shares.  The Nasdaq Insurance Index jumped 4.15 to 529.32 on the day, while the barometer of big insurance and banking issues climbed 1.72 to 455.29.  Investors expect SunGard Data Systems, a company that provides disaster recovery services for computer-dependent businesses, to profit from the earthquake.  SunGard's stock rose 1 3/4 to 21 1/4 on 194,000 shares.  Shares of Kasler, a California road and bridge builder, were heavily traded, jumping 2 1/8 to 9 7/8 on 1.3 million shares.  Guy F. Atkinson added 7/8 to 16 7/8, on 335,700 shares.  The company, based in San Francisco, provides industrial infrastructure engineering and construction services.  Traders were initially nervous about shares of companies, including many leading OTC computer companies, such as Apple Computer with offices in the vicinity of the area damaged by the quake.  But most of those stocks fared well.  Apple Computer gained 1 to 48 1/4; Ashton-Tate rose 3/8 to 10 3/8.  Intel also added 3/8 to 33 7/8.  But Sun Microsystems slipped 1/4 to 17 1/4.  Shares of biotechnology companies in the area were also higher.  Chiron was up 1/2 to 27 and Cetus gained 1/2 to 16 3/8.  The stocks of computer-related companies located outside California improved, too.  Microsoft advanced 1 7/8 to 80 1/2 and Lotus Development added 1 1/4 to 32 1/2.  In other earthquake-related news, Hambrecht & Quist's OTC market makers were excused from trading yesterday and its positions were frozen for the day by the National Association of Securities Dealers.  Power couldn't be restored at the company's San Francisco headquarters to allow trading yesterday morning.  In New York, Roger Killion, a Hambrecht executive vice president, said he expects OTC trading at the company to resume this morning, either in New York or in San Francisco.  In other trading, Medco Containment Services gained 7/8 to 15 on 1.9 million shares after reporting a loss for the first quarter, which ended Sept. 30.  The company earned $6.6 million in the year-earlier quarter.  Jaguar's American depositary receipts added 3/8 to 10 3/4 on volume of 1.1 million.  Analysts in London believe investors, despite their stampede to dump takeover stocks, should hold on tight to their Jaguar shares, this newspaper's Heard on the Street column said yesterday.  Amgen rose 1 1/2 to 50 3/4 in heavy trading.  Analysts figure Amgen could benefit as a result of troubles facing its competitor, Genetics Institute, over the anti-anemia drug EPO. Genetics Institute disclosed recently that it is embroiled in a dispute with Boehringer Mannheim, which distributes the drug, regarding the usability of some batches.  Ciba-Geigy Ltd. and Chiron Corp. said they extended their offer for Connaught BioSciences Inc., valued at 866 million Canadian dollars (US$736 million) to Oct. 27.  The companies earlier said they didn't want to raise their offer to match a rival bid by Institut Merieux S.A. of C$37 a share, or C$942 million.  But they said the C$30-a-share bid, which was due to expire Monday, may still be extended or varied.  Merieux, a vaccine manufacturer based in Lyon, France, is 51%-held by French state-owned Rhone-Poulenc S.A. Ciba-Geigy is a major pharmaceutical concern based in Basel, Switzerland.  Chiron, another pharmaceutical concern, is based in Emeryville, Calif.  Connaught is a biotechnology research and vaccine manufacturing concern.  Institut Merieux's bid for Toronto-based Connaught has run into problems with the Canadian government, which told Merieux last week that it wasn't convinced that the proposed acquisition would be of "net benefit" to Canada.  Merieux officials are expected to meet with federal officials in Ottawa today to discuss the decision.  Within minutes after the stock market closed Friday, I called Sen. Bill Bradley of New Jersey, advised him that the Dow Jones Industrial Average had declined by 190 points late that afternoon, and cheerfully informed him that he and his fellow Democrats were to blame.  They had dealt a major setback that afternoon to President Bush's capital-gains tax cut proposal, which had seemed in the bag after it passed the House overwhelmingly earlier in the month.  Sen. Bradley has it in his mind that such a tax cut would unravel the tax reform he helped engineer in 1986.  But he knows that as many as 20 of his fellow Democrats are disposed to vote for the cut, popular among their constituents.  As a result, he took the lead in arguing that the cut should be blocked on procedural grounds.  He helped persuade 10 of these senators to support him and Majority Leader George Mitchell on these grounds.  The budget reconciliation had to be dealt with by the Oct. 15 deadline, and these Senate Democrats refused to agree to allow a vote to append capital gains to the budget bill, knowing it would pass.  Denied a vote on substance, the GOP leadership in the Senate on Friday morning was confronted with a hard choice.  It could throw in the towel and hope to win on capital gains late this month, or it could follow the White House strategy, to veto reconciliation unless capital gains was appended.  The U.S. Chamber of Commerce has been in the forefront in supporting the Bush proposal.  It endorsed the White House strategy, believing it to be the surest way to victory.  At noon Friday, a senior White House official advised Richard Rahn, the Chamber's chief economist, that the White House would not agree to a budget reconciliation bill unless it had firm assurances that a vote on substance would be permitted in the Senate.  Two hours later, the first word emerged on Capitol Hill that the administration had agreed to reconciliation with no such assurances from Senate Democrats.  Mr. Rahn was shocked, telephoning the office of Richard Darman, director of the Office of Management and Budget, and the administration's chief strategist on this issue.  He left a message accusing Mr. Darman of selling out.  It was the Senate Republicans, though, who had edged away from the veto strategy.  The stock market reacted as Mr. Rahn did, crumbling as it absorbed the news that Mr. Darman's strategy had been abandoned.  The stock market, after all, represents the collective expectations about the value of the future income stream of the nation's capital stock, discounted to present value.  Why should it be so surprising that a 30% cut in the capital-gains tax would have such an enormous impact on the value of the nation's capital stock?  The total value of privately held assets is easily more than $15 trillion.  The value traded on the exchanges is close to $3 trillion.  If the tax on any gain to those assets was doubled, wouldn't the value fall to the owners of the assets?  Isn't it reasonable to assume that the asset you own would be worth more if the government suddenly announced that if you sold it, you would be able to keep 30% more of its gain than you previously believed?  Indeed, the stock market's steady advance this year tracked with President Bush's success in advancing his capital-gains proposal.  A 30% cut in this year's capital gains alone amounts to roughly $50 billion.  We're talking real money.  When Richard Rahn advised the financial press that the market crash was caused by the setback to capital gains, he was generally ignored and mildly ridiculed.  Instead, the press corps readily accepted the notion that a snag in the takeover financing of United Airlines instantly knocked 7% off the value of the nation's capital stock and caused convulsions around the world.  Mr. Rahn was pointing out an elephant rumbling through Wall Street while conventional wisdom had fastened on the UAL flea.  Why is this happening?  For one thing, quite a number of the leading spokesmen on Wall Street are not portfolio managers, who understand that the value of assets is greatly affected by how government taxes those assets.  They are economists and financial reporters who sympathize with the view that a capital-gains tax cut benefits the rich.  Yet they somehow think that Wall Street is indifferent to losing the tax cut that seemed so close Friday morning and is now problematic.  The market rebound Monday followed weekend assurances from Mr. Darman that the administration has other plans to win the cut, which is alive and well.  Sen. Bradley's argument is that a capital-gains tax cut would be bad for the economy in the longer run.  It would inevitably lead to an increase in marginal income-tax rates in 1990, he thinks, when the White House is forced to ask for higher taxes to meet budget targets.  That is, with capital gains cut, the glue of the 1986 accord will be gone, and political realities will push up income-tax rates.  The counter-argument, which he has heard, is that if he and his fellow Democrats are successful in killing the president's proposal, the revenue gap will open up tremendously in 1990 because of the weakened economy.  In this atmosphere, there would be no serious consideration of tax increases.  If Sen. Bradley would permit a vote on capital gains, though, it would pass, Christmas retail sales would be strong instead of burdened by a falling stock market, the 1990 economy would be robust, and the revenue gains at every level of government, including New Jersey's, would be surprisingly high.  No tax increases would be necessary.  The struggle over capital gains is the most important game in town.  In Washington and on Wall Street.  ---  Mr. Wanniski is president of Polyconomics Inc., of Morristown, N.J.  Federal prosecutors said they have obtained a guilty plea from another person in the government's ongoing probe of illegal payments in the record industry.  William Craig, an independent record promoter, pleaded guilty to payola and criminal tax charges, according to a statement issued by Gary Feess, the U.S. attorney here.  Payola is the practice of making illegal, undisclosed payments to radio station personnel in return for getting the stations to play certain songs over the air.  As part of his plea agreement with the government, the 44-year-old Mr. Craig faces a maximum of three years in prison.  In return, Mr. Craig agreed to cooperate in the government's continuing payola probe, says a spokeswoman for the U.S. attorney's office.  Mr. Craig and three others were indicted last year as part of that payola probe.  Two other defendants previously pleaded guilty, and charges against the third were dropped.  Companies listed below reported quarterly profit substantially different from the average of analysts' estimates.  The companies are followed by at least three analysts, and had a minimum five-cent change in actual earnings per share.  Estimated and actual results involving losses are omitted.  The percent difference compares actual profit with the 30-day estimate where at least three analysts have issues forecasts in the past 30 days.  Otherwise, actual profit is compared with the 300-day estimate.  @ ESTIMATE  @ (# of analysts)  @ ACTUAL --------------- %  @ COMPANY NAME EPS 30-DAY 300-DAY DIFF.  @ POSITIVE  @ Nicor Inc. $.11 ... $.04 (4) 175.00  @ Oshkosh B'Gosh .96 ... .69 (6) 39.13  @ Huffy Corp. .41 ... .32 (4) 28.13  @ Lukens Inc. 1.31 ... 1.04 (4) 25.96  @ Phelps Dodge.  Co. 3.26 ... 2.70 (11) 20.74  @ Morgan Stanley 2.54 ... 2.23 (7) 13.90  @ Vitalink Comm .30 ... .27 (5) 11.11  @ Archer-Daniels .63 ... .57 (6) 10.53  @ Hawaiian Elec .88 ... .81 (5) 8.64  @ Honeywell Inc. 1.73 ... 1.61 (12) 7.45  @ Bruno's Inc. .16 ... .15 (5) 6.67  @ NEGATIVE  @ Coca Cola Enrp $.06 $.12 (4) $.14 (5) 50.00  @ Sprins Indus .74 .86 (5) .91 (9) 13.95  @ Pioneer Standard .15 ... .23 (3) 34.78  @ Envirosafe Svc .21 ... .31 (3) 32.26  @ Northwest Nat Gas (.26) ... (.20) (5) 30.00  @ TJ Intl Inc. .75 ... 1.01 (3) 25.74  @ Dennison Mfg Co .44 ... .57 (4) 22.81  @ Goodrich (BF) & Co 1.46 ... 1.85 (8) 21.08  @ Birmingham Steel .63 ... .75 (7) 16.00  @ Heard Fed S&L .38 ... .44 (3) 13.64  @ Cullen Frost Bk .09 ... .10 (4) 10.00  @ Aristech Chem .64 ... .71 (7) 9.86  @ Southwstrn Bell .98 ... 1.07 (11) 8.41  @ Alltel Corp .55 ... .60 (4) 8.33  @ V F Corp .80 ... .87 (7) 8.05  @ Concept Inc. .15 ... .16 (5) 6.25  @ PNC Financial 1.33 ... 1.41 (3) 5.67  @ Banc One Corp. .70 ... .74 (11) 5.41  Source: Zacks Investment Research  Grumman Corp. was awarded a $53.1 million Navy contract for advanced acquisition of six E-2C tactical control aircraft.  LTV Corp. won a $25 million Army contract for missile test equipment.  Unisys Corp. received a $24.4 million Air Force contract for computer programming.  Ford Aerospace & Communications Corp., a unit of Ford Motor Co., was awarded a $15.9 million Air Force contract for computer improvements.  Rockwell International Corp. was issued a $12.5 million Air Force contract for changes in the National Aerospace Plane.  The Tennessee Valley Authority issued $4 billion in bonds in the federal utility's first public debt offering in 15 years.  Proceeds from the bonds, with coupon rates in the 8% range, will be used to replace bonds with an average interest rate of 13.1%.  The TVA said the refinancing should save $75 million a year in interest payments.  The refinancing is part of the TVA's strategy of dealing with what has been an intractable problem: its staggering $18.5 billion debt, most of which is owed to the Treasury Department's Federal Financing Bank.  The TVA currently plans to issue a total of $6.7 billion in bonds to refinance its high-interest debt.  The $4 billion bond issue also will help the TVA meet its goal of not raising rates for another year, said William F. Malec, the agency's chief financial officer.  The bond issue is TVA's first public offering since the Financing Bank was created in 1974, primarily to finance the TVA.  But the offering almost didn't happen.  The TVA, in fact, decided to proceed with the bond offering following an agreement last week with the Financing Bank, which allows TVA to keep borrowing short term from the bank for two years after it goes to the public market.  The Treasury contended that TVA couldn't borrow from both it and the public debt market.  The $4 billion in bonds break down as follows: $1 billion in five-year bonds with a coupon rate of 8.25% and a yield to maturity of 8.33%; $1 billion in 10-year bonds with a coupon rate of 8.375% and a yield to maturity of 8.42%; $2 billion in 30-year bonds with five-year call protection, a coupon rate of 8.75% and a yield to maturity of 9.06%.  Managing the bond issue is a group of investment banks headed by First Boston Corp. and co-managed by Goldman, Sachs & Co., Merrill Lynch Capital Markets, Morgan Stanley & Co., and Salomon Brothers Inc.  Mutual-fund czar John M. Templeton has put his money where his moniker is, pouring $1.4 million into one of his own funds, the Templeton Value Fund.  Mr. Templeton owns shares in several of the 33 funds that his firm manages, but only in three of the 10 available to U.S. investors, according to filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission.  Those are Templeton Global Income, Templeton Emerging Markets and now the Value Fund.  Why did he add the Value Fund to the list?  Because he's very bullish on the emerging growth stocks that make up the fund's portfolio, Mr. Templeton said from his Bahamas hideaway.  "Emerging growth stocks haven't been popular in America for years, they've been neglected," he said, and their prices often trail the market as a whole.  Mr. Templeton's 147,300-share purchase in the closed-end fund came before the U.S. stock market's plunge last Friday, but still proved slightly profitable.  Mr. Templeton bought his shares in several separate purchases between Aug. 30 and Sept. 28, according to reports with the SEC.  He bought at share prices ranging from $9.375 to $9.625.  The fund closed yesterday in New York Stock Exchange composite trading at $9.625, up 12.5 cents.  In addition, Mr. Templeton received a dividend of 22 cents a share Oct. 5.  RIVER RUN: A senior vice president and a vice president at James River Corp. sold the majority of their shares in the Richmond, Va., paper-products concern in late August and early September, reports filed with the SEC show.  The executives, who got $30.88 a share for the stock, showed good timing.  In Big Board trading yesterday, James River shares closed at $28.375, down 12.5 cents.  On Sept. 6, Robert Joseph Sherry, the firm's senior vice president of employee and public relations, sold 4,000 shares, leaving himself with 1,062 shares of James River.  Including a sale of stock last February, Mr. Sherry has sold 88% of his stake in the company this year, according to SEC filings.  Mr. Sherry declined to comment when asked about the sales.  James A. Toney, a vice president, sold 1,500 shares Aug. 28.  He still has 1,143 shares, according to SEC files.  Mr. Toney also declined to comment.  INTEREST-RATE PLAYER: Cincinnati Gas & Electric Co. tops the companies portion of the accompanying Insider Trading table this week.  Three of the utility's directors have at least doubled their holdings in the company since July.  The largest purchase was by Dudley Taft, who bought 4,400 shares for $125,075.  Mr. Taft, who is also president of Taft Broadcasting Co., said he bought the shares because he keeps a utility account at the brokerage firm of Salomon Brothers Inc., which had recommended the stock as a good buy.  Salomon Brothers confirmed that it has had a buy recommendation on the stock for about two years.  "Cincinnati Gas & Electric is in good shape," Mr. Taft said, and utilities are "a good investment because interest rates are going down."  Mr. Taft paid an average of $28.43 for each share.  The stock closed yesterday on the Big Board at $28.75, down 12.5 cents.  The two other directors bought 1,000 and 1,900 shares, respectively, at prices between $28.15 a share and $28.75 a share, filings with the SEC show.  The two couldn't be reached for comment.  A company spokesman said he couldn't explain their sudden bullishness.  "I don't know of any news or anything unusual happening here," said Bruce Stoecklin, director of media services.  ---  Peter Pae in Pittsburgh contributed to this article.  T. Rowe Price Associates Inc. said directors recommended stockholders approve a 2-for-1 stock split and an increase in authorized shares to 25 million from 10 million.  Stockholders will vote on the proposal at a meeting Dec. 13.  T. Rowe Price is an investment adviser to mutual funds, institutions and individuals.  In one of the first indoor air-pollution cases to go to trial, a state-court jury decided in favor of the defendant, Burlington Industries Inc.  The verdict, reached late last week in Cincinnati, may end an eight-year legal battle for the Greensboro, N.C., carpet maker.  Glenn and Sharon Beebe of Cincinnati had sued the com- pany in 1981 after installing Burlington carpets in their office.  The Beebes alleged that toxic fumes from the carpets made them sick.  As a result of their illness, the Beebes said, they lost $1.8 million in wages and earnings.  In addition, they said that months of exposure to the chemicals has left them sensitive to a wide range of commonly used substances.  The case had been closely watched because attorneys anticipate increasing litigation nationally over the so-called sick-building syndrome.  Plaintiffs' lawyers say that buildings become "sick" when inadequate fresh air and poor ventilation systems lead pollutants to build up inside.  Anthony J. Iaciofano, a lawyer for Burlington, said the company believes the Beebes' symptoms were not related to the carpeting.  He said that ill effects from new carpets manifest themselves immediately but that the Beebes' symptoms appeared months later.  Catherine Adams, the Beebes' lawyer, said the verdict would not discourage other plaintiffs from filing such suits.  Scientists are only beginning to understand what causes sick-building syndrome and much of that research was unavailable when the Beebes filed the case, she said.  The Beebes now believe that a prime culprit for their injuries was fumes from an adhesive used in the carpeting.  But the Beebes didn't come to that conclusion until time limits had elapsed for adding the adhesives maker as a defendant in the case, Ms. Adams said.  The Beebes have not yet decided whether to appeal.  ---  TIMES SQUARE development opponents are dealt setback.  The Appellate Division of New York State Supreme Court dismissed six lawsuits attempting to block a $2.5 billion project planned for 42nd Street in Manhattan.  Opponents of the project had claimed that the city and the state of New York, which are co-sponsoring the project, had failed to adhere to environmental guidelines.  All but two of the 40 or so lawsuits that have been filed since the project's 1984 approval have been dismissed before the trial stage.  The two that remain haven't yet reached the pre-trial fact-finding stage.  State officials said the court's ruling clears the way for proceedings to condemn buildings in the area.  "This project is ready to move," said State Urban Development Corp. Chairman Vincent Tese.  But developers of four planned office towers cautioned that obstacles still remain.  As part of the agreement with the state, the developers -- a partnership of Park Tower Realty and Prudential Insurance Co. of America -- said they would not proceed with condemnation proceedings while there was "significant litigation" pending.  Park Tower General Counsel Matthew Mayer said the development team will have to review two additional lawsuits before putting up a $155 million letter of credit to cover condemnation costs.  Also, he said, the partnership is waiting to see whether the appellate division's ruling will be appealed.  The plan, which has been plagued with delays and business-related setbacks, seeks to transform the area from a seedy thoroughfare to a more wholesome office and theater district.  State and city officials are still negotiating with developers to renovate historic theaters and build and operate a merchandise mart and hotel.  ---  FEDERAL JUDGE EXPANDS role of U.S. courts in extradition decisions.  U.S. District Judge Jack B. Weinstein of Brooklyn, N.Y., ruled that a man implicated in an attack on an Israeli passenger bus in 1986 can be extradited to Israel for trial.  A magistrate had initially refused the request, ruling that the attack had been a political act for which the man, Mahmoud El-Abed Ahmad, would be exempt from extradition.  However, Judge Weinstein wrote in his opinion late last month that terrorism and acts of war against civilians cannot be defined as political acts.  Judge Weinstein also ruled that judges must consider prior to extradition whether the defendant will be treated fairly in a foreign court.  To do so, the judge said, the U.S. courts must review the judicial process in the foreign country independently of the State Department's assessment.  He said that in this case he concurred with the State Department's decision that Mr. Ahmad should be extradited.  Mr. Ahmad's lawyer said he would appeal.  Lawyers close to the case said they believed the ruling was unprecedented.  "Up until now the courts have said it is not their role to supervise the foreign country's courts," said Jacques Semmelman, the assistant U.S. attorney on the case.  ---  FORMER CANADIAN AMBASSADOR to the U.S. Allan E. Gotlieb has joined the Philadelphia law firm of Pepper, Hamilton & Scheetz as a consultant.  Mr. Gotlieb, who serves as a consultant to Stikeman, Elliott, one of Canada's biggest law firms, is advising Pepper Hamilton's Washington office on legal matters related to Canadian-U.S. investment, corporate finance and international transactions.  ---  QUOTABLE: In a speech prepared for delivery in New York yesterday, retired Justice Lewis Powell contested the notion that the last Supreme Court term marked a turn toward conservatism: "Commentators who agreed on little else unanimously proclaimed a `shift in direction' on the court. . . .  I take these pronouncements, like many that have preceded them in past years, with a grain of salt.  In an era of `sound bites' and instant opinion polls it is dangerous to apply broad labels to a single term."  (During its centennial year, The Wall Street Journal will report events of the past century that stand as milestones of American business history.)  THE YOM KIPPUR WAR, WHEN EGYPT CRASHED into Israel on Oct. 6, 1973, the holiest day in the Jewish calendar, lasted barely a month.  But one far-afield effect is still with us.  The Arab states, always bitterly resentful of U.S. support toward Israel, realized they held an irresistable weapon -- oil.  Early in October, six Arab nations in the Persian Gulf jacked up prices sharply.  On Oct. 22, led by Saudi Arabia, the world's largest exporter, they embargoed oil shipments to the U.S. and to the Netherlands, Israel's staunchest European ally.  The timing was perfect.  The Arabs had tried embargos before.  In 1956, when Britain, France and Israel invaded Egypt to seize the Suez Canal, Arab producers cut off supplies to Europe.  Texas simply pumped harder.  U.S. oil supplies, however, had peaked in 1970 and 1971 and by 1973 were declining.  Imports, then six million barrels a day, came primarily from Venezuela and Canada.  But Middle East supplies were growing in importance.  By 1973, the U.S. was bringing in two million barrels of Arab oil a day, more than 10% of the 17.3 million barrels consumed daily.  Politics and economics conspired.  Japan and Europe, far more dependent on Mideast oil than the U.S., wouldn't offend the Arabs or trade off their precious supplies.  The U.S. did manage to supply the Dutch with oil by relabeling supplies; once oil is shipped, no one can tell its source.  But car-happy Americans panicked, and so did the U.S. and other oil-consuming governments.  "Shortage" and "crisis" became buzz words, although neither really applied.  The spot dislocations that showed up were largely the result of confusion (much of it in Washington), though that was cold comfort for drivers waiting in mile-long lines at the gas pumps.  The embargo lasted only six months, but the price hikes became a fact of life.  What the Arabs started, inflation finished.  Once and for all, $5-a-barrel crude oil and 35-cents-a-gallon gasoline were history.  Times may be tough on Wall Street for some, but a few bosses are making as much as ever -- or more.  At Bear Stearns Cos., for example, the 15 executive officers led by Chairman Alan "Ace" Greenberg got a pay increase to $35.9 million for the 14-month period ended June 30 from $22.9 million for the 12 months ended April 30, 1988.  The figures don't include substantial dividends on holdings of Bear Stearns stock.  Mr. Greenberg himself was paid $4.5 million, before an estimated $1.5 million in dividends, up from $2.4 million the year before.  The increase is noted in the brokerage firm's latest proxy statement filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission.  Because it operates on a fiscal year, Bear Stearns's yearly filings are available much earlier than those of other firms.  The latest period includes 14 months instead of 12 because Bear Stearns changed to a fiscal year ending in June instead of April.  Meanwhile, Bear Stearns's 650 stock and bond salesmen saw thinner paychecks over the past year, which the company says reflected lower commission revenue caused by a decline in investor activity in the markets.  However, Bear Stearns on Monday reported improved earnings for its first quarter, ended Sept. 29, partly because of a 31% increase in commissions during the quarter.  William J. Montgoris, chief financial officer, defended the lofty salaries at Bear Stearns.  "All of us are on a base salary of $200,000 if the firm makes nothing -- and that's pretty low as far as Wall Street goes," Mr. Montgoris said.  However, Bear Stearns has never had an unprofitable year since its founding 65 years ago.  Four Bear Stearns executives besides the 62-year-old Mr. Greenberg were paid $3 million or more before dividends for the 14 months ended in June.  According to the proxy statement, James E. Cayne, 55, Bear Stearns's president, made $3.9 million; an executive vice president, Michael L. Tarnopol, 53, made nearly $3.4 million; and two executive vice presidents, Vincent J. Mattone, 44, and William J. Michaelcheck, 42, made about $3.3 million each.  Mr. Montgoris said the firm has a "straight mathematical formula" for determining compensation, based on the firm's earnings.  "Just because a particular element of the firm is down," such as stockbrokerage, "doesn't mean the executive committee should be paid less," he said.  Morgan Grenfell Group PLC said John Craven, group chief executive officer, is taking over the chairmanship of the merchant banking group from Sir Peter Carey, who is retiring.  Mr. Carey will remain a member of the merchant bank's board.  Mr. Craven is widely credited with refocusing Morgan Grenfell's energies on its core corporate finance, fund management and banking activities over the past year.  Last year, Morgan Grenfell shut down its ailing U.K. securities operations.  Mr. Craven said his move to the chairmanship means he will take a less active role in the day-to-day management of the group, but he added that the merchant bank's strategic focus remains unchanged.  Mr. Craven joined Morgan Grenfell as group chief executive in May 1987, a few months after the resignations of former Chief Executive Christopher Reeves and other top officials because of the merchant bank's role in Guinness PLC's controversial takeover of Distiller's Co. in 1986.  Morgan Grenfell had advised Guinness on the bid, which was surrounded by allegations that Guinness used artificial means to support the bid's value.  Morgan Grenfell said Michael Dobson, currently group deputy chief executive, will assume the chief executive position.  The merchant bank also announced that finance director David Eward is taking early retirement for personal reasons.  His duties will be taken over by Anthony Richmond-Watson, who has been elected deputy chairman.  News of Mr. Eward's retirement comes one day after Morgan said that Christopher Whittington resigned as chairman of Morgan's banking subsidiary to join a financial services firm.  Mr. Craven said both Messrs.  Eward and Whittington had planned to leave the bank earlier, but Mr. Craven had persuaded them to remain until the bank was in a healthy position.  "If there's any coincidence about the departures it's that they are leaving at a time when the business is in reasonably good shape and going forward very well."  Last month, Morgan Grenfell announced its pretax profit rose 49.6% to #32.8 million in the first half, boosted by a healthy growth in its domestic and international corporate finance business.  The following were among yesterday's offerings and pricings in the U.S. and non-U.S. capital markets, with terms and syndicate manager, as compiled by Dow Jones Capital Markets Report:  @ CORPORATES  Lockheed Corp. -- $300 million of 9 3/8% notes due Oct. 15, 1999, priced at 99.90 to yield 9.39%.  The issue was priced at a spread of 137.5 basis points above the Treasury's 10-year note.  Rated single-A-3 by Moody's Investors Service Inc. and single-A by Standard & Poor's Corp., the issue will be sold through underwriters led by Goldman, Sachs & Co.  @ MUNICIPALS  California Health Facilities Financing Authority -- $144.35 million of revenue bonds for Kaiser Permanente, due 19931999, 2004, 2008, 2018 and 2019, tentatively priced by a PaineWebber Inc. group to yield from 6.25% in 1993 to 7.227% in 2018.  Serial bonds were priced to yield to 6.80% in 1999.  There are about $10 million of 7% bonds priced at 99 1/4 to yield 7.081% in 2004; about $15 million of 7% bonds priced at 98 1/2 to yield 7.145% in 2008; about $88.35 million of 7% bonds priced at 97 1/4 to yield 7.227% in 2018; and about $15 million of 6 3/4% bonds priced to yield 7.15% in 2019.  The bonds are rated double-A-2 by Moody's and double-A by S&P, according to the lead underwriter.  Pennsylvania Higher Education Facilities Authority -- approximately $117 million of revenue bonds for Hahnemann University, Series 1989, due 1990-2002, 2009 and 2019, priced late Monday by a Merrill Lynch Capital Markets group to yield from 6% in 1990 to 7.282% in 2019.  Serial bonds were priced to yield from 6% in 1990 to 7.10% in 2002.  There are about $25.6 million of 7.2% term bonds due 2009, priced to yield 7.25%, and about $66.8 million of 7.2% term bonds due 2019, priced at 99 to yield 7.282%.  The bonds are insured and rated triple-A by Moody's and S&P.  Connecticut -- $100.4 million of general obligation capital appreciation bonds, College Savings Plan, 1989 Series B, priced by a Prudential-Bache Capital Funding group.  The zero-coupon bonds were priced to yield to maturity from 6.25% in 1994 to 6.90% in 2006, 2007 and 2009.  The bonds have received a rating of double-A-1 from Moody's, and a double-A-plus rating is expected from S&P, the underwriter said.  Oregon -- $100 million of general obligation veterans' tax notes, Series 1989, dated Nov. 1, 1989, and due Nov. 1, 1990, through a Chemical Securities Inc. group.  The group is offering the notes priced as 6 3/4% securities to yield 6.25%.  The notes are rated MIG-1 by Moody's and SP1-plus by S&P.  University of Medicine and Dentistry of New Jersey -- $55.8 million of Series C bonds priced by a Prudential-Bache Capital Funding group.  The bonds, rated single-A by Moody's and double-A by S&P, were priced to yield from 6.20% in 1992 to 7.26% in 2019.  All serial bonds are being offered at par except those due 2002.  @ MORTGAGES  Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corp. -- $500 million of Remic mortgage securities being offered in eight classes by Salomon Brothers Inc.  The offering, Series 104, is backed by Freddie Mac 9% securities.  The issue used at-market pricing.  Federal National Mortgage Association -- $350 million of Remic mortgage securities being offered in 11 classes by Greenwich Capital Markets.  The offering, Series 1989-82, is backed by Fannie Mae 9 1/2% securities and used at-market pricing.  The issue brings Fannie Mae's 1989 Remic issuance to $30.2 billion and its total volume to $42.3 billion since the program began in April 1987.  @ EUROBONDS  Hanshin Electric Railway Co. (Japan) -- $150 million of bonds due Nov. 2, 1993, with equity-purchase warrants, indicating a 4% coupon at par, via Nomura International Ltd.  Each $5,000 bond carries one warrant, exercisable from Nov. 16, 1989, through Oct. 19, 1993, to buy company shares at an expected premium of 2 1/2% to the closing share price when terms are fixed Oct. 24.  Toyobo Co. (Japan) -- $150 million of bonds due Nov. 1, 1993, with equity-purchase warrants, indicating a 4% coupon at par, via Daiwa Europe Ltd.  Each $5000 bond carries one warrant, exercisable from Nov. 15, 1989, to Oct. 18, 1993, to buy company shares at an expected premium of 2 1/2% to the closing share price when terms are fixed Oct. 23.  Sammi Steel Co. (Korea) -- $50 million of bonds due Nov. 8, 1994, with equity-purchase warrants, indicating a 1 1/4% to 1 3/4% coupon at par, via Merrill Lynch International Ltd. and Dong Suh Securities Co.  Each $5,000 bond carries one warrant, exercisable from May 8, 1991, through Oct. 8, 1994, to buy company shares at an expected premium of 75% to 85% to the closing share price when terms are fixed Oct. 18.  Redland International Funding PLC (U.K. parent) -- 150 million Australian dollars of 15 3/8% bonds due Nov. 8, 1996, priced at 101 3/4 to yield 15.44% less full fees, via JP Morgan Securities Ltd. Guaranteed by Redland PLC. Fees 2.  @ OTHER  Tennessee Valley Authority -- A $4 billion, three-part offering of power bonds priced through an underwriting group led by First Boston Corp.  The size of the issue was increased from an originally planned $3 billion.  The first part, consisting of $2 billion of bonds due Oct. 1, 2019, with a five-year non-call provision, was priced as 8 3/4% securities at 96.808 to yield 9.06%.  The 30-year issue was priced at a spread of 105 basis points above the Treasury's 30-year bellwether bond.  The second part, consisting of $1 billion of noncallable bonds due Oct. 1, 1999, was priced as 8 3/8% securities at 99.691 to yield 8.42%.  The 10-year issue was priced at a spread of 43 basis points above the Treasury's 10-year note.  The third part, consisting of $1 billion of noncallable bonds due Oct. 1, 1994, was priced as 8 1/4% securities at 99.672 to yield 8.33%.  The five-year issue was priced at a spread of 43 basis points above the Treasury's comparable note.  The issue is rated triple-A by Moody's and triple-A by S&P.  Par Pharmaceutical Inc. said it named its interim president and chief executive officer, Kenneth I. Sawyer, to those posts permanently, and elected him to the board.  Par also said it was advised by the U.S. attorney for Maryland that it is one of a number of companies being investigated by a federal grand jury for alleged violations of the federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act.  Par, a generic-drug maker that has been plagued by management problems, was already the subject of a federal criminal inquiry into the drug-approval process and a Food and Drug Administration investigation.  A Par spokesman said he understood the criminal investigation in Maryland relates to matters Par disclosed in July, when Par said it filed false drug information with the FDA.  At the time, the company said it was recalling one of its drugs and had stopped selling two others.  The spokesman said he also understood that the inquiry related to the existence of an "off-the-record" production book.  The book noted changes made at the manufacturing level that weren't disclosed to the FDA.  Par said it is cooperating in the investigation.  Also yesterday, Ashok Patel, a former Par official who pleaded guilty to providing an FDA employee an illegal gratuity of $3,000, was sentenced by a federal judge in Baltimore to one year of community service and a $150,000 fine.  Mr. Patel also was placed on three years' probation.  Mr. Patel resigned as senior vice president of Par in April.  In July, Par and a 60%-owned unit agreed to plead guilty in that inquiry, as did another former Par official.  Mr. Sawyer began running the company on an interim basis in late September.  Par said it selected him for the posts of president and chief executive on a permanent basis because of his experience in the industry and his performance at Par.  Perry Levine, chairman, said Mr. Sawyer had "taken significant steps" to restore the company's credibility and sense of professionalism and integrity.  Just after midnight Monday, federal spending started to drop by $16 billion.  What do you say we all close down the poker game, go home and bank the $16 billion?  That's essentially what budget director Richard Darman is suggesting, and we think he deserves as much support as he can get.  If human beings can't cut federal spending honestly -- and they can't -- let the computers do it.  Congress, with a measure of White House complicity, has been manipulating the spending accounts for years under the cover of omnibus appropriations bills. (Indeed without earlier manipulations, the current sequester of $16 billion would have been even larger.) We suspect voters are fed up with the finagling.  Consider, for instance, that even yesterday's widely publicized sequester is likely to be traduced if business as usual is allowed to prevail.  Under the law, Gramm-Rudman's across-the-board-cuts in federal programs are supposed to be permanent.  Social Security and spending for poor people are exempted.  However, the Associated Press's account of the Monday sequester order signed by President Bush neatly captured the contempt Congress shows toward the notion of a legally binding commitment: "Lawmakers have been saying for weeks that they plan to roll back the cuts as soon as they agree to a compromise on a deficit-cutting bill."  Mr. Darman's inclination to save the sequester was backed up yesterday by White House Press Secretary Marlin Fitzwater: "There is some feeling here that the cuts are the way to go.  It will reduce spending in a very effective fashion."  This attitude is being waved away by sophisticates around Washington as little more than tough talk.  It looks to us like a golden opportunity for George Bush to chop off at the knees all this talk about a timid, unserious presidency.  Mr. Bush would be acting in the public interest if he let the Washington elites who manipulate these budgets -- the bureaucrats, the lobbyists, the congressional staffers -- live for just one year on a restricted diet.  Ask Tommy Lasorda; thin is in.  Senator Phil Gramm pointed out Monday that in the 20 years before Gramm-Rudman was enacted in 1985, federal spending grew by about 11% a year; since the law, it's grown at under 5% annually.  Another major factor in this positive trend was Ronald Reagan's decision early in his presidency to fight the budget war on the expenditure side rather than raising taxes.  George Bush's continued support of the tax dam sustains this strategy of pressuring Congress to make choices among competing priorities, rather than just saying yes to all the grateful special-interest constituencies that fill the PAC trough.  If Washington's elites ever succeed in bursting the tax dam, Americans will be engulfed in a red sea of new spending programs, such as federalized child care.  Child care was one of the many "extraneous" bills pulled out of the Senate's reconciliation bill last Friday.  Others were the capital-gains cut, Section 89 repeal, the disabled workers bill, and the unprecedented reconsideration of the catastrophic health act.  All this stuff still is in the House's 1,878-page reconciliation bill, and many Members say they're reluctant to pull out cherished bills, just to see them die.  Republicans especially want a guarantee from the House leadership that they'll get an up-or-down vote on the bills.  House Speaker Foley ought to deliver that promise.  This is the way government is supposed to work, with politicians taking responsibility for votes that their constituents can identify, instead of concealing them in the great reconciliation garbage truck.  We have as much nostalgia as anyone for those leafy, breezy days in Washington when honorable men and women dickered over budgets and even log-rolled a bit to see that the bridges got build, roads paved, soldiers paid or that the desperately poor were cared for.  Those days are gone.  Nor do we see any reason to believe that a metropolitan Washington that has gotten fat and rich and lazy in the shadow of the federal colossus will change much on its own initiative.  Save the sequester, and let Washington scream.  The New York Stock Exchange said a seat sold for $436,000, down $39,000 from the previous sale Oct. 4.  Seats are currently quoted at $425,000 bid and $475,000 offered.  The $475,000 sale price earlier this month was the lowest in nearly three years.  Exchange seats hit a peak of $1,150,000 in September 1987.  The Canadian government auctioned 750 million Canadian dollars (US$637.5 million) of 9.25% bonds due Dec. 15, 1994.  The average accepted yield bid was 9.617% for a price equivalent of 98.523.  Proceeds of the sale will be used to redeem C$675 million of government bonds maturing Nov. 1 and for general government purposes.  Northern Trust Corp. said its board adopted a shareholder rights plan aimed at deterring unwanted takeover bids, but said it's not aware of any plan to acquire the banking concern.  Under Northern Trust's plan, shareholders were issued rights that, in the event of certain attempted takeovers, allow holders to buy shares in the company at half price.  National Patent Development Corp. said it plans to purchase as many as 200,000 common shares of its 81%-controlled Interferon Sciences Inc. unit in periodic, open-market purchases.  The 200,000 shares are about 23% of Interferon's common shares outstanding, excluding National Patent's stake.  Noting the recent Food and Drug Administration approval of Interferon's genital warts treatment, National Patent said it believes Interferon's stock is undervalued.  Japanese investors, reassured by Monday's strong rally on Wall Street, erased most of that day's losses on the Tokyo Stock Exchange.  But analysts said the rebound didn't remove the cautious mood from the market.  In London, stocks closed lower in volatile trading as an opening rally was obliterated by worse-than-expected U.S. trade figures.  Paris shares had a similar reaction, but most other European bourses posted gains, as did all major Asian and Pacific stock markets.  Tokyo's Nikkei Index of 225 stocks jumped 527.39 points to close at 34996.08.  The rise came a day after the year's biggest drop on Monday, when the Nikkei fell 647.33, or 1.8%, in response to Friday's 6.9% plunge on Wall Street.  In early trading Wednesday in Tokyo, the Nikkei index rose 19.30 points to 35015.38.  On Tuesday, the broader-based Tokyo Stock Price Index of issues listed in the first section, which fell 45.66 Monday, rose 41.76, or 1.61%, to 2642.64.  Trading was relatively thin at an estimated 650 million shares, though brisker than Monday's 526 million.  Advancing issues outnumbered decliners 821-201, with 103 unchanged.  "We're back to square one," said Simon Smithson, an analyst in Japan for Kleinwort Benson International Inc.  Japanese domestic institutions, including trust banks and investment management firms, that had been on the sidelines during Monday's fall were back in the market, analysts said.  Foreign investors reportedly started off selling but later joined in the buying.  The Tokyo rally seemed to confirm the view, frequently expressed in Japan in the past few days, that the drop in New York was a local problem related to merger and acquisition activity in the U.S.  "This time we don't really have to worry about Tokyo," said an official at Daiwa Securities Co. "Nothing has changed fundamentally in the Tokyo market."  But even though Tokyo appears unharmed by recent market volatility, analysts and traders say there are still a few concerns on the horizon.  In particular, Japanese investors will be keeping a wary eye on Wall Street to see whether Monday's 88.12-point rally holds up as fresh U.S. economic data are released.  "People are placing small bets.  There's no huge buying," said Stephen Hill, head of equity sales at Jardine Fleming Securities Ltd. in Tokyo.  "Really brave views right now would be foolhardy."  Yesterday's buyers favored real estate, construction and other large-capitalization issues, reflecting the fact that many Tokyo investors now feel safer with domestically oriented stocks, analysts said.  They also are concerned about the persistent strength of the dollar against the yen, as a weaker yen leads to higher import prices in Japan and adds to domestic inflationary pressures.  Currency concerns also weigh heavily on interest rate-sensitive stocks such as banking and other financial issues because of fears that Japanese interest rates might have to rise to keep the dollar in check.  Among steel shares, NKK rose 19 to 705 yen ($4.97) a share, and Nippon Steel gained 17 to 735.  Construction shares that gained included Shimizu, which rose 130 to 2,080.  In the real estate sector, Mitsui Real Estate Development was up 100 at 2,760, and Mitsubishi Estate gained 80 to 2,360.  London's Financial Times-Stock Exchange 100-share index fell 27.9 points to 2135.5.  It was down more than 40 points a half-hour before the close, marking a 61.5-point turnaround from its high, reached in the first 15 minutes of trading.  The narrower Financial Times 30-share index fell 29.6 to 1730.7.  Volume was an active 643.3 million shares, about double the recent levels but down from 959.3 million the previous day, which U.K. traders have dubbed "Manic Monday."  Prices opened strongly on the basis of Monday's Wall Street rally and yesterday's gains in Tokyo.  But the advance faltered as index-options traders and investors jittery about the U.K. economic outlook took over.  The unexpectedly wide U.S. August trade deficit of $10.77 billion hit an already jittery U.K. market in midafternoon.  Michael Hicks, who manages sales and trading for brokerage concern Societe Generale Strauss Turnbull, said: "It's a nervous market.  It was all over the place.  If you bought, you wish you hadn't, and if you sold, you wish you hadn't."  He said the current market "is all about sentiment, and the sentiment in London is 90% anxiety and worry."  Britain's economic fundamentals, he said, "don't look very bright."  Dealers said London showed signs of calming in midafternoon after Wall Street avoided sharp losses despite the trade report, but a wave of futures-related selling later in the session sent buyers back to the sidelines.  Still, some sectors found buying interest after being actively sold in recent weeks.  Merchant banks were stronger across the board.  Morgan Grenfell, which has been mentioned in takeover rumors, rose 20 to 392 pence ($6.18) a share.  S.G. Warburg, a rumored target of some European banking concerns, finished 22 higher at 400.  Hambros rose 5 to 204, and Schroders rose 25 to #12.75.  On the corporate front, Ford Motor announced that it raised its stake in U.K. luxury car maker Jaguar to 10.4% from 5%.  Jaguar shares jumped 23 before easing to close at 654, up 6.  Amstrad, a British computer hardware and communications equipment maker, eased 4 to 47.  It announced a 52% plunge in pretax profit for the latest year.  Brewery stocks were firm to higher on talk of early bargain-hunting, but most ended below their peaks.  Bass ended up 3 higher at 966, Guinness closed at 589, down 7, and Scottish & Newcastle dropped 11 to 359, but Whitbread Class A shares rose 17 to 363.  Dealers said there was late talk of a Whitbread sale of brewing operations to Scottish & Newcastle.  The most active shares were major blue-chips, particularly oils and utilities such as British Gas and British Telecommunications.  Traders attributed the action in them largely to defensive positioning in a volatile market.  British Gas finished at 197, down 2, on 13 million shares, British Petroleum fell 8 to 291 on 9.4 million shares, and British Telecom was 4 lower at 261 on turnover of 10 million shares.  Cable & Wireless fell 20 to 478.  Also in active trading, British Steel fell 1 to 124 as 20 million shares changed hands.  Racal Electric, which traded 11 million shares, declined 12 to 218.  In other European markets, share prices closed sharply higher in Frankfurt and Zurich and posted moderate rises in Stockholm, Amsterdam and Milan.  Paris closed lower, and most Brussels shares were unable to trade for a second consecutive day because of technical problems.  South African gold stocks closed higher.  Elsewhere, share prices rebounded in Hong Kong, Sydney, Singapore, Wellington, Taipei, Manila and Seoul.  In Hong Kong, Sydney and Singapore -- the largest of those exchanges -- stocks recovered one-third to one-half of the ground they lost in Monday's plunge, with major market indexes posting gains of 3.6% to 4.4%.  Here are price trends on the world's major stock markets, as calculated by Morgan Stanley Capital International Perspective, Geneva.  To make them directly comparable, each index is based on the close of 1969 equaling 100.  The percentage change is since year-end.  @ % This  @ Oct 16 Oct 13 Year  @ U.S. ........................... 315.1 306.5 + 23.0  @ Britain ........................ 645.7 667.6 + 18.2  @ Canada ......................... 430.3 427.4 + 17.2  @ Japan .......................... 1500.4 1523.9 + 5.6  @ France ......................... 516.6 551.4 + 16.7  @ Germany ........................ 221.9 255.2 + 6.7  @ Hong Kong ...................... 1963.2 2104.7 - 3.3  @ Switzerland .................... 206.8 228.0 + 19.6  @ Australia ...................... 321.3 348.4 + 10.7  @ World index .................... 522.3 524.7 + 5.6  Zurn Industries Inc. said it received approval to proceed on four separate projects with a total contract value of $59 million.  The projects include construction of a 29,400 kilowatt waste-to-energy plant for Ada Cogeneration L.P., Ada, Mich.; a steam generating plant at Ontario, Calif., that Zurn will own and operate, and two waste-water control projects in Orange County, Calif.  AVX Corp. and Unitrode Corp. said they completed the previously reported sale of Unitrode's San Diego-based Passive Components division to AVX. AVX, a New York-based maker of passive electronic products, paid $11 million in cash to Unitrode, a Lexington-based maker of semiconductor products.  Passive Components makes capacitors and filters used to protect electronics.  Consolidated Papers Inc. said it plans to spend $495 million on new paper-manufacturing equipment and facilities.  The producer of paper used in magazines and by commercial printers said spending on the expansion is planned to begin in the first quarter of 1990.  The expansion is subject to approval by federal and Wisconsin environmental regulators.  THE STOCK of Applied Power Inc., which split 2-for-1 in May, has risen since August 1988.  In yesterday's edition, it was incorrectly stated that the company's share price has softened since August 1988.  (See: "Who's News: With One Turnaround Under His Belt, Sim Aims for Another at Barry Wright" -- WSJ Oct. 17, 1989)  The stock market's dizzying gyrations during the past few days have made a lot of individual investors wish they could buy some sort of insurance.  After all, they won't soon forget the stock bargains that became available after the October 1987 crash.  But while they want to be on the alert for similar buying opportunities now, they're afraid of being hammered by another terrifying plunge.  The solution, at least for some investors, may be a hedging technique that's well known to players in the stock-options market.  Called a "married put," the technique is carried out by purchasing a stock and simultaneously buying a put option on that stock.  It's like "fire insurance," says Harrison Roth, the senior options strategist at Cowen & Co.  Because a put option gives its owner the right, but not the obligation, to sell a fixed number of shares of the stock at a stated price on or before the option's expiration date, the investor is protected against a sudden drop in the stock's price.  But most investment advisers don't recommend using married puts all the time.  That's because the cost of buying put options eats into an investor's profit when stock prices rise.  "This is the type of fire insurance you only buy when the nearby woods are on fire," says Mr.Roth.  "You always want your house insured, but you don't always feel the need for your investments to be insured."  In addition to hedging new stock purchases, the married-put technique can be used to protect stocks that an investor already owns.  In either case, the investor faces three possible outcomes:  -- If the stock goes up in price between now and the put's expiration date, the put will probably expire worthless.  The investor will be out the cost of the put, which is called the "premium," and this loss will reduce the stock-market profit.  -- If the stock stays at the same price between now and the put's expiration date, the investor's loss will be limited to the cost of the put, less any amount realized from a closing sale of the put.  The worst-case scenario would be if the put expires worthless.  -- If the price of the stock declines, the put will increase in value.  Once the stock price is less than the exercise price, or "strike price," of the put, the gain will match the loss on the stock dollar for dollar.  The put establishes a minimum selling price for the stock during its life.  When a stock falls below the put's strike price, the investor simply sells the stock at a loss and simultaneously sells the put at a profit.  Or, the investor can exercise the put, by tendering the stock to his or her broker in return for payment from another investor who has sold a put on the same stock.  Brokers handle such transactions through the Options Clearing Corp., which guarantees all option trades.  The accompanying table shows how this strategy would work for three stocks.  Though not reflected in the table, an investor should know that the cost of the option insurance can be partially offset by any dividends that the stock pays.  For example, Tenneco Inc. pays a quarterly dividend of 76 cents, which would be received before the February option expires and, thus, reduce the cost of using the technique by that amount.  In this case, the investor's risk wouldn't exceed 3.6% of the total investment.  To simplify the calculations, commissions on the option and underlying stock aren't included in the table.  There are more than 650 stocks on which options may be bought and sold, including some over-the-counter stocks.  But some investors might prefer a simpler strategy then hedging their individual holdings.  They can do this by purchasing "index puts," which are simply put options on indexes that match broad baskets of stocks.  For instance, the most popular index option is the S&P 100 option, commonly called the OEX.  It is based on the stocks that make up Standard & Poor's 100-stock index.  Unlike options on individual issues, index options are settled only in cash, and no stock is ever tendered.  But while index options are convenient, they have several disadvantages.  For one thing, an investor's portfolio might not closely match the S&P 100.  As a result, the OEX insurance may or may not fully protect an investor's holdings in the event of a market decline.  In addition, OEX options were suspended from trading last Friday afternoon, after the stock-market sell-off got under way and trading in the S&P-500 futures contract was halted.  So an investor who wanted to realize a profit on OEX puts after the trading suspension would have been out of luck.  On the other hand, only a handful of individual issues were suspended from trading on Friday.  Normally, once the underlying investment is suspended from trading, the options on those investments also don't trade.  Ultimately, whether the insurance provided by purchasing puts is worthwhile depends on the cost of the options.  That cost rises in times of high market volatility.  But it still might be cheaper than taking a major hit.  The protection from using married puts is clearly superior to that afforded by another options strategy some investors consider using during troubled times: selling call options on stocks the investor owns.  A call option is similar to a put, except that it gives its owner the right to buy shares at a stated price until expiration.  Selling a call option gives an investor a small buffer against a stock-market decline.  That's because it reduces the cost of the stock by the amount of premium received from the sale of the call.  But if the price of the stock rises above the strike price of the option, the stock is almost certain to be called away.  And in that case, the investor misses out on any major upside gain.  @ ---  @ How the Married-Put Strategy Works  @Hedging stocks with put options lessens the blow of a price drop, but shrinks the return if stock prices rise.  These calculations exclude the effect of commissions paid and dividends received from the stock.  All prices are as of Monday's close.  @ Married-Put Strategy:  @ STOCK BUY STOCK AT BUY PUT AT PUT PRICE  @ Marriott $35.625 Jan. 35 $1.375  @ 100 shares $3,563 $138  @ Merck $74.875 Jan. 75 $3.75  @ 100 shares $7,488 $375  @ Tenneco $58.875 Feb. 60 $4.125  @ 100 shares $5,888 $413  @ Profit (loss) if stock:  @ GOES UP 20% STAYS EVEN FALLS 20%  @ Marriott $575 ($138) ($200)  @ 100 shares 15.5% -3.7% -5.4%  @ Merck $1,122 ($362) ($362)  @ 100 shares 14.3% -4.6% -4.6%  @ Tenneco $765 ($300) ($300)  @ 100 shares 12.1% -4.8% -4.8%  Hopes for quick enactment of pending deficit-reduction legislation faded as efforts to streamline the House version in advance of a House-Senate conference broke down.  House leaders had hoped to follow the Senate's lead by getting an agreement from House committee chairmen under which they would drop items that wouldn't reduce the fiscal 1990 budget deficit from the House-passed bill before the negotiations with the Senate began.  But the effort became snagged on the question of what would become of other issues, ranging from cutting the capital-gains tax to child care to repeal of catastrophic-illness insurance.  "Many members feel there are important features of the House bill that should be enacted," Speaker Thomas Foley (D., Wash.) said.  "If there is any support for reducing the bill, it is conditioned on their desire to see them passed in another form."  Now those items will be discussed in a House-Senate conference, which could begin as soon as today, with the expectation that they could either be resolved there or placed into other legislation.  "You've got to give these chairmen the opportunity to see if they can work things out," said House Budget Committee Chairman Leon Panetta (D., Calif.).  "This is a democratic process -- you can't slam-dunk anything around here."  White House Budget Director Richard Darman has said he would continue to press to keep the capital-gains provision in the final version of the bill unless the House drops many of its costly provisions.  Senate leaders had hoped to be able to send a compromise version of the measure to President Bush by the end of the week, but Speaker Foley said that wasn't likely.  Failure to pass the bill meant that $16.1 billion in across-the-board spending cuts took effect Monday under the Gramm-Rudman budget law.  The bill must be enacted before the cuts can be restored.  TRADING VOLUME in Standard & Poor's 500 stock-index futures contracts on the Chicago Mercantile Exchange Monday totaled 73,803 contracts.  Yesterday's edition incorrectly reported Monday's trading volume as a record for the S&P 500 contract.  (See: "After the Fall: Stock-Index Futures Provide a Windfall for Some Traders --- Chicago Merc's Trading Pit Gets Liquidity Infusion After a Two-Year Wait" -- WSJ Oct. 17, 1989)  NCNB Corp. raised $1 billion in new capital during the third quarter.  In yesterday's edition, the amount of new capital was misstated.  (See: "Morgan Reports 3rd-Period Loss off $1.82 Billion --- NCNB Says Net Doubled, While Security Pacific Posts 10% Rise in Profit" -- WSJ Oct. 17, 1989)  McCormick Capital Inc. said its tender offer to buy back as many as 1.1 million, or 44%, of its common shares at $3 apiece, which expired Friday evening, was oversubscribed.  The developer and manager of futures-investment limited partnerships said preliminary results indicate that about 1,749,000 shares had been tendered, giving a preliminary proration factor of 0.6287.  The final proration factor will be announced Monday.  Northgate Exploration Ltd. said it is proposing to amalgamate four of its associated companies.  Under a proposed two-step amalgamation involving share swaps, ABM Gold Corp., a gold exploration and management company, will merge with Neptune Resources Corp., United Gold Corp. and Inca Resources Inc.  ABM will also increase its stake in Sonora Gold Corp. to 42% from 26%.  Northgate said it will own about 50% of the equity and 81% of the votes of ABM after the amalgamation.  The amalgamations are subject to regulatory approval and require approval by shareholders of ABM, Inca, United and Neptune at special meetings on Nov. 10.  Steven C. Walker, senior vice president of this bank holding company, was named president, chief executive officer and a director of both Commercial National and Commercial National Bank.  He succeeds James E. Burt III, who resigned from all three posts to pursue other interests.  Cincinnati Microwave Inc. said it introduced two radar detectors.  One unit, called the Escort, uses a new digital signal-processing technology to detect radar signals much sooner than was previously possible, the company said.  The other, called the Solo, is battery operated and is the first high-performance radar detector that doesn't need a power cord, the company said.  A surprising surge in the U.S. trade deficit raised fears that the nation's export drive has stalled, and caused new turmoil in financial markets.  The merchandise trade deficit widened in August to $10.77 billion, the Commerce Department reported, a sharp deterioration from July's $8.24 billion and the largest deficit of any month this year.  Exports fell for the second month in a row, while imports rose to a record.  "This is one of the worst trade releases we've had since the dollar troughed out in 1987," said Geoffrey Dennis, chief international economist at James Capel Inc. Like most analysts, Mr. Dennis was hesitant to read too much into one month's numbers; but he said, "It indicates perhaps that the balance in the U.S. economy is not as good as we've been led to believe."  The number had a troubling effect on Wall Street, suggesting that more fundamental economic problems may underlie last Friday's stock market slide.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average tumbled more than 60 points after the report's release, before recovering to close 18.65 points lower at 2638.73.  "This bad trade number raises some deeper issues about the market decline," said Norman Robertson, chief economist for Mellon Bank.  "It raises questions about more deep-seated problems, the budget deficit and the trade deficit and the seeming lack of ability to come to grips with them."  The trade report drew yet another unsettling parallel to October 1987.  On Oct. 14 of that year, the announcement of an unusually large August trade deficit helped trigger a steep market decline.  The slide continued until the record 508-point market drop on Oct. 19.  In 1987, however, the news was the latest in a string of disappointments on trade, while the current report comes after a period of improvement.  The bleak trade report was played down by the Bush administration.  Commerce Secretary Robert Mosbacher called the worsening trade figures "disappointing after two very good months."  And White House spokesman Marlin Fitzwater said the deficit was "an unwelcome increase," adding that "we're hopeful that it simply is a one-month situation and will turn around."  But the figures reinforced the view of many private analysts that the improvement in the U.S. trade deficit has run out of steam.  "The figures today add further evidence to support the view that the improvement in the U.S. trade deficit has essentially stalled out at a level of about a $110 billion annual rate," said Jeffrey Scott, a research fellow at the Institute for International Economics here.  "That's still an improvement over last year, but it leads one to conclude that basically we've gotten all the mileage we can out of past dollar depreciation and past marginal cuts in the federal budget deficit."  Exports declined for the second consecutive month in August, slipping 0.2% to $30.41 billion, the Commerce Department reported.  Imports, on the other hand, leaped 6.4% to a record $41.18 billion.  Not only was August's deficit far worse than July's, but the government revised the July figure substantially from the $7.58 billion deficit it had initially reported last month.  Many economists contend that deep cuts in the U.S. budget deficit are needed before further trade improvement can occur.  That's because the budget deficit feeds an enormous appetite in this country for both foreign goods and foreign capital, overwhelming the nation's capacity to export.  "People are sick and tired of hearing about these deficits, but the imbalances are still there and they are still a problem," said Mr. Robertson.  In addition, the rise in the value of the dollar against foreign currencies over the past several months has increased the price of U.S. products in overseas markets and hurt the country's competitiveness.  Since March, exports have been virtually flat.  At the same time, William T. Archey, international vice president at the U.S. Chamber of Commerce, notes: "Clearly the stronger dollar has made imports more attractive" by causing their prices to decline.  Most economists expect the slowing U.S. economy to curb demand for imports.  But they foresee little substantial progress in exports unless the dollar and the federal budget deficit come down.  "The best result we could get from these numbers would be to see the administration and Congress get serious about putting the U.S. on an internationally competitive economic footing," said Howard Lewis, vice president of international economic affairs at the National Association of Manufacturers.  "That must start with cutting the federal budget deficit."  August's decline in exports reflected decreases in sales of industrial supplies, capital goods and food abroad and increases in sales of motor vehicles, parts and engines.  The jump in imports stemmed from across-the-board increases in purchases of foreign goods.  The numbers were adjusted for usual seasonal fluctuations.  ---  Alan Murray contributed to this article.  @ ---  @ U.S. Merchandise Trade Deficits  (In billions of U.S. dollars, not seasonally adjusted)  @ AUG. '89 JULY '89 AUG. '88  @ Japan $3.98 $4.04 $4.37  @ Canada 1.16 0.47 0.45  @ Western Europe 0.72 0.85 1.10  @ NICs* 2.71 2.20 2.93  *Newly industrialized countries: Singapore, Hong Kong, Taiwan, South Korea  Source: Commerce Department  Steve Jobs took a step back from the frontier of personal-computer technology in an effort to spur sales of Next Inc.'s new machine.  Mr. Jobs moved to remedy a couple of his computer's drawbacks yesterday by lowering the entry-level price for a Next machine by $1,500, or 23%, if the buyer chooses a hard-disk drive as an alternative to Next's optical-storage device.  The hard drive, which is the storage device of choice for virtually every desktop computer user, also now will supplement Next's futuristic optical device if buyers pay full price.  Mr. Jobs, co-founder of Apple Computer Inc., founded Next four years ago in the hopes of fomenting a revolution in the way desktop computers are designed and used.  His Next computer, introduced about a year ago and aimed primarily at university computer users, sports snazzy graphics, digital sound, built-in networking and a sleek black design.  But the computer was proving a hard sell because of its high price, a lack of software and an optical data-storage device that was too slow.  The machine began shipping at the end of last year.  The closely held company hasn't disclosed sales.  However, most universities that have bought the machines say they are buying small numbers for evaluation purposes.  Universities can now buy a Next computer without an optical storage device for $4,995.  A computer with the optical device will still cost $6,495, but from now on Next will outfit every computer with a hard drive and supply one at no cost to those who have already bought Next machines.  Commercial customers can purchase the same system through Businessland Inc., a computer retailer based in San Jose, Calif., for roughly $3,000 more.  Mr. Jobs said the changes were prompted by requests from customers who are frustrated with the performance of the optical device, which isn't offered as standard equipment by any rivals.  Another factor was that customers were asking, "Why don't you give us a cheaper system?"  Mr. Jobs said at a conference on university computing here.  Optical-storage devices can handle very large amounts of data and make it far easier to edit film clips or audio recordings with a computer.  But the technology, while reliable, is far slower than the widely used hard drives.  To get around the delays caused by the optical device, Businessland, which is Next's exclusive dealer to corporations, has for months been advising customers to purchase hard drives with the machines.  Next's decision to rely on the more-established hard drive in every Next computer doesn't signal a retreat from optical storage, said Mr. Jobs, who for years has said this technology will play a crucial role in the next decade.  "We're extremely committed to optical storage technology" he said.  "We think everything will go this way in a few years."  He said that the next generation of optical drives will be as fast as hard drives, but he depends on outside suppliers for the devices.  But university computer specialists, who welcomed the move, called it a necessary retreat from the cutting edge of technology and one that's likely to increase Next's sales on campuses.  "From the standpoint of being on the forefront of technology, this is a step backward," said Jerry W. Sprecher, a senior computing manager for the California state university system.  "But it will definitely boost Next's sales."  Universities, however, say Next's prices must go even lower before large numbers of students purchase the machine.  "We'd still like to see a student model," priced at about $3,500, said Ronald Johnson, director of academic computing at Minnesota's Gustavus Adolphus College, which has bought eight Next machines.  Broad acceptance of Next's computer also is hindered by difficulty in distributing software for it.  Most software is distributed on cheap floppy disks, but the Next computer doesn't come with a device that reads them.  Next's computer also needs more software applications, but Mr. Jobs said he expects more soon.  He said he expects Lotus Development Corp. to introduce a Next version of its popular 1-2-3 spreadsheet program in 1990.  Educators added that Next needs to soon offer a color version of its computer.  Every major maker offers computers with color displays.  Next won't comment on when it will do the same, but is believed to have a color model under development.  Donald J. Amaral, 37 years old, was named president and chief operating officer of this owner and operator of hospitals, nursing centers and retirement hotels.  He succeeds as president, Don Freeberg, who remains chairman and chief executive officer.  The position of chief operating officer is new.  Ashton-Tate Corp. reported a net loss of $19.4 million, or 74 cents a share, for the third quarter, which was burdened by severance costs and the expense of upgrading its database software inventories.  The software company said revenue slid 28% to $53.9 million.  This contrasts with the year-ago quarter, when the company had net income of $11.7 million, or 45 cents a share, on revenue of $75.7 million.  For the nine months, Ashton-Tate had a loss of $27.6 million, or $1.05 a share.  In the year-ago period, the company had profit of $34.3 million, or $1.32 a share.  Revenue in the period slid almost 8% to $203.2 million from about $220 million last year.  Edward M. Esber, chairman, president and chief executive officer, attributed the decline to reduced domestic revenue because of $4.9 million spent to upgrade existing software inventories to the new database IV Version 1.1, and $1.8 million spent on the recent reduction in work force.  He said the company was "encouraged by feedback" it received from selected customers now testing Version 1.1.  The red ink came as no surprise to Wall Street, but analysts said they saw ominous hints of a further delay in volume shipments of Version 1.1, a harbinger of continued losses in the fourth quarter.  "The loss is in line with our expectations," said John C. Maxwell III, an analyst with Dillon, Read & Co. in New York.  He added gross margins and operating profit "eroded quite dramatically" from the prior quarter, along with sales of existing software product lines like Multimate and Framework.  "The success of a new product in the database line is needed.  And while the company hasn't made a definite statement, it now looks like that's not going to be anytime soon," Mr. Maxwell said.  The company said in a statement that it expects to ship new products "during the next two quarters."  "It now looks like database IV Version 1.1 isn't going to be {widely} available until the first quarter of 1990," said David Bayer, an analyst with Montgomery Securities in San Francisco.  "This is the second delay now in getting the product out the door.  It does prolong the pain somewhat."  Mr. Maxwell said unless the company can start shipments of the new product sometime this quarter, the fourth-quarter loss is likely to be "comparable to the third quarter's."  If the company can start to ship during this quarter, it could stem some, if not all of the red ink, he said.  In national over-the-counter trading, Ashton-Tate closed yesterday at $10 a share, up 62.5 cents.  Tuesday, October 17, 1989  The key U.S. and foreign annual interest rates below are a guide to general levels but don't always represent actual transactions.  PRIME RATE: 10 1/2%.  The base rate on corporate loans at large U.S. money center commercial banks.  FEDERAL FUNDS: 8 11/16% high, 8 5/8% low, 8 5/8% near closing bid, 8 11/16% offered.  Reserves traded among commercial banks for overnight use in amounts of $1 million or more.  Source: Fulton Prebon (U.S.A.) Inc.  DISCOUNT RATE: 7%.  The charge on loans to depository institutions by the New York Federal Reserve Bank.  CALL MONEY: 9 3/4% to 10%.  The charge on loans to brokers on stock exchange collateral.  COMMERCIAL PAPER placed directly by General Motors Acceptance Corp.: 8.40% 30 to 44 days; 8.325% 45 to 59 days; 8.10% 60 to 89 days; 8% 90 to 119 days; 7.85% 120 to 149 days; 7.70% 150 to 179 days; 7.375% 180 to 270 days.  COMMERCIAL PAPER: High-grade unsecured notes sold through dealers by major corporations in multiples of $1,000: 8.50% 30 days; 8.40% 60 days; 8.375% 90 days.  CERTIFICATES OF DEPOSIT: 8.05% one month; 8.02% two months; 8% three months; 7.98% six months; 7.95% one year.  Average of top rates paid by major New York banks on primary new issues of negotiable C.D.s, usually on amounts of $1 million and more.  The minimum unit is $100,000.  Typical rates in the secondary market: 8.50% one month; 8.50% three months; 8.45% six months.  BANKERS ACCEPTANCES: 8.38% 30 days; 8.28% 60 days; 8.23% 90 days; 8.13% 120 days; 8.03% 150 days; 7.93% 180 days.  Negotiable, bank-backed business credit instruments typically financing an import order.  LONDON LATE EURODOLLARS: 8 5/8% to 8 1/2% one month; 8 9/16% to 8 7/16% two months; 8 9/16% to 8 7/16% three months; 8 1/2% to 8 3/8% four months; 8 7/16% to 8 5/ 16% five months; 8 7/16% to 8 5/16% six months.  LONDON INTERBANK OFFERED RATES (LIBOR): 8 5/8% one month; 8 9/16% three months; 8 7/16% six months; 8 7/16% one year.  The average of interbank offered rates for dollar deposits in the London market based on quotations at five major banks.  FOREIGN PRIME RATES: Canada 13.50%; Germany 8.50%; Japan 4.875%; Switzerland 8.50%; Britain 15%.  These rate indications aren't directly comparable; lending practices vary widely by location.  TREASURY BILLS: Results of the Monday, October 16, 1989, auction of short-term U.S. government bills, sold at a discount from face value in units of $10,000 to $1 million: 7.37% 13 weeks; 7.42% 26 weeks.  FEDERAL HOME LOAN MORTGAGE CORP. (Freddie Mac): Posted yields on 30-year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days. 9.88%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 7.875%, 2% rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  FEDERAL NATIONAL MORTGAGE ASSOCIATION (Fannie Mae): Posted yields on 30 year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days (priced at par) 9.80%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 8.70%, 6/2 rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  MERRILL LYNCH READY ASSETS TRUST: 8.50%.  Annualized average rate of return after expenses for the past 30 days; not a forecast of future returns.  Ethyl Corp. reported that third-quarter net income fell 12% from a year-earlier quarter helped by a gain from discontinued operations.  Profit from continuing operations rose 19%.  The chemicals and insurance company said net in the latest quarter was $54.8 million, or 45 cents a share.  In the year-earlier quarter, net was $62.2 million, or 51 cents a share.  The previous-year quarter included $16.1 million from businesses spun off as Tredegar Industries Inc.  Revenue was $613.7 million, up 18% from $521.2 million a year ago.  Ethyl said pretax profit from its insurance segment, excluding investment gains, rose 28% in the latest quarter to $28.6 million from $22.4 million.  In the chemicals segment, pretax profit rose 7% to $69.2 million from $64.9 million.  The company's chemicals interests include, among other things, petroleum additives, pharmaceuticals ingredients and polysilicon used by the semiconductor industry.  For the nine months, Ethyl said net fell 2% to $168.7 million, or $1.40 a share, from $172.2 million, $1.42 a share, a year ago.  Net in the latest period included $11.9 million from discontinued operations and a charge of $6.2 million from a plant closing.  In the year-ago period, net included $32.7 million from discontinued operations.  Revenue was $1.79 billion, up 18% from $1.52 billion a year earlier.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading, Ethyl closed at $25.875 a share, up 12.5 cents.  Tribune Co., helped by a hefty boost in performance at its broadcasting and entertainment operations, said net income jumped 21% in its third quarter ended Sept. 24 on a 3% increase in revenue.  The broadcasting and newspaper concern, based in Chicago, said net was $62.7 million, or 77 cents a primary share, up from $51.6 million, or 69 cents a share.  Per-share figures this year reflect $6.8 million in preferred-share dividends; the 1988 quarter didn't have such a payout.  Revenue rose to $590.7 million from $575.1 million.  Nine-month net climbed 19% to $174.8 million, or $2.21 a primary share, from $147.5 million, or $1.94 a share.  Nine-month per-share figures for 1989 reflect $12.9 million in preferred dividends that had no counterpart in the year-earlier quarter.  Revenue rose 4% to $1.79 billion.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading Friday, Tribune closed at $49.375, down $4.75.  Enserch Corp. said about 12 million, or 93%, of the publicly traded units of its limited partnership, Enserch Exploration Partners Ltd., were tendered in response to an offer that expired Monday.  Enserch said the tendered units will raise its ownership of the partnership to more than 99% from 87%.  About 900,000 units will continue to be publicly traded on the New York Stock Exchange, Enserch said.  Enserch had offered one-half a share of its common and $1 in cash for each unit.  The public sector borrowing requirement, the most widely used measure of Britain's government deficit or surplus, showed a deficit of #200 million in September, compared with a deficit of #765 million in August and a deficit of #1.08 billion in September 1988, the Treasury said.  In the six months since the current fiscal year began April 1, the surplus totaled #500 million, compared with a surplus of #3.6 billion in the year-earlier period.  The government is projecting a #14 billion surplus for the fiscal year.  The reported figures for the public sector borrowing requirement include receipts from the sale of state-owned industries.  Excluding those receipts, the government deficit would have totaled about #2.5 billion in the first six months, compared with #1.3 billion a year earlier, the Treasury said.  French crude-steel production in September was 1,616,000 metric tons, unchanged from a year earlier, according to the National Steel Manufacturers' Association.  The association said the September total brought French output for the first nine months this year to 14,789,000 tons, up 4.5% from a year earlier.  Prospect Group Inc., whose recent hostile tender offer for Recognition Equipment Inc. failed for lack of financing, apparently has gained a measure of control over the troubled company anyway.  As part of what a Recognition spokeswoman termed an "amiable agreement," Prospect Group will wind up with control of top management posts and an increased stake in the maker of data management equipment.  In a management restructuring, Thomas L. Ringer resigned as chairman, chief executive and a director, while Israel Sheinberg resigned as a director.  Mr. Sheinberg remains as executive vice president.  Thomas M. Hurley and Robert A. Vanourek, who had been designated to take over Recognition's top spots had Prospect's tender offer succeeded, were named co-chief executives and directors.  Mr. Hurley was formerly a vice president and general manager of an Avery International division; Mr. Vanourek was a former group vice president of Pitney Bowes Inc.  In addition, the agreement calls for Gilbert H. Lamphere, chairman of Prospect Group's executive committee, to be named chairman of a restructured board that will include four new independent directors.  Also named to the revised board was Thomas A. Loose, Recognition's senior vice president and general counsel.  Prospect, a New York-based leveraged buy-out firm, also agreed to invest $15 million in Recognition, which in turn agreed to repurchase as much as $20 million of its stock.  That would increase Prospect's ownership of the company's fully-diluted shares outstanding to 20% from 14.1%.  Under the agreement, Prospect is permitted to increase its stake in Recognition to 30%.  Beyond that, Prospect said it wouldn't offer to acquire additional shares for less than $11.25 a share during the next year or less than $14.06 a share during the subsequent two years.  Recognition also said it obtained a commitment from Chemical Bank and Bank of Boston to convert an estimated $18 million in bank debt to a new, 24-month secured term loan to be repaid through the sale of certain assets.  In August, Recognition said it was in violation of certain terms of its debt agreements with bank lenders because of a $3.9 million loss for the third quarter ended July 31.  The company attributed the loss to declining revenue and litigation costs relating to criminal charges against the company and two former executives, William G. Moore Jr. and Robert W. Reedy.  The former executives were indicted last October on charges of fraud, theft and conspiracy related to efforts by the company to win $400 million in Postal Service contracts.  Recognition Equipment said it expected to put the agreement with Prospect to a vote of its stockholders at a special meeting in January.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading, Recognition rose 87.5 cents to $6.625.  Prospect slipped 25 cents to $10.50 in national over-the-counter trading.  General Motors Corp.'s Chevrolet division, reacting to slow sales, said it will offer $800 rebates on its 1990 Beretta, the two-door version of its core compact-car line.  Sluggish sales of the Beretta, and its four-door sister car, the Corsica, prompted GM to idle the two plants that build the automobiles for a total of three weeks this month.  The Corsica and Beretta make up the highest-volume car line at Chevrolet, but sales of the vehicles are off 9.6% for the year, and fell a steep 34% during early October.  Chevrolet already is offering an $800 rebate on the 1990-model Corsica.  The latest rebate is good for all Beretta models.  Chevrolet buyers can take the rebate, or get discount financing at rates ranging from 6.9% on 24-month loans to 10.9% on 60-month loans.  StatesWest Airlines said it submitted an offer to the directors of Mesa Airlines to acquire the Farmington, N.M., carrier.  Except to characterize its offer as "fair and generous and in the best interests of Mesa shareholders," StatesWest declined to discuss details of its proposal.  It also asked Mesa to keep the proposal confidential.  A Mesa official confirmed receipt of the offer and said directors would meet to consider it.  Last week, Mesa rejected a proposal by StatesWest to acquire it or merge.  StatesWest has a 7.25% stake in Mesa, which operates 20 twin-engine and two single-engine turboprops among 42 cities in New Mexico, Arizona, Wyoming, Colorado and Texas.  StatesWest operates four twin-engine turboprop aircraft, connecting 10 cities in California, Arizona and Nevada.  The carrier hasn't yet turned a profit.  The former president of FirstSouth F.A., a defunct Arkansas thrift, pleaded guilty to conspiring to inflate the institution's earnings by concealing worthless loan guarantees.  Roderick D. Reed III, who was also chief operating officer of FirstSouth, could receive a maximum sentence of five years in federal prison and a $250,000 fine.  A sentencing date hasn't been set.  Mr. Reed admitted he conspired to conceal an agreement not to enforce loan guarantees executed by Dallas real-estate developers A. Starke Taylor III and George S. Watson, both of whom were FirstSouth stockholders.  Neither Mr. Taylor nor Mr. Watson have been charged with criminal wrongdoing.  By concealing the non-enforcement agreement, certain transactions with Messrs.  Taylor and Watson were entered on FirstSouth's books as loans, allowing the thrift to report fees and interest as current income, according to the U.S. attorney's office in Little Rock, Ark.  The conspiracy was part of an effort by Mr. Reed to hide FirstSouth's shaky financial condition from federal regulators, according to federal prosecutors and regulators.  The $1.68 billion thrift was declared insolvent and closed in December 1986.  FirstSouth's former chairman and chief executive officer, Howard Weichern, is also charged with conspiring to conceal the agreements with Messrs.  Watson and Taylor.  Mr. Weichern is scheduled for trial Jan. 3 before federal Judge Stephen Reasoner of Little Rock.  I approached "Mastergate," Larry Gelbart's new comedy at the Criterion Center, with considerable trepidation.  Nothing, I assumed, would be more hopelessly dated than a political satire on the Iran-Contra affair.  I had underestimated, however, both Mr. Gelbart's wit and the persistence of scandal in Washington.  Though the play clearly is framed around the events of Iran-Contra, it takes in the wide sweep of scandals over the past 30 years.  In fact, at one point Merry Chase (Melinda Mullins), a cool, carefully coiffed television announcer, recites a list of a dozen or more scandals of recent years, concluding with those affecting the Department of Housing and Urban Development and the savings and loan industry.  Onstage, a congressional hearing is in progress, complete with elegant crystal chandelier overhead and a lifesize reproduction of the signing of the Constitution in the background.  The witness table is center stage and below it, the paraphernalia for the ever-present media, in this case TNN, the Total News Network.  Not only are there camera operators on all sides, but the proceedings are shown on monitors throughout the theater.  The metaphor of theater is not entirely coincidental.  Mr. Gelbart clearly feels that all the participants in a congressional hearing -- the witnesses, the lawyers, the interrogators and the news media -- are performers.  As the story of "Mastergate" unfolds, we learn that the Internal Revenue Service confiscated one of the properties of a foreign financier who owes the government millions in taxes.  The man, it seems, has a Lichtenstein corporation, licensed in Libya and sheltered in the Bahamas.  He himself lives in a "consecutive series of unnumbered houses in a town in Switzerland."  The property seized by the IRS is a Hollywood film studio, Master Pictures Incorporated (MPI).  Supposedly the IRS will sell off the assets of MPI, but before it can, a lowly IRS agent is called into the hospital room of Wylie Slaughter, the dying head of the Central Intelligence Agency.  The lowly agent, Abel Lamb, who as you might guess, is being led to the slaughter, is ordered to take over the studio.  Soon the studio is producing a $40 million picture called "Tet, the Motion Picture," to distinguish it from "Tet, the Offensive," as well as "Tet, the Book" and "Tet, the Album."  The picture, to be made in the Central American country of San Elvador, is a cover for sending $800 million of arms to Los Otros, the rebel group attempting to regain neighboring Ambigua, which has been taken over by the leftist dictator Dr. Overtega, a former podiatrist, who leads a revolutionary band of foot soldiers.  The man handling all this for the now-deceased Slaughter is Major Manley Battle, Mr. Gelbart's stand in for Col. Oliver North.  Director Michael Engler has assembled a top-flight cast to carry out the impersonations of well-known political figures and to play the stock characters who invariably show up at congressional hearings.  Daniel von Bargen is ramrod-stiff but totally assured as Major Battle, mixing just the right brand of self-righteousness and patriotism; Jeff Weiss is fire, brimstone and teary-eyed emotionalism as the far-right senator who serves as a friendly interrogator of Major Battle; Zach Grenier is maddeningly officious playing a succession of lawyers; Joseph Daly has the perfect "aw, shucks" demeanor of George Bush in his portrayal of the vice president; and Ann McDonough is first-rate as a succession of witnesses' wives.  With one she is pregnant, with Major Battle she is knitting an American flag, and as the vice president's wife she rushes in with white hair, wearing a tailored suit and pearls, imitating Barbara Bush's gestures down to the last detail.  Though it's clear that Mr. Gelbart's sympathies do not lie with the far right, it's also true that he is evenhanded in dispensing his satirical jabs, taking sharp aim at senators and congressmen of all stripes and particularly at the media.  Mr. Gelbart also has fun with language.  "Mastergate" is subtitled "a play on words," and Mr. Gelbart plays that game as well as anyone.  He describes a Mastergate flunky as one who experienced a "meteoric disappearance" and found himself "handling blanket appeals at the Bureau of Indian Affairs."  This interest in words goes beyond puns and playfulness, however.  Mr. Gelbart deplores the obfuscation, the circumlocution and the debasement of language he sees on all sides.  As the hearings begin, the self-important Sen. Bowman (Jerome Kilty) announces: "Let me emphaticize one thing at the outset: We are not looking for hides to skin nor goats to scape."  Major Battle himself speaks in pure Pentagonese: "Without further monetary-stroke-military aid, scores of Ambiguan freedom lovers, who had gone way out on their life and limbs for us, were literally cut off at the knees without a paddle."  At another point he intones: "Publicity is a small price to pay for secrecy."  The evening is short -- 95 minutes without an intermission -- but even so, as the play progresses the thrust of Mr. Gelbart's satire loses its sharpness as his targets pop up ever more predictably.  Most of the evening, though, is filled with rare and welcome wit.  In "Mastergate," Mr. Gelbart has provided us not just one but two commodities that have all but disappeared from the Broadway theater: sharp political satire and an even sharper appreciation of the value of language.  The Federal National Mortgage Association set up a three-member office of the chairman and elected James A. Johnson as vice chairman, effective Jan. 1.  Mr. Johnson has been a managing director at Shearson Lehman Hutton since 1985, and before that was president of Public Strategies, a Washington consulting firm.  He is well-known in Democratic circles, having been executive assistant to Vice President Walter Mondale and chairman of Mr. Mondale's 1984 presidential campaign.  At Fannie Mae, he will take responsibility for the corporation's financial and legal areas and will work with David Maxwell, chairman and chief executive officer, and Roger Birk, president and chief operating officer, on strategic planning.  Mr. Johnson, 45 years old, has been a consultant on strategy to Fannie Mae for the past 3 1/2 years.  In an interview, he said Fannie Mae faces a number of challenges with the restructuring of the thrift industry and the push to broaden its activities overseas.  "There's no shortage of major things to do," he said.  Fannie Mae also said James A. Aliber, chairman of First Federal of Michigan and a director since 1985, moved up the date of his retirement from the board to accommodate Mr. Johnson's election as a director.  The board has 13 members elected by holders and five presidential appointees.  Fannie Mae, a federally chartered, shareholder-owned corporation, operates a secondary market for mortgage loans, buying loans from lenders, packaging some into securities for sale to investors and keeping the rest in its portfolio.  "The New Crowd" by Judith Ramsey Ehrlich and Barry J. Rehfeld (Little, Brown, 444 pages, $19.95), describes the displacing of the old "our crowd" Jewish Wall Street banking grandees by such new business barons as Saul Steinberg, Carl Icahn, Sanford Weill and Bruce Wasserstein.  Its many lively stories include the Gutfreund-Postel holiday cheer imbroglio.  These two New Crowd families lived in the same apartment building, with the Postel penthouse perched on top of the Gutfreund duplex.  The penthouse elevator started up from the Gutfreund landing, and Susan Gutfreund used to turn off its light, to give the impression that there was no higher floor.  Eventually, Mr. Postel broke his toe in the dark.  Then the Gutfreunds determined to put up a 22-foot Christmas tree, weighing a quarter of a ton, to amaze their holiday guests.  For this, a crane needed to be mounted on the Postels' terrace.  The Postels did not give permission.  But the Gutfreund workers went ahead anyway, only to be captured "in flagrante" by Joan Postel, who called the police.  Before the Gutfreunds finally left this unfriendly environment for a prodigious duplex on Fifth Avenue and an 18th-century mansion with a specially excavated $1 million garage in Paris, the Postels had obtained an injunction to prevent any future hoisting of trees, and in a neighborly spirit hit both the Gutfreunds and the building with a $35 million lawsuit.  Nothing less, it seemed, could console them for their traumas.  Where had all the money come from?  The young John Gutfreund had been discovered by Billy Salomon of Salomon Bros. when he was still a bearded liberal, and put to work as a trader, and then as a rough-and-tumble syndicator. " `Get off your . . .,' he would bellow," say the authors.  Rising in the firm, he became powerful and bland, though his new wife, Susan, made him shine in the gossip columns with her profligate spending habits and flamboyant frocks.  After he had been head of the company for 3 1/2 years, he and his partners sold it to Phibro, a powerful commodity trading outfit, for $550 million in Phibro stock.  Limited partner Billy Salomon, whose family name had been on the firm's door for 70 years and who had hoped it would be there forever, was not consulted.  Mr. Gutfreund collected $32 million, while Billy Salomon got $10 million, much less than if he had conducted the sale.  "I felt betrayed," he later said.  Worse, Salomon's timing had been off.  Its profits, unlike Phibro's, soared over the next two years, and had it held out, Salomon could have gotten an even bigger bundle.  The book also recounts the not dissimilar maneuvers surrounding the changing of the guard at Lehman Bros. and other grand old firms.  Often the genteel, conservative, long-term-oriented investment bankers were displaced by crude traders: "When angered, he cursed so forcefully that his face reddened and his pale-blue eyes narrowed into tiny slits," the authors say of Lehman's Lewis Glucksman.  The earlier generation of "our crowd" bankers -- Belmonts, Warburgs, Lehmans, Baches and Schiffs -- had stressed above all probity, tradition, continuity and reputation.  They were old-fashioned elegant gentlemen, who happened to be of German Jewish extraction.  But in the harsh world of today's Wall Street they have lost out to more aggressive and sometimes less scrupulous successors.  The cuckoo prefers the nests of other birds and heaves out their eggs.  But the old guard hired the New Crowd people: It brought in its own cuckoos.  So, as the Old Crowd toppled from the branch, it shouldn't have been too surprised.  The old guard had every right, however, to disdain the newcomers' new ways of making money, such as greenmail. (A Fortune article on Saul Steinberg was entitled, "Fear and Loathing in the Corporate Boardrooms.") Their other staple has been corporate takeovers, often hostile and financed by junk bonds.  Hostile takeovers are quite a new phenomenon.  Sometimes they are constructive, but often not.  First, by making management focus on short-term results, they inhibit building for the future -- just the opposite of Japan.  Second, a long-term shareholder of a good company needn't worry too much when the stock price drops temporarily: It will bounce back.  But if a raider takes over when the stock is weak, the shareholder never gets his recovery.  The raiders, meanwhile, have evolved their own pattern for spending their new millions.  As described in "The New Crowd," they take on ambitious new wives, move to Greenwich, Conn., or Bedford, N.Y., buy OK pictures, and let their wives share the wealth with decorators.  Having donated heavily to museums, they demand a place on their boards.  The book is patronizing about this nouveau riche struggle for respectability, which has its tawdry aspects.  However, on balance, the charity game helps America.  If those who have the money don't get involved with the museums and the charities, then City Hall will do it, badly.  It has been rightly observed that the main thing wrong with tainted money is, t'aint enough of it.  A handful of the New Crowd operators have crossed the line from the immoral to the illegal, and have ended up in the slammer or paying huge fines: Ivan Boesky, Dennis Levine, Martin Siegel, Victor and Steven Posner, and now Michael Milken and perhaps Leona Helmsley.  The glitzy office that Ivan Boesky vacated for a prison cell had previously contained commodity operators Marc Rich and "Pinky" Green, today fugitives from a potential century apiece of jail sentences.  The Old Crowd is deeply concerned by the backlash from all this.  However, the phenomenon is not specifically Jewish.  It has always been true that those outside the club want to climb in, and that a few will cut corners in the process.  Some pretty seamy stuff built the turn-of-the-century families' Fifth Avenue and Newport palazzi and endowed their daughters' weddings to foreign noblemen.  Mr. Boesky was a piker compared to Jay Gould and Jim Fiske, and Commodore Vanderbilt thought nothing of bribing judges and legislators.  So who knows?  In a generation or two some of the New Crowd may attain true respectability, perhaps to be displaced in turn by a later flock of unscrupulous raptors.  Or perhaps Wall Street, when it has suffered enough, will realize that finance is a service industry, and change its ethos.  ---  Mr. Train is president of Train, Smith Investment Counsel, New York.  Dallas investor Harold C. Simmons said he raised his stake in Lockheed Corp. to 10.62% from 10.43% of the aerospace and electronics concern's common shares.  In a Securities and Exchange Commission filing, Mr. Simmons said he and companies he controls, NL Industries Inc. and NL Chemicals Inc., hold 6,744,600 shares of Lockheed, of Calabasas, Calif.  They include 122,700 shares bought Friday for between $47.125 and $48 each.  In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange, Lockheed closed at $46.125 a share, down 12.5 cents.  Earlier this week, Mr. Simmons objected to published reports quoting him as saying he planned to sell his Lockheed stake because "the defense industry seems to be getting more uncertain."  Valhi Inc., another of Mr. Simmons' companies, responded to an article Monday in The Wall Street Journal, which credited a story in the Sunday Los Angeles Daily News.  Valhi said the articles didn't accurately reflect Valhi and its affiliates' intentions toward Lockheed.  Instead, Valhi said, they may increase, decrease or retain their Lockheed holdings, depending on a number of conditions.  Canada, which is preparing to speed up tariff cuts with the U.S., recorded a 47% narrowing in its trade surplus with the U.S. in August, Statistics Canada, a federal agency, reported.  U.S. exports to Canada jumped 11.2% in August from July while U.S. imports from Canada rose only 2.7%.  As a result, Canada's trade surplus with the U.S. narrowed to C$656.5 million (US$558 million) in August from C$1.23 billion (US$1.04 billion) in July.  U.S. exports benefited in August from heavy Canadian spending on new plant and equipment and a pickup in Canadian auto demand, Canadian officials said.  The U.S. and Canada, which do more trade than any other pair of nations, are to meet next month to arrange an acceleration of planned tariff cuts under the U.S.-Canada free trade agreement.  Industries in both countries have requested a speedup of tariff cuts on hundreds of products.  Some tariffs were eliminated when the trade pact took effect Jan. 1.  The remainder were to be phased out in five or 10 annual installments, with all tariffs eliminated by January 1998.  The two countries aim to reach an agreement by early December on a package of accelerated tariff cuts that would take effect early next year.  Canadian officials said the trade pact has kindled an export interest among many small Canadian companies that previously had little or no foreign sales.  For such businessmen, the Canadian government is organizing 55 missions this year to U.S. states bordering on Canada.  The businessmen are introduced to potential agents and distributors and instructed in trade procedures.  The U.S. Commerce Department is planning to try out similar trips on U.S. businessmen in coming months under its Canada First] Outreach Program.  Participants in the U.S. missions to Canada are to be assisted by members of the Service Corps of Retired Executives, a volunteer group, in dealing with their export challenges.  The Canadian government also has recently opened new trade offices in San Diego; San Juan, Puerto Rico; Miami; Princeton, N.J., and Denver, bringing the total number of such Canadian offices in the U.S. to 27.  The U.S. has six trade promotion offices in Canada.  Canada's export effort has been blunted by robust home market demand and by an 18% appreciation of the Canadian dollar against its U.S. counterpart in the past three years that has made Canadian goods more costly in the U.S.  Canada's trade surplus with all countries narrowed to C$203.5 million in August from C$528.3 million in July, Statistics Canada said.  Loral Corp. said it received a $325 million order from Turkey's Ministry of Defense, the largest contract the company ever has received.  Loral will provide to Turkey an electronic countermeasures system for its fleet of F-16 aircraft.  The system provides radar-threat warning and electronic jamming capabilities.  The defense electronics maker said delivery will begin in October 1991 and run through mid-1995.  Loral said the contract with Turkey will provide opportunities for Loral to supply that country with other defense systems.  Crown Resources Corp. said it reached a definitive agreement to acquire the Gold Texas Resources Ltd. shares it doesn't already own.  Under the proposed agreement, Gold Texas holders will receive 1.43 Crown shares for each of the 1.1 million Gold Texas shares not owned by Crown, which already owns 65%.  The arrangement is subject to approval by the Supreme Court of British Columbia province, Crown said.  Gold Texas is based in Vancouver, British Columbia, and Crown Resources is based in Denver.  Both are mining concerns.  Apogee Robotics Inc. said its board extended until Feb. 1 the exercise period of Apogee's existing stock purchase warrants outstanding.  The expiration date had been Nov. 3.  Each of the 1,075,000 warrants entitle the holders to purchase one share of Apogee common stock for $2.25.  Apogee was quoted in the over-the-counter market yesterday at $2 bid.  Bank of New England Corp., seeking to streamline its business after a year of weak earnings and mounting loan problems, said it will sell some operations and lay off 4% of its work force.  The bank holding company also reported that third-quarter profit dropped 41%, to $42.7 million, or 61 cents a share, from the year-earlier $72.3 million, or $1.04 a share.  Among its restructuring measures, the company said it plans to sell 53 of its 453 branch offices and to lay off 800 employees.  Altogether, employment is expected to decline to less than 16,000 from the current level of about 18,000.  Walter Connolly, chairman, said in an interview that the company expects to record pretax gains of $100 million to $125 million from the sale of its leasing operations and of certain financial processing services.  In a prepared statement, the company said it expects to realize those gains before year end.  Nonperforming assets continued to pile up in the latest quarter, rising to $900 million, or 3.52% of loans and leases, from $667 million, or 2.68%, at the end of the second quarter.  Some $170 million of the $233 million increase in nonperforming loans was related to real estate, and roughly three-quarters of that was in the troubled New England market, according to Richard Driscoll, vice chairman.  Mr. Driscoll said that, despite continued weakness in the region's real estate market, Bank of New England expects the rate of increase in nonperforming assets to slow in coming quarters.  Mr. Connolly noted that net third-quarter charge-offs, at $63 million, improved slightly from the $67 million in the second quarter.  And he indicated that more substantial improvement is expected in the next couple of quarters.  The company increased its loan loss reserve to $354 million from $342 million at the end of the second quarter.  Total assets slipped to $31.4 billion, from $32 billion as of June 30.  Among other restructuring measures, the bank said it will close its loan production offices in Chicago, New York and Philadelphia.  The Chicago office figured prominently in the bank's problems earlier this year, when $65 million in loans to Chicago businessman William Stoecker went sour.  In an internal memorandum to employees, Messrs.  Connolly and Driscoll described the restructuring as an effort to continue rationalizing operations assembled during a series of mergers over the past five years.  Italy's wholesale price index rose 0.4% in August from July and was up 6.1% from a year earlier, the state statistical institute reported.  The index registered 196.1 in August, compared with 195.4 in July and with 184.9 in August 1988.  The year-on-year rise in August was slightly down from the 6.4% rate in July.  The index has a base of 100 set in 1980 and isn't seasonally adjusted.  U.S. steel imports in August fell 14% from a year earlier to 1,531,000 tons, according to the American Iron and Steel Institute.  The trade group's compilation of Commerce Department data showed that August imports, the second largest monthly total of the year, were up 5% from July's 1,458,000 tons but below last year's high of 1,979,000 tons in June 1988.  August imports claimed 18.5% of the U.S. market, compared with 19.3% in July and 20.5% in August 1988.  The latest month's figures show that imports of steel from European Community nations fell to 466,000 tons from 481,000 a month earlier, while imports from Japan rose to 323,000 tons from 288,000 in July.  Imports from Canada rose to 272,000 tons in August from 209,000 in July.  The American Institute for Imported Steel said imports for the first eight months of 1989 were below the level allowed by the Voluntary Restraint Agreement program.  The institute said that, excluding semifinished steel products, year-to-date imports represented 15.2% of consumption, compared with a permitted maximum of 18.5%.  Japanese machinery makers received orders totaling 1.465 trillion yen ($10.33 billion) in August, up 14% from a year earlier, the Economic Planning Agency said.  "Equipment orders on the domestic side were particularly strong in shipping and power utilities," said an agency official.  The latest report compares with a modest 9.9% increase in July machinery orders from a year earlier.  In August, soon after Wang Laboratories Inc. reported a staggering $424.3 million loss and replaced its president, two Boston sales representatives sent customers a letter saying: "We fully expect that you will soon be reading stories in the press reporting the `Amazing Comeback at Wang.'"  How soon Wang will stage a comeback, or if it will at all, are still matters of debate.  But Wang salespeople are trying to cope with the biggest challenge any marketer can face: selling the products of a company that is on the ropes.  "If your prospect is feeling risk the whole time and you're not feeling as if you're backed up by a stable company, you've lost it before you've begun," says Mary Ann Cluggish, a Wellesley, Mass., sales trainer and consultant who works with high technology companies.  It can happen in any industry.  Consider the difficulties faced by Audi salespeople when the car was tainted by false charges of sudden acceleration, or Exxon dealers' problems in the wake of the Valdez oil spill.  Like thousands of salespeople before them, Wang's are finding ways to combat the bad news.  "It's very important that we exude confidence, even though within the family we know there's a lot of hard work ahead," said Richard Miller, the Lowell, Mass., computer concern's new president, in a video message to salespeople a month after he took over.  Wang got into financial trouble because of bloated overhead and overly optimistic sales forecasts.  Its mainline minicomputers and word processors have lost ground to cheaper personal computers.  Last year it funded its high employment by heavy borrowing, and it suffered huge losses when sales turned down instead of rising.  After the company reported red ink for the fiscal third quarter, Wang's marketing department provided the sales force answers to questions such as "How could you not have known you were going to lose $55 million?" and "Is Wang still a viable company?"  Salespeople try to push their products and avoid discussions of finances.  Responding to such questions is "defensive," says Kenneth Olissa, Wang's vice president, marketing.  "That's antithetical to the art of selling."  Moreover, he notes that analyzing financial results "poses a problem for a salesman who isn't particularly familiar with a balance sheet."  At one sales strategy meeting, an executive suggested ordering salespeople to become experts on the annual report.  Mr. Miller vetoed that: "Even I can't understand all the footnotes," he says.  Instead, he says, if the salespeople can get the customers to consider Wang's products on their merits, he or a top financial officer will try to assuage the fears about finances.  Mike Metschan, a salesman in Wang's Austin, Texas, office, has a breezier method: "We tell them $3 billion companies don't go out of business.  We tell them all the major companies are having financial difficulties."  Numerous computer companies are having sales slumps and earnings declines, but very few have had losses comparable to Wang's or are carrying such a large debt load.  Mr. Miller says that after a sharp sales slump in July and August, sales stabilized in September.  Although Wang will report a loss for the first quarter ended Sept. 30 and the full fiscal year, Mr. Miller says he expects the company will return to profitability by the fourth quarter.  Experts on sales technique say anyone representing a troubled company must walk a fine line.  "If a salesman jeopardizes his credibility in this time of trouble, it will be a problem for the long run," says George Palmatier, a Minden, Nev., sales consultant and author of "The Marketing Edge."  Still, says John Sullivan, a management recruiter with Daniel Roberts Inc. of Boston, who has held senior sales positions at Polaroid and Atari: "The customer will react to strength.  Ignore the present condition.  Show it's business as usual."  That isn't easy.  Wang's customers are data processing managers who want to be sure that their suppliers are stable, wellrun companies that will be around to fix bugs and upgrade computers for years to come.  For buyers, "these are career-risking decisions," says Jean Conlin, who supervises a network of Wang computers in the admissions department at Boston University.  The university is considering installing a $250,000 system to store applications electronically.  "Before the really bad news, we were looking at Wang fairly seriously," she says.  But "their present financial condition means I'd have a hard time convincing the vice president in charge of purchasing."  Ms. Conlin adds: "At some point we'd have to ask, `How do we know that in three years you won't be in Chapter 11?'"  During the past year, Wang has developed new products and a new strategy and hired a new president.  Wang's overall product line is "still not as good as other vendors, but they've come a long way," says Steven Wendler, a consultant with market researcher Gartner Group, Stamford, Conn.  "They were on the road to recovery in terms of customer attitudes until this bad quarter happened."  The first priority for Wang's sales force is to make sure it holds on to existing customers.  Wang's installed base is one of its greatest assets, and many of those customers remain extremely loyal.  But even before Wang's latest financial troubles surfaced, some customers "were trying to wall off their Wang installations" so other departments wouldn't add Wang, says Chris Christiansen, a former Wang marketer who is now a market analyst with Meta Group, a market research firm in Stamford, Conn.  One Wang salesman who left the company in July recalls that when he tried to sell products to Eastman Kodak, he worked "to muster support from internal allies," but "those allies became skeptical as they saw the downtrend.  The more recent losses were really devastating."  New customers, the source of higher commissions for salespeople and the key to Wang's long-term viability, are even tougher.  Rick Lynch, a former top salesman in Wang's Boston office, referring to Wang's mainstay computer line, says: "You can't sell a VS to a new customer."  Mr. Lynch left Wang this summer for Oracle Systems Inc., a software vendor.  The financial problems are particularly frustrating for salespeople pushing Wang's image systems, which convert paper forms to electronic documents.  Consultants say that Wang's technology is among the best available in the image market.  But salespeople often found that news of Wang's problems superseded their sales efforts.  William Tait, a former sales manager in Indianapolis, says that his office had all but sold a $1.5 million image system to pharmaceutical maker Eli Lilly & Co. "When they were making the decision, all hell broke loose with the finances."  He says the Lilly executives told him they couldn't take the risk with Wang.  Mr. Tait say he doesn't blame Lilly.  Buyers have to rely on a supplier "continually upgrading and replacing the product," he says.  "When a company realizes that, it's hard to go with Wang."  For Mr. Tait, who says he used to earn as much as $150,000 a year at Wang, it was one more reason to quit.  He is now president of Eastate Homes Inc., an Indianapolis contractor.  It can be hard for a salesperson to fight off feelings of discouragement.  Brian Petre, a former Wang salesman in upstate New York, says: "You have pride in your job.  You think you can go out and turn things around.  It's a tough thing when you can't.  The reason doesn't relate to your selling skills."  Discouragement feeds on itself.  "The problem is, if people get down in the dumps, they stop selling," says Mike Durcan, a laid-off sales manager in Wang's Austin office.  One key for salespeople is to boost their own morale.  Paul Hellman, a Framingham, Mass., sales and management consultant and author of "Ready, Aim, You're Hired," says: "The bad news is, you'll be rejected more.  The good news is, it's not your fault."  So, he advises, make goals achievable.  For instance, he suggests that salespeople making telephone calls should say to themselves: "All I want to do today is get 50 rejections."  But Mr. Miller, Wang's new president, recently warned his salespeople about negativism.  "Our customers watch us for the hidden message," he said.  "Look a customer right in the eye and say, `I'm glad to be at Wang.'"  Blinder International Enterprises Inc., the parent of beleaguered penny-stockbroker Blinder, Robinson & Co., said its shareholders approved a previously announced name change to Intercontinental Enterprises Inc.  "The parent company is diversifying into other industries around the world," said president Meyer Blinder in explaining the name change.  "Everytime we talked about Blinder International, {people} thought it was the brokerage house."  Mr. Blinder said the change wasn't related to the brokerage's recent troubles, which have included sharp declines in earnings, run-ins with the securities regulators and lawsuits by former customers.  The company said it expects the name change to take effect within a week.  Olin Corp. said third-quarter net income rose 26% on the strength of its chemical business.  Net was $24 million, or $1.15 a share, up from $19 million, or 90 cents a share, a year earlier.  Sales rose 7.4% to $580 million from $540 million.  Olin said its chemical segment had profit of $22 million, up from $15 million a year ago, largely because of gains in electrochemicals such as caustic soda.  The company said the gains were tied to volume increases and higher prices.  The market for electrochemicals include the paper, water-purification and textile industries.  The chemical segment had a $6 million gain on the sale of ammonia and urea businesses, which was offset by a $6 million charge for future environmental expenditures.  Profit in Olin's defense and ammunition segment rose to $8 million from $7 million.  The metals segment, hurt by a strike, had break-even results, against $3 million a year ago.  In the first nine months, net rose 21% to $93 million, or $4.52 a share, from $77 million, or $3.62 a share a year ago.  Sales rose 13% to $1.91 billion from $1.69 billion.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading, Olin closed at $58.50 a share, down 25 cents.  GTE Corp. and MCI Communications Corp. reported strong earnings gains to record levels for the third quarter.  Southwestern Bell Corp. and Cincinnati Bell posted slight declines.  GTE Corp.  GTE said net income rose 18%, aided by higher long-distance calling volumes and an increase in telephone lines in service.  Pretax operating profit from telephone operations rose 8.2% but profits from telecommunications products and electrical products were flat.  Revenues rose 8.8% to $4.35 billion from $4.0 billion.  The company said the quarter included a 10% increase in local-exchange usage for long-distance calling and a 5% increase in the number of access lines in service.  Earlier rate reductions in Texas and California reduced the quarter's revenue and operating profit $55 million; a year earlier, operating profit in telephone operations was reduced by a similar amount as a result of a provision for a reorganization.  Revenue in the telecommunications products and services unit rose 27% to $728.8 million, but operating profit was unchanged at $26.3 million, partly because of start-up expenses.  Electrical products' sales fell to $496.7 million from $504.5 million with higher world-wide lighting volume offset by lower domestic prices and the impact of weaker currencies in Europe and South America.  Operating profit of $37.2 million was unchanged.  In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange, GTE rose $1.25 to $64.125.  MCI Communications Corp.  MCI, which stepped up efforts to sell long-distance telephone service to residential customers, reported a 59% jump in earnings.  Revenue rose 23% to $1.67 billion from $1.36 billion.  Operating profit grew 57% to $269 million from $171 million, while operating margins rose to 16.1% from 15.9% the previous quarter and 12.6% a year ago.  Daniel Akerson, MCI chief financial officer, said the company sees further improvements in operating margins.  "We think we can take it to the 18% range over next 18 to 24 months," he said.  In national over-the-counter trading, MCI fell $2.625 to $42.375.  Charles Schellke, an analyst with Smith Barney, Harris Upham & Co., said some investors apparently expected slightly better revenue growth.  The company said that residential traffic grew faster than business traffic and attributed that to its new PrimeTime calling plan that competes with American Telephone & Telegraph's Reach Out America plan.  MCI claims about 12% of the overall long-distance telephone market but just under 10% of the $23 billion residential market.  It has been trying to improve its share of the residential market.  The company wants its business mix to more closely match that of AT&T -- a step it says will help prevent cross subsidization.  Mr. Akerson said MCI recorded "another solid cash positive quarter," its fourth in a row, but declined to comment on whether the company is considering a dividend or is planning any acquisition.  The current quarter, he said, "looks fine.  We think revenue will continue to grow and that we can control costs and thus improve profitability."  Southwestern Bell Corp.  Southwestern Bell Corp. said net dropped 8.7%, mainly the result of four extraordinary items: a franchise tax refund that its Southwestern Bell Telephone Co. unit received last year; a production shift of several Yellow Pages directories to the fourth quarter from the third; a rate refund in Missouri and a one-time adjustment to phone company revenues.  Revenue slipped 1.2% to $2.21 billion from $2.23 billion.  The earnings drop had been expected.  Chairman Zane E. Barnes said Southwestern Bell's "businesses are healthy and are continuing to grow."  The company reported a 3.1% increase in the number of access lines in service, and also said its Southwestern Bell Mobile Systems unit added 30,000 new customers, with a current total of about 333,000.  Southwestern shares fell 50 cents to $55.875 in composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange.  Cincinnati Bell Inc.  Cincinnati Bell Inc. said net declined 1.8%.  The company noted that the year-ago period was particularly strong, with an increase of nearly 70%.  Revenue jumped nearly 17% to $223.3 million from $191.4 million.  In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange, Cincinnati Bell fell 25 cents to $29.  The company said that the number of access lines dropped slightly in the quarter, a decline attributed to seasonal fluctuations.  For the year, however, access lines in service have increased 5.5%.  Chairman D.H. Hibbard said the company has set a new five year goal of doubling revenues to about $1.8 billion while steadily increasing net.  ---  @ 1989 1988  @ in per in per %  @ millions share millions share chg.  @ THIRD QUARTER NET INCOME  @ GTE Corp. .... $367.6 $1.06 $312.7 $0.91 + 18  @ MCI........... 165 0.62 104 0.38 + 59  @ Southwest Bell 295.3 0.98 323.3 1.08 -8.7  @ Cincinnati Bell 23 0.37 23.4 0.36 -1.8  @ NINE MONTHS NET INCOME  @ GTE Corp......$1,025.6 $3.01 $898.4 $2.62 + 14  @ MCI........... 450 1.69 224 0.78 +101  @ Southwest Bell 795.6 2.65 754.9 2.51 +5.4  @ Cincinnati Bell 71.6 1.14 67 1.05 +6.8  Rockwell International Corp.'s Tulsa unit said it signed a tentative agreement extending its contract with Boeing Co. to provide structural parts for Boeing's 747 jetliners.  Rockwell said the agreement calls for it to supply 200 additional so-called shipsets for the planes.  These include, among other parts, each jetliner's two major bulkheads, a pressure floor, torque box, fixed leading edges for the wings and an aft keel beam.  Under the existing contract, Rockwell said, it has already delivered 793 of the shipsets to Boeing.  Rockwell, based in El Segundo, Calif., is an aerospace, electronics, automotive and graphics concern.  Frank Carlucci III was named to this telecommunications company's board, filling the vacancy created by the death of William Sobey last May.  Mr. Carlucci, 59 years old, served as defense secretary in the Reagan administration.  In January, he accepted the position of vice chairman of Carlyle Group, a merchant banking concern.  SHEARSON LEHMAN HUTTON Inc.Thomas E. Meador, 42 years old, was named president and chief operating officer of Balcor Co., a Skokie, Ill., subsidiary of this New York investment banking firm.  Balcor, which has interests in real estate, said the position is newly created.  Mr. Meador had been executive vice president of Balcor.  In addition to his previous real-estate investment and asset-management duties, Mr. Meador takes responsibility for development and property management.  Those duties had been held by Van Pell, 44, who resigned as an executive vice president.  Shearson is about 60%-held by American Express Co.  Great American Bank, citing depressed Arizona real estate prices, posted a third-quarter loss of $59.4 million, or $2.48 a share.  A year earlier, the savings bank had earnings of $8.1 million, or 33 cents a share.  For the nine months, it had a loss of $58.3 million, or $2.44 a share, after earnings of $29.5 million, or $1.20 a share, in the 1988 period.  Great American said it increased its loan-loss reserves by $93 million after reviewing its loan portfolio, raising its total loan and real estate reserves to $217 million.  Before the loan-loss addition, it said, it had operating profit of $10 million for the quarter.  The move followed a round of similar increases by other lenders against Arizona real estate loans, reflecting a continuing decline in that market.  In addition to the increased reserve, the savings bank took a special charge of $5 million representing general and administrative expenses from staff reductions and other matters, and it posted a $7.6 million reduction in expected mortgage servicing fees, reflecting the fact that more borrowers are prepaying their mortgages.  Arbitragers weren't the only big losers in the collapse of UAL Corp. stock.  Look at what happened to UAL's chairman, Stephen M. Wolf, and its chief financial officer, John C. Pope.  On a day some United Airlines employees wanted Mr. Wolf fired and takeover stock speculators wanted his scalp, Messrs.  Wolf and Pope saw their prospective personal fortunes continue to plummet as shares of UAL, United's parent company, dived $24.875 on the Big Board to close at $198.  Including Monday's plunge, that has given the two executives paper losses of $49.5 million, based on what they would have realized had the pilots and management-led buy-out of UAL gone through at $300 a share.  When bank financing for the buy-out collapsed last week, so did UAL's stock.  Even if the banks resurrect a financing package at $250 a share, the two executives would still get about $25 million less than they stood to gain in the initial transaction.  Mr. Wolf owns 75,000 UAL shares and has options to buy another 250,000 at $83.3125 each.  In the $300-a-share buyout, that totaled about $76.7 million.  By yesterday's close of trading, it was good for a paltry $43.5 million.  Of course, Mr. Wolf, 48 years old, has some savings.  He left his last two jobs at Republic Airlines and Flying Tiger with combined stock-option gains of about $22 million, and UAL gave him a $15 million bonus when it hired him.  His 1988 salary was $575,000, with a $575,000 bonus.  The 40-year old Mr. Pope hasn't changed jobs enough -- at least the right ones -- to stash away that kind of money.  United paid him a $375,000 bonus to lure him away from American Airlines, and he was paid a salary of $342,122 last year with a $280,000 bonus.  Mr. Pope owns 10,000 UAL shares and has options to buy another 150,000 at $69 each.  That came to a combined $37.7 million under the $300-a-share buy-out, but just $21.3 million at yesterday's close.  Of the combined $114.4 million the two men were scheduled to reap under the buy-out, they agreed to invest in the buy-out just $15 million, angering many of the thousands of workers asked to make pay concessions so the buy-out would be a success.  United's directors voted themselves, and their spouses, lifetime access to the Friendly Skies -- free first-class travel, and $20,000 a year for life as well.  Conceivably, in a scaled-back buy-out, they could be bumped back to coach seats for life.  Thomas H. Johnson, president of the Coatedboard division of Mead Corp., was named president of Manville Forest Products Corp., a Manville unit, and senior vice president of Manville Corp. Mr. Johnson succeeds Harry W. Sherman, who resigned to pursue other interests, in both positions.  Manville is a building and forest products concern.  US Facilities Corp. said Robert J. Percival agreed to step down as vice chairman of the insurance holding company.  "There was a difference of opinion as to the future direction of the company," a spokeswoman said.  Mr. Percival declined to comment.  In a statement, US Facilities said Mr. Percival's employment contract calls for him to act as a consultant to the company for two years.  He will also remain a director, US Facilities said, but won't serve on any board committees.  Mr. Percival will be succeeded on an interim basis by George Kadonada, US Facilities chairman and president.  In the same statement, US Facilities also said it had bought back 112,000 of its common shares in a private transaction.  Terms weren't disclosed.  The buy-back represents about 3% of the company's shares, based on the 3.7 million shares outstanding as of Sept. 30.  In national over-the-counter trading yesterday, US Facilities closed at $3.625, unchanged.  Three leading drug companies reported robust third-quarter earnings, bolstered by strong sales of newer, big-selling prescriptions drugs that provide hefty profit margins.  Merck & Co. reported a 25% increase in earnings; Warner-Lambert Co.'s profit rose 22% and Eli Lilly & Co.'s net income rose 24%.  The results were in line with analysts' expectations.  Merck & Co.  Merck, Rahway, N.J., continued to lead the industry with a strong sales performance in the human and animal health-products segment.  A stronger U.S. dollar reduced third-quarter and first-nine-month sales growth 2% and 3%, respectively.  International sales accounted for 47% of total company sales for the nine months, compared with 50% a year earlier.  Sales for the quarter rose to $1.63 billion from $1.47 billion.  Mevacor, Merck's new cholesterol-lowering drug, had higher sales than any other prescription medicine has ever achieved in the U.S. in the year following introduction, the company said.  The drug was introduced in West Germany this year.  Intense competition, however, led to unit sales declines for a group of Merck's established human and animal-health products, including Aldomet and Indocin.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Merck shares closed at $75.25, up 50 cents.  Warner-Lambert Co.  Warner-Lambert, Morris Plains, N.J., reported sales that were a record for any quarter and the eighth quarter in a row of 20% or more per-share earnings growth.  Spurred by growth in world-wide sales of the company's prescription drugs, Warner-Lambert said 1989 will be the best year in its history, with per-share earnings expected to increase more than 20% to about $6.10.  Sales for the quarter rose to $1.11 billion from $1.03 billion.  Prescription-drug world-wide sales rose 9% in the quarter to $340 million; U.S. sales rose 15%.  The segment's growth was led by sales of the cardiovascular drugs Lopid, a lipid regulator, and Dilzem, a calcium channel blocker.  World-wide sales of Warner-Lambert's non-prescription health-care products, such as Halls cough tablets, Rolaids antacid, and Lubriderm skin lotion, increased 3% to $362 million in the third quarter; U.S. sales rose 5%.  Confectionery products sales also had strong growth in the quarter.  World-wide sales of Trident gum, Certs breath mints, and Clorets gum and breath mints, increased 12% to $277 million.  Warner-Lambert shares closed at $109.50 a share, up $1.50, in Big Board composite trading yesterday.  Eli Lilly & Co.  Lilly attributed record third-quarter and nine-month results to world-wide gains for pharmaceuticals, medical instruments and plant-science products despite poor exchange rates for the dollar that slowed sales abroad.  Earnings continued to pace sales because of a lower tax rate, profit from the renegotiation of the debt instrument received from Faberge Inc. in connection with Lilly's sale of Elizabeth Arden Inc. in 1987, and net proceeds from the settlement of patent litigation at Lilly's Hybritech Inc. unit.  Third-quarter sales of the Indianapolis, Ind., company rose 11% to $1.045 billion from $940.6 million.  Nine-month sales grew 12% to $3.39 billion from $3.03 billion a year earlier.  Sales of Prozac, an anti-depressant, led drug-sales increases.  Higher sales of pesticides and other plant-science products more than offset a slight decline in the sales of animal-health products to fuel the increase in world-wide agricultural product sales, Lilly said.  Advanced Cardiovascular Systems Inc. and Cardiac Pacemakers Inc. units led growth in the medical-instrument systems division.  Lilly shares closed yesterday in composite trading on the Big Board at $62.25, down 12.5 cents.  ---  @ 1989 1988  @ in per in per %  @ millions share millions share chg.  @ THIRD QUARTER NET INCOME  @ Merck ............. $390.5 $0.99 $311.8 $0.79 + 25  @ Eli Lilly & Co..... 212.4 0.73 171.4 0.60 + 24  @ Wrnr-Lmbrt ........ 106.9 1.58 87.7 1.29 + 22  @ NINE MONTHS NET INCOME  @ Merck ............ $1,127.5 $2.85 $899.5 $2.28 + 25  @ Eli Lilly & Co.... 714.2 2.45 585.3 2.04 + 22  @ Wrnr-Lmbrt ....... 320.4 4.73 262.8 3.86 + 22  Reuben Mark, chairman of Colgate-Palmolive Co., said he is "comfortable" with analysts' estimates that third-quarter earnings rose to between 95 cents and $1.05 a share.  That compares with per-share earnings from continuing operations of 69 cents the year earlier; including discontinued operations, per-share was 88 cents a year ago.  The per-share estimates mean the consumer-products company's net income, increased to between $69.5 million and $76 million, from $47.1 million the year-before period.  Analysts estimate Colgate's world-wide third-quarter sales rose about 8% to $1.29 billion.  Mr. Mark attributed the earnings growth to strong sales in Latin America, Asia and Europe.  Results were also bolstered by "a very meaningful" increase in operating profit by Colgate's U.S. business, Mr. Mark said.  Operating profit at Colgate's U.S. household products and personal-care businesses jumped 25% in the quarter, Mr. Mark added.  He said the improvement was a result of cost savings achieved by consolidating manufacturing operations, blending two sales organizations and focusing more carefully the company's promotional activities.  The estimated improvement in Colgate's U.S. operations took some analysts by surprise.  Colgate's household products business, which includes such brands as Fab laundry detergent and Ajax cleanser, has been a weak performer.  Analysts estimate Colgate's sales of household products in the U.S. were flat for the quarter, and they estimated operating margins at only 1% to 3%.  "If you could say their business in the U.S. was mediocre, but great everywhere else, that would be fine," says Bonita Austin, an analyst with Wertheim Schroder & Co.  "But it's not mediocre, it's a real problem."  Mr. Mark conceded that Colgate's domestic business, apart from its highly profitable Hill's Pet Products unit, has lagged.  "We've done a lot to improve {U.S.} results, and a lot more will be done," Mr. Mark said.  "Improving profitability of U.S. operations is an extremely high priority in the company."  To focus on its global consumer-products business, Colgate sold its Kendall health-care business in 1988.  H. Anthony Ittleson was elected a director of this company, which primarily has interests in radio and television stations, increasing the number of seats to five.  Osborn also operates Muzak franchises, entertainment properties and small cable-television systems.  Mr. Ittleson is executive, special projects, at CIT Group Holdings Inc., which is controlled by Manufacturers Hanover Corp.  The Boston Globe says its newly redesigned pages have a "crisper" look with revamped fixtures aimed at making the paper "more consistent" and "easier to read."  Maybe so -- if you can find where your favorite writer went.  Beantown scribes, who spare no invective when taking on local luminaries such as Michael "Pee Wee" Dukakis, or New England Patriots Coach Raymond "Rev.  Ray" Berry, yesterday poured ridicule on new drawings of Globe columnists that replaced old photos in the revamped pages this week.  By late last night, Globe Managing Editor Thomas Mulvoy, bending to the will of his troops, scrapped the new drawings.  For a few days at least, he says, no pictures or drawings of any kind will adorn the columns.  Trouble was, nobody thought they looked right.  Globe columnist Mike Barnicle -- in the second attack on his employer in as many weeks -- averred that his shadowy countenance was so bad, it looked "like a face you'd find on a bottle of miracle elixir that promises to do away with diarrhea in our lifetime."  Mr. Barnicle reminded readers that he still hasn't forgiven Globe management for questioning a $20 expense chit he submitted for parking his car while chasing a story.  "I thought {the drawing} a cross between someone you'd spot whipping open his trench coat . . . or a guy who boasted he'd been Charles Manson's roommate for the last 19 years," he said.  Mr. Barnicle was hardly kinder to the renderings of colleagues Michael Madden ("appears to be a pervert"), Will McDonough ("looks as if he drove for Abe Lincoln") or Bella English, whose "little girl now screams hysterically every time she sees a newspaper."  Lynn Staley, the Globe's assistant managing editor for design, acknowledges that the visages were "on the low end of the likeness spectrum."  Rival Boston Herald columnist Howie Carr, who usually rails at Statehouse "hacks" and nepotism, argued that the new drawings were designed to hide Mr. Madden's "rapidly growing forehead" and the facial defects of "chinless" Dan Shaughnessy, a Globe sports columnist.  "But think of the money you, the reader, will save on Halloween," said Mr. Barnicle.  "Instead of buying masks for your kids, just cut out the columnists' pictures. . . ."   Deeply ingrained in both the book review "Kissing Nature Good-bye" by Stephen MacDonald (Leisure & Arts, Sept. 27) and the books reviewed is the assumption that global warming is entirely a result of human activity.  Is such a view justified?  In the absence of humans, would the Earth enjoy a constant climate over the long term?  Clearly not.  About 20,000 years ago the last ice age ended.  Enormous ice sheets retreated from the face of North America, northern Europe and Asia.  This global warming must have been entirely natural -- nobody would blame it on a few hundred thousand hunter-gatherers hunting mammoths and scratching around in caves.  Furthermore, no bell has yet rung to announce the end of this immense episode of natural global warming.  It is probably continuing and may well account for most of, or all of, present-day global warming.  I bow to no one in my regard for our terrestrial heritage, but if we are serious about global warming we must look at the big picture and not allow the Dominant Culture to lock us into the capitalist-exploiters-greedy-American-consumers-global- warming scenario as the sole model for discussion.  Jocelyn Tomkin  Astronomy Department  University of  Texas Austin, Texas  The Internal Revenue Service plans to restructure itself more like a private corporation.  In addition, the tax-collecting agency says that it will take the unusual step of looking to the private sector to fill two new high-level positions to guide the 120,000-employee agency: a comptroller to oversee daily finances and a chief information officer to update the information system, which includes probably the largest computer data base in the world.  The IRS also said that it would create the position of chief financial officer, who will be hired from within the agency.  IRS Commissioner Fred T. Goldberg said the changes are intended to bring "accountability" to the agency, which has an annual budget of more than $5 billion and collects about $1 trillion a year.  "My assessment and everyone's assessment is that we do not have the kinds of information that let us responsibly and effectively formulate and execute our budget," Mr. Goldberg said.  "And we don't have internal controls and discipline that we need to have to spend $5 billion properly."  Mr. Goldberg, who took over as head of the IRS in July, has been disturbed by what he considers the inefficiency, waste and lack of coordination among the branches of the vast federal agency.  The IRS operates on a computer system designed in 1961, which it has been trying to modernize for years.  And the agency, which operated throughout fiscal 1989 with a $360 million budget shortfall, has been under a hiring freeze since last fall.  The new commissioner says that closer scrutiny of how the agency uses its resources will go a long way toward enhancing its ability to collect more tax revenue.  "I think that you will see a significant improvement in the budget formulation and execution process which, in turn, I believe will result in a significant increase in revenue," he said.  The IRS hopes to fill the new positions soon.  Customarily, it would appoint career civil servants from within the agency, but Mr. Goldberg said he plans to "scour the world" for the chief information officer and the comptroller.  Although the jobs will probably pay between $70,000 and $80,000 a year, IRS officials are confident that they can attract top-notch candidates from the private sector.  "You're telling someone they can spend the next three or four or five or six years of their life bringing about the most difficult and costly modernization of an information system on the civil side ever," Mr. Goldberg said.  "On the comptroller side, you're developing and making work financial controls governing a $6 billion budget."  When Maj. Moises Giroldi, the leader of the abortive coup in Panama, was buried, his body bore several gunshot wounds, a cracked skull and broken legs and ribs.  They were the signature of his adversary, Panamanian leader Manuel Antonio Noriega.  The rebel officer's slow and painful death, at the headquarters of Panama's Battalion-2000 squad, was personally supervised by Gen. Noriega, says a U.S. official with access to intelligence reports.  Leaping into rages, sinking into bouts of drunkenness and mistrust, Mr. Noriega has put to death some 70 of his troops involved in the coup, according to U.S. officials monitoring crematoriums and funeral parlors in Panama City.  He is now changing the place he sleeps every night, sometimes more than once a night.  His meals are most often prepared by women he trusts -- his full-time mistress, Vicky Amado, and her mother, Norma.  And he is collecting the names of those who telephoned the coup-makers to congratulate them during their brief time in control of his headquarters.  More enemies to be dealt with.  In the two weeks since the rebellion, which the U.S. hesitantly backed, Mr. Noriega has been at his most brutal-and efficient-in maintaining power.  Yet, while the failed coup is a major U.S. foreign policy embarrassment, it is merely the latest chapter in a byzantine relationship between Mr. Noriega and Washington that stretches back three decades.  America's war on the dictator over the past two years, following his indictment on drug charges in February 1988, is the legacy of that relationship.  Before American foreign policy set out to destroy Noriega, it helped create him out of the crucible of Panama's long history of conspirators and pirates.  For most of the past 30 years, the marriage was one of convenience.  In 1960, for example, when Mr. Noriega was both a cadet at an elite military academy in Peru and a spy-in-training for the U.S. Defense Intelligence Agency, he was detained by Lima authorities for allegedly raping and savagely beating a prostitute, according to a U.S. Embassy cable from that period.  The woman had nearly died.  But U.S. intelligence, rather than rein in or cut loose its new spy, merely filed the report away.  Mr. Noriega's tips on emerging leftists at his school were deemed more important to U.S. interests.  From that point on, the U.S. would make a practice of overlooking the Panamanian's misadventures.  The U.S. has befriended and later turned against many dictators, but none quite so resourceful.  The 55-year-old Mr. Noriega isn't as smooth as the shah of Iran, as well-born as Nicaragua's Anastasio Somoza, as imperial as Ferdinand Marcos of the Philippines or as bloody as Haiti's Baby Doc Duvalier.  Yet he has proved more resilient than any of them.  And out of necessity: The U.S. can make mistakes and still hope to remove him from power, but a single error on his part could cost him his life.  "The U.S. underestimated Noriega all along," says Ambler Moss, a former Ambassador to Panama.  "He has mastered the art of survival."  In keeping with America's long history of propping up Mr. Noriega, recent U.S. actions have extended rather than shortened his survival.  Mr. Noriega might have fallen of his own weight in 1988 because of Panama's dire economic situation, says Mr. Moss, but increasing external pressure has only given him additional excuses for repression, and a scapegoat for his own mismanagement.  "If the U.S. had sat back and done nothing, he might not have made it through 1988," Mr. Moss contends.  Perhaps most important, Mr. Noriega's allies have intervened to encourage -- in some cases, to demand -- that the dictator maintain his grip of the throne.  One Colombian drug boss, upon hearing in 1987 that Gen. Noriega was negotiating with the U.S. to abandon his command for a comfortable exile, sent him a hand-sized mahogany coffin engraved with his name.  "He is cornered," says the Rev. Fernando Guardia, who has led Catholic Church opposition against Noriega.  "The Americans have left him without a way out.  It is easy to fight when you don't have any other option."  His chief advantage in the fight: his intimate knowledge of American ways and weaknesses.  Mr. Noriega often tells friends that patience is the best weapon against the gringos, who have a short attention span and little stomach for lasting confrontation.  The U.S. discovered the young Tony Noriega in late 1959, when he was in his second year at the Chorrillos Military Academy in Lima, according to former U.S. intelligence officials.  The contact occurred through Mr. Noriega's half-brother, a Panamanian diplomat based in Peru named Luis Carlos Noriega Hurtado.  Luis Carlos, knowing that helping the Americans could advance the career of any Panamanian officer, relayed Tony's reports on the leftist tendencies he observed among his fellow students and, more important, among his officers and instructors.  A spy was born.  It was a heady experience for the pockmarked and slightly built Mr. Noriega, who was known to his friends as Cara la Pina -- pineapple face.  Born the illegitimate son of his father's maid, he was raised on the mean streets of the central market district of Panama City.  Tony was four years older than most of his fellow cadets, and gained admission to the academy because his brother had falsified his birth certificate.  He considered himself intellectually superior to his Peruvian peers, many of whom were wayward sons sent by their well-off families to the highly disciplined, French-modeled academy as a sort of reform school.  In his peaked military cap and neatly pressed, French-made uniform, Noriega felt more respected and powerful than ever in his underprivileged life, friends from the period say.  "He had an elegant uniform with gold buttons in a country where there was a cult of militarism, where officers were the elite with special privileges," recalls Darien Ayala, a fellow student in Peru and a lifelong friend.  Mr. Noriega's relationship to American intelligence agencies became contractual in either 1966 or 1967, intelligence officials say.  His commanding officer at the Chiriqui Province garrison, Major Omar Torrijos, gave him an intriguing assignment: Mr. Noriega would organize the province's first intelligence service.  The spy network would serve two clients: the Panamanian government, by monitoring political opponents in the region, and the U.S., by tracking the growing Communist influence in the unions organized at United Fruit Co.'s banana plantations in Bocas del Toros and Puerto Armuelles.  United Fruit was one of the two largest contributors to Panama's national income.  Satisfying its interests was a priority for any Panamanian leader.  Mr. Noriega's initial retainer was only $50 to $100 a month, plus occasional gifts of liquor or groceries from the American PX, a former intelligence official says.  It was modest pay by American standards, but a healthy boost to his small military salary, which fellow officers remember as having been $300 to $400 monthly.  "He did it very well," recalls Boris Martinez, a former Panamanian colonel who managed Mr. Noriega and his operation.  "He started building the files that helped him gain power."  A National Guard job assumed by Capt. Noriega in 1964 -- as chief of the transit police in David City, capital of the Chiriqui Province -- was tailor-made for an aspiring super-spy.  By pressuring taxi and bus drivers who needed licenses, he gained a ready cache of information.  He knew which local luminaries had been caught driving drunk, which had been found with their mistresses.  This proved particularly valuable to the Panamanian government in 1967, when union leaders were planning a May Day march that the government feared could turn violent.  Mr. Noriega had learned that a local union leader was sleeping with the wife of his deputy.  So he splashed the information on handbills that he distributed throughout the banana-exporting city of Puerto Armuelles, which was ruled by United Fruit Co.  The campaign so divided union leaders that the government found them far easier to control.  "It was like a play on Broadway," recalls Mr. Martinez.  "Noriega managed the whole thing.  He was superb.  Noriega was an expert at bribing and blackmailing people."  During his years in Chiriqui, however, Mr. Noriega also revealed himself as an officer as perverse as he was ingenious.  Rodrigo Miranda, a local lawyer and human-rights monitor, recalls an intoxicated Noriega visiting prisoners in their cells at the 5th Zone Garrison headquarters in David, where he had his offices.  Mr. Noriega would order them all to take off their clothes and run around the courtyard naked, laughing at them and then retreating to his office.  "People started wondering if something was wrong with him," Mr. Miranda recalls.  But through this period, so far as the U.S. military was concerned, Mr. Noriega was a model recruit.  He signed up for intelligence and counter-intelligence training under American officers at Fort Gulick in Panama in July 1967, according to a copy of a 1983 resume with details Mr. Noriega has since classified as secret.  He flew to Fort Bragg, N.C., in September of that year for a course in psychological operations, returning to the School of the Americas in Panama for a two-month course called "military intelligence for officers."  Some American officers interpreted his eagerness and studiousness as a sign of loyalty, but they did so falsely.  He rose to chief of intelligence in Panama's socalled G-2 in 1970 after providing populist dictator Torrijos the critical support to defeat a coup attempt against him a year earlier.  He became Gen. Torrijos's inseparable shadow, and the holder of all Panama's secrets.  Mr. Noriega, by now a lieutenant colonel, expanded his contacts to include the Cubans -- not to mention the Israelis, the Taiwanese and any other intelligence service that came knocking.  When U.S. diplomats complained to the CIA of Col. Noriega's moonlighting, intelligence experts always insisted that his allegiance was first to the Americans.  "Early on in the State Department, we took to calling him the rent-a-colonel, in tribute to his ability to simultaneously milk the antagonistic intelligence services of Cuba and the United States," recalls Francis J. McNeil, who, as deputy assistant secretary of state for inter-American affairs, first ran across reports about Mr. Noriega in 1977.  "Some of us wondered how our intelligence people could put so much stock in his information when he was just as close to the Cubans."  Even at this early stage, drugs caused additional concerns.  During the Nixon administration, the Drug Enforcement Administration became dismayed at the extent of the G-2's connections to arrested drug traffickers.  One DEA agent drew up a list of five options for dealing with Col. Noriega, one of which was assassination.  The head of the DEA at the time, John Ingersoll, scotched the assassination plan.  But he did fly to Panama to scold dictator Torrijos on the drug ties of Panamanian officials, including Mr. Noriega.  Mr. Ingersoll later recalled that Gen. Torrijos seemed afraid to act on the concerns of the U.S. "Everybody was afraid of him," Mr. Ingersoll says.  Mr. Noriega became an even greater threat in 1976, when U.S. intelligence services discovered that he had been buying recordings of electronically monitored conversations from three sergeants working for the U.S. Army's 470th Military Intelligence Group.  The tapes included wiretaps of Gen. Torrijos's own phone, according to American intelligence officials.  "We caught him with his hands on our cookie jar," says former CIA Director Stansfield Turner.  For the first time, the U.S. considered cutting Mr. Noriega from its intelligence payroll -- and the deliberations were intense, Mr. Turner says.  "In the world of intelligence, if you want to get information, you get it from seedy characters.  The question is how much you get tied in with seedy characters so they can extort you."  Intelligence officials to this day worry whether Mr. Noriega sold sensitive information on the recordings to the Cubans or others.  Mr. Turner was troubled enough to cancel the U.S. contract with the rent-a-colonel at the beginning of the Carter administration.  The U.S. soon found new cause for concern: gun-running.  Prosecutors in Southern Florida indicted five Panamanians on charges of illegally running arms to Sandinista rebels trying to overthrow the Nicaraguan government of Mr. Somoza.  They included one of Mr. Noriega's closest friends and business partners, Carlos Wittgreen.  And the investigators were quickly closing in on Mr. Noriega himself.  At the time, though, in 1979, the U.S. was once again flirting with its longtime Latin American spy.  Mr. Noriega made plans to fly to Washington for a meeting with his counterpart at the Pentagon.  Dade County and federal authorities, learning that he intended to fly through Miami, made plans to arrest him on the gun-running charges as soon as he hit U.S. soil.  It was a Friday in June.  The Pentagon foiled the plan.  According to military officers at the time, word was passed to Mr. Noriega by his American hosts that the police would be waiting.  On Monday, U.S. officials received a routine, unclassified message from the military group commander in Panama.  "Due to health reasons, Lt. Col. Noriega has elected to postpone his visit to Washington," it read.  Prosecutors in Miami received yet another setback.  Their original indictment against Mr. Wittgreen, the friend of Mr. Noriega, and the other four was dismissed on a technicality.  But now, along with reindicting Mr. Noriega's pal, they intended to charge Mr. Noriega himself, on allegations that he was involved in the illegal trading of some $2 million in arms.  In January 1980, Jerome Sanford, as assistant U.S. attorney, was summoned to a meeting with a Federal Bureau of Investigation agent assigned to the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco and Firearms in Miami.  Panamanian dictator Torrijos, he was told, had granted the shah of Iran asylum in Panama as a favor to Washington.  Mr. Sanford was told Mr. Noriega's friend, Mr. Wittgreen, would be handling the shah's security.  It wouldn't be a good idea to indict him -- much less Mr. Noriega, the prosecutor was told.  After prodding from Mr. Sanford, U.S. Attorney Jack Eskenazi pleaded with Justice Department officials in Washington to let the indictment proceed.  "Unfortunately," Mr. Eskenazi wrote in a letter, "those of us in law enforcement in Miami find ourselves frequently attempting to enforce the laws of the United States but simultaneously being caught between foreign policy considerations over which we have no control."  The letter, along with a detailed prosecution memo, sat on the desks of Justice officials for months before the case died a quiet death.  "I think if we had been allowed to go ahead then we wouldn't have the problems we have now," Mr. Sanford says.  "If he had been found guilty, we could have stopped him."  In August 1983, Mr. Noriega took over as General and de-facto dictator of Panama, having maneuvered his way to the top only two years after the mysterious death in a plane crash of his old boss Omar Torrijos.  Soon, the military became a veritable mafia controlling legal and illegal businesses.  The Reagan administration also put Mr. Noriega's G-2 back on the U.S. payroll.  Payments averaged nearly $200,000 a year from the U.S. Defense Intelligence Agency and the CIA.  Although working for U.S. intelligence, Mr. Noriega was hardly helping the U.S. exclusively.  During the Reagan years he expanded his business and intelligence contacts with the Cubans and the Sandinistas.  He allegedly entered into Panama's first formal business arrangement with Colombian drug bosses, according to Floyd Carlton, a pilot who once worked for Mr. Noriega and who testified before the U.S. grand jury in Miami that would ultimately indict the Panamanian on drug charges.  But Mr. Noriega was convinced the Reagan White House wouldn't act against him, recalls his close ally Jose Blandon, because he had an insurance policy: his involvement with the Contra rebels in Nicaragua.  Mr. Blandon says the general allowed the Contras to set up a secret training center in Panama.  Mr. Noriega also conveyed intelligence from his spy operation inside the Nicaraguan capital of Managua.  And on at least one occasion, in the spring of 1985, he helped arrange a sabotage attack on a Sandinista arsenal in Nicaragua.  Although, his help for the Contra cause was limited, it was enough to win him important protectors in the Reagan administration, says Sen. Patrick Leahy, a Vermont Democrat who then served on the Senate Intelligence Committee.  "Noriega played U.S. intelligence agencies and the U.S. government like a violin," he says.  An incident in 1984 suggested one additional means by which Mr. Noriega might have maintained such influence with Washington -- by compromising U.S. officials.  Curtin Windsor, then the ambassador to Costa Rica, recalls being invited to Panama by Mr. Noriega's brother Luis Carlos for a weekend of deep sea fishing and "quiet, serious conversation" on the Aswara Peninsula.  Mr. Windsor notified Everett E. Briggs, the U.S. ambassador to Panama, of the invitation.  "Briggs screamed," Mr. Windsor recalls.  He says Mr. Briggs told him he was being set up for a "honey trap," in which Mr. Noriega would try to involve him in an orgy and then record the event "with sound and video."  Mr. Briggs, on vacation after resigning his position at the National Security Council, couldn't be reached for comment.  As Mr. Noriega's political troubles grew, so did his offers of assistance to the Contras, an apparent attempt to curry more favor in Washington.  For instance, he helped steal the May 1984 Panamanian elections for the ruling party.  But just one month later, he also contributed $100,000 to a Contra leader, according to documents released for Oliver North's criminal trial in Washington, D.C.  Yet, his political setbacks mounted.  Mr. Noriega was accused of ordering in 1985 the beheading of Hugo Spadafora, his most outspoken political opponent and the first man to publicly finger Mr. Noriega on drug trafficking charges.  He then ousted President Nicholas Ardito Barletta, a former World Bank official with close ties to the U.S., after Mr. Barletta tried to create a commission to investigate the murder.  And, all the while, Panama's debt problems continued to grow.  Mr. Noriega was growing desperate.  In late 1986, he made an offer he thought the U.S. couldn't refuse.  As recounted in a stipulation that summarized government documents released for the North trial, Mr. Noriega offered to assassinate the Sandinista leadership in exchange "for a promise to help clean up Noriega's image and a commitment to lift the {U.S.} ban on military sales to the Panamanian Defense Forces."  "North," the document went on, referring to Oliver North, "has told Noriega's representative that U.S. law forbade such actions.  The representative responded that Noriega had numerous assets in place in Nicaragua and could accomplish many essential things, just as Noriega had helped {the U.S.} the previous year in blowing up a Sandinista arsenal."  Col. North conveyed the request to his superiors and to Assistant Secretary of State Elliot Abrams, who relayed it to Secretary of State George Shultz.  Mr. Noriega's proposal was turned down.  And Mr. Shultz curtly told Mr. Abrams that the general should be told that only he could repair his tarnished image.  The end of the marriage was at hand.  Within weeks the unfolding Iran-Contra scandal took away Mr. Noriega's insurance policy.  The death of CIA Director William Casey and resignation of Oliver North allowed anti-Noriega political forces to gain influence.  Public protests against him were triggered in June 1987 due to charges by Diaz Herrera, his former chief of staff, that Mr. Noriega had stolen the 1984 election and had ordered the killing of Messrs.  Spadafora and Torrijos.  Few American officials were willing any longer to defend him.  Lawyers in Miami -- this time working virtually without impediment -- prepared to have him indicted on drug charges in February 1988.  During negotiations with American officials in May 1988 over proposals to drop the U.S. indictments in exchange for his resignation, Mr. Noriega often asked almost plaintively how the Americans, whom he had helped for so many years, could turn against him.  Now, neither side -- the U.S. nor Mr. Noriega -- has an easy out.  President Bush has sworn to bring him to justice.  Mr. Noriega believes he hasn't any alternative but to continue clutching to power.  It is a knock-out battle -- perhaps to the death.  In the end, is Mr. Noriega the political equivalent of Frankenstein's monster, created by a well-intentioned but misguided foreign power?  Not quite, Sen. Leahy contends.  "For short-term gains, people were willing to put up with him.  That allowed him to get stronger and stronger," he says.  "I don't think we created him as much as we fed him, nurtured him and let him grow up to be big and strong."  UPJOHN Co. reported that third-quarter net income rose to $96 million, or 52 cents a share, from $89.6 million, or 49 cents a share, a year earlier.  Yesterday's edition provided analysts' estimates for the company when actual earnings were available.  Industrial production declined 0.1% in September, reinforcing other signs that the manufacturing sector continues its slowing trend.  The Federal Reserve Board said output of the nation's factories, mines and utilities expanded at an annual rate of 1.3% in the third quarter, substantially slower than the 3.3% annual rate in the second quarter.  "Capital spending and exports, which have been the driving force in this expansion, are showing clear signs of having the steam taken out of them," said Robert Dederick, economist for Northern Trust Co. in Chicago.  The new reports of sluggishness, which were foreshadowed by an earlier Labor Department report that manufacturing payrolls dropped by 105,000 in September, give the Fed another reason to further ease its grip on credit and lower interest rates.  "They need to do something about this," said Maury Harris, economist at PaineWebber Group Inc.  The Fed also said U.S. industry operated at 83.6% of capacity last month, down from 83.8% in August.  Measures of manufacturing activity fell more than the overall measures.  Factory output dropped 0.2%, its first decline since February, after having been unchanged in October.  Factories operated at 83.7% of capacity, the lowest rate in more than a year and down from 84.1% in September.  The declines mainly reflected widespread weakness in durable goods, those intended to last more than three years.  The biggest drop was recorded by primary metals producers, a category that includes the steel industry.  Output of business equipment was unchanged in September.  Production of factory equipment, one indication of the strength of manufacturers' investment spending, fell 0.3%.  Some economists expect further declines in investment spending.  "Whenever corporate profits are weak that means capital spending is going to soften subsequently," Mr. Harris said.  "You haven't seen the full effect of that yet."  A decline in truck production more than offset a sharp rise in auto assemblies, the Fed noted.  Analysts don't expect the September surge in auto production to be repeated in the coming months.  Here is a summary of the Federal Reserve Board's report on industrial production in September.  The figures are seasonally adjusted.  @ % change from  @ Aug. Sept.  @ 1989 1988  @ Total .......................... -0.1 2.7  @ Consumer goods ............... 0.1 3.4  @ Business equipment ........... 0.0 5.6  @ Defense and space ............ -0.3 2.2  @ Manufacturing only ............. -0.2 3.0  @ Durable goods ................ -0.5 2.2  @ Nondurable goods ............. 0.1 4.1  @ Mining ......................... 0.9 -0.1  @ Utilities ...................... 1.2 1.7  @ The industrial production index for September stood at 142.3% of the 1977 average.  Robin Honiss, president and chief executive officer of this bank holding company, was elected to the additional posts of chairman, president and chief executive of the company's New England Savings Bank subsidiary.  William R. Attridge resigned those posts, as well as a seat on NESB's board.  NESB is also the parent of Omnibank.  Lung-cancer mortality rates for people under 45 years of age have begun to decline, federal researchers report.  The drop is particularly large for white males, although black males and white and black women also show lower mortality rates.  A report in this week's issue of the Journal of the National Cancer Institute also projects that overall U.S. mortality rates from lung cancer, the leading cause of cancer death, should begin to drop in several years if cigarette smoking continues to abate.  The report, which comes 25 years after the U.S. Surgeon General issued a report warning against the dangers of smoking, is the strongest indication to date that the reduction in smoking is leading to lower death rates from lung cancer.  "What this is saying is that the surgeon general's message is having an impact," said Melvyn Tockman, an epidemiologist at the Johns Hopkins School of Hygiene and Public Health in Baltimore.  The National Cancer Institute report compares mortality rates of two groups of people between the ages of 35 and 44 a decade apart.  The death rate from lung cancer of white males aged 35 to 44 in the mid-1970s was 13.4 per 100,000, but the mortality rate of the same age group in the mid-1980s was 9.6, a decline of 28.7%.  Measured the same way, the decline for black males was 14.2%.  The drop in mortality rates for women was less steep -- 8.9% for blacks and 5.3% for whites.  The study, by Susan Devesa, William Blot and Joseph Fraumeni of the institute's staff, also shows that the incidence of lung cancer as well as the death rate declined over the decade for all groups in the 35-44 age bracket, except black men.  Although lung-cancer mortality rates are increasing for the nation as a whole, the report projects that death rates will begin to decline in the 1990s for men and after the year 2000 for women.  Lung-cancer mortality rates increase with age and are continuing to rise for all age groups over 55, with sharp increases for everybody but white men.  But Dr. Fraumeni, one of the authors of the report, said "the declining rates we're seeing for younger people we believe may be a harbinger of declining mortality in the future."  However, he stressed that the improvement depends on a continued reduction in smoking.  "Even though these favorable trends in lung-cancer mortality affect all sex and race groups, they can't be taken for granted," the report says.  "Smoking prevention programs should reach larger segments of the population, especially children, adolescents and minorities."  An editorial in the NCI Journal says the report of declining lung-cancer mortality "among young men and women in the U.S. indicates that we finally may be winning the battle -- this even in a country where the tobacco industry spends over $2 billion a year for promotion of the addictive habit of smoking."  But the editorial, by Jan Stjernsward of the World Health Organization, notes that tobacco consumption and lung-cancer mortality rates are rising in developing countries.  "Non-smoking should be established as the norm of social behavior" around the world, the editorial says, through the enactment of laws that limit advertising, boost tobacco prices and promote anti-smoking education.  Asked for comment, Walker Merryman, a vice president of the Tobacco Institute, said new efforts to restrict tobacco advertising in the U.S. could violate the First Amendment protection of free speech.  According to the American Cancer Society, smoking is responsible for 85% of the lung-cancer cases among men and 75% among women.  The NCI report attributes the differences in mortality rates by race to different smoking patterns.  A higher proportion of black men smoke than white men.  While nearly equal percentages of black and white women currently smoke, in both sexes more whites have given up smoking than blacks.  In comparing changes in mortality rates over the past decade, the NCI study looked only at blacks and whites.  Asians and native Americans weren't studied; Hispanics were included with whites.  ---  @ Lung-Cancer Rates Declining for People Under 45  Recent changes in average annual age-specific lung-cancer rates per 100,000 population by race and sex.  @ Mortality in the U.S.  @ ---------------------  @ Age 1973-1976 1983-1986 % Chg.  White Males  @ 34-44 13.4 9.6 -28.7%  @ 45-54 67.4 63.0 - 6.6  @ 55-64 194.5 206.3 6.1  @ 65+ 369.5 452.6 22.5  White Females  @ 35-44 6.6 6.2 -5.3  @ 45-54 25.3 34.3 35.5  @ 55-64 53.0 87.8 65.5  @ 65+ 63.6 135.0 112.2  Black Males  @ 35-44 26.9 23.1 -14.2  @ 45-54 132.9 120.2 -9.6  @ 55-64 280.9 325.8 16.0  @ 65+ 346.7 522.8 50.8  Black Females  @ 35-44 9.0 8.2 -8.9  @ 45-54 32.0 40.3 25.9  @ 55-64 47.9 94.8 97.9  @ 65+ 54.5 110.0 101.6  Source: Journal of the National Cancer Institute  Directors elected R. Marvin Womack, currently vice president/product supply, purchasing, to head the company's Washington, D.C., office.  As vice president/national-government relations, Mr. Womack will work with P&G's top management and with the company's government-relations staff "to represent P&G's interests at the federal level," said John G. Smale, chairman and chief executive officer.  Mr. Smale said the appointment "recognizes the growing influence of government on our business."  Mr. Womack, 53 years old, has been with the big producer of household products, food and pharmaceuticals for 30 years.  Traders trying to profit from the recent volatility in financial markets invaded the Nasdaq over-the-counter market, prompting even more swings in stock prices.  After gaining strength during a brief run-up when trading began, the Nasdaq Composite Index weakened under selling pressure.  The forces at work included computer-guided trading, as well as profit-driven market makers and institutional investors who had bought stock on the cheap during the recent correction.  During the last two hours of trading, the composite almost drew even on the day before slipping again.  The Nasdaq Composite closed down 1.05, or 0.2%, to 459.93.  The action was confined to Nasdaq's biggest and most liquid stocks, traders said.  The Nasdaq 100 Index began the day at 449.89, lost 2% at one point, and was up 0.4% at another.  The barometer of the biggest nonfinancial stocks settled at 448.49, off 1.40.  Its counterpart, the Nasdaq Financial Index, was weak for most of the day, sliding 2.51 to 453.57 by the end of trading.  The volatility was dizzying for traders.  "The market must have turned up and down 15 different times," commented Lance Zipper, head of OTC trading at Kidder Peabody.  "Every time you thought it was going into a rally it gave up, and every time you thought it would rally it came down.  This is a tough market."  Mr. Zipper said the market is still settling down after the recent correction.  Most of trading action now is from professional traders who are trying to take advantage of the price swings to turn a quick profit, he and other traders said.  "Everybody's confused and no one has an opinion that lasts longer than 30 seconds," said Mr. Zipper.  "A lot of the professional traders are just going back and forth.  They're just as confused."  William Rothe, head of OTC trading at Alex.  Brown & Sons, in Baltimore, said program trading is keeping the markets unsettled.  He believes that the volatile conditions created by program trading has "thoroughly confused" investors about where the market is headed.  Program trading is "benefiting a few to the detriment of many and I wish someone would do something about it," he complained.  Trading activity cooled off from Monday's sizzling pace.  Share turnover subsided to 161.5 million.  Advancing and declining issues finished about even.  Of the 4,345 stocks that changed hands, 1,174 declined and 1,040 advanced.  One big technology issue, Novell, rode the roller coaster.  The stock, which finished Monday at 29 1/2, traded as high as 29 3/4 and as low as 28 3/4 before closing at 29 1/4, down 1/4.  It was a jarring day for investors in Genetics Institute.  The stock tumbled 2 3/4 on news that it might have to take a charge against earnings if it can't successfully resolve a dispute with its European licensee, Boehringer Mannheim, over its anti-anemia drug, EPO.  The stock recovered somewhat to finish 1 1/4 lower at 26 1/4.  In a statement, Genetics Institute said the dispute with Boehringer centers on questions of the usability of certain batches of EPO material valued at $13.6 million.  Earlier this week, Genetics Institute reported wider losses in its fiscal third quarter ended Aug. 31.  Price Co. jumped 2 1/4 to 44 on 1.7 million shares.  The wholesaler of cash and carry merchandise reported fiscal fourthquarter earnings that were better than analysts had expected.  The company also pleased analysts by announcing four new store openings planned for fiscal 1990, ending next August.  That will bring the total for the year to 10, from five during fiscal 1989.  "Every year we've been waiting for stepped-up expansion from the company.  The news couldn't have been better," said Linda Kristiansen, a Dean Witter Reynolds analyst, in an interview.  Intermec, a maker of optical character-recognition devices, also reported higher third-quarter earnings.  Its shares added 3/4 to 30 3/4.  But favorable earnings wasn't a guarantee that a stock's price would improve yesterday.  MCI Communications tumbled 2 5/8 to 42 3/8 on 4.7 million shares even though the telecommunications giant reported a 63% increase in third-quarter profit.  CoreStates Financial slipped 3/8 to 43 1/8 in active trading after reporting that third-quarter earnings improved to $1.27 a share from $1.15 a share a year earlier.  However, the bank holding company's loan-loss reserves rose to $177.3 million from $154 million a year earlier.  A&W Brands lost 1/4 to 27.  But its thirdquarter earnings rose to 26 cents a share from 18 cents a share last year.  Capital Associates dropped 1 to 5 3/8.  The company, which leases technology equipment, reported substantially lower net income for its fiscal first quarter, which ended Aug. 31.  Robert M. Jelenic, 39, was named president and chief operating officer of this closely held publisher.  The post had been vacant for more than a year.  Mr. Jelenic had been executive vice president for operations.  In addition, Ralph Ingersoll II, 43, chairman and chief executive, said he would take on additional responsibilities as editor in chief of the company.  John Wilpers resigned as editor in chief.  Mr. Ingersoll remains editor in chief of the company's recently launched daily, the St. Louis Sun.  Also, Jean B. Clifton, 28, was named executive vice president, treasurer and chief financial officer.  Michael Applebaum resigned after less than a year in the posts.  Ms. Clifton had been executive financial assistant to the chairman.  Certainly conservative environmentalists can defend their limited government position by differentiating between Old Environmentalism and New Environmentalism ("Journalists and Others for Saving the Planet," by David Brooks, editorial page, Oct. 5).  Old Environmentalism involved microbe hunters and sanitationists.  It started with improvements in hygiene made possible by affordable soap and washable underwear during the Industrial Revolution.  Then cast-iron sewer pipe and the flush toilet were followed by sewage- and water-treatment plants toward the end of the 19th century.  Medicine in the 19th century was dedicated mostly to combating sepsis and diagnostic analysis.  Then the 20th century saw the evolution of private-sector wonder drugs, which promulgated medical therapy.  The process dramatically increased our average life expectancy, eliminated much pain and constantly improved health and well-being.  Most public-health measures were handled at the local level.  New Environmentalism probably started in 1962 with the publication of Rachel Carson's book "Silent Spring."  Shortly thereafter, hysterical articles began to appear predicting that advanced industrial societies would produce a blackened, uninhabitable planet possibly by the turn of the century.  These apocalyptic predictions were advanced by such stalwarts as Paul Ehrlich, Barry Commoner, Rene Dubois and George Wald.  Writing in the 1960s Ms. Carson suggested that the human race could be eliminated in 20 years, and Mr. Wald suggested that life on earth might end by 1985.  Mr. Ehrlich predicted unprecedented famine by 1980.  There were many more.  Thousands of chemical products were categorized as carcinogenic, with recommendations that they be banned from industrial use because they produced malignant tumors in overdosed rats.  Unknown before 1960 were the inconclusive effects of acid rain, greenhouse warming and ozone depletion, all of which required burgeoning political power and gargantuan expense.  Meanwhile, the New Environmentalists systematically opposed the methods of the Old Environmentalists.  Local pollution problems require cheap energy and capital for their solution.  But the New Environmentalists oppose private wealth creation (which, they claim, depletes natural resources) and nuclear power (even though it would counteract the greenhouse effect).  They are in the forefront of opposing the search for new landfills and methods of incineration and even oppose new methods of research such as genetic engineering.  New Environmentalism is an emotional attack on proven methods of improving our quality of life and a bid for political power.  Let's rationalize our priorities by solving pollution problems at the local level as heretofore.  Harry Lee Smith  Alpharetta, Ga.  ---  Your story missed some essential points of the conference on "The Global Environment: Are We Overreacting?"  First and foremost, the vignettes presented by the various scientists represent a general consensus among specialists working in the respective aspects of the global environment.  Consider, for example, the greenhouse effect and climate change; numerous blue-ribbon scientific committees, including one from the National Academy of Science, judge there is a greater than 50% probability of a grave problem in the offing.  The point was to answer the question in the conference title, not to try to create news stories for the event itself.  Nor was it intended to dictate a set of prescriptive solutions, although various points were raised.  Each speaker was asked to address a specific topic, not deliver a point of view.  Each scientist independently concluded society and government are underreacting when it comes to substantive policy change.  This leads to a very special sense of urgency.  If the media decide to work harder at educating the public about these complex and technical issues, that hardly can be termed non-objective journalism.  The environment can no longer be a normal issue, to be dealt with on a business-as-usual basis with comfortable increments of change.  We have literally altered the chemistry and physics of our planet's atmosphere.  This portends consequences from what we have already done that will be very destabilizing to social and economic systems.  The problems of the environment are so interrelated, so inextricably entwined with our current way of life and so large that it is unlikely we will be able to address them effectively unless major changes are made in less than 10 years.  The consensus from the scientific community is that there is sufficient evidence to advise major policy changes.  No, we are not overreacting.  Thomas E. Lovejoy  Assistant Secretary for External Affairs  Smithsonian Institution  Washington  Coca-Cola Enterprises Inc., fulfilling its dismal earnings forecast for 1989, said its third-quarter net income fell 68% on flat revenue.  Stung by higher marketing costs and slowing volume growth, the giant Coke bottling operation said net fell to $12.7 million, or six cents a share, from $39.9 million, or 26 cents a share, the year earlier.  The results met estimates of analysts, who had already slashed their projections after the company said in late August that its 1989 earnings could tumble as much as 37%.  A company spokesman said yesterday that Coca-Cola Enterprises sticks by its 1989 forecast.  Third-quarter revenue was flat at $1.02 billion.  The year-ago results, however, included the operations of a bottling business, which was sold last December.  Excluding that bottling business, Coca-Cola Enterprises' volume, measured by cases of soda, rose only 1%.  The volume is well below the industry's 4% to 5% growth rate of recent years, but in line with other soft-drink companies for the third quarter.  The latest third-quarter volume also compares with a very strong 10% growth in the year-ago quarter.  Coca-Cola Enterprises blamed the lower volume on its soft-drink prices, which were about 3% higher in the third quarter.  Consumers have been accustomed to buying soft-drinks at discounted prices for several years.  Coca-Cola Enterprises said it had to boost spending for trade and dealer incentives to try to keep volumes from slipping.  The company said it expects consumers will adjust to higher-priced soft drinks.  A spokesman attributed the bulk of a 14% increase in selling, administrative and general expenses -- to $324.9 million -- to marketing costs.  "They're out there promoting like crazy, trying to get prices up by promotion," said Roy Burry, an analyst with Kidder, Peabody & Co.  For the nine months, Coca-Cola Enterprises' net fell 31% to $65 million, or 39 cents a share, from $93.8 million, or 63 cents a share.  Revenue was flat at about $2.97 billion.  Coca-Cola Enterprises, which is 49%-owned by Coca-Cola Co., also said it repurchased about 1.2 million of its common shares during the third quarter.  The buy-back is part of a 25-million-share repurchase plan, under which Coca-Cola Enterprises so far has acquired a total of 9.7 million shares.  Separately, Purchase, N.Y.-based PepsiCo Inc., as expected, said fiscal third-quarter net rose 11% to $269.3 million, or $1.02 a share, from $241.6 million, or 91 cents a share.  Sales rose 25% to $3.90 billion from $3.13 billion.  The year-ago quarter's results include an after-tax charge of $5.9 million from the sale of a winery in Spain.  In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange, Coca-Cola Enterprises closed at $16.375 a share, down 62.5 cents.  PepsiCo closed at $58.50 a share, up $1.375.  L.J. Hooker Corp. is expected to reach an agreement in principle this week to sell Merksamer Jewelers Inc. to management, say executives familiar with the talks.  L.J. Hooker, based in Atlanta, filed for Chapter 11 bankruptcy protection earlier this year.  Currently, its parent company, Hooker Corp. of Sydney, Australia, is being managed by a court-appointed liquidator.  It is expected that GE Capital Corp., a financial-services subsidiary of General Electric Co., will provide much of the funding for the proposed leveraged buy-out of Merksamer, based in Sacramento, Calif.  A spokesman for GE Capital declined to comment.  GE Capital has a working relationship with L.J. Hooker.  It is providing $50 million in emergency financing to the company and has agreed to buy as much as $75 million in receivables from B. Altman & Co. and Bonwit Teller, L.J. Hooker's two fully owned department-store chains.  Sam Merksamer, chief executive officer of the nationwide jewelry chain, and Sanford Sigoloff, chief executive of L.J. Hooker Corp., both declined to comment.  Currently, Mr. Merksamer owns 20% of the company; L.J. Hooker acquired its 80% interest in the firm in May 1986.  At the time, the Merksamer chain had 11 stores in operation.  Today, there are 77 units, all located in shopping malls.  In recent weeks Mr. Merksamer has approached a number of his suppliers and asked them to provide letters of intent saying they will continue shipping merchandise to the chain following the buy-out, say those familiar with the situation.  This year, a number of retail leveraged buyouts have failed, causing jitters among suppliers, and Mr. Merksamer apparently wanted assurances that he won't have delivery problems.  For the year ended June 30, 1989, Merksamer Jewelers had $62 million of revenue and operating profit of $2.5 million.  The jewelery chain was put up for sale in June.  According to those familiar with the situation, other bidders included Ratners Group PLC of London and Kay Jewelers Inc. First Boston Corp. is advising L.J. Hooker on the sale of the Merksamer business.  Merksamer was the first in a series of retail acquisitions made by L.J. Hooker.  The company was founded in Sacramento in 1929 by two brothers, Ralph and Walter Merksamer, who operated as DeVon's Jewelers.  In 1979, the pair split the company in half, with Walter and his son, Sam, agreeing to operate under the Merksamer Jewelery name.  The sale of Merksamer Jewelers is subject to approval by Judge Tina Brozman of U.S. Bankruptcy Court.  As earlier reported, L.J. Hooker this week received a $409 million bid for its three shopping malls, plus other properties from a consortium led by Honolulu real-estate investor Jay Shidler and A. Boyd Simpson, an Atlanta developer and former L.J. Hooker senior executive.  The offer, which didn't include the Merksamer chain, is being reviewed by Mr. Sigoloff.  Robert J. Regal was named president and chief executive officer of this company's Universal-Rundle Corp. unit.  Mr. Regal had been president and chief executive of RBS Industries Inc. Robert H. Carlson, previous president and chief executive of Universal-Rundle, will assume the title of chairman of the unit, a vitreous-china maker.  The days may be numbered for animated shows featuring Alf, the Karate Kid and the Chipmunks.  NBC, a leader in morning, prime-time and late night programs but an also-ran on Saturday mornings, when children rule the TV set, is contemplating getting out of the cartoon business.  Instead, network officials say, it may "counterprogram" with shows for an audience that is virtually ignored in that time period: adults.  "There is talk of some revamping and we're certainly heading in the direction of less and less animation," said Joseph S. Cicero, vice president of finance and administration for National Broadcasting Co., a unit of General Electric Co.  Mr. Cicero said that NBC Entertainment president Brandon Tartikoff, who declined to be interviewed, is "looking at options now and may put some things into the schedule by mid-season."  He declined to elaborate.  NBC's options could range from news-oriented programming to sports shows, although the network declined to comment.  One major NBC affiliate, KCRA in Sacramento, plans to cancel the NBC Saturday morning line-up as of January and replace it with a local newscast.  The one-hour program will be repeated with updates throughout Saturday mornings.  "We feel there is an opportunity for an audience that is not being served by any network, so we want to take the lead," says KCRA's general manager, John Kueneke.  "We don't need cartoons anymore.  They only accounted for 5%, at best, of the station's total revenues."  An NBC spokesman says the network will "closely monitor" the Sacramento situation, and says it is the only station to defect.  Spokesmen for the television networks of CBS Inc. and Capital Cities/ABC Inc., say there are no plans to alter the children's line-up on Saturday mornings.  The youthful audience for Saturday programming is no longer dependent on the networks.  There has been a surge in syndicated children's shows to independent stations, as well as competition from videocassettes for kids and from cable outlets such as Nickelodeon and the Disney Channel.  At the same time, there appears to be a market for news-oriented programming; Turner Broadcasting System Inc.'s Cable News Network has its highest ratings, outside of prime time, on Saturday mornings.  NBC has on previous occasions considered replacing cartoons with a Saturday version of "Today," which is produced by NBC News.  The network's own production company, NBC Productions, supplies a half-hour family-oriented show titled "Saved By The Bell."  NBC Productions or NBC News could supply the network with other Saturday morning shows, a move that would control costs.  Animated shows, which are made by outside production companies, cost the network about $300,000 per episode.  Rohm & Haas Co. said third-quarter net income skidded 35% to $32.6 million, or 49 cents a share.  In the year-earlier quarter, the chemicals company had net of $49.8 million, or 75 cents a share.  Sales were $623 million, up 0.5% from $619.8 million a year ago.  Rohm & Haas, which plans to start operating seven new production units this year, attributed the profit slide partly to higher start-up expense.  The company also cited the stronger dollar, which cuts the value of overseas profit when it is translated into dollars.  In addition, the company said, it was hurt by higher than previous-year costs for raw materials, though those costs have declined since the second quarter.  Incrementally higher production of those chemicals which remain in heavy demand also has forced up costs, such as overtime pay.  For the nine months, Rohm & Haas net totaled $155 million, or $2.33 a share, down 17% from $187.8 million, or $2.82 a share, a year ago.  Sales rose 5.2% to $2.04 billion from $1.94 billion the previous year.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading, Rohm & Haas closed at $33 a share, down $1.75.  Michael A. Gaskin, 55 years old, was named president and chief executive officer of this manufacturer of industrial robots, succeeding Walter K. Weisel.  Mr. Weisel, 49, resigned as president and chief executive and will work on special projects, said John J. Wallace, chairman.  Mr. Gaskin formerly was president and chief executive of Taylor & Gaskin Inc. and was a director of Prab Robots since 1985.  Stephen N. Wertheimer was named managing director and group head of investment banking in Asia, based in Tokyo.  Mr. Wertheimer, 38 years old, had been a first vice president in the industrial group in investment banking.  He succeeds Everett Meyers, who resigned in May.  This is written to correct a misquotation in your Oct. 3 article "Deaths From Advanced Colon Cancer Can Be Reduced by Using Two Drugs."  In this article, I was alleged to have said, "Any patient with high-risk colon cancer is really getting short shrift if he's not getting this therapy."  I didn't say this, and I'm totally opposed to the philosophy expressed by the quote.  I have not offered and will not offer routine therapy with the two drugs, levamisole and 5-fluorouracil, to any of my colon-cancer patients.  With this treatment we have reduced deaths in high-risk colon cancer by one-third -- but this leaves the two-thirds who are dying of cancer.  This is not nearly good enough.  I believe any physician who truly cares about cancer patients, both today and tomorrow, should offer the hope of something better than that.  My statement, read verbatim from a printed text available to all reporters attending the National Cancer Institute news conference, was the following: "New clinical trials are already in operation seeking to improve these results.  These research protocols offer to the patient not only the very best therapy which we have established today but also the hope of something still better.  I feel any patient with high-risk cancer is getting short shrift if he is not offered this opportunity."  We have very exciting prospects for far more impressive advances in the treatment of colon cancer during the years immediately ahead.  This hope, however, will never be realized if we use levamisole and 5-fluorouracil as a stopping point.  Charles G. Moertel M.D.  Mayo Clinic  Rochester, Minn.  The oil and auto industries, united in their dislike of President Bush's proposal for cars that run on alternative fuels, announced a joint research program that could turn up a cleaner-burning gasoline.  Officials of the Big Three auto makers and 14 petroleum companies said they are setting out to find the most cost-effective fuel for reducing cities' air-pollution problems, with no bias toward any fuel in particular.  However, their search notably won't include natural gas or pure methanol -- the two front-running alternative fuels -- in tests to be completed by next summer.  Instead, the tests will focus heavily on new blends of gasoline, which are still undeveloped but which the petroleum industry has been touting as a solution for automobile pollution that is choking urban areas.  Environmentalists criticized the program as merely a public-relations attempt to head off a White House proposal to require a million cars a year that run on cleaner-burning fuels by 1997.  While major oil companies have been experimenting with cleaner-burning gasoline blends for years, only Atlantic Richfield Co. is now marketing a lower-emission gasoline for older cars currently running on leaded fuel.  The initial $11 million research program will conduct the most extensive testing to date of reformulated gasolines, said Joe Colucci, head of fuels and lubricants at General Motors Corp. research laboratories.  It will compare 21 different blends of gasolines with three mixtures of up to 85% methanol.  A second phase of research, which is still being planned, will test reformulated gasolines on newer engine technologies now being developed for use in 1992 or 1993 cars.  There was no cost estimate for the second phase.  "The whole idea here is the automobile and oil companies have joint customers," said Keith McHenry, a senior vice president of technology at Amoco Corp.  "And we are looking for the most cost-effective way to clean up the air."  But David Hawkins, an environmental lawyer with the Natural Resources Defense Council, said the research appears merely to be a way to promote reformulated gasoline.  Oil and auto companies supported a move on Capitol Hill last week to gut Mr. Bush's plans to require auto makers to begin selling alternative-fueled cars by 1995.  Instead, a House subcommittee adopted a clean-fuels program that specifically mentions reformulated gasoline as an alternative.  The Bush administration has said it will try to resurrect its plan when the House Energy and Commerce Committee takes up a comprehensive clean-air bill.  William Seidman, chairman of the Federal Deposit Insurance Corp., said Lincoln Savings & Loan Association should have been seized by the government in 1986 to contain losses that he estimated will cost taxpayers as much as $2 billion.  Mr. Seidman, who has been the nation's top bank regulator, inherited the problems of Lincoln, based in Irvine, Calif., after his regulatory role was expanded by the new savings-and-loan bailout law.  He made his comments before House Banking Committee hearings to investigate what appears to be the biggest thrift disaster in a scandal-ridden industry.  The inquiry also will cover the actions of Charles Keating Jr., who is chairman of American Continental Corp., Lincoln's parent, and who contributed heavily to several U.S. senators.  Mr. Seidman told the committee that the Resolution Trust Corp., the agency created to sell sick thrifts, has studied Lincoln's examination reports by former regulators dating back to 1986.  "My staff indicated that had we made such findings in one of our own institutions, we would have sought an immediate cease-and-desist order to stop the hazardous operations," Mr. Seidman said.  When Lincoln was seized by the government, for example, 15% of its loans, or $250 million, were to borrowers who were buying real estate from one of American Continental's 50 other subsidiaries, according to Mr. Seidman.  But the government didn't step in until six months ago, when thrift officials put Lincoln into conservatorship -- the day after American Continental filed for Chapter 11 bankruptcy protection from creditors.  The bankruptcy filing, the government has charged in a $1.1 billion civil lawsuit, was part of a pattern to shift insured deposits to the parent company, which used the deposits as a cache for real-estate deals.  The deposits that have been transferred to other subsidiaries are now under the jurisdiction of the bankruptcy court.  "I think it's fairly clear {Mr.  Keating} knew," that regulators were set to seize Lincoln, Mr. Seidman said.  Further investigation, he said, may result in further actions against Lincoln's executives, said Mr. Seidman, "including fraud actions."  Mr. Keating, for his part, has filed suit alleging that regulators unlawfully seized the thrift.  Leonard Bickwit, an attorney in Washington for Mr. Keating, declined to comment on the hearings, except to say, "We will be responding comprehensively in several forums to each of these allegations at the appropriate time."  Lincoln's treatment by former thrift regulators, in an agency disbanded by the new law, has proved embarrassing for five senators who received thousands of dollars in campaign contributions from Mr. Keating.  Mr. Seidman said yesterday, for example, that Sen. Dennis DeConcini (D., Ariz.), who received $48,100 in contributions from Mr. Keating, phoned Mr. Seidman to request that he push for a sale of Lincoln before it would be seized.  After the government lawsuit was filed against Lincoln, Sen. DeConcini returned the campaign contributions.  The senator's spokesman said yesterday that he pushed for the sale of Lincoln because "hundreds of Arizona jobs {at Lincoln} were on the line."  Senate Banking Committee Chairman Donald Riegle (D., Mich.) has also returned contributions he received from Mr. Keating a year ago.  Sens.  John Glenn (D., Ohio), John McCain, (R., Ariz.) and Alan Cranston (D., Calif.) also received substantial contributions from Mr. Keating and sought to intervene on behalf of Lincoln.  House Banking Committee Chairman Henry Gonzalez (D., Texas) said Sen. Cranston volunteered to appear before the House committee, if necessary.  But a committee staff member said the panel is unlikely to pursue closely the role of the senators.  At the hearing, Mr. Seidman said the RTC has already pumped $729 million into Lincoln for liquidity.  He also held out little hope of restitution for purchasers of $225 million in American Continental subordinated debt.  Some of those debtholders have filed a suit, saying they believed they were buying government-insured certificates of deposit.  "We have no plans at this time to pay off those notes," he said.  Eastern Airlines' creditors committee, unhappy with the carrier's plans for emerging from bankruptcy-law proceedings, asked its own experts to devise alternate approaches to a reorganization.  Representatives of the accounting firm of Ernst & Young and the securities firm of Goldman, Sachs & Co., hired by creditors to consult on Eastern's financial plans, told the committee in a private meeting yesterday that Eastern's latest plan to emerge from bankruptcy-law protection is far riskier than an earlier one which won the creditors' approval.  According to one person present at the meeting, Eastern's new plan is financially "overly optimistic."  Asked about the consultants' reports, an Eastern spokeswoman said "we totally disagree."  She said they have "oversimplified and made some erroneous assumptions that make their analysis completely off-base."  At a later news conference here, Frank Lorenzo, chairman of Eastern's parent Texas Air Corp., said Eastern was exceeding its goals for getting back into operation and predicted it would emerge from Chapter 11 protection from creditors early next year, operating with more service than it originally had scheduled.  He insisted, as he has before, that creditors would be paid in full under the plan.  Mr. Lorenzo made no mention of creditors' negative response to his plan.  "We're in the process of discussing an amended plan with the creditors and anticipate filing that amended plan shortly," Mr. Lorenzo told reporters.  "We're meeting and surpassing our goals," he added.  In July, Eastern and its creditors agreed on a reorganization plan that called for Eastern to sell $1.8 billion in assets and to emerge from bankruptcy-law protection at two-thirds its former size.  But after selling off pieces such as its East Coast shuttle, its Philadelphia hub and various planes, Eastern hit a stumbling block.  It couldn't sell its South American routes, one of the major assets marked for disposal.  Those routes, valued by the creditors' professionals at about $400 million, were to be sold to AMR Corp.'s American Airlines.  A last-minute snag in negotiations with AMR, over an unrelated lawsuit between American and another Texas Air unit, caused the deal to collapse.  Eastern ultimately decided it would have to keep and operate the routes itself, which would leave it with less cash for its reorganization.  It also would leave Eastern a bigger carrier than the scaled-down one proposed under the initial plan.  Those changes in its condition meant the reorganization plan previously presented to creditors would have to be revamped.  Since then, Eastern has been negotiating with creditors over revisions, but the creditors committee has been having problems with the revisions.  The committee has two groups of experts it calls on to analyze Eastern's plans.  Both said the new plan wouldn't work.  Ernst & Young said Eastern's plans will miss its projections of earnings before interest, tax and depreciation by $100 million, and that Eastern's plan presented no comfort level, according to a source present at yesterday's session.  Experts from Goldman Sachs estimated Eastern would miss the same mark by $120 million to $135 million, the source said.  The experts said they expected Eastern would have to issue new debt to cover its costs, and that it would generate far less cash than anticipated.  Other costs also would increase, including maintenance, because Eastern has an older fleet.  At the news conference, Mr. Lorenzo and Eastern President Phil Bakes presented a far rosier assessment.  Flanked by flight attendants, pilots and gate agents dressed in spiffy new blue uniforms, they said Eastern has exceeded its operational goals and is filling its seats.  Starting next month, Eastern will begin flying 775 flights daily instead of the previously announced 700, they said.  Mr. Bakes declined to give out Eastern's daily losses, but said he didn't expect Eastern would have to dip into the cash from asset sales currently held in escrow.  These accounts hold several hundred million dollars, primarily from asset sales.  The plan Eastern hopes to pursue, he said, calls for Eastern to have $390 million in cash by year's end.  Both he and Mr. Lorenzo predicted that plan might be confirmed in January.  As to negotiations with creditors, Mr. Lorenzo said in remarks after the conference "we'll have to see how they {talks} come along."  However, he added, "it's not a requirement that the plan be accepted by creditors.  It must be accepted by the court."  Under bankruptcy law, Eastern has exclusive rights for a certain period to develop its own reorganization plan.  That deadline has been extended once and could be extended again.  If Eastern can get creditor support, court confirmation of its plan could be relatively swift.  But creditors are free to press for court approval of their own plan, or the court could ignore both sides and draw its own.  In any event, some people familiar with the case question whether the court will act by January as forecast by Mr. Lorenzo and Mr. Bakes.  Eastern sought bankruptcy-law protection a few days after a crippling strike began March 4.  Mr. Lorenzo told reporters the reorganization Eastern is pursuing would create a carrier 85% to 90% of the size of the pre-bankruptcy Eastern.  He projected it would be operating about 1,000 flights a day by late spring, only slightly fewer than the carrier's old volume of 1,050 a day.  HOPES OF SIMPLIFYING the corporate minimum tax before 1990 are weakening.  The method of calculating the 20% tax, paid if it exceeds tax figured the regular way, is due for a change in 1990, thanks to 1986's tax act.  But most experts agree that the concept that is to be introduced drags in great complexity; they have been trying to head it off this year.  Ways and Means Chairman Rostenkowski backed a simplification plan in the pending House tax bill, but the plan turns out to be a big revenue loser.  Now the Senate's stripped-down bill omits any proposal to deal with the corporate tax.  Proponents of simplification fear that the chances of getting it into the final bill are waning.  "We hear it has low priority on the House side," says Samuel Starr of Coopers & Lybrand, CPAs.  If the law isn't changed, he says, "we are left staring at rules that are almost impossible to implement, because there are so many complex depreciation calculations to do."  But Congress still could resolve the issue with other legislation this year or next, Starr adds.  HUGO'S RAVAGES may be offset by immediate claims for tax refunds.  This law aids hurricane-wracked locales named by the president as disaster areas, as well as regions so designated after other 1989 disasters.  It lets victims elect to deduct casualty losses on either 1989 or amended 1988 returns, whichever offers the larger tax benefit; they have until April 16 to choose.  Amending a 1988 return to claim a refund brings cash faster; but for personal losses, there are other factors to consider, notes publisher Prentice Hall.  A loss -- after insurance recoveries -- is deductible only to the extent that it exceeds $100 and that the year's total losses exceed 10% of adjusted gross income; victims may pick the year when income is lower and deductions higher.  In filing an original (not amended) return, a couple should consider whether damaged property is owned jointly or separately and whether one spouse has larger income; that may determine whether they should file jointly or separately.  THE IRS DELAYS several deadlines for Hugo's victims.  Returns for 1988 from people with six-month filing extensions were due Monday, but the IRS says people in the disaster areas won't be penalized for late filing if their returns are marked "Hugo" and postmarked by Jan. 16.  Interest will be imposed on unpaid taxes, but late-payment penalties on the returns will be waived if the balance due and paid is 10% or less of the liability.  IRS Notice 89-136 describes this and other deadline relief for Hugo's victims.  Among the provisions: Fiscal-year taxpayers with returns due last Monday won't be penalized if they file -- or request an extension -- and pay tax due by Nov. 15.  Excise-tax returns due by Oct. 31 or Nov. 30 may be delayed to Jan. 16.  Extensions can't be granted for filing employment-tax returns due Oct. 31 or for depositing withheld taxes, but late penalties will be abated for deposits made by Nov. 15.  The notice also grants relief for certain estate-tax returns.  ONE-DAY JAUNTS in a chartered boat were perks for permanent staffers of American Business Service Corp., a Costa Mesa, Calif., supplier of temporary workers.  The IRS denied cost deductions because few of the temps got to go aboard.  But the Tax Court said the limitations were reasonable and realistic and allowed the deductions.  USED-CAR BUYERS who try to avoid sales tax by understating prices paid in private deals are the targets of a New York drive.  Estimating that the state may lose $15 million a year, officials announced the filing of 15 criminal actions and "hundreds" of civil penalties.  WHEN AN IRA OWNER dies, the trustee of the individual retirement account must file forms 5498 reporting market values relating to the decedent and each beneficiary, with copies to the executor and beneficiaries.  IRS Revenue Procedure 89-52 describes the reporting requirements.  BIGGER THAN A BREADBOX was this cash hoarder's reputation for honesty.  People often cite frugality and distrust of banks to justify cash caches to the IRS. Gregory Damonne Brown of Fremont, Calif., a hardworking, reclusive young bachelor, told that story to the Tax Court.  But judges usually find the real aim is to escape tax on hidden income; and the IRS said Brown must have had such income -- although it uncovered no source -- because he deposited $124,732 in a bank account in 1982-84 while reporting income of only $52,012.  Brown's story: The deposits came from savings kept in a Tupperware breadbox; he saved $47,000 in 1974-81 by living with family members and pinching pennies and $45,000 of secret gifts from his remorseful father, who had abandoned the family in 1955.  Brown had no proof; but testimony of his mother and stepmother about his father and of an ex-employer about his honesty and habits satisfied a judge that Brown was truthful and his tale of gifts was possible.  The IRS offered no evidence of hidden sources of taxable income, so Judge Shields rejected its claims.  BRIEFS: Asked how he made charitable gifts of $26,350 out of reported two-year income of $46,892, Thomas H. McFall of Bryan, Texas, told the Tax Court he had understated his income.  The court rejected his incredible claims, denied his deductions, and imposed a negligence penalty. . . .  Rep. Schaefer (R., Colo.) entered a bill to exempt from tax rewards for tips leading to the arrest of violent criminals.  Kay Peterson mounts her bicycle and grinds up yet another steep, rocky path seemingly suitable only for mountain goats.  After a tortuous climb, she is rewarded by a picture-postcard vista: a glade of golden aspens under an azure Indian-summer sky.  This place is 12 miles into the back country -- a day-long trudge for a hiker, but reached by Ms. Peterson and six others in a mere two hours of pedaling fat-tired mountain bikes.  "This," says Ms. Peterson, "is what it's all about."  Twelve hundred miles away, rangers at a Napa County, Calif., state park are among the many who don't quite share the enthusiasm.  This summer, speeding bikers were blamed for an accident in the Napa County park, in which a horse -- spooked on a trail that was closed to bikers -- broke its leg.  The animal had to be destroyed; the bikers fled and were never found.  In numerous parks near San Francisco, rangers have been forced to close trails, set up speed traps and use radar guns to curb fast and reckless riding.  They have even sent helicopters in pursuit of bikers after hikers and equestrians complained they were being driven from trails.  "We were being overrun," says Steve Fiala, trails coordinator of the East Bay Regional Park District.  Two years ago, the district decided to limit the bikes to fire roads in its 65,000 hilly acres.  From about 200,000 six years ago, the number of mountain bikes in the U.S. is expected to grow to 10 million in 1990.  At least half that growth will have come in the past three years alone.  The controversy kicked up by the proliferation of these all-terrain bicycles is one of the most divisive storms to blow through the national conservation movement in recent memory.  Bikers -- many of them ardent environmentalists -- proclaim their sport an efficient, safe, fitness-promoting way to get back to nature, while asserting a right, as taxpayers, to pedal on public lands.  But the bikes' burgeoning numbers, safety concerns and fear that they damage fragile landscapes have prompted pleas, from the Sierras to the Eastern Seaboard, to ban them from the back country.  Key to the issue is that the bikes, in skillful hands, can go virtually anywhere, and in reckless hands can become vehicles of terror.  An adept bicyclist can leap from a dead stop to the top of a picnic table without losing balance.  Such skills allow riders to fly down treacherous mountain grades at speeds of up to 40 miles an hour -- a thrill for the cyclist but a nightmare for unsuspecting hikers or equestrians.  For harried public-land managers across the nation, the response is increasingly to shut the gates.  The state of California, following the lead of some regional parks, recently adopted regulations that closed nearly all hiking paths in state parks to mountain bicycles.  The move largely consigns them to roads used by motorized vehicles.  Most other states have enacted similar bans.  The bikes are unwelcome on trails in national parks.  Even the U.S. Forest Service, whose lenient "multiple-use" philosophy permits motorized vehicles on thousands of miles of its trails across the U.S., has begun to close some lands to the bikes, including major portions of the popular Pacific Crest Trail, which stretches from California to Canada.  Often these closings come after vigorous anti-bike lobbying by conservation organizations, the politically potent Sierra Club among them.  Sierra has been instrumental in securing a number of the California bans.  It has been waging an all-out campaign to beat back a proposal, pushed by Utah bike groups, to allow the cycles in federally designated wilderness areas, where they are now prohibited.  Yet Sierra's hard-line stance has created something of a rift in the organization, which estimates that 17% of its 500,000 members own mountain bikes.  Pressure from these members prompted the club recently to soften its anti-bike rhetoric; it no longer, for example, lumps the bikes into the same category as motorcycles and other terrain-marring off-road vehicles.  But the club still insists that public lands ought to be closed to the bikes unless studies indicate the bikes won't injure the environment or other users.  "I have a mountain bike, yet as a hiker I've been run off the road by kids careening down a fire trail on them," says Gene Coan, an official at Sierra's headquarters in San Francisco, echoing the concerns of many members.  "People who feel that cyclists should be banned from an area aren't looking at the whole picture," complains Mark Langton, associate editor of Mountain and City Biking magazine in Canoga Park, Calif.  Mr. Langton is among the legions of bikers who got their first taste of wilderness as hikers or backpackers.  He says fellow bikers show the same concern for the land that they demonstrated as hikers; many are appalled that the conservation community would suddenly consider them the enemy.  To fight back, activists such as Mr. Langton are forming groups to lobby land managers over access issues and undertake education programs to show that the bikes can responsibly share trails.  Mr. Langton's group, Concerned Off-Road Bicyclists Association, mounted petition drives to help keep open certain Santa Monica Mountain trails designated for closing.  Biking groups in Montana, Idaho, Michigan and Massachusetts have won similar concessions, says Tim Blumenthal, mountain bike editor of Bicycling magazine.  These groups have been trying to improve the mountain biker's image; in the San Francisco-area park district where a ranger was clobbered by a cyclist this summer bikers have formed a volunteer patrol to help rangers enforce regulations, and to school riders in proper trail etiquette.  Even staunch anti-bike Sierra members concede that 10% of all riders cause most of the problems.  While some are renegade riders who simply scorn regulations, much bad riding simply reflects ignorance that can be corrected through "education and peer pressure," says Jim Hasenauer, a director of the International Mountain Biking Association.  "I think we're making progress."  Few would have foreseen such a furor when, a decade ago, some Marin County bicycle enthusiasts created a hybrid bike using fat tires, lightweight metallurgy and multi-gear technology.  They wanted a machine that would allow them to pedal into rugged terrain then inaccessible to cycles.  They got a machine more responsive, more stable and in many ways easier to ride than the thin-tired racing bikes that then were the rage.  When the bikes first entered mass production in 1981, they were dismissed as a fad.  Last year, 25% of the 10 million bicycles sold in the U.S. were mountain bikes.  In California, a bellwether market, they accounted for more than 80% of all bike sales.  The majority of the bikes never even make it into the high country.  City dwellers love them because they shift smoothly in traffic, bounce easily over curbs and roll through road glass with far fewer flat tires than racing bikes.  Crested Butte, population 1,200, is a bastion of the sport.  By one estimate, everyone here under 50 owns at least one bike.  The town is home to the Mountain Bike Hall of Fame and it hosts the annual Fat Tire Bike Week.  This summer, the jamboree attracted more visitors than the busiest week of the town's winter ski season.  David Lindsey, chairman of the Fat Tire Bike celebration, muses that the bike's popularity may be a combination of technology and nostalgia.  "The mountain bike feels as comfortable as the `paperboy' bike you had as a kid, but it can do so much more," he says.  The following issues were recently filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission:  Canada's Province of Nova Scotia, shelf offering of up to $550 million of debentures.  Golar Gas Holding Co., a subsidiary of Gotaas-Larsen Shipping Corp., offering of $280 million first preferred ship mortgage notes, via Merrill Lynch Capital Markets.  H.F. Ahmanson & Co., offering of four million shares of noncumulative convertible preferred stock, Series B., via Goldman, Sachs & Co, First Boston Corp., and Merrill Lynch.  Shared Technologies Inc., offering of 2.5 million common shares, via Smetek, Van Horn & Cormack Inc. and Oakes, Fitzwilliams & Co.  Stock-market tremors again shook bond prices, while the dollar turned in a mixed performance.  Early yesterday, investors scrambled to buy Treasury bonds for safety as stock prices plummeted and fears mounted of a replay of Friday.  But stocks later recovered, erasing most of their early declines.  That cut short the rally in Treasury bonds and depressed prices moderately below late Monday's levels.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average, down more than 60.25 points early in the day, finished 18.65 points lower at 2638.73.  Long-term Treasury issues declined about half a point, or $5 for each $1,000 face amount.  "The stock market clearly is leading the bond markets," said Jack Conlon, an executive vice president at Nikko Securities.  "People are breathing a major sigh of relief that the world didn't end Monday morning" or yesterday.  Gold, a closely watched barometer of investor anxiety, was little changed.  The dollar initially fell against other major currencies on news that the U.S. trade deficit surged in August to $10.77 billion.  But the dollar later rebounded, finishing slightly higher against the yen although slightly lower against the mark.  Federal Reserve officials sent another signal of their determination to shore up investor confidence.  In an apparent attempt to keep a lid on short-term interest rates, the Fed once again pumped money into the banking system.  But the Fed move was a small gesture, traders said.  Fed officials appear reluctant to ease their credit grip any further because a bold move doesn't appear necessary, several investment managers said.  The Fed has allowed a key short-term interest rate to decline about one-quarter percentage point.  The federal funds rate on overnight loans between banks has been hovering around 8 3/4%, down from 9% previously.  Although stocks have led bonds this week, some traders predict that relationship will reverse during the next few weeks.  Nikko's Mr. Conlon fears a huge wave of Treasury borrowing early next month will drive down Treasury bond prices.  That, coupled with poor third-quarter corporate-earnings comparisons, "will make trouble for the equity market for the next two to three months," he says.  But several other traders contend investors have overreacted to junk-bond jitters, and that stock prices will continue to recover.  "They shot the whole orchestra just because the piano player hit a bad note," said Laszlo Birinyi, president of Birinyi Associates Inc., referring to the stock market's plunge Friday on news of trouble in financing the UAL Corp. buy-out.  In major market activity:  Treasury bond prices fell.  The yield on 30-year Treasury bonds climbed back above 8%, ending the day at 8.03%.  The dollar was mixed.  Late yesterday in New York, the dollar rose to 142.75 yen from 141.80 yen Monday, but fell to 1.8667 marks from 1.8685 marks.  The Consumer News and Business Channel cable network and U.S. News & World Report have formed a joint venture to produce cable program versions of special issues of the magazine.  The programs will run on the cable network the Sunday evening immediately prior to the release of the special issue of U.S. News & World Report.  CNBC is a joint venture of the National Broadcasting Co., a unit of General Electric Co., and Cablevision System Corp.  Advertisers will be offered an advertising package, which for a single price, will include time on the CNBC program and ad pages in the special guides.  CNBC will produce six, one-hour programs, beginning in April 1990.  The first program scheduled in the joint venture is "The 1990 Homeowner's Guide."  Other programs and special issues will be based on themes of health, jobs, personal finance, the best colleges, and investments.  The programs will be written and produced by CNBC, with background and research provided by staff from U.S. News & World Report.  Skoal Daze  I've learned the hard way that too much booze  Takes revenge the next day about nine;  No wonder I say, "I drink to your health" --  It certainly isn't to mine]  --George O. Ludcke.  ---  Spaced Out  Those supermarket tabloids  Make me feel slow  Because I still haven't seen  A UFO.  -- Bruce Kafaroff.  ---  Daffynition  Repression: emote control.  -- Daisy Brown.  Weyerhaeuser Co. reported a one-time gain and strong wood-product sales that offset weakness in pulp and paper to fuel a 15% jump in third-quarter net income to $166.8 million, or 78 cents a share.  In the 1988 third quarter, the forest-products company reported profit of $144.9 million, or 69 cents a share.  Sales rose 9% to $2.57 billion from $2.36 billion.  For the nine months, the company posted a 14% rise in profit to $469.8 million, or $2.21 a share, from $410.3 million, or $1.95 a share.  Sales rose 9% to $7.54 billion from $6.95 billion.  Results for the 1989 third quarter and nine months include a pretax loss of $33 million from the company's business improvement and refocusing program, and a gain of $49 million on the sale of a subsidiary's common stock.  Forest-products operations strengthened in the third quarter, while paper operations were dogged by higher costs, soft newsprint exports and a strong Japanese yen.  Some competing forest-products firms have recently reported improved results due to strong pulp and paper business.  Weyerhaeuser's pulp and paper operations were up for the nine months, but full-year performance depends on the balance of operating and maintenance costs, plus pricing of certain products, the company said.  Looking ahead to the fourth quarter, the company said export log and lumber markets will be weak, while panel and plywood markets will be stronger.  Pulp and paper performance depends on cost and price variables, the company said.  Bankers Trust New York Corp. became the latest major U.S. bank to increase reserves for its loans to less-developed countries, making a $1.6 billion third-quarter addition to its provision.  The bank also said it expects to report a $1.42 billion loss for the third quarter and a loss for the full year.  The new reserves bring the company's provision for loans to Third World countries to $2.6 billion, or 85% of Bankers Trust's medium and long-term loans to these countries.  "Step up to the plate and take the big swing.  Get the problem behind you and don't look back," said James J. McDermott, analyst at Keefe, Bruyette & Woods, in approving of the move.  Bankers Trust "has had the capacity to do this for some time," the analyst said.  He expects Citicorp to take a similar step this year.  Citicorp yesterday reported a 9% third-quarter earnings drop, which analysts called a bit disappointing, while Manufacturers Hanover Corp. posted a $789 million loss for the quarter after adding $950 million to its reserve for loans to less-developed countries.  Three other major U.S. banks posted earnings increases.  Wells Fargo & Co. of San Francisco posted a 17% jump.  PNC Financial Corp., the parent of Pittsburgh National Bank, reported net income climbed 9.8%, while net for Banc One Corp. of Columbus, Ohio, grew 3.8%.  Citicorp  Analysts were only slightly disappointed by Citicorp's numbers.  "There's nothing in here that's horrible and nothing to make you think they're setting the world on fire," said Carole Berger, analyst for C.J. Lawrence, Morgan Grenfell Inc. Earnings from the bank's global consumer business grew 27%.  "The consumer business continues to drive the earnings stream," said Mr. McDermott of Keefe, Bruyette & Woods.  Corporate finance and trading results in member countries of the Organization for Economic Cooperation and Development were "relatively flat, sometimes choppy," the bank said, and profit for the area sank 27%.  The cross-border loan portfolio reflected "adjustment problems and episodic payment patterns," the bank said no interest payments from Argentina in the nine months and none from Brazil in the third quarter, while Venezuela brought itself "substantially current."  Overall, the portfolio narrowed its quarterly loss to $70 million from $80 million a year earlier.  "People were waiting to see if we would take an additional provision" for medium-term and long-term loans to less-developed countries, a Citicorp spokesman said.  But he reiterated the bank's position that it is comfortable with the current level of $2.6 billion, covering about 30% of the $8.9 billion of such loans outstanding.  Ronald I. Mandle, analyst at Sanford C. Bernstein & Co., called Citicorp's venture-capital gains of $93 million before taxes "strong."  A "concerning" item the analyst cited was the 10% jump in expenses, which the bank attributes to costs of expanding both its consumer credit-card operations and its overseas branch business.  Citicorp's spokesman said, however, that the bank is maintaining those expenses in proportion to revenue growth.  Wells Fargo  Wells Fargo continued to generate one of the highest profit margins among major banks, minimizing a drop in net interest margin with 13% third-quarter growth in high-yielding business loans and similar growth in mortgages.  Its margin fell only seven basis points, or 7/100ths of a percentage point, from a year ago, compared with a 13-point drop at Security Pacific Corp. and much larger declines among banks in other parts of the country.  As a result, Wells Fargo's net interest income rose $36.3 million, or 7%, to $537 million for the quarter.  Non-interest income fell slightly to $191.9 million from $193.3 million, while Wells Fargo continued to rigorously control non-interest expense, which was almost flat at $393.4 million.  The combination of solid loan growth with tight expense control gave Wells Fargo a 1.25% return on average assets for the quarter, about 40% higher than Security Pacific's and a profit ratio matched by only two or three other major banks in the U.S. Wells Fargo's return on equity increased to 24.4% from 23.8%.  Wells Fargo has sold all of its non-trade loans made to less-developed countries, and managed to partly reverse the sharp rise in domestic non-accrual loans, which fell 8% from the previous quarter to $806.8 million from $880.9 million.  But the amount was still 39% higher than the year-ago level, and 25% higher as a percentage of total loans.  That trend, and Wells Fargo's heavy exposure to leveraged buy-outs, are about the only worries analysts have about Wells Fargo's financial picture.  Wells Fargo is rebuilding its loan-loss reserve, which increased to $711 million at Sept. 30 from $664 million the previous quarter but was down from $852 million a year ago, when the bank still had some shaky foreign loans.  Manufacturers Hanover  Manufacturers Hanover said that excluding the addition to its reserves, certain tax benefits, and a one-time $16 million gain on the sale of an interest in a foreign leasing company, third-quarter earnings were $75 million.  The comparable year-earlier number was $56 million, a spokesman said.  The bank's additional provisions brought reserves for loans to less-developed countries to $2.4 billion, covering 36% of its medium and long-term loans outstanding to these nations.  The net interest margin-the difference between the bank's cost of funds and what it receives as interest payments -- improved in the quarter, as did certain areas of wholesale banking.  Fees from syndicating loans dropped 48%, to $21 million.  "We didn't take part in a lot of deals" in the quarter "because their credit quality was poor," the spokesman said.  Expenses unrelated to interest rose 5.4%, to $541 million.  PNC Financial  PNC Financial cited higher income from sources unrelated to interest and said it continues to cut costs.  Net interest income in the third quarter edged up 1.4%, to $317.7 million.  Trust income grew 15%, to $49.9 million, while service charges, fees and commissions increased 22%, to $79.4 million.  The bank's total allowance for credit losses was $502.1 million, or 1.82% of total loans.  ---  @ 1989 1988  @ in per in per %  @ millions share millions share chg.  @ THIRD QUARTER NET INCOME  @Manufacturers. .$- 789- 15.46 198 3.77 ...  @Citicorp ..... $358 0.99 394 1.13 - 9  @Wells Fargo .. $153.7 2.83 131.7 2.36 +17  @PNC Financial. $126.9 1.33 115.6 1.25 + 9.8  @ NINE MONTHS NET INCOME  @Manufacturers. .$- 580- 11.82 742 14.28 ...  @Citicorp ..... $1,282 3.62 1,111 3.17 +15  @Wells Fargo .. $442.6 8.07 376.6 6.75 +18  @PNC Financial. $376 3.98 341.3 3.70 +10  Prime Minister Rajiv Gandhi set a date next month for general elections that some analysts say could cost him and his ruling Congress (I) Party control of the government.  Other analysts say the Indian leader could retain control with a slim majority or be forced to rule as the dominant partner in a coalition with other parties.  Elections in this large, diverse and passionate nation are always hard to predict.  Much depends on the opposition, a loose group of regional and ideological parties led by former Gandhi cabinet minister Vishwanath Pratap Singh.  The biggest certainty is that the elections will be a vote for or against Mr. Gandhi and his five years in power -- five years of ups and downs, promises and disappointments and wide fluctuations in popularity.  Yesterday, four days after an unusual parliamentary defeat for the ruling party, Mr. Gandhi called elections for the lower house of Parliament on Nov. 22 and 24.  The elections will be held in different states on one of the two days. (The lower house's five-year term expires in January; the Parliament's upper house is appointed.)  The elections will be a rigorous test for the 45-year-old prime minister and Congress (I), which in various forms has ruled for 40 of India's 42 years of independence.  After a landslide win in 1984 in polls held after the assassination of his mother, Indira Gandhi, Mr. Gandhi saw his popularity begin a roller coaster ride.  His early promises to make India a modern nation remain bogged down in bloated bureaucracy.  His pledge to clean up local administration and Indian politics, including his own party, went unfulfilled.  His "Mr.  Clean" image was muddied by an arms-kickback scandal, which will be a major campaign issue.  Some analysts predict that disappointment in Mr. Gandhi's spent pledge to reduce corruption and heavy-handed local government will crest at the polls.  "There's a wide feeling of indignation across the country," says Bhabani Sen Gupta of the Center for Policy Research, in New Delhi.  "I think the people will be judging the regime by a petty policeman, by a corrupt revenue collector.  This could be a big protest against an administrative failure."  Even if the Congress (I) retains control of the government, Mr. Gandhi's ability to push through major initiatives might be hobbled by a thinner majority.  Economic analysts call his trail-blazing liberalization of the Indian economy incomplete, and many are hoping for major new liberalizations if he is returned firmly to power.  The Lok Sabha, or lower house of Parliament, has 542 elected and two appointed seats.  In 1984, the Congress (I) captured 405 seats, the largest victory in the history of Indian democracy.The landslide was fueled by panic that prevailed in India at the time.  Mrs. Gandhi had been assassinated by separatist Sikhs, and many Indians feared their country might split apart.  In the previous three general elections, similar national issues clinched the vote.  In 1971, the Congress Party won after India's victory in the Bangladesh war.  In 1977, Mrs. Gandhi was thrown out of office after her 19-month emergency rule, and in 1980, after her successors made a mess of their three years in power, she was restored to office.  Most political analysts say that if Mr. Gandhi's opposition unites to field single candidates in most precincts, the Congress (I) will lose big.  But if the opposition remains fractured, the Congress (I) could win a small majority, or lead a coalition government.  Chimanbhai Mehta, a parliamentarian and former Gandhi ally, predicts Congress (I) will win only 150 seats, a quarter of the house, if the opposition fields single candidates in 80% of the races.  Analysts say the opposition will struggle this week to unite, and its success will be clear only when it announces its final list of parliamentary candidates.  The arms-kickback scandal is likely to be one of the big talking points in the campaign, but it's unclear how it is viewed by average Indian voters.  In 1986, India signed a $1.4 billion contract with AB Bofors, a unit of Nobel Industries Sweden AB, to purchase 400 artillery pieces.  The contract was negotiated by the countries' two prime ministers, and was supposed to be free of commissions or agents' costs.  In April 1987, evidence surfaced that commissions were paid.  The opposition charged that the money was used to bribe Indian government officials, an allegation denied by Mr. Gandhi's administration.  But many of his statements on the issue in Parliament subsequently were proven wrong by documentary evidence.  The scandal has faded and flared, but recent disclosures propelled it back onto the front pages, and that has helped galvanize the opposition, which last week blocked passage of two constitutional amendment bills.  It was the first time in 20 years that such government bills were defeated.  In a country where a bribe is needed to get a phone, a job, and even into a school, the name Bofors has become a potent rallying cry against the government.  That illustrates the kind of disappointment many Indians feel toward Mr. Gandhi, whom they zestfully elected and enthusiastically supported in his first two years in power.  His term has produced no spectacular failures in politics, in the economy or on the military front, and has chalked up some successes.  But the average Indian had tremendous hope in the youthful leader and his promise to make both government and the ruling party more effective and less corrupt.  His failures in those two areas deeply, and sometimes bitterly, disappointed many Indians.  "We don't like the Congress (I)," says Sooraji Jath, a farmer in the western state of Gujarat.  "The Congress government is taking the farmers' bread and not giving us any support.  When there are well problems, light problems, road problems, the government tells us to forget it."  The greatest thing going for Mr. Gandhi and the Congress (I) Party is the poor reputation of the opposition.  Even if it unites for the elections, its coherence is likely to be temporary.  When the Congress (I) lost the 1977 election, following Mrs. Gandhi's hated emergency rule, a similar coalition took power and then disintegrated.  Many Indians fear a repeat of that experience.  ---  @ Gandhi's Quagmire: The Bofors Scandal  March 24, 1986: AB Bofors, a unit of Nobel Industries Sweden AB, enters into a $1.4 billion contract with India's Defense Ministry to supply 400 Bofors FH-77B 155-mm field howitzer guns.  In 1985, Prime Minister Rajiv Gandhi, in his talks with then Swedish Prime Minister Olof Palme, imposed the condition that the contract have no middlemen.  April 16, 1987: Swedish National Radio reports that about $40 million -- nearly 3% of the total contract -- was paid by Bofors as commissions to middlemen.  June 1, 1987: Sweden's National Audit Bureau releases its report confirming payment of about $40 million to unidentified Indians.  The report says that investigations were severely hampered by lack of cooperation from Bofors.  Bofors says it can't disclose the names of the middlemen because it would jeopardize industrial confidentiality.  A portion of the report containing names of the middlemen is withheld by officials citing bank secrecy requirements.  Aug. 6, 1987: Prime Minister Gandhi tells the Indian Parliament, ". . . neither I nor any member of my family has received any consideration in these transactions.  That is the truth."  Aug. 26, 1987: Bofors admits payments of $41 million to middlemen.  April 22, 1988: The Hindu newspaper publishes facsimiles of bank documents for foreign-exchange remittances and letters between Bofors and certain private companies related to the sale of the guns to India.  April 26, 1988: A parliamentary investigative committee dominated by the Congress (I) Party concludes that there were no middlemen in the deal and no payment to any Indian individual or company.  July 18, 1989: The comptroller and auditor-general of India reports serious lapses in the government's technical and financial evaluation of the Bofors deal.  Sept. 15, 1989: Retired army Chief of Staff Krishnaswami Sundarji discloses in an interview that he suggested in May 1987 that the government cancel the Bofors contract.  According to Gen. Sundarji, that would have forced Bofors to disclose the names of the middlemen who received kickbacks from the company.  His recommendation was rejected by the government.  Oct. 9. 1989: The Hindu newspaper publishes the withheld portion of the Swedish National Audit Bureau's report.  The disclosures state that commissions were paid by Bofors to an Indian agent of the arms company.  Parsow Partnership Ltd. and Elkhorn Partners L.P. said they may seek proposals from third parties relating to a sale or restructuring of CACI International Inc.  In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission, Parsow and Elkhorn, which together hold 8.685% of CACI's common shares, said they think it is in the best interest of CACI stockholders that the company be sold.  CACI, based in Arlington, Va., said it hadn't seen the filing by Parsow and Elkhorn and therefore had no comment.  The partnerships said they may seek board representation, and they may seek the support of CACI's board and other major shareholders in connection with their plans.  According to the filing, Parsow and Elkhorn are based in Elkhorn, Neb., and are controlled by the same general partner, Alan S. Parsow.  Their combined stake consists of 880,500 CACI common shares, including 86,500 shares bought in the past 60 days at $2.3125 to $2.4375 a share.  Additional shares may be bought or sold in the open market, in private transactions or otherwise, depending on market conditions and other factors.  The inverse trading relationship between bonds and stocks was interrupted yesterday as bonds fell despite a modest decline in stock prices.  But bond investors continue to keep a close watch on the jittery stock market.  In early trading, investors were bidding bond prices higher as stocks tumbled and fears mounted that Friday's stock market debacle would be repeated.  But a partial recovery in the Dow Jones Industrial Average, which had been down more than 60 points in midmorning, dashed those expectations.  Treasury bonds also were hurt late in the day by a $4 billion offering by the Tennessee Valley Authority and the prospect of a huge amount of new agency debt.  "Bond investors were hoping that stock prices would continue to fall," said Roger Early, a vice president at Federated Investors Inc., Pittsburgh.  "When stocks stabilized, that was a disappointment."  Meanwhile, for the second straight day, the bond market paid little attention to the Federal Reserve's open market operations.  Fed officials injected more cash into the banking system by arranging $1.5 billion of repurchase agreements during the usual pre-noon intervention period.  The move was meant to keep a lid on interest rates and to boost investor confidence.  "The intervention has been friendly, meaning that they really didn't have to do it," said Maria Fiorini Ramirez, money-market economist at Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc.  She said a more aggressive move wasn't needed.  The Fed also appears reluctant to ease credit conditions further.  It already has allowed the closely watched federal funds rate to decline 1/4 percentage point to about 8 3/4% from its previous target level of about 9%.  The rate, which banks charge each other on overnight loans, is considered an early signal of changes in Fed policy.  It ended at about 8 11/16% yesterday, but was as low as 8 1/2% Monday.  The Treasury's benchmark 30-year bond fell more than 1/2 point, or over $5 for each $1,000 face amount, while the yield moved above 8% for the first time since Thursday.  Investment-grade corporate, municipal and mortgage-backed securities also fell.  But most junk bonds closed unchanged after opening slightly higher on bargain-hunting by institutional investors.  Some so-called high-quality junk issues, such as R.H. Macy & Co.'s 14 1/2% subordinated debentures, rose.  The Macy's issue closed up about one point at a bid price of 97.  The TVA's public debt offering was its first in 15 years.  Strong investor demand prompted it to boost the size of the issue from $3 billion.  Traders said hedging related to the TVA pricing also pressured Treasury bonds.  "Underwriters of the TVA bonds reduced their market risk by selling Treasurys to cover at least part of their {TVA} holdings," said James R. Capra, a senior vice president at Shearson Lehman Government Securities Inc.  The TVA bonds also "served to remind the market that there will be even more new supply," said Lawrence N. Leuzzi, a managing director at S.G. Warburg Securities & Co.  Today the Treasury will announce the size of its next two-year note sale and Resolution Funding Corp. will announce details of its first bond offering.  Some traders estimate $9.75 billion of new two-year Treasurys will be sold next week, and they expect Refcorp to offer $4 billion to $6 billion of long-term "bailout" bonds.  Refcorp was created to help fund the thrift bailout.  Another agency issue came to market yesterday.  The Office of Finance of the Federal Home Loan Banks said it priced a four-part $2.27 billion bond offering for the banks to yield from 8.125% to 8.375%.  The release of several economic reports had little impact on the market, including a report that the U.S. trade deficit expanded to a surprisingly wide $10.77 billion in August, up from a revised $8.24 billion in July.  The August gap was expected to have expanded to $9.1 billion.  Treasury Securities  Treasury securities were essentially flat to about 1/2 point lower.  The benchmark 30-year bond was quoted late at 100 28/32 to yield 8.04%, compared with 101 19/32 to yield 7.97% Monday.  The latest 10-year notes were quoted late at 99 25/32 to yield 8.01%, compared with 100 1/32 to yield 7.97%.  Short-term rates increased.  The discount rate on three-month bills rose to 7.52% for a bond-equivalent yield of 7.75%.  The rate on six-month bills rose to 7.53% for a bond-equivalent yield of 7.92%.  Corporate, Other Issues  Investment-grade corporate bonds ended 1/4 to 1/2 point lower, while most junk bonds ended unchanged.  The TVA's huge $4 billion offering dominated attention in the new-issue market.  TVA offered $2 billion of 30-year bonds priced to yield 9.06%; $1 billion in 10-year notes priced to yield 8.42%; and $1 billion in five-year notes priced to yield 8.33%.  The TVA, which operates one of the nation's largest electric power systems, is a corporation wholly owned by the U.S. government.  Yesterday's bond sale was part of a $6.7 billion refinancing plan to pay off high-interest debt the TVA owes the Federal Financing Bank, an arm of the Treasury.  Meanwhile, Lockheed Corp. priced a $300 million note offering to yield 9.39%.  Mortgage-Backed Securities  The derivative mortgage-backed market revived after a brief hiatus as two new Remics totaling $850 million were offered and talk circulated about two more issues that could be priced today.  The revival of the real estate mortgage investment conduit market reflected the relative calm in the mortgage market after two days of volatile trading.  Dealers noted that it's difficult to structure new Remics when prices are moving widely.  The two Remics priced were a $500 million Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corp. issue underwritten by Salomon Brothers Inc. and a $350 million Federal National Mortgage Association deal underwritten by Greenwich Capital Markets.  The Remic issuance supported prices of Freddie Mac and Fannie Mae securities, which held up better than Government National Mortgage Association securities during an afternoon sell-off.  Ginnie Mae 9% securities for November delivery ended at 97 29/32, down 7/32; 9 1/2% securities at 99 31/32, down 6/32; and 10% securities at 101 29/32, down 5/32.  Freddie Mac 9% securities were at 97 5/32, down 3/32.  The Ginnie Mae 9% issue was yielding 9.43% to a 12-year average life assumption, as the spread above the Treasury 10-year note held at 1.42 percentage points.  Municipals  Confusion over the near-term trend for rates dominated the municipal arena, as gyrations in the stock market continued to buffet bonds.  Long tax-exempt dollar bonds were mostly flat to 3/8 point lower after a whipsaw session of moving inversely to stocks in modest dealer-led trading.  Prices of pre-refunded municipal bonds were capped by news that Chemical Securities Inc., as agent for a customer, will accept bids today for two large lists of bonds that include many such issues.  The lists total $654.5 million.  Pre-refunded bonds are called at their earliest call date with the escrowed proceeds of another bond issue.  Meanwhile, several new issues were priced.  Underwriters led by PaineWebber Inc. set preliminary pricing for $144.4 million of California Health Facilities Financing Authority revenue bonds for Kaiser Permanente.  Tentative reoffering yields were set from 6.25% in 1993 to 7.227% in 2018.  As part of its College Savings Plan, Connecticut offered $100.4 million of general obligation capital appreciation bonds priced to yield to maturity from 6.25% in 1994 to 6.90% in 2006, 2007 and 2009.  A Chemical Securities group won a $100 million Oregon general obligation veterans' tax note issue due Nov. 1, 1990.  The 6 3/4% notes yield 6.25%.  Foreign Bonds  West German government bond prices took a wild roller-coaster ride, pulled down by Monday's U.S. stock market gains then up by a wider-than-expected U.S. trade deficit and falling U.S. stock prices.  West Germany's 7% bond due October 1999 was at 99.95 late yesterday, off 0.10 point from Monday, to yield 7.01%.  The 6 3/4% notes due April 1994 were up 0.10 point to 97.85 to yield 7.31%.  British government bonds surged on renewed volatility in the stock market.  The Treasury 11 3/4% bond due 2003/2007 rose 23/32 to 112 10/32 to yield 10.03%.  But Japanese bonds ended weaker.  The benchmark No. 111 4.6% bond due 1998 ended on brokers' screens at a price of 96, off 0.15 point to yield 5.27%.  A House-Senate conference approved an estimated $67 billion fiscal 1990 spending bill that provides a 28% increase for space research and development and incorporates far-reaching provisions affecting the federal mortgage market.  The current ceiling on home loans insured by the Federal Housing Administration would be increased to $124,875.  Separately, the bill gives authority to the Bush administration to facilitate the refinancing of federally subsidized loans for low-income and moderate-income homeowners.  The second provision, affecting so-called 235 mortgages, has met strong opposition from investment bankers represented by the Public Securities Association.  And a squad of influential former Senate aides employed by the Wall Street firm Salomon Brothers came to the Capitol in a vain attempt to strip the provision.  By an 11-2 margin, Senate negotiators voted to preserve the 235 mortgage refinancing plan, and despite powerful allies, the opposition found itself undercut by an unusual alliance of liberals and conservatives.  The government currently is subsidizing an estimated 23,000 loans above 11% under the 235 program, and however disruptive to private investors, the refinancing is expected to yield at least $15 million in savings in fiscal 1990.  This sum has been guarded jealously by appropriators anxious to offset spending elsewhere, and conservative Sen. Phil Gramm cast the fight as a populist stand against monied interests.  "We are stewards here, not of the mortgage companies, but the taxpayers," said the Texas Republican.  The action came as the administration won final congressional approval of $9 million in assistance for elections scheduled in Nicaragua in February.  The bulk of the money would be funneled through the National Endowment for Democracy, but the legislation is so vaguely written that it has been dogged by questions regarding the money's true purpose and its ultimate destination.  The Senate had refused late Friday to invoke cloture and limit debate, but behind the bipartisan leadership, a solid majority took shape yesterday and brushed aside amendments seeking to cut the total package or steer it away from direct aid to political parties.  Final approval -- on a 64-35 roll call -- was never in doubt, but the opposition drew an unusual mix of senators, including Republicans Jesse Helms and Warren Rudman and Democrats Bill Bradley and John Glenn.  The money will be applied for voter registration and election monitoring, but more than half is likely to go to the Union Nacional Opositora party.  Critics warned such cash contributions may only undercut the opposition party's standing, and one irony is that under Nicaraguan law a major portion of the opposition party's funds must be shared with the government's Supreme Electoral Council.  Within the appropriations conference yesterday, the $67 billion measure is the second largest of the annual domestic spending bills and covers a disparate collection of accounts for science, housing, veterans and the environment.  The decision to raise the ceiling on FHA home loans still faces strong opposition in the House.  But it is driven by the same fiscal pressures that have forced lawmakers to resort to various bookkeeping devices to juggle as much as $1 billion in spending that would otherwise put the bill over budget.  These costs will complicate the budget picture in fiscal 1991, and the measure further commits Congress to a set of costly projects, including the first construction funds for the space station.  The station is promised $1.8 billion within the $5.36 billion provided for research and development in the National Aeronautics and Space Administration, and the nation's high-speed aerospace plane -- cut by the Senate -- could receive as much as $60 million in new funds or transfers.  Similarly, the House agreed to add back $62 million to continue work on the advanced communications technology satellite, being developed by General Electric Co.  And while setting a statutory limit of $1.6 billion on the automated space probe, the conference appropriated $30 million for the start-up of the CRAF-Cassini mission, a successor to the Voyager space probe.  Among major domestic agencies, the Environmental Protection Agency stands to receive increases significantly beyond those sought by the administration, with pollution abatement and control accounts growing by 14% to about $829.9 million.  An estimated $1.57 billion is separately allocated for the National Science Foundation, and within the Housing and Urban Development Department, more than $9.2 billion is provided for federally assisted housing, including an expanded effort to modernize public housing units that serve the poorest families.  To an unusual degree, the massive bill has become a vehicle for lawmakers to earmark funds for projects in home states.  While the practice was discouraged in the past, the conference agreement is laced with veterans' hospitals, environmental projects and urban grants designated for specific communities.  The most striking example yesterday may have been in community development funds, where the two houses had separately approved a total of 27 projects valued at $20 million, and the conference added 15 more valued at $8 million to ostensibly preserve "balance" between the House and Senate.  Yesterday's conference agreement is the second major bill to emerge from negotiations this week, as appropriators approved a fiscal 1990 transportation bill late Monday that includes a sweeping ban on smoking on most domestic airline flights.  An exemption will remain for flights longer than six hours to Hawaii and Alaska, but estimates by the tobacco industry yesterday indicate all but about 30 flights would be covered.  Separately, a third conference report covering an $18.4 billion Treasury and Postal Service bill was sent to the Senate after passing the House on a 383-30 roll call yesterday.  And after weeks of delay, the appropriations process is beginning to take some final shape.  Defense and foreign aid are the two most critical areas remaining from the administration's standpoint.  And among domestic programs, the most serious threat is White House opposition to abortion riders attached to separate bills funding the District of Columbia and Department of Health and Human Services.  The same issue threatens to spill over to the foreign aid debate, and Mr. Bush also is threatening to veto any agreement that preserves Senate-passed provisions renewing U.S. support for the United Nations Fund for Population Activities.  In a sharply written letter, Rep. David Obey, chairman of the House appropriations subcommittee for foreign operations, warned Mr. Bush that the result of his "ultimatum" could weaken efforts to accommodate the administration elsewhere.  "As a result of your ultimatum," writes the Wisconsin Democrat, "I guess there is no longer any point in taking administration views into account on other items in conference, inasmuch regardless of their resolution you apparently intend to veto this bill."  Markets usually get noticed because they soar or plunge.  Gold, which hasn't risen or fallen significantly in quite some time, yesterday achieved what may be a new level of impassiveness: The most actively traded futures contracts closed unchanged despite nervous fluctuations in both the dollar and the stock market.  The settlement prices of the December, February and April gold contracts were even with Monday's final prices.  The December 1989 contract, which has the greatest trading volume, ended at $371.20 an ounce.  The other months posted advances of 10 cents to 20 cents an ounce.  According to one analyst, Bernard Savaiko of PaineWebber, New York, the stock market's ability on Monday to rally from last Friday's decline -- which seemed to indicate that the economy wasn't going to fall either -- took the starch out of precious metals prices, and out of gold's, in particular.  Yesterday, gold traded within a narrow range.  Gold tried to rally on Monday but ran into the same situation that has subdued gold prices for more than a year: selling by gold producers, who want to fix the highest possible price for their gold.  "December delivery gold is trading in a range of $365 to $375 {an ounce} and is having difficulty breaking out above that," Mr. Savaiko said.  "Producers at the moment regard that area a good one in which to sell gold."  Also, Mr. Savaiko noted, stock market investors seeking greater safety are veering toward buying bonds rather than precious metals because "we are tending more toward a disinflationary economy that doesn't make gold and precious metals attractive."  Jeffrey Nichols, president of APMS Canada, Toronto precious metals advisers, said there is little to motivate gold traders to buy the metal.  "Investors in the U.S. and Europe are comfortable with the actions of the {Federal Reserve} in its willingness to supply liquidity to financial system, which helped the stock market rebound on Monday," he said.  There isn't any rush on the part of investors in the West to buy gold, he said.  "They still bear the memory of October 1987, when they bought gold after the stock market crashed and ended up losing money because gold prices subsequently fell," Mr. Nichols said.  "It's an experience they don't want to repeat."  At the moment gold traders aren't concerned about inflation, he said, and as for the dollar, "gold's association with the currency has been diminishing recently so drops in the currency aren't having much impact on gold."  Dinsa Mehta, chief bullion trader for Chase Manhattan Bank, said: "There is little incentive on the part of traders to sell gold because the stock market may go lower and gold may retain some of its `flight to safety' quality.  There is little incentive to buy gold because if the stock market goes higher, it may be just a false alarm.  This is keeping the gold traders handcuffed."  The most remarkable feature about yesterday's action was that the price of roughly $370 an ounce was regarded as attractive enough by gold producers around the world to aggressively sell gold, Mr. Mehta said.  "I don't know what it means over the long run, but for the short term, it appears that gold producers are grateful for the $10 or so that gold has risen over the past week or so," he said.  Previously, he noted, gold producers tended to back off from a rising gold market, letting prices rise as much as possible before selling.  Mr. Mehta observed that the U.S. merchandise trade deficit, which rose sharply in August, according to yesterday's report, has been having less and less impact on the gold market.  "The dollar hasn't reacted much to it, so gold hasn't either," he said.  In other commodity markets yesterday:  ENERGY: Crude oil prices rose slightly in lackluster activity as traders in the pits tried to assess action in the stock market.  Since stock market indexes plummeted last Friday, participants in all markets have been wary.  When traders become confident that the stock market has stabilized, oil prices are expected to rise as supply and demand fundamentals once again become the major consideration.  Crude oil for November delivery edged up by 16 cents a barrel to $20.75 a barrel.  Heating oil prices also rose.  November gasoline slipped slightly.  SUGAR: Futures prices rose on a report that Cuba may seek to postpone some sugar shipments.  The March contract advanced 0.14 cent a pound to 14.11 cents.  According to an analyst, Cuba can't meet all its shipment commitments and has asked Japan to accept a delay of shipments scheduled for later this year, into early next year.  "Japan is perceived as a wealthy nation that can turn elsewhere in the world market and buy the sugar," the analyst said.  It was the possibility of this demand that helped firm prices, the analyst said.  Another analyst noted that Cuba has been deferring shipments in recent years.  "To the professionals in the trade it didn't cause much surprise.  The March futures contract traded as high as 14.24 cents, but couldn't sustain the advance," he said.  LIVESTOCK AND MEATS: The prices of cattle, hogs and pork belly futures contracts rebounded as livestock traders shook off fears that the Friday stock market plunge would chill consumer spending, which in turn would hurt retail sales of beef and pork.  The prices of most livestock futures contracts had dropped sharply Monday.  Cattle futures prices were also supported yesterday by signs that supermarket chains are making plans to increase their promotions concerning beef.  GRAINS AND SOYBEANS: The prices of most soybean and soybean-meal futures contracts rose amid rumors that the Soviet Union is interested in buying from the U.S. or South America about 250,000 metric tons of soybeans and as many as 400,000 metric tons of soybean meal.  Traders are especially sensitive to reports of possible U.S. soybean sales because U.S. exports are lagging.  Since Sept. 1, about 13 million fewer bushels of U.S. soybeans have been sold overseas than for the same period last year.  Corn futures prices rose slightly while wheat prices settled mixed.  Moody's Investors Service Inc., fretting about increasing competitive pressure on Ryder, placed about $2.8 billion in company securities under review for possible downgrade.  Ratings under review are Ryder's A-1 collateral trust debentures, A-2 senior notes and bonds, A-2 preferred stock and the company's Prime-1 rating for commercial paper.  Moody's said it is assessing the strategies Ryder's management may follow in addressing significant challenges in some major markets.  The rating agency said it is focusing especially on the transportation service company's efforts to control costs, improve margins and enhance its competitive position in its primary business, vehicle leasing and rental.  The nations of southern Africa know a lot about managing elephants; their herds are thriving.  But the nations of Europe and North America have decided they know better.  At this week's U.N. conference in Lausanne, they imposed a global ivory ban that seeks to overturn local policies.  A Zimbabwean delegate argued that the ban would "guarantee the extinction of the elephant."  Legitimate ranchers, who have an interest in preserving the herds, would go out of business.  Poachers would control the underground trade.  Many delegates were willing to craft a compromise, but U.S. delegate Constance Harriman and others thundered that down.  The Greens from the First World wanted a morality play, not a negotiation.  Fortunately, the nations of southern Africa haven't totally surrendered their sovereignty.  Five countries announced they would not honor what one Zimbabwean delegate wryly called the "made in Switzerland" solution.  In fact, they seemed a mite resentful.  The director of Zimbabwe's Wildlife Department described American conservationists as "fat little puppies from urban environments who don't know a thing about Africa."  That's not fair; they're not all fat.  HUGO'S BLAST generates pleas for aid from South Carolina small businesses.  The Small Business Administration has received more than 5,000 formal requests for disaster loans because of the hurricane.  About 45% of requests for SBA relief loans, which also are available to homeowners, come from small businesses, compared with a 25% business share after most disasters.  The SBA expects to make about $1 billion in Hurricane Hugo loans.  The disaster fund is replenished by loan repayments.  Hardest hit by Hugo in South Carolina were small retailers tied to the tourist industry and businesses in agriculture and cultivated seafood.  The State Development Board set up a Hugo Hotline to accept business-to-business help.  After NBC weather man Willard Scott broadcast the hot-line number, it was flooded with 10,000 calls.  Last week, the U.S. Chamber of Commerce began using its national TV show to seek help, such as equipment, for business owners.  Local bankers and accountants help applicants fill out forms.  "It helps us, and people feel better talking to someone who's gone through the same thing," an SBA official says.  ---  HEALTH BENEFITS remain a central lobbying effort, even as Section 89 fades.  The Senate, after deleting Section 89 repeal from its deficit-reduction bill, still is expected to join the House in voting to kill the law, which forces companies to provide comparable benefits to laborers and executives alike.  In lobbying on other health-coverage topics, the National Federation of Independent Business will press for legislation that would give self-employed people a 100% tax deduction for their own health plans, up from 25% currently.  And the group will urge that the federal government pre-empt state rules on what must be covered by employers' health insurance.  Small-business groups also will fight the medical-leave provision of legislation that would expand parental leaves.  And they still oppose as too costly an employer-paid health insurance bill sponsored by Sen. Edward Kennedy (D., Mass.) despite his proposal to phase in small business only gradually.  There is also worry that the Pepper Commission studying long-term health care will again push lawmakers toward employerpaid solutions.  The Section 89 victory could have a downside by making it harder to oppose lawmakers on other health proposals.  "With the repeal of Section 89, we can no longer say they're discouraging businesses from offering health plans," says Christine Russell, the Chamber of Commerce's small-business advocate.  ---  JUMPING THE GUN: Sen. Lloyd Bentsen (D., Texas) was outraged after a private word to John Motley, lobbyist for the National Federation of Independent Business, resulted in a news release saying that the Senate Finance Committee chairman would recommend repeal of Section 89.  Even though the announcement was true in the end, it was issued without the senator's permission.  "I blew it," Mr. Motley says apologetically.  "It was a timing mistake."  ---  PRISON-SHOP BLUES: Sen. Strom Thurmond (R., S.C.) protests pending legislation to end the preference that the federal prison system gets in selling prisoner-made furniture and other goods to government agencies.  Small-business suppliers want prisons to stop getting high priority, especially as prison production grows with swelling inmate populations.  Last year, the prisons' sales to the Pentagon totaled $336 million.  ---  REPAIR SHOPS SCRAP for more access to work on auto-emissions systems.  Groups representing some independent auto-repair shops join a compromise on the Clean Air legislation worked out between environmentalists and Rep. Henry Waxman (D., Calif.).  The plan would increase the warranty on auto-emission systems to eight years or 80,000 miles from five years or 50,000 for major parts.  But the warranty on simpler parts would be lowered to two years or 24,000 miles.  The garage owners say they would benefit because car owners would be less likely to go back to dealers for the simpler repairs after two years.  The repair shops aren't united, however.  Shops represented by the Automotive Service Industry Association and the Motor Equipment Manufacturers Association oppose any increase in warranty length.  They say the longer the warranty, the longer customers will automatically return to new-car dealers, which then find non-warranty work that might otherwise go to repair shops.  The House Energy Committee will debate the issue later this month.  Stan Hathcock, an Atlanta garage owner who opposes a longer warranty, estimates that the current plan costs him as much as $15,000 a year in lost business. ---  SMALL TALK: Some 70% of graduates who recently earned an M.B.A. degree say they'd prefer to work in or own a small company, yet most take jobs with large concerns, says a survey by the Foster McKay Group, a New York recruiting firm. . . .  Cardinal Scientific Inc. of Waldorf, Md., seeks a Small Business Innovation Research grant to produce a "nozzle assembly for an Army mass delousing outfit."  Banc One Corp. said Frank E. McKinney plans to retire as the bank holding company's president effective Jan. 12.  Banc One said "it is contemplated" that John B. McCoy, chairman and chief executive officer, will assume the additional position of president upon Mr. McKinney's retirement.  Mr. McKinney, 50 years old, was chairman and chief executive of American Fletcher Corp., Indianapolis, when that bank holding company merged into Banc One in January 1987.  The company said Mr. McKinney plans to retire because the process of affiliating American Fletcher into Banc One "is considered completed."  Mr. McKinney will continue as chairman of the board and chairman of the executive committee of Banc One Indiana Corp., the successor company to American Fletcher Corp., but will no longer be active in day-to-day management.  He will remain on the Banc One board.  The Treasury plans to raise $1.55 billion in new cash with the sale Monday of about $15.6 billion in short-term bills to redeem $14.1 billion in maturing bills.  The offering will be divided evenly between 13-week and 26-week bills maturing on Jan. 25, 1990, and April 26, 1990, respectively.  Tenders for the bills, available in minimum $10,000 denominations, must be received by 1 p.m. EDT Monday at the Treasury or at Federal Reserve banks or branches.  Moody's Investors Service Inc. said it lowered ratings on about $650 million of Beatrice Co. debt, citing the closely held Chicago food concern's proposed recapitalization.  The ratings concern said it downgraded Beatrice notes, Euronotes and certain industrial revenue bonds to single-B-1 from Ba-3 and the company's subordinated debentures to single-B-3 from single-B-2.  Moody's said the proposed recaptilization may "limit the company's ability to realize its profit potential" and that paying dividends from a new series of preferred could squeeze "basic business operations."  A Beatrice spokesman didn't return calls seeking comment.  Beatrice, which went private in an $8.2 billion leveraged buy-out in 1986, said last month that it might borrow again to help pay investors as much as $983 million in preferred stock and debt securities.  When the Soviets announced their last soldier had left Afghanistan in February, the voices of skepticism were all but drowned out by an international chorus of euphoria.  It was "the Soviets' Vietnam."  The Kabul regime would fall.  Millions of refugees would rush home.  A resistance government would walk into Kabul.  Those who bought that illusion are now bewildered.  Eight months after Gen. Boris Gromov walked across the bridge into the U.S.S.R., a Soviet-controlled regime remains in Kabul, the refugees sit in their camps, and the restoration of Afghan freedom seems as far off as ever.  But there never was a chance that the Afghan resistance would overthrow the Kabul regime quickly and easily.  Soviet leaders said they would support their Kabul clients by all means necessary -- and did.  The U.S. said it would fully support the resistance -- and didn't.  With the February 1987 U.N. accords "relating to Afghanistan," the Soviet Union got everything it needed to consolidate permanent control.  The terms of the Geneva accords leave Moscow free to provide its clients in Kabul with assistance of any kind -- including the return of Soviet ground forces -- while requiring the U.S. and Pakistan to cut off aid.  The only fly in the Soviet ointment was the last-minute addition of a unilateral American caveat, that U.S. aid to the resistance would continue as long as Soviet aid to Kabul did.  But as soon as the accords were signed, American officials sharply reduced aid.  In February 1989, when the Soviets said they had completed their pullout, the U.S. cut it further.  Not so the Soviets.  Gen. Gromov himself said Soviet troops expected to leave behind more than $1 billion of military equipment and installations for the Kabul regime.  Since the troop withdrawal, Moscow has poured in an additional $200 to $300 million worth per month -- nearly $2 billion since February, equivalent to the total U.S. aid to the resistance in nine years.  This includes what Deputy Foreign Minister Yuli Vorontsov fetchingly called "new peaceful long-range weapons," including more than 800 SCUD missiles.  By early May, Moscow had delivered, for example, 1,000 trucks, about 100 tanks, artillery and hundreds of other combat vehicles.  Later that month, it added an entire tank brigade, including 120 T-72 tanks and more than 40 BMP state-of-the-art infantry fighting vehicles.  By September, a new Reinforced Motorized Rifle Brigade with an additional 300 combat vehicles, 1,000 more trucks and 10,000 Soviet-trained Afghan troops had arrived in Kandahar.  In the last few weeks, Moscow has added FROG-7B missiles, the bomber version of the An-12, MiG-23BN high-altitude aircraft, MiG-29s, which can outfly Pakistan's U.S.-built F16s, and Sukhoi SU-27 fighter-bombers, which can outfly the MiG-29s.  Moscow claims this is all needed to protect the Kabul regime against the guerrilla resistance.  It is well-known that the regular Afghan infantry is filled with reluctant conscripts.  But this is not the entire Afghan army, and it is no longer Kabul's only military force.  Complete units have been trained and indoctrinated in the U.S.S.R. and other East bloc nations; 30,000 to 40,000 of these troops have returned.  In addition, the regime has established well-paid paramilitary forces totaling more than 100,000, including 35,000 Soviet-trained troops of the Interior Ministry (KHAD/WAD), which still is directed by 1,500 Soviet KGB officers.  Even if not all these forces are committed to the regime, they are now dependent on it.  And thousands of Afghan children have been taken to the Soviet Union, where they are hostage for the behavior of their families.  Since 1981, Indian military advisers have been assisting the Kabul regime.  In preparation for the withdrawal, Moscow, Kabul and New Delhi signed two agreements for several hundred newly civilian Indian experts to replace some of the more visible Soviet military personnel.  Cuban military personnel also have been active in Afghanistan since 1979.  The Soviets cut a deal with Iran: a future Iranian role in Afghanistan in exchange for Iranian support of Soviet policy.  The deal was symbolized by the restoration of the Shi'ite Sultan Ali Keshtmand to the Afghan prime ministry.  Moreover, serious questions have been raised about the claimed withdrawal of Soviet forces.  Before his assassination in 1988, President Zia of Pakistan repeatedly stated that fresh Soviet troops were being inserted into Afghanistan even as others were ostentatiously withdrawn.  Rep. Bill McCollum (R., Fla.) reports that these included 20,000 to 30,000 Soviet Central Asian KGB Border Guards, ethnically indistinguishable from Afghans and wearing unmarked uniforms.  Meanwhile, the Kabul regime is increasingly successful at portraying the resistance as bloody-minded fanatics.  In this they are aided by years of American, European, Pakistani and Saudi support for the most extreme factions -- radical Islamic fanatics with leaders whose policies are anathema to the Afghan public.  This heavy outside support for the worst has undermined better, moderate leaders.  In autumn last year, for example, the regime garrison at Kandahar was prepared to surrender the city to resistance moderates.  At the last minute, however, Pakistani officials sent in Gulbuddin Hekhmatyar, perhaps the most hated and feared of the extremists, with a demand that the surrender be made to his forces.  The deal fell through, and Kandahar remains a major regime base.  The resistance lacks not only air power, armor and expertise but often such essentials as maps, mine detectors, or even winter gloves.  Experienced resistance commanders wanted to use guerrilla action and siege tactics to wear down the regime.  Instead, they were pressured by Pakistan's ISI, the channel for their support, into attacking Jalalabad.  They took more than 25% casualties; journalists report that they faced minefields without mine detectors.  The wonder is not that the resistance has failed to topple the Kabul regime, but that it continues to exist and fight at all.  Last summer, in response to congressional criticism, the State Department and the CIA said they had resumed military aid to the resistance months after it was cut off; but it is not clear how much is being sent or when it will arrive.  For months the resistance has been defenseless against air attack.  Thus far there is no indication that they have been re-supplied with Stingers or other anti-aircraft weapons.  Indeed, U.S. officials have indicated to the press that the continuation of aid depends on what success the weakened resistance achieves by the end of this year.  Moscow and Kabul must have found that information useful.  For a decade U.S. policy has been incoherent, based on miscalculation and the defense of bureaucratic and political turf.  No settlement negotiated by others can force the Afghan people to give up their struggle.  A cutoff of U.S. military aid would merely abandon them to die in vain.  Creation of a new, realistic U.S. policy is long overdue.  ---  Ms. Klass, editor and co-author of "Afghanistan: The Great Game Revisited" (Freedom House), directs the Freedom House program on Afghanistan/Southwest Asia.  Nothing stirred the soul of Ronald Reagan and his disciples as much as the crusade to aid Nicaragua's Contra rebels, or the dream of building a space-based defense shield to knock out Soviet nuclear missiles.  Yet under Mr. Reagan's preferred successor, President Bush, those two cherished national-security causes are withering on the vine.  And, surprisingly, little more than a whimper of protest is being heard, even though Reaganauts once breathed fire supporting the Contras and the Strategic Defense Initiative.  "The programs have arthritis," says Rep. Henry Hyde, a conservative Republican from Illinois.  Yet, he asserts, "you look around . . . and you say, `Who are the leaders?  Who is going to carry the water?'"  It isn't surprising that President Bush hasn't led a crusade to pump up the Contras or SDI. Though he nominally supports both programs, Mr. Bush hasn't been a passionate champion of either cause, as Mr. Reagan was.  What's surprising is that there isn't more of a conservative outcry as the Bush administration lets the programs slip down the national-priority list.  A combination of factors -- a weariness among some conservatives, a decline in the perception of a Soviet threat and a preoccupation with other issues -- seem to explain the strange tranquility.  Above all, though, conservative Republicans who have championed both the Contras and SDI are reluctant to attack a Republican president for failing to do more -- though that reluctance may be receding.  "We want to complain, we want to say something about it, and we're going to as it gets worse," says Rep. Dan Burton, an Indiana Republican who has been a staunch Contra backer.  "But it's like kicking your father in the pants.  You hate to do it because he's your father."  Mr. Burton says conservatives' unhappiness with Mr. Bush's cautious handling of the recent unsuccessful coup in Panama will make them more willing to speak out.  Of course, neither President Bush nor the Congress has actually abandoned the Contras or SDI. Mr. Bush has struck a deal with congressional leaders to provide nonlethal aid to the Contras until Nicaragua holds national elections next February.  But the administration has dropped any effort to win military aid for the rebels.  And the administration's deal with Congress gives several congressional committees the right to cut off even humanitarian aid next month, though the committees are likely to let aid continue until February.  Most analysts think there's little prospect the Contras can be a significant fighting force without U.S. arms, and after the February election their future in any form will be murky at best.  Instead of focusing on the Contras, Mr. Bush has switched to urging members of Congress -- most recently in a White House meeting yesterday -- to approve financing for the election campaign of political opponents of Nicaragua's Sandinista government.  The administration continues to support SDI, or Star Wars, and it recently lobbied to persuade the Senate to restore some of the funds it planned to cut from the program.  And just last week, Defense Secretary Dick Cheney gave a strong speech listing "compelling reasons" to push ahead with SDI and saying he'd urge President Bush to veto a defense bill with "inadequate" funding for the program.  But the strong pitch by Mr. Cheney may be too little too late to prevent damage to SDI.  The House has already voted for a deep cut in funding, and in the end the program's backers will be hard pressed to head off some reduction in spending next year.  And while the defense secretary is speaking out, President Bush himself hasn't launched any high-visibility campaign to drum up support, as President Reagan did.  The administration also acknowledges that it isn't pursuing Mr. Reagan's original vision of an "impenetrable shield" protecting the whole U.S., but rather a more modest version.  More ominous to SDI supporters, the Bush administration appears to have tacitly accepted a new arms-control proposal from the Soviet Union that spells long-term trouble for Star Wars.  The Soviets have agreed to complete a treaty cutting strategic weapons without including restrictions on space-based defenses.  But the Soviets also are insisting that they will reserve the right to withdraw from the completed strategic-arms treaty later on if the U.S. does SDI testing or deployment that the Soviets think violates the existing anti-ballistic-missile treaty.  It will be hard down the road to persuade Congress to approve money for SDI plans if lawmakers fear those plans could scuttle a completed treaty.  As a result, Frank Gaffney, a former Reagan Pentagon aide who now heads the Center for Security Policy, charges that the administration's "professions of continued commitment to development and deployment of the SDI program strain credulity."  Still, proponents may be shying away from more drumbeating because they sense political tides have turned against arming the Nicaraguan rebels or boosting spending on SDI -- particularly when the public perceives the Soviet threat is declining under Mikhail Gorbachev.  In fact, because communism seems to be beating a global retreat, some conservatives may simply be so pleased that their anti-communist philosophy is prevailing that they don't have the fire at the moment to push controversial programs.  "The short of it is that the most hard-bitten among us cannot get into too sour a mood with communism collapsing," says Mitchell Daniels, a former Reagan White House aide who now is president of the Hudson Institute.  Some activists are toiling to raise the profile of the two causes.  But they say they can't make much headway because of a lack of willing leaders in a position to turn the tide.  One longtime champion of these programs in Congress, Republican whip Newt Gingrich of Georgia, is distracted by questions about his ethics, conservatives note.  Other conservative champions, like Wyoming Republican Sen. Malcolm Wallop, a longtime SDI advocate, don't have the clout with the Bush White House that they enjoyed with President Reagan.  Above all, though, proponents say neither the Contra nor the SDI cause can be pushed much further without more presidential support.  "For there to be wind in the sails of any program, the chief executive has to be blowing in the sails," says Rep. Burton.  All this causes Rep. Hyde to muse about an alternate way to drum up more enthusiasm.  "What I'd like to see, if he is up to it, is for Reagan to take to the hustings to regenerate enthusiasm for SDI," the congressman says.  @ ---  @ SDI and the Contras:  @ A Funding Profile  @ Strategic Defense Initiative  @ Fiscal 1989 funding $4.1 billion  @ Reagan request for fiscal 1990 $5.9 billion  @ Bush request for fiscal 1990 $4.9 billion  @ Senate vote for fiscal 1990 $4.3 billion  @ House vote for fiscal 1990 $3.1 billion  @ Contras  @ Current nonmilitary aid (monthly) $4.5 million  @ Current military aid None being  @ provided  @ Four congressional committees have the power to stop aid outlays after November  @ Aid agreement between Congress and Bush expires in February  We're sorry to report that on Monday President Bush accepted the resignation of William Allen as chairman of the U.S. Civil Rights Commission.  Mr. Allen, appointed by President Reagan, grew understandably tired of dealing with the guerrilla tactics of his enemies.  His recent speech, provocatively titled "Blacks?  Animals?  Homosexuals?  What is a Minority?" caused an uproar when its title leaked out.  Mr. Allen's commissioners voted to call his unread speech "thoughtless, disgusting and unnecessarily inflammatory."  Commissioner Mary Francis Berry said it was "another sad episode in the saga of the unguided missile who is chairman."  Rep. Don Edwards, the California Democrat, warned Mr. Allen that the speech would be "outside the scope of the commission's jurisdiction."  Thomas Stoddard, head of the Lambda Legal Defense Fund, called the prospect of the speech "frankly shocking."  We've actually read the speech.  Mr. Allen began it with a warning to his hosts, a California church group that opposes rights for homosexuals.  He said that other participants in the conference "do not believe that the rights of Americans should be guaranteed to citizens who are homosexual," but that "I mean to persuade you to the opposite view."  He recalled to the audience a "strange, infelicitous" analogy he once heard arguing "now that we have finally recognized that American blacks have rights, we need to do the same for animals."  Mr. Allen objected to this analogy because it seems to "assimilate the status of blacks to that of animals -- as a mere project of charity, of humaneness."  Rights on such a basis, whether for blacks or homosexuals, are "mere indulgences," he said, subject to being taken back.  He says the title of his speech was to make his point that Americans have rights as individuals, not as members of certain select groups.  His speech criticized the "idiocy of notions of protected groups in society" as opposed to individual equality or, as he put it, in "a common destiny as Americans."  Instead of lobbying for special treatment, Mr. Allen said that homosexuals and others should try to ensure equal treatment under the law and not aim for special privileges that would risk "invidious retrenchment with government complicity."  This hardly sounds like an anti-homosexual screed.  What's really going on here?  The three most important things to understand about Mr. Allen is that he is a black conservative intellectual -- a triple threat to the liberal establishment.  Mr. Allen, who teaches government at prestigious Harvey Mudd College in California and will remain a member of the commission, has spent years arguing that civil rights are individuals' rights.  He last made waves when he dared to defend an Indian girl who had been adopted by non-Indian parents off her reservation.  Mr. Allen quickly ran up against the liberal establishment again, which somehow elevated the vague concept of "Indian rights" above the rights of individual Indians.  There is a huge divide between Mr. Allen's we're-all-in-this-together view and the divisive litigation approach of the civil rights groups.  Indeed, the gap is so large that Mr. Allen's critics refuse to engage the debate.  Their ridicule of him is no substitute for argument.  Their effort to run him out of Washington is an embarrassment to the original purpose of their own movement.  We hope the next head of the Civil Rights Commission will be as brave as Mr. Allen in making the case for equality of civil rights.  Bearings Inc. said its chairman, John R. Cunin, will retire as an officer of the company on Jan. 2.  George L. LaMore, president and chief executive officer, will become chairman and chief executive upon Mr. Cunin's retirement.  John C. Dannemiller, executive vice president and chief operating officer, will become president and chief operating officer.  Mr. Cunin, 65 years old, was chief executive of the distributor of bearings and power-transmission products from 1982 to 1988.  He will continue as a director.  Mr. LaMore, 63, a 48-year veteran at Bearings, has been president since 1983.  Mr. Dannemiller, 51, joined Bearings in August 1988 from Leaseway Transportation Corp., where he was president and chief operating officer.  He has been a Bearings director since 1985.  The appointments are part of a planned succession at the company.  GORBACHEV WALKABOUT  Soviet leader Mikhail Gorbachev opened a major U.S. trade exhibition in Moscow and spent two hours touring some of the 150 stalls representing such blue-chip companies as General Motors Corp., International Business Machines Corp. and Johnson & Johnson.  At the Archer-Daniels-Midland Co. stand, Mrs. Nelson Rockefeller, a board member, offered him a soy burger.  He didn't bite.  The exhibition by the U.S.-U.S.S.R.  Trade and Economic Council underscores the growing U.S. interest in that nation's market, though trade between the two countries is a minuscule $3 billion.  The Soviet president and his prime minister, Nikolai Ryzhkov, spent the longest time, about 15 minutes, at the IBM stand, where they got souvenir computer-chip key rings.  At the GM stall, they barely looked at a gleaming Cadillac, preferring to talk about cooperation possibilities.  In Beijing, meantime, China opened an international aviation show, but the West's embargo on military deals and uncertainty about the nation's stability kept many foreign exhibitors away.  Officials said 91 companies from 14 countries, including the U.S., had displays, down from about 260 firms from more than 20 countries at the last show in 1987.  JAPANESE FIRM FINED  Japanese air-conditioner maker Daikin Industries Ltd. was fined two million yen ($14,000) for exporting to the Soviet Union a chemical solution that could be used in missile-guidance systems.  A Daikin executive in charge of exports when the high-purity halogenated hydrocarbon was sold to the Soviets in 1986 received a suspended 10-month jail sentence.  Judge Masaaki Yoneyama told the Osaka District Court Daikin's "responsibility is heavy because illegal exports lowered international trust in Japan."  Sale of the solution in concentrated form to Communist countries is prohibited by Japanese law and by international agreement.  SOVIET PLAN REJECTED  A Soviet legislative panel rejected as not radical enough a government proposal on decentralizing economic control.  The newspaper Leninskoye Zamya said the committee decided the plan to parcel out economic powers previously exercised by Moscow to the country's 15 republics "doesn't reflect the radical changes in the Soviet federation."  The committee gave the government until Nov. 15 to revise the proposal.  The move reflected the growing confidence of the revamped Supreme Soviet.  SCOTT ABANDONS PROJECT  Scott Paper Co. said it is abandoning a proposed $650 million tree-farming project in Indonesia because it no longer expects to use as much eucalyptus pulp as previously anticipated.  The eucalyptus plantation and pulp mill, which would have covered about 175,000 acres in the Irian Jaya region, had been approved by Indonesia's investment board.  But it was opposed by some environmentalists as a threat to Irian Jaya's forests and a potential source of social unrest for the primitive tribes who inhabit them.  MOVE TO HONG KONG  Yaohan Departmentstore Co. of Japan is moving its international-operations headquarters and holding company to Hong Kong to gain from the British colony's economic advantages and tax structure.  With funds of 5.56 billion Hong Kong dollars (US$712 million), the new company, Yaohan International Co., plans to acquire 10 of Hong Kong's top restaurants.  It also intends to set up an international wholesale market with the Singapore government next May and to open a department store in Bangkok and shopping centers in Malaysia, Taiwan, Canada, Chicago and Seattle by December 1990.  The chain currently has 90 retail outlets in Japan, seven in the U.S., three in Hong Kong and a dozen more scattered around the globe.  EUROPEAN AUCTION HOUSES  Major European auction houses are turning increasingly to specialized sales.  Christie's will soon have a sale of Dada and Symbolist art while Sotheby's is luring collectors with sales of Swiss, German, Spanish, Australian and Canadian paintings.  In Brussels, Hotel de Ventes Horta auctioned pistols and sabers-along with paintings and jewels.  Berlin's Villa Grisebach will auction art works with pre-sale estimates of less than $1,600 on Nov. 25.  The auction house, known for its sales of top-drawer 19th and 20th century works, is providing "a service to clients who don't want to sell just their fabulous oil paintings," says Villa Grisebach's Vivien Reuter.  Antwerp auctioneer Campo is less concerned with market niches than with Belgium's crushing tax and auction-fee burden.  "Everything has to be the same between countries," says Campo's Stefan Campo, who is asking clients to sign protest petitions.  "Then there'll be fair competition."  POSTSCRIPTS . . .  Ending tax-free shopping in the European Community after 1992 could threaten more than 3,000 jobs, the International Duty Free Confederation said.  Instead of banning such shopping, the confederation proposed amending controls to be sure the privilege isn't abused. . . .  British and Argentine diplomats opened talks in Madrid aimed at restoring ties severed because of their 1982 war over the Falkland Islands.  Britain's U.N. representative and delegation head Crispin Tickell called the first meeting "good, interesting and businesslike."  Polaroid Corp., benefiting from staff-reduction savings, reported a strong gain in third-quarter operating results and net income of $29.9 million, or 40 cents a share, after preferred-stock requirements.  Analysts said the numbers were better than expectations, partly because of strong profit margins and a positive foreign-currency translation.  However, they said the company's flat revenue was a disappointment, and an indication that sales of Polaroid's new conventional film in the U.S. have been sluggish.  Revenue in the third quarter was $437.7 million, almost unchanged from $436.3 million a year earlier.  Polaroid reported operating profit before taxes and interest costs of $63.1 million for the third quarter, more than double the year-before $24 million.  Charges for staff cuts and other restructuring produced a net loss of $54.1 million, or 77 cents a share, in 1988's third quarter.  "I'm somewhat skeptical about the underlying demand" for Polaroid products, said Michael Ellmann, an analyst with Wertheim Schroder & Co.  "If you believe that a good performance next year is contingent on an acceleration of revenue, there isn't a lot here to base optimism on."  Alex Henderson, an analyst with Prudential-Bache, says Polaroid officials told him yesterday that U.S. sales of the company's new conventional film product, introduced in the second quarter, have been "disappointing" after a promising start.  Sam Yanes, a Polaroid spokesman, said "I don't know about disappointing," but added that the company hasn't been able to get the product on the shelves of some mass-merchandise, discount retailers that it had hoped would be carrying the product already.  Mr. Yanes said the film, One Film, is currently carried at about 15,000 retail outlets, including drugstores and supermarkets.  For the nine months, Polaroid reported earnings of $98.5 million, or $1.27 a share.  Last year, the company had a nine-month loss of $15.1 million, or 23 cents a share.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading, Polaroid closed at $47, up $1.125.  Why is the stock market suddenly so volatile?  Yesterday, the Dow Jones Industrial Average did a now familiar dance: It plunged 60.25 points before lunch, with most of the drop occurring in 25 minutes.  Then, it rebounded to finish down only 18.65 points.  And those swings paled beside Friday's 190.58-point plunge and Monday's 88.12-point recovery.  "It's madness -- that in an hour you can whack off so much value," says Stanford Calderwood, chairman of Trinity Investment Management Corp., Boston.  And, apparently, it is here to stay.  Richard Bernstein, senior quantitative analyst at Merrill Lynch & Co, says, "My gut feel is that we'll live with those swings for a while."  There are many reasons for the market's jumpiness: new trading vehicles such as stock-index futures and options; computer-driven strategies like program trading; and crowd psychology.  But most are linked by a single theme: liquidity -- the ability to get in and out of the market quickly.  Prices are moving up and down so fast because investors are employing ways to turn over shares at ever-faster rates and increasingly acting in concert.  "Institutions are herding animals," says Peter Anderson, who heads the pension-fund management arm of IDS Financial Services Inc.  "We watch the same indicators and listen to the same prognosticators.  Like lemmings, we tend to move in the same direction at same time."  And that, naturally, exacerbates price movements.  Institutions -- who now account for most trading -- count on being able to buy and sell big blocks of stock at an eye-blink.  But when they discover that markets aren't always as liquid as they supposed -- markets jump.  On Monday, for instance, Howard Ward, a principal at Scudder, Stevens & Clark, found that "you couldn't buy blue-chips at quoted prices without paying up."  And when many firms had to "pay up," Monday's sudden rally was sparked.  Trading in futures and options, some people believe, can add to volatility.  Investors believe they can can rely on such derivative securities to get in and out of the stock market without actually selling any stocks; that is, a way of staying liquid even when they own stocks.  These and other modern trading methods "tend to promote dramatic shifts in assets," says George Douglas, first vice president at Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc.  "It's the idea that what goes in easy can come out easy" -- so that bouts of higher volatility get built into the stock market.  One new investment style called "asset allocation" shifts portfolio weightings between stocks, bonds and cash when computer models say one is more attractive.  For instance, First Quadrant Corp., an asset allocator based in Morristown, N.J., said it quickly boosted stock positions in its "aggressive" accounts to 75% from 55% to take advantage of plunging prices Friday.  It added another 5% Monday before stocks rallied.  When they did, the firm reduced those stock holdings to about 70%.  A classic example of institutions' hunger for liquidity is portfolio insurance, now widely discredited.  Before the 1987 crash, an estimated $60 billion in institutional money was managed under this hedging technique.  The idea was to "insure" the value of a portfolio by selling futures when stock prices dropped -- eliminating the need to sell the stocks themselves.  But in October 1987, when portfolio insurers rushed to sell at the same time, they overwhelmed both the stock and futures markets.  Yet even today, institutions are quietly practicing forms of portfolio insurance by nervously rushing to and fro in the markets.  Others are doing "index arbitrage"a strategy of taking advantage of price discrepancies between stocks and futures.  Unlike traditional buy-and-hold strategies, all of the above require that market makers be on hand to provide liquidity by buying and selling stocks in a crunch.  But institutions say Wall Street brokerage firms are less willing to make markets.  Brokers don't deny that.  Wall Street traders say that, with institutional brokerage commissions far lower than in the 1970s, securities firms can't afford to take the risk of buying too much stock.  "I think everyone's a little more leery," says Jack Baker, head of equity trading at Shearon Lehman Hutton Inc.  "The institutions have driven (commission) rates down to the point where it makes no sense to commit capital," says Tom Gallagher, senior executive vice president in charge of institutional trading at Oppenheimer & Co.  "Why should I risk money for a guy for who's paying me five cents a dance?  All you get is risk."  Lack of liquidity can also result from exchange "reforms."  Many traders say that "circuit breakers" put in place to damp volatility after the 1987 crash actually added to volatility when the stock market plunged Friday.  The circuit breakers caused a 30-minute shutdown in trading in Standard & Poor's 500-stock index futures contract as the markets were falling.  "With the futures-trading halt, you could only sell stocks" to cut exposure to the market, says a money manager.  "It was scary to people thinking that they couldn't get their trades off."  "It was like they put you in a room with a gorilla and told you there were three doors to exit," said one Chicago-based futures trader.  "Then they said, `By the way, two of the doors are locked.'"  The takeover mania also adds to volatility.  UAL Corp. is a good example.  Valued as a buy-out target, the airline stock was trading at nearly $280 a share.  When the deal ran into trouble, the stock tumbled; it closed at $198 yesterday.  Presumably, UAL is now trading closer to its value based on earnings.  By contrast, traditional buy-and-hold investors are unlikely to generate sudden price moves.  Scott Black, a value-oriented money manager who heads Delphi Management Inc., points out that for those who invest on fundamentals, "the value of a stock from day to day doesn't change all that much."  Some experts say markets aren't as volatile as widely assumed.  Hans Stoll, finance professor at Vanderbilt University, says the current volatility in U.S. markets pales in comparison to the 1930s, decades before derivative instruments such as options and futures were introduced.  "I just can't believe that the innovations in the financial market are causing any of this volatility," he says.  And Robert D. Arnott, president of asset allocator First Quadrant, notes that before Friday's tailspin, daily volatility on the New York Stock Exchange in recent weeks had reached "historically low levels."  Some people tend to ignore that a 50-point move is less in percentage terms than it was when the stock market was lower.  John J. Phelan Jr., chairman of the Big Board, asserts that "1988 and 1989 have been two of the least volatile years in the last 30 or 40 years."  But the low average volatility Mr. Phelan is talking about isn't any comfort in a period of rapid stock-market moves like the past week.  In addition, Sanford Grossman, a Wharton School finance professor, says volatile jumps in stock prices will continue as long as liquidity falls short of the voracious demands of institutions "who can go out and say `I have a billion dollars of stocks to sell.'"  Some people think the search for liquidity is fruitless.  In 1936, John Maynard Keynes wrote that "of the maxims of orthodox finance none, surely, is more antisocial than the fetish of liquidity."  It leads investors to focus on short-term price movements -- "a game of musical chairs," he called it -- rather than on long-term fundamental valuation.  ---  James A. White contributed to this article.  The National Aeronautics and Space Administration said a computer virus has infected one of its networks and is spreading anti-nuclear messages related to its Galileo space probe, which is to be launched today.  Charles Redmond, a NASA spokesman, said the agency discovered the virus on Monday on the collection of computer networks collectively called Internet and expected 100 university centers to be infected by today.  Although the network isn't connected to the computer systems that operate either Galileo or the shuttle, part of the network will carry analyses of Galileo data once the craft gets spaceborn.  Mr. Redmond said the intruder hadn't yet done any harm but the agency feared "garbage data could be substituted for real data."  He estimated it could take a day for a computer security manager to expunge the virus from a computer system.  The intruder, among the broadest yet to hit a research network, appeared to affect only Digital Equipment Corp. hardware that uses Digital's VAX/VMS operating system.  It is unrelated to the much-publicized virus that last year infected Arpanet, a much larger network used by researchers at universities, laboratories and government agencies around the world.  In the lingo of computer security, the NASA intruder is technically a computer worm, Mr. Redmond said.  A worm resides in the operating system of a computer and spreads by boring into other computers contacted through networks.  The Galileo worm apparently was hatched on a computer in France hooked up to NASA's Space Physics Analysis Network, Mr. Redmond said.  NASA said the Galileo worm hadn't affected its computers or the computers of other government agencies because they had modified their systems to reject worms.  But Mr. Redmond said the worm hit universities that hadn't elected to make the changes.  Michael Alexander, a senior editor at Computerworld, a trade publication, said he was told that the worm gets into a computer center by looking for obvious passwords -- such as ones that are the same as the user's name.  If it finds one and gets into the system, it will display a screen when a user logs on that says, "Worms Against Nuclear Killers. . . .  You talk of times of peace for all, and then prepare for war."  In addition, Mr. Alexander said, the worm sends strange messages to other machines at the center -- such as, "George Orwell was an optimist," or "Don't feed the bats tonight."  The worm also looks for elementary passwords that confer more privileges on the user.  The passwords are included in the system software when it is installed but are supposed to be replaced as soon as the system is up and running.  If it finds one of those passwords, Mr. Alexander said, the worm will do such things as change users' passwords to a series of random numbers, preventing them from signing on to the network.  NASA estimated that, on Monday, about four computer centers were affected.  Yesterday, the number grew to 40; today the number is expected to grow to 100.  NASA said it will take about a week before it knows exactly how many centers of the 6,000 connected to Internet were affected and the extent of the damage, if any.  Anti-nuclear activists have protested the launch of the Galileo space probe to Jupiter because it uses plutonium to generate the electricity needed to run the craft.  Activists fear that if the shuttle carrying Galileo into orbit should explode, or if Galileo itself crashes into the Earth during the two times it flies close to the planet, fatal levels of plutonium would be released into the atmosphere.  So far Galileo has been delayed twice, once because of a computer malfunction connected with a space-shuttle engine, and yesterday because of the weather.  NASA said the Galileo worm had nothing to do with either delay.  Mr. Alexander of Computerworld said hackers have gone after SPAN before.  He said the Chaos Computer Club, of West Germany, once managed to invade SPAN and do such things as change the value of pi, messing up some calculations.  It is now a commonplace that prosecutors are bringing criminal indictments in cases where until a few years ago only a civil action at most would have been brought.  Yet it is also axiomatic that the power to create new crimes belongs only to the legislature, and not to courts.  Beginning in the early 19th century, with U.S. v.  Hudson and Goodwin, the Supreme Court has repeatedly held that a judicial power to declare conduct to be against the public interest and hence criminal, while well established in British law, would usurp legislative authority under the doctrine of separation of powers.  That's the conventional theory anyway.  In practice, however, the line between interpretation and redefinition of the criminal law long ago began to blur.  In particular, a common law of white-collar crime has developed with surprising rapidity over the past decade.  For example, although insider trading has long been criminal, it has never been statutorily defined.  In 1983, the Supreme Court tried to supply a workable definition in the Dirks v.  SEC decision, which found that liability depended on whether the tipper had breached his fiduciary duty to the corporation in order to obtain "some personal gain" and whether the tippee knew or recklessly disregarded this fact.  Gradually, however, lower courts and prosecutors have pushed this definition to its breaking point.  Consider the facts underlying the 1989 conviction of Robert Chestman.  Prior to a tender offer by A&P for Waldbaum Inc. in 1986, the founder of the Waldbaum's supermarket chain called an elderly relative to tell her to assemble her stock certificates for delivery.  She called her daughter to take her to the bank, who, in turn, persuaded her husband, a Mr. Loeb, to run this errand.  Hearing of this information, the husband discussed it with his broker, Mr. Chestman, and Mr. Chestman then bought for his own account and other clients.  Basically, Mr. Chestman was a fourth-level tippee.  Did Mr. Loeb, his tipper, breach a fiduciary duty (and, if so, to whom)?  Did Mr. Loeb seek personal gain (and if so, how)?  Or did Mr. Chestman only hear a market rumor (which one may lawfully trade upon)?  The line seems awfully thin for criminal-law purposes.  A second illustration is supplied by the recent guilty plea entered by Robert Freeman, formerly head of arbitrage at Goldman, Sachs & Co. Essentially, Mr. Freeman had invested heavily in the Beatrice leveraged buy-out, when he was told by another prominent trader, Bernard "Bunny" Lasker, that the deal was in trouble.  After placing orders to sell, Mr. Freeman called Martin Siegel, an investment banker at Kidder, Peabody & Co., who was advising on the deal, to confirm these rumors.  Mr. Siegel asked Mr. Freeman who his source was and, on hearing that it was Bunny Lasker, responded: "Well, your bunny has a good nose."  The illegal "tip" of the bunny's good nose was then largely a confirmation of rumors already known to many in the market.  Had the case gone to trial the same issues would have surfaced: Was there a fiduciary breach in order to obtain personal gain?  Did Mr. Freeman have notice of this?  Finally, was the information material?  Yet, all these issues are subsidiary to a more central issue: Who is and who should be making the criminal law here?  It is not my contention that either Mr. Chestman or Mr. Freeman was an innocent victim of prosecutorial overzealousness.  Arguably, both were on notice that their behavior was at least risky.  But even if they behaved recklessly, reasons still exist to fear and resist this steady process of case-by-case judicial extension of the law of insider trading.  Courts and legislatures make decisions in very different ways and are each susceptible to very different kinds of errors.  After-the-fact judicial examination of an actor's conduct has always been the common law's method.  When only civil liability is involved, this method has the undeniable strengths of factual specificity and avoidance of overgeneralization.  Still, case-by-case retrospective decision making of this sort is vulnerable to the tunnel vision caused by a fixation on ad hoc (and usually sleazy) examples.  When a court decides that a particular actor's conduct was culpable and so extends the definition of insider trading to reach this conduct, it does not see the potentially enormous number of other cases that will be covered by the expanded rule.  Thus, a court is poorly positioned to make judgments about the social utility of the expanded rule.  For example, in focusing on Mr. Freeman's attempt to gain nonpublic information about a deal's collapse, one does not naturally think about the reverse side of the coin: What if the rumor had been false?  Can a security analyst call an investment banker to make certain that a seemingly improbable rumor is in fact false?  In the past, not only would reputable professionals have rushed to check out such rumors with the company, but companies listed on the major stock exchanges were encouraged by the exchanges to respond openly to such inquiries from securities analysts.  Today, after Mr. Freeman's plea, there is an uncertainty that is both unfair and inefficient.  In this light, the comparative advantages of legislative law-making become clear: (1) Before it acts, the legislature typically will hear the views of representatives of all those affected by its decision, not just the immediate parties before the court; and (2) the legislature can frame "bright line" standards that create less uncertainty than the fact-bound decisions of courts.  Although legislative lines can result in under-inclusion (which explains why the SEC has long resisted a legislative definition of insider trading), judicial lawmaking inevitably creates uncertainty because of the shadowy outer edges and implications of most judicial decisions.  At least when the stakes are high, uncertainty in turn results in overinclusion, as individuals do not dare to approach an uncertain line closely.  The federal mail and wire fraud statutes provide even better illustrations of the rapid evolution of a federal common law of white-collar crime.  In 1987, the Supreme Court attempted in McNally v.  U.S. to halt the inexorable expansion of these statutes by adopting a rule of strict construction for ambiguous criminal statues.  Yet, late last year, Congress effectively reversed this decision by enacting a one-sentence statute that defined fraud to include any scheme to deprive another of "the intangible right of honest services."  At a stroke, this may criminalize all fiduciary breaches (and possibly all misrepresentations by an agent or employee).  Such a statute illustrates the fundamental problem: Congress finds it is easier to pass sweepingly moralistic prohibitions, which the courts must thereafter interpret, than to engage in the difficult line-drawing distinctions that are inherently its responsibility.  We are confronted less with a judicial power grab than with a legislative giveaway.  Predictably, when confronted with morally dubious behavior, prosecutors will exploit the latitude such openended statutes give them.  Over the long run, however, sleazy cases will make bad law.  ---  Mr. Coffee is a professor at Columbia Law School.  Corning Inc. posted a 38% decline in third-quarter net income to $76.5 million, or 80 cents a share, from $123.9 million, or $1.37 a share, a year earlier.  The year-earlier figure included a one-time gain of $59.9 million from the sale of Corning's stakes in Japanese businesses.  Without the gain, operating profit was $64 million, or 71 cents a share.  The telecommunications, specialty glass, ceramic products and laboratory-services concern said the latest quarter included a tax-loss carry-forward of $600,000.  A year earlier, net included a $700,000 taxlow carry-forward.  Sales rose 14% to $715 million from $625.4 million.  Corning's chairman and chief executive officer, James R. Houghton, said operating performance continued to be strong in the telecommunications and health and science segments.  But the specialty-material segment slowed somewhat and consumer products continued below expectations.  As for joint ventures, Mr. Houghton said profit was "essentially flat" due primarily to a slow recovery at Samsung-Corning Co. in Korea following a strike at a major customer and the disruption of shipments to China.  Also, profit was hurt by the strength of the dollar overseas which negatively affected the company's currency-exchange rate.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading, Corning closed at $38.50, down 75 cents.  UAL, the hair-trigger stock that exploded Friday's market bombshell, briefly traumatized traders again yesterday.  Within 10 minutes after an 11:13 a.m. trading halt in UAL, parent of United Airlines, the Dow Jones Industrial Average plunged nearly 27 points to a 60.25-point deficit.  Computer-guided buying then kicked in, and the industrials regained 27 points in five minutes.  The lightning moves show that the stock market remains fragile and volatile -- ready to jump at the slightest rumor -- a few days after its shocking 190.58-point plunge.  Nervous investors continued to limit their buying to blue-chip stocks while dumping takeover-related issues.  The industrial average closed down 18.65, to 2638.73.  New York Stock Exchange volume was a heavy 224,070,000 shares.  Decliners on the Big Board outnumbered advancers, 931 to 658.  UAL was watched closely and traded heavily.  The stock tumbled 24 7/8 to 198 on volume of 2.8 million shares.  The market is still very touchy about rumors and news on pending takeovers.  UAL, which is trying to reconstruct a buy-out bid that banks wouldn't finance, represents the future of one of the most powerful ingredients in the bull market-corporate restructuring.  An important element of this phenomenon -- the now-shaky market for junk bonds, used often to finance restructurings and takeovers -- continued to cast a pall over stocks.  "It was a very nervous day," said John Geary, partner of the Big Board specialist firm Ziebarth, Geary.  The volatility won't end soon.  This Friday brings the "double witching hour," Wall Street's nickname for the monthly simultaneous expiration of a variety of stock index futures, index options and options on individual stocks.  Traders are already buckling their seat belts.  Previous monthly expirations of the Major Market Index futures and Standard & Poor's 100-stock index options have produced spectacular volatility.  "We are in one of those phases where you are going to get a lot of volatile expiration action," said Donald Selkin, head of stock-index research at Prudential-Bache Securities.  Investors were buying yesterday, but they were running scared to premier blue chips such as Procter & Gamble, which jumped 3 3/8 to 127.  Investors "are buying stocks that have predictable earnings," said Edward J. Laux, head of block trading at Kidder Peabody.  Along the way, investors dumped takeover stocks and shares of banks that have leveraged-buy-out debt and risky real estate loans on their books.  "These loans are more of a focus than lesser-developed-country debt now," said William Bee, senior block trader at Prudential-Bache Securities.  Chase Manhattan, which sold 14 million additional shares at 40 1/8 Monday through an underwriting group led by Goldman Sachs, closed down 1/8 to 40.  Citicorp fell 1/2 to 32, and Manufacturers Hanover slipped 3/8 to 40 1/4.  Chase and Citicorp's Citibank are involved in the UAL buy-out financing.  Both Citicorp and Manufacturers Hanover reported earnings yesterday.  In the first hour of trading, about one million shares a minute changed hands on the Big Board as big stock-index arbitrage sell programs pushed prices lower. (In stock-index arbitrage, traders buy or sell big baskets of stocks against offsetting positions in futures.) Traders said many of the sell programs are positions being established ahead of this Friday's expiration.  Aside from computer-guided selling, airline stocks took a beating as well.  The Dow Jones Transportation Average fell 49.96 to close at 1254.27.  AMR, the parent of American Airlines, continued to retreat in the wake of New York developer Donald Trump's decision to withdraw his $120-a-share takeover bid.  The stock fell 3 1/4 to 73 1/4 on 3.4 million shares.  Delta Air Lines fell 1 7/8 to 67 7/8, USAir Group dropped 3/4 to 40 1/4, Southwest Airlines dipped 1/2 to 25 and Alaska Air Group slid 3/8 to 24 1/4.  But Texas Air, the owner of Continental and Eastern airlines, bucked the group's decline by rising 7/8 to 14 5/8 in American Stock Exchange trading.  Eastern said it is ahead of schedule in resuming its operations after filing earlier this year for Chapter 11 bankruptcy protection, from which it expects to emerge early next year.  Philip Morris, the most active Big Board issue for the second consecutive session, was unchanged at 43 1/4 on 3.9 million shares.  Other blue-chip consumer issues also fared relatively well: PepsiCo rose 1 3/8 to 58 1/2; Coca-Cola Co. was unchanged at 66 3/4; McDonald's also closed unchanged at 30 1/2, and Merck rose 1/2 to 75 1/4.  Broader averages also fell.  Standard & Poor's 500-stock index fell 1.69 to 341.16, and the New York Stock Exchange Composite Index fell 0.88 to 188.89.  Among the takeover-related stocks that sold off yesterday were Disney, which closed down 2 1/8 to 121 1/4.  Philips Industries tumbled 3/8 to 22 7/8; Hilton Hotels fell 2 1/2 to 92 and Holiday Corp. fell 2 1/8 to 69 7/8.  Among other blue chips, Exxon gained 1/8 to 45 1/2.  International Paper fell 1 3/8 to 51 1/2, Union Carbide eased 7/8 to 25, Chevron gained 1/8 to 64, and Eastman Kodak closed down 3/4 to 44 1/4.  The only industry group to show a gain from the industrial average's record high on Oct. 9 is restaurants.  Among the three worst-performing groups, with declines of 10% to 20%, are airlines, casinos and securities brokers.  Trading also was heavy in the over-the-counter market.  The Nasdaq composite index closed down 1.05 to 459.93 on volume of 161.5 million shares.  "The environment is a lot more trading-oriented," said Gary Rosenbach, manager of equity trading at the OTC stock firm Needham & Co. in New York.  "Because there is a lot more volatility now, if guys see that they can make a quick 10% or 15% profit, they'll take it."  Compaq Computer gained 2 1/8 to 103 3/4 on two million shares, reflecting market optimism about the prospects for its newly introduced notebook-sized computer.  B.F. Goodrich dropped 1 3/8 to 49 1/8.  The company's third-quarter earnings were below both analysts' forecasts and the year-earlier level.  Blue Arrow added 1/2 to 17 1/4.  The British company plans to change its name to Manpower, the name of its U.S. unit, and write off part of nearly $1.2 billion in good will as a possible prelude to reincorporating in the U.S.  Dravo rose 5/8 to 16 1/8.  Shearson Lehman Hutton began its coverage of the company with favorable ratings.  Intertan jumped 2 1/4 to 56 7/8.  The company reported that earnings from operations for the September quarter were up about 25% from a year earlier.  Bay Financial, which said it may be forced to file under Chapter 11 if it can't reach an agreement with its lenders to relieve its debt burden, plunged 1 3/8 to 2 1/8.  The Amex Market Value Index fell 1.25 to 375.16.  Volume totaled 16,800,000 shares.  Among active Amex issues, the American depositary receipts of B.A.T Industries fell 1/4 to 11 3/4 on turnover of 885,800.  Investment bankers and retailers said the turmoil on Wall Street may benefit managers who plan to bid for U.S. retailing units of the British firm because takeover prices may not be as high as before the recent correction.  Fruit of the Loom slipped 1/8 to 12 3/8 on 501,200 shares.  DWG Corp. jumped 1 1/4 to 15 on 454,100 shares.  Carnival Cruise Lines Class A dropped 1 to 21 1/8 on 331,400 shares.  Amex issues with big percentage price gains included two Eastern Air Lines preferred stocks, reacting to the news about improved recovery in flight schedules after the company filed for bankruptcy protection.  Eastern's Class F preferred rose 12%, or 1 1/4, to 11 3/4; the Class E preferred gained 7%, or 5/8, to 10 1/4.  The biggest percentage gainer on the Amex was Enviropact, which jumped 23%, or 5/8, to 3 3/8 on volume of 29,000 shares.  On Monday, the company, a provider of environmental consulting services, reported a wider fiscal fourth-quarter loss and predicted a loss for its fiscal 1990 first quarter, but said a profit is expected for all of fiscal 1990.  But its auditor, Ernst & Young, said Enviropact's financial situation raises "substantial doubt about its ability to continue as a going concern."  Mission Resource Partners advanced 8%, or 1 3/8, to 18 7/8.  ---  Sonja Steptoe and David Wilson contributed to this article. 